Imagine Honduran Women makes Clothes in a Sweatshop... ing clothes....think of the Butlerian strategy of it all!Are they undoing gender? Wow! And on pennies a day, too!Think of the androgynous gay boy who might wear the same clothes as his bestest girlfriend. Think of the subversiveness of it all!Consider the fact that maybe the slave woman in Honduras made those clothes!How Butlerian, indeed!
Not a page turner. A friend recommended this book to me, so I picked it up.  From the start, I had to force myself to keep going.  I read the whole book, but I wouldn't recommend it
Lives not worth living. Other reviews give a good sense of the concretes of this book, so I'll just mention what struck me as the fundamentals:  the characters (and I do mean all of them) are pathetic: thieves and murderers; the setting is a dark, pointless future containing not a single real person with a real life; and the plot feels like a confusing tumble down a well.  Although Gibson is intelligent and quite creative, he seems to enjoy creating difficult, jargony prose (muddying the waters so that they appear deep?).  If this is one of the best in the cyberpunk genre, then the genre is not for me
BORING!. This book is a great disappointment.  I forced myself to continue on thru the first 300 pages and now I am getting rid of it.  What of waste of my precious reading time
Just a waste. Hi,I purchased this book, and found out I had wasted my money (by my own fault, i will admit).  There is nothing in this book that is useful.  Dissappointing...
She Made It Even Harder To Get By. Ehrenreich is the kind of journalist I despise. One who thinks her insights are so important that it doesn't matter how much she inconveniences others to make her point.She constantly drones about how difficult it is to find housing on the wages blue color workers earn.  The market is to tight, that oftentimes one has to use a huge percentage of one's pay to stay in hotels while looking for apartments.  Does that stop Ehrenreich from competing for those coveted apartments?  Of course not.  She has to do her research, and she is the only reliable subject she can find to satisfy her curiousity.  If jobs and apartments are so hard to come by, then leave those jobs and digs for the people who so desparately need them.  There is nothing one learns from Ehrenreich's experiences that one couldn't have learned from professional interviews of blue color workers.  But that would have taken away Ehrenreich's righteous indignation.Don't encourage this kind of writing.  See it for what it is. Gratuitous research that could have been easily conducted without firsthand experience.  And that while doing it, some very needy people were out of work and living in substandard housing conditions
Results Need Supporting Evidence. The Scientific Method applied to this book:1) Form a hypothesis:  Great managers do something differently than mediocre managers.2) Conduct an experiment:  Interview 80,000 managers.3) Analyze data: ???this step is missing???4) Draw conclusions: Write this Book.With the exception of the "12 questions", the authors make no attempt to back any their conclusions with the results of their study.  They make several insightful statements, such as "many managers say they would like to define the right outcomes."  However, they do not even attempt to tell the reader how the study led them to this statement.  Did 90% of the managers interviewed state this?  Did 60% of the great managers state this while only 10% of the mediocre managers did?  Does "many managers" mean 100 managers?  100 managers seems like "many managers" at first, but considering 80,000 were interviewed I 100 managers is a negligible amount.  The entire book consists of several rational statements that are not supported by their study.It seems to me that after conducting a huge study to find out what great managers do differently, the authors found almost no common trends.  However, since they put a lot of money and effort into conducting the study, they needed something to show for it and wrote this book.  If Buckingham and Coffman didn't claim this book was a result of "the largest study of its kind," I would say it offers some decent advice;  however, since it does make this claim, I wish they would have back up their conclusions so the readers would be able to determine how valid they are.
Silly. I found this book was written like a comedy but because it only made me laugh once it was just silly. Comedy is one of those itchy things that you either get it, and love it or you don't. I didn't. I found the dialect frustrating: It was supposed to be set in Kent but the dialect read more like northern England, you have to read it slower to work out what is being said and in doing so you lose your attention slightly which takes the edge off the humour to the extent that you're not even aware that humour is present. At least that's what it was like for me. Whatever the nasty thing in the cowshed was isn't explained in the end but you're left feeling that there is a hint of bestiality that didn't really suit the book, being or trying to be a comedy, hence the lack of explanation. I've given it two stars because when Gibbons takes a step back and looks at the overall picture she has a great way of describing scenes
Poor history lesson. I had to use this book in an undergraduate course. It is extremely biased and the author on many instances goes way over the line into editorializing. It is a poor example of true history but an excellent example of revisionist history. In chapter 9 the author states " But in history we care as much about what people believe to have happened as we do about the literal truth". Any time a historian puts as much emphasis on tales as much as fact they are on thin academic ice.
Too much aimless wandering. I stopped reading after 150 pages. There are three interwoven tales. The first of a serial murderer who wanders around trying to evade a supernatural monster, and his half-crazy ex-wife who seems to get off on the prospect of being killed. The second of a high-tech pirate ship that wanders around, kills a few people, tries to find out something about a mysterious device. The third about two men who only seem to wander around aimlessly. And the prose, which initially felt interesting, seems to wander around aimlessly, too. A pity, since a nice SF world shines through
Soapy. This is a soap opera that either wants to be literature, or was marketed as literature. It's a romance novel. Many people over a period of many years fall in love, get married, have affairs, grow up, grow old, and have children of their own. Though the characters are scientists, their crushes and affairs are no different from any others' (the book jacket says it's about "inner lives of smart people"). Regrets are a large part of their lives, though only one or two characters are well-drawn enough to be interesting and induce sympathy, and they have a terrible habit of not taking action when they can and want to. Large editing problems render this clearly a first novel, though I give it two stars for the apparent effort put into it
Disappointing. This reads more like a textbook for an interior design course.  It has little to do with the psychology of your own choice of home/setting.  Like another reviewer said, the idea seemed fascinating, but the book disappoints right away, if not for the setup alone; the author overuses the same phrases and form to setup her next example. It is as though this were her thesis for design school.  It could also pass for a really good new age book, that's how problem-centered it is.  If you have watched "Designing for the Sexes" on HGTV, you have read this book.  This book is only interesting and appropriate for interior designers, not for anyone seeking insight into our needs and choices when it comes to home
Is Christianity really interested in an equitable economy? (2.5*s). Ethics - that is, right and wrong - are not ordinarily considerations for economists when analyzing current economic functioning or in proposing measures for the future, although legal standards must be adhered to. This book is a rather uncertain effort to suggest the position that Christians should take concerning some of the aspects of economic life that are contrary to Christian ideals.The author basically accepts a capitalist, free-market economy based on private property and control and geared to constant growth with highly unequal outcomes as the only legitimate economic form. But it becomes immediately evident that an economy based on self-interest produces outcomes and side-effects that do not comport well with Christian ideals. Laissez-faire capitalist economies cannot produce any where near enough dignified jobs that permit all who can work to be lifted out of poverty and become full members of Christian society  - a significant concern of Jesus. At this point the author is unsure where to turn. He suggests that Christians should personally give voluntarily sufficient resources to alleviate poverty, yet he also seems to lend vague support to government initiatives despite an expressed reluctance for governmental intervention in the economy.In addition to the goods and services produced that make for a viable society, capitalistic enterprise also can degrade the environment and create hugely profitable businesses based on pornography and gambling with deplorable social consequences.The book leaves much doubt as to whether Christians should be that concerned about the state of capitalistic economies and their impacts on people. In the first place, Christianity eschews materialism, preferring to focus on a greater end. If Christians are "aliens and strangers on earth," as the author suggests, where is the incentive for remedial efforts? Furthermore, any efforts to plan for a better outcome are criticized as arrogant for failing to note that mankind consists of self-centered sinners. Perhaps the otherworldliness of Christianity and the rejection of empowered reasonable men is why the author does not really assess whether Christians are now addressing the deleterious consequences of capitalistic economies or make any concrete proposals as to how a Christian perspective can become ingrained in an economic system that focuses almost exclusively on profits.Curiously, the author actually analyzes the ramifications of laissez-faire capitalism quite well. The Structural Adjustment Policies that the IMF and the World Bank forced on developing nations that got into debt trouble in the 1970s and later are disgraceful. The huge inequalities resulting in very widespread poverty that are a part of the US economy is plainly laid out. However, in the face of all of this evidence concerning the dark side of capitalism, the author's reluctance to recommend more vigorous actions, even major revamping of our economic system, is not really understandable. Apparently, Christianity is not really meant to help mankind while on earth.
Where in hell is my book?. I odered this book a LONG time ago from one of the used Book Dealers
I wanted to like it. I wanted to like this book, I really did.  I thought it had many good ideas for inspiring writing and getting the creative process flowing; however, I found none of them novel.  I am not only a voracious reader but also avid attender of writing classes and workshops.   I earmarked this book at the top of my list because I thought that the reviews were great and the title was clever.  I was immediately inspired and excited to get into the book.  Once I started the book, I realized that I would have preferred to read a bit more before I stopped to workshop.  For me, the exercises became tedious and it was difficult to continue my flow from book to paper.  I suppose for the beginning writer who has never taken a workshop, this book may be a great introduction and very helpful.  If you have taken many workshops you may find the process cumbersome if not remedial.  I was too frustrated to finish the book and am taking another writing workshop class instead
This book is useless. This book certainly did not live up to the advertising copy I found on Amazon.com. I found this book to be very poor in terms of usefullness of the contents. It was all fluff and appeared to be aimed, at best, toward management level people who don't have the competence to make factual based decisions on equipment purchases. It not only did not provide facts or data, it didn't provide many clues about how someone trying to make a decision would go about fact based decision making with respect to EDM. The text was highly repetitive in nature. I found its strong advocacy of relying on the manufacturers of equipment for everything from operations knowledge to purchasing evaluation, to be insulting to my inteligence
This  book was sometimes interesting but. the plethora of percentages and numbers weigh it down. The views of the author were one sided and sometimes a little biased agaisnt the majority. This is a small quibble and does not really take away from the main message the author is trying to convey. This book is, however, quite an eye opener especially for those who believe that in this country all men are created equal. This book proves that it simply isn't so
Suspends your disbelief. Caveat - I wasn't exactly expecting to finish PE a die-hard believer.  That said, I was unprepared for how much of my skepticism stemmed from the authors' willingness to believe anything, and mask their suspension of disbelief as objectivity.According to legend, the US Navy conducted invisibility experiments on one of their ships during WWII.  Not simply invisible, the ship actually teleported from its berth in Philadelphia.  However, the little-understood process played havoc with the crew - even after the experiment's end, some crewmen would "blink" in and out of existence, become frozen in time or catch fire.  One man walked through a wall, never to be seen again.  Of course, the Navy denies the whole thing....While the legend places the story during the dark days of WWII, the legend itself began in the mid 1950's, with the publication of "The Case for the UFO" by Morris Jessup.  (Aknowledging that Jessup is no scientist, Berlitz & Moore nevertheless refer to him as "Dr. Jessup".)  Believing that propulsion of UFO's (and perhaps future human spacecraft) lay in solving Einstein's "Unified Field Theory", Jessup encouraged readers to press for research in that area. Jessup's book caught the attention of Carl Allen (AKA Carlos Allende), who spent the war in the Merchant Marine.  In a series of rambling letters Allen insisted that Einstein had solved UFT, and the solution was successfully used to cloak a USN warship in wartime experiments.  Though claiming to have witnessed the event from deck of a nearby freighter, Allen goes further than detailing his observation - exhaustively describing the travails of the crew, Einstein's seeming retraction of UFT, his admission to Bertrand Russel that UFT was complete but had to be suppressed at least until after WWIII, the identity of one of the chief scientists attached to the project, and that UFT had anything to do with the experiment.  To get his point across, Allen/Allende even forwarded a copy of Jessup's book (heavily annotated with his own theories, many having nothing to do with the Philadelphia Experiment) to the Office of Naval Research.  There it piqued the personal interest of at least 2 officers, and slowly became the story-that-wouldn't-die.  A few years later, a depressed Jessup was found dead in his car.  Allende/Allen became something of a cult celeb, sometimes retracting what he had previously claimed, often warning against the ominous dangers of UFT even as he seemed to beg others to look into it.Berlitz and Moore piece Allen/Allende together with what are supposed to be other pieces of a puzzle that will prove the Philadelphia Experiment actually occurred.  Instead, the result is far less than the sum of its parts: Berlitz and Moore place far more weight on any of the individual pieces than common sense would allow, and they find a better fit between the different pieces than you'd get in a jigsaw puzzle.  Nothing in PE lacks a more reasonable explanation than the authors can provide.  At the beginning, and towards the end of the book, the authors mention coming in contact with others who claim to have met alleged crewmembers of the ship involved in the experiment - but neither name nor any other convincing corroborating information comes out (Allende at least included his Merchant Marine ID in his letters).  The authors add to the puzzle, but never actually establish that the Philadelphia Experiment actually occurred.  An anonymous radar scientist, who doesn't claim to have worked on the project, clairifies how events would have had to occurr if the legend were true.  Another scientist - given a psuedonym because it would upset "the status quo" - describes wartime discussions on a project that we're supposed to believe developed into the Philadelphia Experiment.  Named "Rinehart" after a similar character in the novel "Thin Air" (a thriller inspired by the legend) the doctor describes discussions but never mentions witnessing the experiment, nor any discussions of its aftermath - obvious details for such a pivotal figure.  "Rinehart" never even mentions Allende, even though it had been Allende's letters that clued the authors into Rinehart's existence (under yet another pseudonym).  The authors never explain how they managed to find "Rinehart" - they need to protect his identity even though the government obviously knows who he is, and anybody else would have the same difficulty tracking him down as the authors of this book.  The authors describe how the experiments of another scientist in "electrogravity" never caught on despite their apparent success - suggesting they were suppressed.  Though Allende described reading stories about the Experiment's sailors in Philadelphia newspapers, the only article that could be found is obviously bogus: a xerox of an obviously fabricated article describing a bar-room brawl by sailors who mysteriously vanish -  but no mention of date, newspaper, or the reporter, norany specific facts in the article about the event, like the name of the bar or those of witnesses.  The authors make the barest efforts to answer the questions they raise, and then merely add more pieces to the puzzle, without explaining how one piece corroborates any others.  Though appearing critical and objective, it's impossible to believe that the authors haven't already settled on the idea that the experiment actually occurred - they explicitly question Allende, yet never express their doubts, let alone attempt to deal with our own.But what's the danger of that?  I mean, who cares if they can get their readers to believe the legend of the "Philadelphia Experiment".  Unfortunately, "Philadelphia" feeds on our prejudices of secret conspiracies, and relies on our willingness to do so with little prompting - never a positive thing.  Worse, it's not even interesting - barely substantive enough to raise the sort of questions that would make a more critical investigation a stirring story.
Never got the book. I waited for 4 weeks and never got the book, i tried to contact the vendor 3 different times with no response. I purchased the book somewhere else and I got it the next day. I am still waiting for my money to be returned
Sub Par Performance, Desperation Better. First off, Desperation and The Regulators is not the same story. Yes certain characters are used, (some in name only) but that's all apart of the pun involved. The Regulators is supposedly the discovered manuscript of Richard Bachman, about an evil entity named Tak, who telepathically terrorizes a small suburban Ohio town through the use of a child's television heroes. Desperation, on the other hand, is about a mistakenly discovered tommyknocker, (not to be confused with the SK novel by the same name) who can manipulate and posses other living beings in the fictitious town of Desperation, NV. (Tak is also the antagonist in this prose.)Without rehashing the synopsis of either book, this Stephen King fan enjoyed Desperation to a higher degree than The Regulators. In my opinion, the latter seems more of an extended short story and at no time did I find myself even remotely attached to any character presented in the material. Desperation however, was a more enjoyable read with a deeper plot line and thoroughly developed characters. If you happen to read The Regulators before Desperation don't fret. Neither book is in any kind of sequential order. Read one and think of the other as some sort of parallel universe.
Books do not quite cover it.... Why daughters need their moms, I don;t think this book quite get's it.   It seems more atitle, just so the authors can make some money off of it.    The so-called touching photos that show moms and daughters together do not really show any touching emotion that they are suppoed to convey.   I've seen better moving scenes of Daughters hugging their Moms in Orange Juice TV adds.   Sure, maybe the best was intented with this book, but it does not deliver
Still excellent, but old in the tooth, and preposterously overpriced. Well, I guess it's been a while since I've been a college student. I'm a crusty old amateur radio hobbyist now. I guess all college texts have ridiculous prices. This book used to be the best reference I've ever seen on basic electronics for non-EE's, and even for non-engineers. It's not much of a cookbook - instead, it will make you sit down and work through the fundamentals of the circuits you're designing or adapting. The second ed. is getting long in the tooth, and since the book is used as a college text, it's preposterously overpriced. The one terrible thing about the book is that there are no answers to the (otherwise excellent) exercises, and you have to pay out again to get answers to the questions you're not sure about. It will be interesting to see what the 3rd ed. looks like. Maybe I'll start a web site and publish the answers online
Not good, not good. This book is not good. The author's style is good but the story goes nowhere.The characters in the book are really more parodies of people rather than being fully developed.Waste of time
A Sight Better Left Unseen. This book chronicles a few years in the childhood of a young girl named  Hattie whose mother is a severe manic depressive.  Unlike other children,  Hattie and her brother, Freddy, operate more as caretakers than as  children.  They watch their mother and act according to her state of mind  for that specific day.  Pearl, the cook and maid, acts as surrogate mother,  nurturing the siblings with care and love as they grow older, something  their mother has never been able to do.  Pearl also acts as guardian to the  mother, keeping her from leaving the house in a frenzy when she is manic  and from killing herself when she is depressed.  Although this book was  easily read in a day, it was disappointingly bland and somewhat  anti-climactic.  I can't place exactly what it was - it just didn't build  up to a page-turning &quot;what-will-possibly-happen-next&quot; mindset and  I grew bored and apathetic towards the end which is highly unusual for me.   I would recommend it as a good, thought-provoking, informative book on  manic depression but certainly not as entertaining fiction
A Disappointment to Say the Least. As I sat here writting this review my rating dropped from a three star rating to a two star rating, and I now realize that all of my malice and discontent could have easily been diverted if the book were titled "Drawing People: A Technical Guide for Beginners" and mentioned nary a word about the clothed figure. Then if I had of stumbled upon this book it would have been an added bonus that the author took the time to outline some basics on clothing and drappery, instead of a full out disappointment. Not that I blame the author solely, most of the blame lies at my door. I was so overjoyed in finding a book that proclaimed it was specifically about drawing the clothed figure, Brune Hogath's book aside (another devastating disappointment), and that it was written by a professor from the Academy of Art, a school that I am still deciding on attending, that instead of going my normal route (ordering the book through the store, checking it out in person, and then ordering it online so I could get a fatty discount) I impulsively bought the book, only reading the book synopsis and barely glancing over the customer reviews (which all looked favorable). Now I realise my folly, and am yet determining whether I'll pay for it (i.e. keep the book).I guess what all of my harping boils down to is the lack of content instead of the quality, for I can easily discern Bradley is an excellent artist with years of knowledge garnered from experience, and I'd say that experience shows equally in all areas, not just clothing but in setting up a composition and following through. The problem is, at least in my opinion, that this book is supposed to specifically address clothing, and it doesn't for the most part. Roughly one fourth of the book pertains to clothing, the other three fourths talk about:how to properly hold your drawing implement, how to properly position yourself if you are drawing                                 from a live modle, maintaing a daily sketchbook, researching your subject matter, the relationships between       the head neck and shoulders, drawing hands, drawing feet, drawing eyes, and a whole slew of other. . .I wouldn't say irrelavent, because they are relavent, but not neccessarily the most important topics pertaining to drawing the clothed figure.A refernce guide on clothing should discuss a plethora of clothing materials, and Bradley does on one page with chicken scratch detailing. It should outline some of the rules when dealing with how clothes tend to fit people of varying body tips, again something Bradley discusses on one single page. The differnce between water logged clothing and dry clothing, she didn't bother mentioning that. How pants typically bunch up while you're walking seen from the head on, profile, three quaters, and back view, another topic she failed to mention. Some examples of evening/ formal attire vs. day clothes, how clothing reacts when the subject is in motion, how jackets restrain your actions and bunch up, the effect of wearing multiple layers at once, achieving that perfect windswept look, and all manner of other topics that should appear in an artistic clothing refernce guide.Maybe I'm being too harsh on Bradley, after all she does mention in her preface that there aren't a whole lot of books pertain to drawing the clothed figure, and compared to the standard "how to. . ." books she's leaps and bounds ahead of the rest. Oh yeah, that's another thing, she doesn't outline any steps on how to achieve a realistic rendering like- first start out with a cone pointing upward then draw a sphere at the bottom/base. The sphere represents the weight of the gathered cloth so the stress lines originate from the tip of the cone and travel down the length eventually enveloping the sphere. Note the ripples. -or some junk like that. Back to me not being to harsh on Bradley, I guess in reading she is/was a professor in the arts I thought she would have some understanding of the common impediments modern day artist face when depicting clothing.For all who have read this drawn out rant, two maybe three people, and think I'm all talk, trust me if I had the skills I'd come up with my own series of "How to draw. . ." books and address all of my issues. As is I'm pretty good at drawing dynamic figures, but the second I add clothing they become flat, lifeless caricatures and I don't see this book as alleviating my shortcomings much. As is my own artistic habits (drawing from magazines, online pics, and occasionally stepping outside of my cave to draw people in motion) are a match for the few helpful hints in this book. You're better off doing what you've always done plus artistically drapping to a wall or over a piece of furniture from time to time then buying this book.If you do know of a book that addresses even half of the afore mentioned topics, if you could write a review mentioning them, somehow recommend them to me or whatever I'd be eternally in your debt
Do Not Read This Book. I couldn't find any good reading material, so I read Bloods instead. That was a big mistake. This was possibly the worst written piece of literature I have ever had the misforture to read. The book was repetitive, the underlying theme was a crock, and the book was more of a colorful adventure novel than an oral history. All in all, it was a terrible book
Not so great... While there is some good information in this book, I found the author's style disjointed and a little odd, making much of the book difficult to wade through.  Also, there's a strong emphasis on UFO sightings, so unless you've got a keen interest in that subject you might find yourself skipping quite a bit of the book
A real disappointment. An admiring though shallow and poorly written account of a unique American genius. Though salted with several good anecdotes, Gordon's book mostly relies on the research and interviews of others and ultimately does little to explain McKinley Morganfield's life and times. For a writer who presumes to account for the life of a musician, Gordon's descriptions of various Waters recordings are especially poor. Far far better is his video documentary of the same name. One suspects the book is the assembled notes of that project
Read the back carefully. In a rush I read the great reviews on the back of the book and thus decided to start reading this book but I soon realized the great reviews are not justified by this book. I took another look at the back and saw that the reviews are ment for the author's "The Bookseller of Kabul". If I had not been misled she might have gotten another star from me
Stunk. Although it had some good parts (hence the 2 stars), it was very bad overall.  Most of the book was garbage that consisted of applying theories of finance and psychology to why he lost money on WorldCom and to use those theories to justify his losses, almost saying "it wasn't my fault, look at rule 6, thats why I lost money".  If you want to learn about the stockmarket, I wouldn't reccommend you do it from someone who bought worldcom (and WCOM options outright)all the way down, only a few years ago!
Not Fun Activities and it Falls Apart!. I bought this for my daughter thinking there would be actual activities.  I was way wrong.  There are 365 different things to look at and point out, but not any kind of games or learning activites (other then pointing to blue and red).  Also, the pages are thin and it is spiral bound so my 19 month old has now destroyed about half the book.  I would go for something else
Read it in one night. This book is really for those who are in the beginning stages of *thinking* about getting into mystery shopping and covers the barest of basics.  It does include the information for many companies so that one can immediately start filling out applications, but all this information can be found on the MSPA and [...].When I purchased this book, I bought it in the hopes that it would be more of an actual 'manual'.  I was looking for guidance about the verbiage that companies want used in their reports.  If that is also what you are looking for, pass on this book as it does not really address this much needed information.It also appears by the number of pages that the book is loaded with information, but the font is so big that the number of pages is very deceiving (roughly 3 pages of this book would equal 1 page in a  regular book.)Not to slam the book - it is a good read for someone thinking about getting into mystery shopping, but not for anyone that's done any mystery shopping already.
Good Start.. But tThe Rest Was Bad. I was very disappointed with this book.  There were some good reviews but I found that the story could not deliver.It started off good, a good murder mystery, I was excited to see what would unfold...  I kept waiting for the book to get exciting or suspenseful or to get attached to one of the characters but it never happened.The whole book was, to me, a lot of filler and the end was anticlimactic
Left me feeling wanting......... Somehow, if I had spent the time reading the book a little before purchasing, I wouldn't have bought it.  He talks extensively about competition rigs, rules, etc. which I had no interest in. I have yet to see a gun rag writer talk honestly about guns. Ever see a bad review in ANY of the gun magazines
Racist. I remember my teacher reading this book to me in the first grade.  I thought it was the most racist book I had ever seen or heard & could not understand why someone would write something like that & think it was okay or to read it & think there's nothing wrong with it.  I am a 32 yr old african american woman now & I wouldn't dream of reading this to my children because it does not depict true african or african american children.  It's only a stereotype of how some people, who may have some racism in them, view us.  Now if you want to read a better version of this story, then you should read Sam & The Tigers.  A retold version of Little Black Sambo, written by Julius Lester.
Groomers beware. This is an ok book for new people, but it has several safty issues, and doesn't have the show cuts for many dogs, poodles. It also has the wrong cuts from some of the dogs. There are better books out there
Too broad and lacks depth. This is something for a new manager with little experience in not only systems administration but supervision.  This book may give a clue to someone who has just stepped into such a position but provides little depth and direction.  Unfortunately, there isn't any one book out there as management is a very complex role that encompasses many disciplines, any one of which would be a volume in itself.  I was very dissappointed and I find the other reviews misleading
Dreadfully Boring. How can a best-selling author like Simon Winchester take an event as exciting as the San Francisco Earthquake of 1906 and turn it into a tedious snooze-fest? One answer: write as if you had just discovered an adjective mine and were free to throw in extra descripitive terms on every line until listeners scream for an end to florid phrases. Another: strive to break the record for most clich?s in a single paragraph. Finally: write about events in 1906 as if no one but Simon Winchester had ever before thought about their consequences -- thus, everything in this tedious narrative becomes about Simon. Simon and the raccoons; Simon on the failing American economy; Simon attempting to reproduce American accents. This is a CD set for avoiding
BUYER BEWARE. I am a man with DID and I found this book insulting to those who truly suffer from its effects.  The book was written with an attempt to read like a novel.  The author obviously fills in many trivial events with specluations.  Since the Mr. West was NOT co-conscious for much of the book, he fills in the missing details with fluff and extremely poor writing.  The book is easy to read since it was written on a 5th grade level.  My eleven year old could easily sit down and read this.  The constant swearing and profanity left me baffled as to why the author decided to insert offensive language.  It didn't further the plot or define himself.  If it was an attempt to show the reader that he was a tough guy dealing with DID, it missed the mark since he spends most of the book refusing to take any responsibility for his actions, his family, and his diagnosis of DID.The author spends most of his energy attempting to create a gripping story around his DID which falls flat in many of its 300 pages.  Not only are his sessions not realistic, but he paints his DID as debilitating deciding that he cannot work or take care of his family or even his young son.  The wife decides to work and puts the son in day care so that the father does not have to do anything but lay around with a blanket and toys and moan.  In truth, people with DID get up in the morning, dress, go to work, make dinner, help with homework, fix the plumbing, etc.  This is not an accurate portrayal of someone with DID.  Life with DID is hard and devastating, but DID is not an excuse to quit life.  Instead, all of life's responsibilities actually helps the person with DID to be in the present.I found the therapy techniques in this book more consistent with DID therapy than in Fractured Mind.  However, Mr. West was not able to find a therapist who gave him the dose of reality that he needed until the last few chapters. The first therapist never encouraged Mr. West to be present or taught him the skills he needed to be present and function as an adult.  This obviously gave Mr. West the green light to whine and whimper through most of the book.  At the end of the book I became very concerned about Mr. West entering the field of psychology and leading others down the his distorted path of healing.In short, I find the book poorly written with a great amount of offensive language, a contrived storyline with an abundance of holes, and an inaccurate portayal of someone who struggles with DID.  I am concerned that readers of this book will assume that there is important information within the pages that will help them. It will only assist the reader in becoming more confused about the disorder.The Dissociative Identity Disorder Source Book is still the best book that will help anyone learn about what DID is and how to deal with it.  Energies should be spent reading viable material that will explain, teach and help those with DID and their support. Please do not get sucked in by the media hype and the over effulgent swooning of others who obviously have dealt very little with DID. For respect of those who daily brave the storm of DID, do NOT buy this book.  You've been warned.
Not only "same old, same old"... but inaccurate. I have read all of the Kennedy biographies and there is very little new information in this biography.  The first part has been covered in all of the others, and the second part has been covered in the tabloids, which makes we question the accuracy of anything here that has not been lifted from another source.  I noted two parts of this book that do not appear to be in keeping with what has been well documented.  1.  The books states, that on April 4, 1968, Caroline was in her classroom when a teacher came in and whispered to her teacher that Martin Luther King had been shot. Quick research on the Web states this happened at about 4:30PM EST..Are 11 year olds in class at that time?  2. The books states that when visiting the White House JFK Jr. told then President Nixon, that he used to play under his desk.  Everyone knows that the famous Kennedy desk was removed when he died, and not used again until it was brought back by President Clinton
OH GOD SAVE US FROM HIM!!!!!!!!!!!. NOT again!!! another get &quot;broke&quot; real fast from the guy who got sued out of dozens of states and lost how many millions then filed bankruptcy too??? And you're gonna take his advise?? YOUR not really are you??? ARE WE THAT BLIND??  Anyone who HAS lasted on Wall street wouldn't even waste their time with one single thing he has to offer, not one! That's why they have lasted and he got sued just before his bankruptcy. You have absolutely gotta be kidding me..... Why do you think he got sued so many times and in so many different places??? He gave extremely dangerous and lethal advise like &quot;go on margin&quot; and double your winnings. Great advise there pal!! Wade cook gives the highest risk strategy advise that has the most disasterous consequences. Look at his track record!!! Ask anyone who listened and HOW MUCH did the MAJORITY LOOSE??? JUST THAT!!! From his advice formulas. Now he is saying red &amp; green light WHAT HOW WHY ??? Based on what? A gut feeling? What a dumb tactic. Why don't floor traders use his advice? Do money managers? Do credible people like the Stock doctors? HELL NO!! Not even close. You must be a second generation of greater ignorance than the last batch of them. It's your money at the hands of someone who got sued, filed for bankruptcy and lost millions in recent years. WOW!!! What next????? WHAT NEXT??????? DANGER!! Get ready for the next wave of it
Hardly as original as Blood Music. And the micros are psychologically too much like people.  But it does raise a number of interesting points, and it's a fun read.  And I wanted to give it 3 stars, but Amazon is insisting on two
This Is Not Leather Bound !. Great book, but Amazon have made a serious mistake in the description.  They say it is "Leather Bound".   It is most definitely NOT leather bound.  It is leatherette, which is not leather.  Leatherette is fake leather made from some kind of plastic.  Don't be fooled.  IT IS NOT LEATHER BOUND.  I bought one and was very disappointed.  I told Amazon, but they didn't want to know and I see they are still advertising it as leather when it is not
Yes, it did have some humorous remarks... Since I've read and enjoyed an earlier book by these authors (Why Men Don't Listen and Women Can't Read Maps) I didn't hesitate to grab this one off the shelves. What a waste of money! They just repeat a lot that was said in the book I already had. Also, of all the "facts" that are stated I know for sure that at least three of them are total fiction or at best hearsay (these are the only three where I'm an expert) which seriously makes me doubt the validity of the remaining facts. I found this book a very irritating read.
A mermaid reference book for the easily pleased. Love research on folklore. And compilations of myth or legend.But this struck me as the 'ultra-lite' version. This book is not outstanding or special in any way. Suggest readers (whether child or adult) get this from the library before they decide to spend any money for their own copy. Glad I did. There are plenty of other mermaid books that contain stunning art and text.
Factual and typographical errors. After the third or fouth factual error (I teach Ethernet technologies) and the fifth or sixth typesetting error (missing or partial paragraphs) I finally tracked down the publishing house and told them of my disappointment.  They sent out another book (without the typesetting errors), but it didn't set my mind at ease about the factual errors
"Pop" psychology at its worse... ...Mr. Jensen and his wife have developed a veritable cottage industry replete with workshops, seminars, presentations, publications, certifications -- if you've got the money then they have something to sell you...and all of it is centered around what is termed "brain-based learning"...but what this book presents is little more than 400 pages of scientifically unsubstantiated claims and recommendations...for example, it claims that the color yellow somehow enhances intellectual performance and, hence, classrooms should be painted yellow...however, he doesn't offer a shred of evidence to back that claim up...it's all just ridiculous...how does this stuff ever make it into print
Truly awful book for discussing so many nobodies. The part about the plain soldiers of the revolutionary war being dealt with so much in detail is boring and tedious. Better to have written about the founding fathers of the US Army who were at least colonels in the army's birth.
Paint Shop Pro 8 Power ... Not. This book really needs a Glossary. The author assumes too much -- including that the reader has PSP 8's Manual (one does not if the program is bought online and downloaded). One cannot start a project in this book if you do not know where to begin. I have been using PSP 7 for two years and recently got PSP 8, and this book has given me very little help. Look for something that at least has a solid overview or foundation (it does not have to be intro to)
Fall, Fall, Charlotte. Susanna Rowson's &quot;Charlotte Temple&quot; is not the first novel and certainly not the last to deal with the topic of the morally fallen woman. Poor, pitiful Charlotte finds herself in the midst of an immoral and unforgiving world where one transgression sends her on the road to permanent ruin.          Rowson encases her heroine Charlotte Temple within a world of virtue and vengeance. Charlotte has no possible means of escaping her inevitable fate because the author/narrator makes it clear from the onset that she has written this story as a lesson to young woman. She has no real interest in Charlotte as a dimensional character. Charlotte simply serves as a symbol of lost virtue and symbols do not have real emotions or feelings.           &quot;Charlotte Temple&quot; was written in 1794 and became one of the first best sellers of the newly formed America. A morally abhorrent woman who pays for her sins almost always guaranteed a best seller in the eighteenth century and now &quot;Charlotte Temple&quot; has been rediscovered and published in a Scholarly Press edition.          Was this reclamation of Charlotte really necessary? In the past twenty years, feminist scholars have rediscovered authors and texts that have gone out of print or been totally ignored by the literati. Authors such as Anne Plumptre, Frances Burney, Aphra Behn, Sarah Fielding and Charlotte Lennox have been dusted off and given new literary lives. Feminist scholar Cathy Davidson has taken Charlotte Temple in hand and aims to join Rowson to the above list of rediscoveries.          Unfortunately, Rowson does not warrant such treatment. Rowson has a flat, humorless approach to the fallen woman story. Unlike Burney's &quot;Evelina&quot; or &quot;Camilla,&quot; Rowson does not imbue her narrative with needed levity.  Her pedantic iron-fisted preaching smothers the modern reader in a moral morass that confounds rather than illuminates.           In many of the fallen women stories, authors would use the genre as a subversive technique to criticize the patriarchal structures. Rowson does engage in such subversion within the novel. She seeks to preach to the young women who may fall victim to the unscrupulous man -- in England and America, it was not considered altogether lady-like to read a novel, so Rowson would be preaching to young women who had already transgressed.          Rowson does not criticize men within the novel. She does not censure Montraville for taking Charlotte as his mistress, impregnating her and abandoning her for a wealthier woman. When he believes that Charlotte has becomes his best friend's mistress, he does not believe that she would soil her reputation even though she has ruined her life by engaging in an illicit affair with him.          He aims to enact revenge upon the friend for acting &quot;dishonorable&quot; against her. Yet if he had not acted dishonorably towards her, she would not have been reduced to a penniless, pregnant ex-mistress scrounging the streets for food and shelter. He never takes responsibility for his role in Charlotte's downfall.  Rowson had the perfect opportunity for savage criticism of the patriarchy with Montraville but she fails to take it.           Instead, Rowson places the blame for Charlotte's ruin on the women within the novel. When Charlotte leaves the safe bosom of her morally upstanding family, she enters into the deviant world of the female who fail to protect her from licentious men.          Madame Du Pont errs in judgment by hiring the morally loose Miss La Rue. Madame Du Pont sets Charlotte's downfall in action. Rowson does not punish the ignorant Madame Du Pont by killing her, she ends up an hysterical mess after the Montraville/Charlotte &quot;elopement.&quot;          Miss La Rue, the woman who pushes Charlotte into the arms of Montraville, must be punished for being a promiscuous woman. She ends up poor and begs for her last scrap of food. She ends up dying painfully as Rowson takes the opportunity to lecture her readers on the improper behavior of loose women.          Why would modern readers want to read this? I do not think any intelligent would reader would want to subject themselves to the depressing experience of reading this novel. At 125 pages, it seemed to progress at such an excruciating pace. No character has any shadings. There are no subplots to divert the attention from the static Charlotte. Rowson does nothing to keep our interest.          Unfortunately Rowson has become a heroine to feminist scholars for her feat as the first American woman to have a best-selling novel. That accomplishment is noteworthy as literary trivia, but it does not make for engaging reading
What A Joke!!. What's wrong with all you Amamzon reviewers?I actually quite liked Shutter Island but this was total garbage. The morose tone is totally overdone throughout, and the end is pathetic. The interesting situtation setup in the first chapter is never satisfyingly integrated with the rest of the story.Avoid
Very disappointing. Not a spy thriller, but a novel about self-absorbed middle-aged men who happen to be former spies. Which is fine, except the book is sold as a thriller, and the blurb is full of praise for the "tension" and "pace". Talk about false advertising! The story really only gets going in the last 70 pages or so, and then it suddenly ends without any resolution.Even considers as a character study with no pretensions as a spy thriller, this book disappoints. It's far too full of annoying "What-ho old chap" overgrown "public" (i.e. private) schoolboys, and the main characters are totally unsympathetic; Cranmer is a sad sack, Pettifer (encountered only in flashback) is a narcissistic boor, and Emma (likewise only seen in flashback) is a vacuous airhead.Thirty years ago, Le Carre might have taken this premise and made something worth reading out of it. Once every hundred pages or so, there is a flash of his former skill, which only makes the book more disappointing
I can't see a target audience. Lots of paper, but not much information. Many things are scrated on the surface, but not in a way you can really use something. As an experienced developer on other plattforms (Java,--ix) I wanted an overview of the OS and the API's. The book failed here totally. I think I got 2 usefull snippets of information from the first 300 pages, when I decided its a waste of time, to go on. And additionally some Java-examples are close to wrong (the reflection example)
Save your money. This book is too generic and full of platitudes, plus poor grammar and typos. The sloppy editing gets worse at the end of the book. For anyone over 40 who has ever done martial arts, there is nothing new here. For anyone who is just beginning in their 40s or later, it is okay but not great. If you are into fitness or are even aware of your body and have anything resembling an active lifestyle, you will be disappointed.The first four chapters are a waste of space - why fitness is good; the fact that exercise, diet, and mental attitude contribute to health; that most people over 40 resist exercise because it is work and can hurt; etc. Most of the rest of the book discusses the changes in fitness you can expect when you are older, and tells you to keep your chin up and not give up even if tempted. There is also not nearly enough specific information on how to compensate for various physical limitations due to injury, etc. that prevent a full range of motion for many older martial artists.The only thing I found of value was Chapter 19 Sparring: a few recommendations on how to modify sparring technique to compensate for a loss of power, speed, flexibility, and agility for the older martial artist. Most of it was fairly obvious (circle away from your opponent to avoid being hit!), but there was some good info about disrupting the fight rhythm and using a few simple techniques that you know well and that work for your particular body.The book finishes with some guidance on meditation and mind/body connection. A good final chapter would have been how to know when to call it quits and stop training for good, or at least change styles to something easier on the body like tai chi.If I had glanced through this at Barnes and Noble, I would not have bought it. You can have mine
Doesn't Compare. This book does not compare with 1) Atlas Shrugged, or 2) The Fountainhead.  In my opinion, those are two of the finest books ever written.  If you haven't read them, put We the Living aside and read them now.I could not finish We the Living.  I got sick of the stupid relationship.  I guess I got about 1/4th the way through.  Maybe my tastes are changing
AWFUL. Despite coming up with possibly one of the greatest ideas of the 20th century, Byatt, in all her annoyingly feminist glory, has failed completely to construct anything which might in any way interest even the most inanely boring person on the face of the planet. Each and every character is lacking in charisma, humour and, in fact, any other attractive facet about their personality, offering the reader no interest or reason for empathy, thus leaving no hero, so necessary to such a story.Then there's the sub-plot literature which was all, unfortunately, written by the woman herself. To interlink the text with poetry and letters is, admittedly a good idea, but the quality is dire. Could it be more pretentious to fill a book with sections that the author herself admits will not be read by most? And chapter 10...just too long. So unneccessary.This is, without a doubt, the single worst book I have ever had the misfortune to read, and would recommend it to no-body other than those who consider suicide by boredom a good idea
Less than I had hoped for. I picked up, Sheldon Cashdan's The Witch Must Die: The Hidden Meaning of Fairy Tales because I had an idea for a fairy tale inspired short story and wanted to do a little bit of research. I gleaned a few insights from the pages of the book, but mostly found it did not live up to all my expectations.The book is classified as pscyhology and Cashdan makes the case for fairy tales offering psychologists and patients insights into psychological problems. This was something I had a hard time swallowing, but then maybe this has something to do with my lack of conviction in pscyhology.There are a lot of fairy tales out there, and there's no way Cashdan could possibly be expected to offer a full analyzation of each one, but he does base his conclusions on a very small sampling of fairy tales, to the point that some of what was said seemed a bit repetitive.There was also far too much time discussing the movie versions, particularly the Disney versions of many of the stories. While a comparison of Disney movies to their original tales would make an excellent subject for a book, in The Witch Must Die it only serves to confuse the issue.So, I will continue with my fairy tale research. I have a volume containing the complete Brothers Grimm fairy tales which I intend to get to one of these days and a couple of weeks ago picked up a copy of Uses of Enchantment: The Meaning and Importance of Fairy Tales by Bruno Bettelheim, which Cashdan had referenced a few times, at a used book sale
The Book of Pretentiousness. Nothing can prepare you for this work. No one in the history of literature has written with more pretentiousness and self-indulgence. How Pessoa can present himself as both pathetic and heroic at the same time is a miracle of narcissism. In contemporary terms this is like an adolescent blog. He dismally attempts to disguise his platitudes as lyrical profundity
Couldn't finish-. First of all, I must say I did not finish the book, despite its minimal size.  I began reading this book because I am very interested in Art History, and reading historical fiction.  This novel is based on Vermeer's painting, "the Music Lesson".  I found very few references to Vermeer at all in the novel, and was very bored with the story line.  Granted, I did not read all the way to the finish, but I was so bored with the story thus far, I couldn't.
Bad Theory, Worse Practice. Dr. Moats' theories have been excitedly received by politicians (particularly those with very strong conservative views) and slavishly followed by publishers.  These interests claim her work to be informed by scientific research and met by strong results.Sadly, not only is Dr. Moats' classroom experience and research questionable, she also fails to take any notice of linguistic theory.  Most damagingly, she is an adherent to the widely discredited theory of language deficit hypothesis.  This theory, which was stunninngly debunked by Labov in the 1950s, states simply that children who speak dialects other than Standard American English lack a true language and require both remedial education and lots of phonics.Dr. Moats seems entirely unaware of this hypothesis' thorough debunking, since she never bothers to make any kind of argument as to why she believes it to be true.  This arrogance is problematic
Buy the 2nd Edition, this is a rip off. Buy the 2nd edition this is a 2 book rip off with no CD.  The 2nd edition is the whole book with the BSD CD. This is not even 1/2 of what the 2nd edition was. And you can get the 2nd edition for $5.00 today!!  If you order DO NOT ORDER FROM CAMIN BOOK, I have been waiting 32 days on them. They do not answer e-mail and they have my cash, another thing is they are out of the USA, i.e. Camin Ilands so you can't do anything about the rip off.
Disappointing. I was in the mood for &quot;chick lit&quot; when I picked this book up, so was predisposed to enjoy it.  But although it had amusing moments, I was fairly bored throughout.  None of the characters are really defined, and the main character is derivative of far too many other books, television shows and movies.  There are better &quot;Bridget Jones&quot; ripoffs out there
Not a Whole Lot on Homeowners Insurance. I bought the book thinking that I'd be getting detailed information about homeowners insurance but the author merely glosses over the subject matter.I think he's an agent and, as such, doesn't have that much experience when it comes to the information I need, such as claims (particularly mold since I was just cancelled as a result of filing a mold claim), how to interpret specific policy language, etc
2 1/2 stars. Decent starting point for cooking-impaired college students if they don't mind eating eggs and potatoes often.  A little more variation in the recipes would be nice as well as some pointers on how to substitute ingredients and an explanation on why some ingredients do (What is the purpose of using cornstarch?  I know, some of it is common sense, but heyyyyyyy.... I'm a stupid college student). For example, for one recipe for frying chicken, I used pork and it tasted fine.Also, some of the recipes don't really work.  Baking chicken drumsticks at 375 degrees in the oven for 40 minutes is not enough for thoroughly cooked chicken.On the upside, the cooking tips were really helpful.  The book could use more of those, like be aware that if you heat oil, it pops and it could land on your face or burn your arm.Overall, this book provides some ideas, but I wouldn't rely on it too much.  Not really worth the purchase.  Flip through it in the bookstore like I did and save some bucks for uhhh.... buying food. =
title misleading. there was hardly any mention of Pixel the cat, it was alot of dialog, tried to resemble a fast paced action book, but I found myself skimming over alot of the text after a while.......for a female I like action and for the plot to move along........there was too much about dumb sexual innuendos about swinging, and multiple partner sex.I felt like the over tone to the book was "well ok we all have alot of sex with LOTS of different people in the future" it was too focused on that ...I liked "Stranger In a Strange Land" alot better. By the time I was through with this book I kind of felt almost like he was just slapping stuff on a page.
Less than was led to believe by the other reviewers. I love art and SF fantasy illustration and I am an admirer of Lovecraft's writing skill and imagination. The cover art on the book is great! The interior work does not suffer for quaility, so why the low review?Because I found the book itself disappointing, it lacks inspiration. I have seen most of the images online. I don't doubt that many of the artist are fellow fans of Lovecraftian lore and imagery, but they (as far as I know) got paid to paint these illustrations for the CoC card game, hardly a paeon to the muses.To be fair, I was warned by several of the reviewers of what the contents amounted to, it was the reviewers who were gushing about a book with a fair amount of mediocre art work that I could have paid less heed to.If you are desperate for Cthulhu related images, get it. If your merely curious, let it pass.
Unbiblical and bad writing make for one star. This book is so flawed in every which way, it is hard to know where to begin. First of all, we are living in the end times, and when Jesus comes, that's all she wrote, folks. There's no seven years, no Christians being zapped up, etc. This is our Second Chance on Earth. No tribulation. This book takes figurative visions and tries to apply it literally, and does it poorly. Reading this book made me think that if this was true, then what's the point of trying to be a Christian. Why not just live your life the way you want to, and then when people zap out of thin air, change your life. It's ridiculous and sends the wrong message. Plus, the writing is for second graders with no redeeming characteristics to it. But I really don't think the author's care at this point (seeing how many millions they've made printing lies). My recommendation is to read the bible instead of this series; then you'll get truth and the bible is probably shorter (and much better writing). Man, not even Kirk Cameron could save this train wreck
Disappointing. I had high hopes for this book as I thought it would address spirituality in a humanistic way.  At first, I thought I agreed with the 'accepting of self' philosophy, but gradually statements made by the author just didn't ring true.  I kept on thinking that maybe I was resistant to the reevaluation of my own thought processes, but gave up when the author spoke of a patient who found out her husband was cheating on her and the author's response was that she had control issues (!?!) and was acting like a victim.  I think at that moment, perhaps she feeling victimized.  But instead of telling her to 'embrace her victim', she is a control freak. Then he presents depression like it is some kind of choice, instead of a chemical imbalance.  Perhaps depression can spawn creativity, but you have to be able to get out of bed first -- and that is a problem.  I gave up on the book after that
Disappointed. OK - I went into this book hoping it would be a James Michener-type epic with sweeping characters and a grand sense of the rich field of Middle Eastern history since World War II. What I got was a romance novel about 3 men's boring love lifes and their boring affairs with a little war thrown in for spice.The book starts out well but becomes hopelessly sappy. In addition, I was irritated that the story was told exclusively from the Israeli point of view (undoubtedly since I was hoping for the more-inclusive Michener-type approach). I stopped reading about halfway through.My grade: F
Another self-indulgent Heinlein novel. Heinlein loads this book up with hooks in the early pages to catch your attention.  Unfortunately, these hooks turn out to be superfluous and lead nowhere.  This shoddy technique is found in all four of Hienlein's final books.  We are also treated to some of Heinlein's stock characters, dirty old men, horny female computers, naked adolescent girls, and dominant beauties who would be right at home in leather and whips.  Without these archetype characters most Heinlein novels written after 1970 would have a sparse population indeed.  As if this isn't enough, Heinlein drags in his usual cast of characters from his other novels as he is so prone to doing.  In spite of all their cameo appearances, this group remains dull and one dimensional throughout.  Heinlein's earlier novels written prior to 1960 are still fine fare for young people, especially boys.  This novel, as well as most of Heinlein's later work will be enjoyed primarily by a group of die hard fans and is definitely not for general consumption
Reuters fired Author Joe Maguire for being a bias liar. Joe Maguire never takes on any of Ann's remarks and so called lies, he just babbles on endlessly about how much he really hates her... that's it that's the whole book!The best thing about this book is that it got Joe Maguire fired from Reuters!  Now he'll have some time to think about why it's wrong to lie, maybe he can even find some time to polish up on his neo-liberal goose stepping
Bovine Scatology!. This appears to be an attempt to see how many lies per minute can be put in print. Both the text and author are a waste of your time
Zoolander on the Wagon. Interesting observations about rehab and kicking a bad drinking problem, so part of the book is worthwhile and inspiring.  About half way through I had to quit.  It was too much like reading the diary of a shallow teenage girl.  (Will he call me?  Did the gorgeous guy wear that tight shirt to impress me?  All I do is think about him.  Is he thinking about me? Oh, please, please, please, let him say something to me.  I love you, but I'm not in love with you.)  On and on. The humor is mildly amusing, but seems forced; it doesn't ring quite true, like the author is trying too hard.  An earlier negative reviewer said they didn't like the author.  It didn't prevent me from reading the book - I like the writing of a number of unlikable people.  But I now understand - the book is completely about this shallow person.  His struggle with alcohol is one of the few interesting/humane things about him.  His colleagues force him into rehab, which turns his life around.  He returns to work a changed and invigorated man, loving life, but continues to mock the people who saved him.  It doesn't dawn on him to thank them.
A Tale of One City Would Have Been Plenty. Dont buy this book!  Or buy it and tear it in two pieces because it is much to long.  Wow I mean talk about boreing.  Is it the best of times or is it the worst of times?  You cant make up you're mind on page one sentence one even!?!If I am this guys editer I would have told him to just write about the best of times.  Thats plenty and people dont need another depressing book in this day and age anyhow.Only ONE STAR for you but keep trying youll get there
Typical paranoid nonsense. Typical left wing &quot;vast right wing conspiracy&quot; nonsense.  Only the most paranoid Americans looking through the peepholes of triple locked  doors would recognize the place this book is about and apparently from  where it was written
not recommended - there are better novels of Marie-Antoinette. I often wonder how many more novels have yet to be written about Marie-Antoinette- how many times can the same old untruths be rehashed and retold? The doomed princess trapped in an unhappy marriage surrounded by a hostile court who dies on the guillotine...and on and on. "Versailles" is a vulgarized, hazy rehashing, totally lacking the delicacy and authenticity of Chantal Thomas' "Farewell My Queen," or the powerful, innovative punch of Elena Maria Vidal's "Trianon." At least it is not a complete fabrication like Erickson's "Hidden Dairy." Not my cup of tea but I do know others who have enjoyed it, and Kathryn Davis seems to have a loyal following
Hubbert's Peak. This book was on a very interseting topic. The author took time in studying this topic. It was about the impending world oil shortage. That is the time when we, the world, will run out of oil. It tells you about Hubbert's analysis of the time or year when the world will run out of oil. They then talk about a lot of other things like where oil comes from. Then they talk about where oil is. They also talk about drilling for oil. They say it takes people over 20 drills to find oil. sometimes it will take even more time then that. Then they talk about the size of oil fields. They also reexamine Hubbert's analysis later on in the book. Rate plots is brought up because the more people driving the less oil we will have in the future. They talk about the future to fossil fuels and discuss elctricity and natural gases. They also talk about how much we already have so when oil runs out we need to think about all the stuff we already have. Hubbert was a brilliant man. some gas companys tried to make him stay quiet but he didn't want to he told everybody. The author was ver knowledgable and I could tell he knew what he was talking about.I wouldn't recommend this book to anybody unless they are very smart and want to know about the impending world oil shortage. I say again the author took time in studying this topic but that was his downfall in that he went into to much depth and made it boring. When you read it you can tell the author knew what he was talking about but he got to much into detail which is very boring. I gave it a low rating because I have a short attenion span so it was hard enough for me to make it through this book
Am I the only one...?. I read this book many years ago, and thought it was terrible.  Looking through the reviews just now, I couldn't believe how overwhelmingly positive they were, and just had to put in a word for those of us (and I assume/hope there are others) who didn't like the book.The book is ludicrously long, and meanders through way too many red herrings, dead ends, and nonsequitirs.  There are any number of sub-plots that appear out of nowhwere, go nowhere, never pay off, and leave you wondering why you had to take the time to read through them at all.The sub-plots, though, are nothing like as much of a problem as the main plot itself.  It's a very uninspiring story about a business deal.  Will person A get the contract, or will person B?  A business deal?  Who cares?SPOILER ALERT:And then, after sitting through thousands of pages boringly building up to the big deal, at the end one of the characters randomly dies, and the whole thing just peters out.  No climax, no drama, nothing.I also respectfully disagree with the reviewers who praised the characters.  I found that Clavell has a bad habit of making his characters too perfect, carried out too far in this book.  All of the major characters are the greatest golfer and an olympic diver and the greatest gourmet and a brilliant business person and so on and so on.  These are not real people, they're supermen who I couldn't relate to at all.It's boring, it's long, it's badly written.  I was particularly disappointed because I loved Shogun and liked Tai-pan and King Rat.  But after this one, I've never read another Clavell book, and I don't think I will
Some Style and No Substance. Alan Deutschman writes in quintessential GQ style...Apple, Pixar, Next and Jobs are given the cinematic attention - Brioni suits and designer clothing take precedence to the story telling theme! That's precisely where the story ends - Neither Apple's business environment nor the facts behind Jobs renaissance garner attention! Steve's vendetta against the Apple board that sacked him, his bitterness about moving away from the company he helped create and his pre-occupation with Odwalla fruit juices/Black polo shirt &amp; blue jeans are the only facets of Steve's character that Deutschman manages to grasp. Talk is cheap - Deutschman manages to splice up this pathetic offering with additives! Steve's obsession with German design aesthetics, his &quot;tomfoolery&quot; with his corporate hobbies- Next, Pixar and Apple are all touted by Deuschman as tenets of a precipitous corporate personality! Jobs is portayed as a whip slashing mogul who just rides his &quot;ill-deserved&quot; luck to the top- He is credited with ZERO intelligence and a disgusting atttitude! Apparently, Next and Pixar had no strategies and were &quot;bleeding,hemorrhaging corporations&quot;- a phrase Deutschman uses with irritating regularity!  Job's groundbreaking strategies to rev up the motorcade of new products at Apple and Next are promptly thrown out of the window! His ability to turn small-door companies like Pixar into money making machines is rudely ignored. The book is definitely based on hearsay and might as well be treated as a rag....This man hardly knows what he is talking about
Where's the poker?. If you are looking for a book to read about poker, pass on this one unless you are desperate for any poker read.  Do so for a very simple reason:  there is surprisingly little about poker in this 'poker book'.There is a detailed account of Ted Binion's murder which courses through the book.  In fact there is much more about Binion than about poker.  But this book was not found in the mystery section of the bookstore; it was in the poker section.Or you might like some insight about going to a jewelry store to pick out an anniversary ring for your wife.  This is covered in more detail than McManus' coverage of his WSOP satellite tournaments.  In fact, the author's wife Jennifer's ring size is six, a fact which for some reason I can't get out of my head.  But the book was not in the weddings/anniversaries section of the bookstore; it was in the poker section.Are you curious about McManus' childhood, his parents and grandparents?  Then this is the book for you, although it would usually be found in the autobiography section.There is even a fascinating, endless chapter on whether A. Alvarez should have had intercourse with Sylvia Plath, and whether such coitus would have interrupted her eventual suicide (our  author thinks not, but we all know it depends).  But this book was not in the self-help-for-sick-poets section of the bookstore; it was in the poker section.In all seriousness, I could go on and on with examples such as these.  It's not a bad book; in fact the sections on poker are really quite good.  If the author had edited out three quarters of the book, I would give it five stars.  When I go to the poker section of the bookstore and buy a book about poker, I want my goddess poker to be the topic.If you're looking for one person's experience with poker, mostly but not exclusively in Vegas, read Anthony Holden's "Big Deal".  It's a great read, and it's even about poker.
mixed feelings. Well, straight out I will admit that I am only half-way through this book, but already, I feel really bogged down, and slightly confused.Ms. Myss seems to take a rather overly authoritative tone in this book, as she mixes Jungian psychology, Eastern religions and divination, all in an attempt to convince her readers that through her guidance they can come to know the destinies chosen for them before their birth, their "Sacred Contracts".I feel that the author tends to over simplify the concepts of destiny, and pre-destination, as well as the nature of evil, and does so through a rather verbose, and strangely vague text.  I think that my eyes were really opened when I visited Ms. Myss' website and read the answers she had given to questions by her readers.  Her arrogant attitude and insistance that her way is the only way, left a sour taste in my mouth, I must say.  Many asked questions such as, "I can't narrow my personality down to only 8 archtypes, no matter how hard I try," and, "You insist that there are four archtypes that everyone has, no matter what.  I don't feel that I have all of these."  These questions were met with the insistance that there were only 8 archtypes, and that everyone has the four, no matter what.  Ms. Myss makes her "theory" sound like it is academically proven fact, which it is absolutely not.  I'm not sure that even Jung would agree to the way that his concepts of the archtype have been used in this book.In summary, I am not sure that I will finish reading the book.  I want to, just to see if there is something that I am missing closer to the end, but from many of the reviews that I have read here, I'm not so sure it's worth it.  I suggest taking the book out from the library before you purchase it.  Some may like the authoritative tone, and complex theories of the book.  I did not
Holism and Evolution with Sanford Holst 's Editing. Holism and Evolution by Jan Christiaan Smuts, originally published in 1926, is one of the great and authentic visionary classics of the 20th century, and I highly recommend to anyone interested in the subject of holism, evolution, and integral philosophy. This book is not only one of the harbingers of today's holistic and integral movements but also continues to provide us with deep insights and powerful inspirations.However, this edition with Sanford Holst's editing is an insult to the original author and an insult to the intelligence of the readers. Holst adds subheadings and summaries that are utterly unnecessary while changing some words to make them &quot;understandable&quot; to the contemporary readers, which is insulting to the intelligence and linguistic knowledge of the readers.Therefore, my recommendation is to read the original book sold by Amazon.com, but not this edition by Sanford Holst, if the reader wants to enjoy an experience of reading a book by one of the truly great minds, without a contamination by the hubris of a mediocre mind.
Ranges from distortion to outright falsehood. Shahak was a chemistry professor better known for his racist, anti-Jewish diatribes. His allegations range from the outright distorted to the flat out fictional. One example is the often used slander that the Talmud allows relations with minors. Actually, it is a sin and a crime under Jewish law. It is rape. There IS a discussion that does NOT ask whether it is allowed but whether the victim of this rape is considered a "non-virgin" when they grow up and seek to marry. In a culture where virginity is considered important for marriage, the victim may become a double victim, victimized by the rapist and again by society, being labelled a "non-virgin." The final answer is that they are considered a virgin when it comes time to get married. However, this discussion that "it is as nothing" is taken out of context as if it allowed rape. Shahak also makes many bizarre and patently false allegations such as his claim that Jews and Israelis dont' use "+" signs in addition because they are "little crosses" and that observant Jewish ritual involves desecrating Christian graves. If many readers who don't know much about Judaism find it an "eye opener," there is good reason. Shahak is making this stuff up.   If you want to know what Judaism REALLY says or Jewish Law, the Talmud really says, find out for yourself. Go to your local orthodox synagogue and ask for lessons or go to a free class. Heck, pretend you're Jewish and see what we "really" think and say. And you can also check out: http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Cyprus/8815/http://www.angelfire.com/mt/talmud/
Not broke down well. I can't get into this book nor can I find what I'm looking for because it's not broke down well. "Make up Don't Break up" is WAY better and explains why people are "scared"
Disappointing. In today's pace driven world, I was looking forward to a little respite in James Ogilvy's book.  Unfortunetely, it didn't deliver for me.  What  suggests to be a guide to finding creativity and fulfillment, ends up being  nothing more than the author's sterile philosophical rantings.  Actually, I  don't know how it ended since I only made it through half the book.  I  would have liked less history and more &quot;evidence&quot; or anecdotes  from the author's life that promote this way of living.  Ogilvy wants to  sell us on &quot;goallessness&quot;, but doesn't offer any kind of  convincing argument.  Too bad, since I would tend to agree with this point  of view!
There's only one reason to buy this book. The contempt the author has for writers and the contempt so many of the agents have for writers is the real theme of this book. If you want names and addresses, use the internet. If you want a book that can actually help you get published, read The Square Guide to Publishing Your Non-fiction Book by Rudy Shur
End Capital Punishment then kill/abolish all the lawyers, quoth Shakespeare and Zemeckis. (...) Ladies and Gentlemen, you do not need an $ 80 book to tell you that Capital Punishment should be abolished because it is pretty obvious even to the layman. There are maybe ten facts that make it necessary to abolish capital punishment and they include: possible execution of the innocent, more expensive than life imprisonment, cruel and unusual means, no deterrent to capital or even felony crimes, death sentences based on ridiculous standards of guilt beyond a reasonable doubt, drawn out lengthy legal fights that last 10-25 years bogging down the justice system, laws instituted due to political agendas and a legal system with absolute gridlock. Now I am in favor of a total moratorium on the death penalty for convicted felons since we cannot afford it in money or legal corruption. The United States of America and the 50 states must not execute the innocent no matter what. The death penalty is not helping deter crime and the standard for conviction is laughable and undefined.I am not advocating the death penalty for convicted felons but I believe Shakespeare might have been right when he said in Henry VI part II through his character Dick the Butcher, "The first thing we do, let's kill all the lawyers." I believe capital punishment is targeting the victims or felons of the system when it should start targeting the ones who screwed it up in the first place.Lawyers are nothing more than mindless automatons of a system they are trapped in the second Professors teach their minds to think of the law, no, turn their minds to a jelly state of Tabla Rosa. So the lawyers are the major problem of a corrupt legal system and corrupt government.  Maybe the Capital Punishment laws should be redirected towards them as Shakespeare suggested in Henry VI Part II.There are others who have expressed this desire in literature, fiction or film to rid the world or especially the USA of all lawyers. How about award winning director and producer Robert Zemeckis and his writings in Back to the Future II? Remember that Robert Zemeckis did not just direct Back to the Future II, he also wrote a great deal of dialogue for the characters along with writer Bob Gale. Thus it was Zemeckis most likely or Gale who wrote the line for character Dr. Emmett Brown in Back to the Future II, "The justice system works swiftly in the future now that they've abolished all lawyers." I think that is hilarious and probably true like the futuristic writings of Orwell, H.G. Wells and Morgan Robertson.So if Shakespeare and Zemeckis have advocated it in fiction, and these men are both geniuses, why shouldn't it be instituted in reality? I mean every problem in the US Government or legal system in one way or another can be blamed on lawyers. The proof is in law school education which does not take the dialectical materialist liberal arts education route of colleges and universities. Instead, law school education can most likely be referred to as neo-scholasticism-where student's minds are crushed in an examination of pure minutia. Law students do not learn the law or how to apply it, only penny ante sets of facts that avail them not in education or practice. Remember who has advocated the liberal arts system of dialectical materialism education; their ranks include Francisco Petrarch, Karl Marx and even Frederick Engels. Only Catholic priests and educators of the Dark and Middle Ages ever advocated scholasticism, a study in pure minutia. Anyone who doubts law school education is anything but neo-scholasticism go and find out the truth in law schools.The true practice of law ended circa 1930. Before 1930 lawyers were schooled equally in the classroom and in apprentice work under the tutelage of other working attorneys. However, in 1930 the US system of law and US Law education shifted from a common law/court of equity focus to an international law/court of admiralty focus and look what happened. The US Government and US system of law has been totally corrupted by these lawyers. A once perfected system of government and law created by Jefferson and Madison has now been obliterated. Unless we institute the inspiring plans of Shakespeare or Zemeckis it is quite possible that only the return of The Lord can stop these corrupt and evil lawyers. If only the Lord's return can stop these lawyers then I say, like John the Revelator, "come quickly Lord Jesus."These lawyers took a beautiful Libertarian US system of government and law and destroyed it. So I am inspired by Coyne, let us indeed end capital punishment for felons and focus on life imprisonment, death of personality or alternate means for them. Instead, focusing our efforts, hopefully not capital, on the lawyers to abolish all law school, international court of admiralty lawyers in the USA. Then the USA would return to the common law system of liberal arts education in law schools or the apprentice system of learning the practice of law.Of course Capital Punishment should be abolished, because it is the Court of Admiralty lawyers who set it up and corrupted it in the first place. Now you have a sue everyone legal environment where there are 100 times the lawsuits there should be in the courts. There are ridiculous lawsuits over everything now, from property disputes, slander, libel, looking at something the wrong way and lease/contract disputes. There are now lawsuits over anything and everything in all US Courts.  Most of these ridiculous lawsuits could have been resolved with alternate dispute resolution, compromise or even honest communication.It is not just the lawyers who should be blamed for the corruption and harm to a beautiful system of government and law in the USA. Obviously, the politicians share a great deal of the blame but since 80 percent of the bastards are lawyers already it is pretty obvious the lawyers are the most to blame, owning at least 90 percent of the blame, the mean of 100 and 80 percent. This book is part of the solution and that is excellent. The problem is that the Professor and man who wrote it is only part of the problem. Actually, he is twice the problem since he is both a lawyer and law school educator. The only way to save the United States of America from the corruption of international court admiralty lawyers is to follow the wise advice of William Shakespeare and Robert Zemeckis.  Professor, you cannot reform a legal system that is already beyond saving and trapped in a legal paradox of its own creation.
Prose to make you cringe. My favorite from this one had to be the fat guy's comment -- "I'd be a rich man if I had a dime for every hour i've spent auditing Pentagon departments" -- what - he doesn't make more than $0.10 per hour?  In 1987?  Give me a break.  Yes, these are great page turners.  But the dialog is absolutely horrendous.Shakespeare, he is not.
no so good, don't buy this book!!. I am studying calculus currently in my ap class. I bought this book. And I found out there are many misprints and errors there
Worst ending ever!!. I'm giving this book 2 stars because it did keep me entertained for a short while. Then, like many other reviewers, I began to get bored of all of her complaining and whining.  But the ending....horrible!!  I was left feeling bewildered & felt like perhaps my book had some pages left out of it.  The authors did a very poor job of tying up loose ends.  What happened to her and HH?Also, she mentions that she needs to find a job using her degree, a whole section is even devoted to describing one interview.  Then, the only thing you ever here about her job hunting again is a one sentence reply during a dinner party???? What????  Did we miss something?  I was extremely disappointed and would encourage you to pass this one up
One sided, nationalistic story - avoid if you care about history. Here's the news:less than half the forces on the allied side on D Day were from the  U.S. Would you guess that from reading Ambrose's book? - nope. The vast bulk of the volume is devoted to the U.S. experience. It seems Ambrose thinks the British, Canadians etc were just there to make up the numbers.It's just not acceptable for a historian to devote the bulk of what purports to be an account of that day to one national contingent and then call it 'D Day' . To perpetrate that is petty and appallingly parochial.  Worse: it's offensive to the memories of ALL those who fought and died for democracy. The American sacrifice was real and  doesn't need this sort of thing to keep its memory green.  Robin Neillands and John Keegan have both written much better, fairer accounts.If Ambrose had called the book 'the American contribution to D-Day' no one could have complained. As it is, it has no claim to our serious consideration as history.
Horrible textbook. Reads like a dictionary, each page is nothing more than bullet points that alternate between definitions and corollaries.  Proofs are typically very short: explained and illustrated in no more than a quarter of a page.  More appropriate as a reference manual than a textbook for a class
Not Baxter's Finest Hour. Transcendent takes the fun of transcendental philosophy and merges it with the raw excitement of project management. It's not just boring - it's unfocused, too: Transcendent is part sci-fi, part eco-thriller, part family drama, and part ghost story.The bulk of the book revolves around Michael Poole, who splits his time between chasing the ghost of his dead wife and starting an eco-recovery business. The "ghost story" subplot (which culminates in a excorcism, believe it or not) seems out of place in a sci-fi novel such as this, and is wrapped up in a lot of religious and philosophical psychobabble. Likewise, Stephen is a little heavy-handed with the message of ecological responsibility, and spends too much time going through the mundane details of the startup and business deals for Poole's eco-recovery project.The other 33% of the book revolves around Alia, who has to answer some questions about/for the godlike Transcendence, a meta-mind that's stumbling over some very basic facts of life. Even more rediculous is that the Transencdence, which is "beyond the farthest imagining of mere humans", has a proposed solution to its problem which basically amounts to "take my ball and go home." I can say no more without giving anything away, but the universe's supermind seems to have the intellect of a walnut.It's not just the Transcendence who has issues. The Poole family relations are a non-stop car wreck, a subplot which makes the book feel like a soap opera at times. In particular, the protagonist's adult son spends the entire novel acting like a spoiled 12-year old. Likewise, the book never explains why the Transcendence would want to "join" with Alia, who also comes off as both incredibly selfish and immature.It's also fairly odd that, 500,000 years in the future, "Lethe" is still being used as an interjection. The origin of the term is presented here, but it's fairly odd that it would stick around for for a length of time that's much greater than the length of recorded human history. Nobody uses terms like "baloney" or "balderdash" anymore, and those were in use a century ago. 500,000 years? Come on.Last but not least, anyone who makes it past the final 50 pages deserves an honorary doctorate in philosophy. You'll be able to discuss the ontology and philosophy behind the meaning of love and intellect with the best of them. Unfortunately, you have to read through a grad school term paper to get any closure out of this book. I was tempted - multiple times - to just chalk this one up to a loss and start on something else. Mr. Baxter, you can do better
Ugh... While I only am a little over half way through this book, I'm finding myself hating Will.  He's pathetic and boring and not at all a character that I can cheer for.  This book has been a tedious read overall.  I keep pushing through because I feel like it has to get better, yet so far it has not.  I'm happy that I checked this out from the library, so that I can return it and not have it collect dust on MY shelves.  The only reason why I'm even writing a review is that I'm so shocked about all the positive comments this book has received thus far.  I looked on Amazon to see if my thoughts were shared by others; I'm surprised that they are not.  I usually like this genre of fiction, but in terms of this book all it is is a bunch of whining and self-loathing
'94 Blackstone Audio is AWFUL. The 1994 Blackstone Audio Book version of "Turn of the Screw" is read by Pat Bottino.  Mr. Bottino's uninspired presentation destroyed the story.Perhaps Mr. Bottino got better in later ventures, I don't know, but he mangled "Turn".Avoid this version at all costs
I thought it was a dream... I kept waiting for Stephanie to wake up and realize that it was all a dream, but she didn't.  What shocked me even more was when I went on to read the 10th book and some of the story from Visions fo Sugarplums carried over.  I was already getting a little tired of the far fetched SP stories, but this one went too far.  If I could give it 0 stars, I would.
high brow advice. Clearly John Gardner is a literary genius, however not being one myself I found that his style was a little overbearing, it does not offer the inspired start to writing fiction that I was looking for.
I was also disappointed. I have used LP guides to travel all over the world and this was a major disappointment.  I won't dispute that Randall S. Peffer has spent the last 30 years getting to know Puerto Rico as the book claims.  He knew it very well, it seems, when he wrote the first edition.  When he went back, however, in October 2002 to update the book, I got the feeling that he may have meandered  by locales he had mentioned to ensure the building was still standing, not confirming any of the facts he had originally included on his way to drink &quot;Cielito Lindos&quot; at the friend's house who invented them and has never shared the recipe with any other bar on the island (contrary to Peffer's statement that this is the national cocktail).  We had a good time despite Randall Peffer's sloppy updating.  By the way, the &quot;aphrodisiac&quot; restaurant in Old San Juan is called &quot;OstraCosa&quot; .. a play on words . . . &quot;ostra&quot; means oyster.  &quot;otra cosa&quot; means &quot;another thing&quot; the pun was lost on Peffer despite his fluent Borricua Spanish
Not What It Appears. If you read the outside cover of the CD Audiobook, you get the impression that the volume strongly will deal with the manner in which FDR and Eleanor Roosevelt led the country during World War II.  However, what you get is more often innuendo about FDR's fascination with women other than his wife, whether his prviate secretaries, a visiting princess, or his mistress of many years.  Eleanor is covered in more detail than was expected, but she comes off pretty well, her husband's wandering eye notwithstanding.Goodwin does provide some insight into the challenges of running the United States during the critical war years, but the amount of time devoted to private pursuits was not what was expected.  I had hoped for a lot more detail on the warimte effects of the economy, and the challenges it served the president.  I had hopes of more on FDR's handling of race and labor issues, but did not get it.  I had hopes of learning more about FDR's partnership with the Congress to achieve the nation's goals, but was disappointed there as well.This was the first Goodwin book I picked up, and it didn't put me off enough to avoid her amazingly good Team of Rivals, about Lincoln and his cabinet.  Still, I remain disappointed that the book's cover and inside clearly focused on other issues than what was projected
Not impressed. Eileen Barker seems to spend most of this book apologising for the cult's behavior and practices and every turn rather than telling parents what they can do to help their troubled children.  Barker should have spent more time listening to former members, and less time talking to the cult leaders
broad, but not deep. I used this book when I took the RF Circuit Design class at Cornell. The experience with this book was devastating. It did not give me any good detail of any single RF circuit.  I am not sure what kind of background the author expected, but I am sure that this book is not a good choice for a beginner. And if you got a Ph.D. in RF design, why do you wanna read a magazine version of an RF design
Culture Shock:Italy. I purchased this book to learn more about doing business in Italy, and I found there was not enough detail.  I did learn how vastly different each region is in Italy - - and the author tries to show the differences in each region.   Perhaps this is why I felt that it didn't do a deep dive into the regions I was most interested in
Cynosure Scallions on the Mountain Look Downwards (Upon?) the Zebus & Sevens. Really tried to like this book. Premise was grand; story bobbed and weaved; conclusion was flimsy. Discursive scientific literalizations distract & disorient. Crichton breaks the rule to never stanch the flow. I dislike the quartet of scientists who investigate the outbreak; they don't come across to the reader as likeable
Don't be misled. The Title of this book is "C++ All-in-One Desk Reference For Dummies".However after reading this book it is quite obviously aimed at users of Microsoft products on Microsft systems. C++ is a multi-system language and any book calling itself a "C++ All-in-One Desk Reference" should be demonstrating the language in a pure form, such as the excellent "C All-in-One Desk Reference For Dummies" book by Dan Gookin.This book either needs to be rewritten to accurately reflect the title or the title needs to be changed to accurately reflect the content, maybe "C++ on Microsoft All-in-One Desk Reference For Dummies".If you need to learn C++ in a pure form then find another title
Hey! Why don't we go to a teacher when we're sick, too. This guy needs to stop flattering himself.  He isn't controversial or innovative.  He is merely stupid.The idea that some education or pysch major is going to have something important to say about biology is laughable.  It is clear he didn't take (because he couldn't pass) Biology 101.  Kind of goes against he's theories doesn't it.I (a physician) found his references to hormones and neuroanatomy comical.  A failing pre-med knows more than he does!  He states something about the hormones maturing faster in girls.  Well, last time I checked, the structure of various hormones was constant.  The hormones themselves don't change a bit.  No one who had the slightest inkling of what they were talking about would refer to this is such terms.This guy is just projecting his social agenda on a bunch of biological terms he doesn't understand.  The only people who would fall for this are those who a)know less than he does and b) have the same agenda.
I know it's a classic, but... I know this play is suppose to be a classic and a master of it's genre. But if this is the best this genre can produce, this genre must be worse than "Plan 9 From Outer Space". The play is trite and cliched. It's whole meaning is that everything is meaningless. Is it just me or is that a bit ironic? Unless you have to read this play for school, don't read it. If I had gone to see this play in a theatre I would have walked out after 5 minuntes. Why can't people write good and decent plays like Shakespeare or Sophoclese. (I know I spelled them wrong, Sorry.) This new genre of pointless dialogue is, well, pointless. I wonder if all of these playwrites are writing these plays and laughing at the fools that think they are good. Beckett is probably laughing in his grave because he is still fooling people. If you like non-sense, and you like to look like you are philisophical, go ahead and read it, but don't say you weren't warned
PS. Heck, why SHD I be sorry for you, Dan - you're sitting on a gold mine
"How Far Out There Can We Make This?". I think that that is exactly what Neiderman had running through his mind when he wrote this series and book.I have always loved Andrews and Neiderman's work. (I even ran a very popular VCA site) Heck I even liked one of the miniseries (the Orphans series). But ever since the DeBeers series I have liked the books less and less. And I don't think it has anything to do with the fact that I read books that are truly shocking now because I still get that wonderful "OMG" feeling when I re-read the early books of both Andrews and Neiderman. I remained optimistic with the wildflowers and shooting stars series even though I could not stand them. Then he lost me with the De Beers series (with the exception of Willow because I could dort of understand her and where she was coming from, in the first book anyway), and even more so with this last series. The Gemini series has had to have been the worst series of books I have ever read. And it's too bad because it could have been so wonderful. I love weird and freaky stories. And let's face it, a girl being forced to live as a boy is pretty twisted and freaky. But Neiderman dropped the ball. The entire story was boring. It barely held my interest but I was determined to try and get through it (mainly because I was hoping I hadn't wasted $7 on a book). Then came the ending and it was so obvious that he was desperately trying to come up with the most shocking thing ever just to keep people interested. Instead, I believe it had the opposite effect.I'll still be reading April Showers, but (and I hate to say it) if it's as bad as De Beers and Gemini, I highly doubt that I will ever purchase another "V.C. Andrews" novel, and it so pains me to say that
Count me in the minority. Unlike most reviewers here, I really disliked this book.  The main reason is that the entire novel is a gimmick without any real substance.  There is no reason to tell such a dull story except for the fact that there is some mysterious story-within-a-story complexity.The characters, especially the protagonist Iris, are bores.  Iris is like a 300 page wet blanket.  Most of the other characters are 1-dimensional cut outs.  Her sister Laura is the exception, but she got on my nerves too with her one-note quirkiness.The story-within-a-story is more a gimmick than anything else.  The science-fiction meta-story within that story I thought was the most interesting part of the book, but it goes nowhere and its purpose is even more tenuous than its parent.Finally, this is my second Atwood book, and I really dislike her writing style.  It reads as if she is trying too hard, and even the simplest situations feel forced.I don't understand why everyone seems to like this book, but I would just suggest not to believe all the hype.
A Disappointment - Well Below Expectations. Perhaps my expectations were too high?  Martha produces a beautiful magazine and her new Best of Weddings book is superb so I thought that this book, although older, would be a nice addition.  I was disappointed.  Although the book was published in 1999, it seemed even more outdated than that.  The flowers used seemed repeated over and over again and the book was centered completely around the varieties in Martha's garden. For a more thorough view, I'd like to recommend 2 books in place of this one.  Jane Packer's Fast Flower Arranging is fantastic and shows beautiful arrangements that can be made quickly even by a novice.  For actual, technical &quot;how to&quot; steps and design theory, I'd recommend Judith Blacklock's &quot;Flower Arranging&quot; (might be called Teach Yourself Flower Arranging in some indexes).  Once you know proper floral design techniques, you can use any kind of flowers (NOT just those from Martha's garden) to create beautiful arrangements
I'm usually a Heinlein fan, but.... I love Heinlein.  I think that he has a unique voice and perspective in the world of science fiction.  I find that his plots and ideas are inventive.  Even this story was inventive in many ways, like some of the business ideas in regards to the new source of energy in the first chapters.  However, I found this book as a whole to be very boring.  Much of this is due to the lack of fully fleshed characters.  The &quot;main&quot; characters of each section of the book aren't fully realized at all.  I wouldn't recommend this book unless you picked it up for free and were really, really bored
A Testament to the Author's Ego and Pettiness. As Michael Rubin said, Losing Iraq illustrates what went wrong with planning for post-liberation Iraq although not for the reasons its author, a Council on Foreign Relations staffer, intends. In the run-up to the Iraq war, the State Department hired Phillips to moderate seminar discussions among Iraqis. He uses this limited experience to conclude that the cause for difficulty in post-liberation Iraq was not lack of planning but rather a failure to listen. "How could such noble intentions [Iraq's freedom] go so wrong?" he asks. "The White House and Pentagon political appointees thought they could liberate a county without talking to those they were liberating," he replies.Phillips appears unaware that every Iraqi who met with him also visited the Pentagon, National Security Council, and Central Intelligence Agency. U.S. officials would meet almost daily at the National Security Council, chaired by officials such as Zalmay Khalilzad, then the president's special assistant for Iraq, and Stephen Hadley, then-deputy national security advisor.Rather than researching and analyzing prewar planning, Losing Iraq becomes a testament to the author's ego and pettiness, features that caused Iraqis and U.S. officials alike to push Phillips aside. He describes Kanan Makiya, with whom he clashed on issues including de-Baathification, as poisoned by neoconservatives who transformed him from an academic to a polemicist. Most Iraqis and Americans differed and questioned whether Phillips's hostility was due to jealousy of Makiya's prominence in fields in which Phillips sought to compete. Phillips also writes that he initiated ideas like a Kirkuk commission to adjudicate competing property claims but was ignored. Actually, such a commission was up and running weeks before his epiphany.Phillips revises events liberally, saying, for example, that he and Ryan Crocker, deputy assistant secretary of state for Near Eastern affairs, opposed the establishment of the Coalition Provisional Authority because it did not empower Iraqis. Actually, Crocker opposed the transfer of sovereignty.The irony of Phillips's argument is hubris. He chides Bush administration officials for not listening to Iraqis, but he himself did not bother to travel to Baghdad in the wake of Iraq's liberation. Rather, as revealed in a Wall Street Journal review by Rob Pollock, he lifted descriptions from newspapers.[1] His experience in Iraq was limited to a few brief trips to Iraqi Kurdistan before the war, the sheltered guest of a Kurdish politician.Losing Iraq may try to castigate the White House but instead becomes an example of the arrogance about which so many Iraqis complain. Phillips treats Iraq as a template upon which to lay down his theories. The Iraqi voice is subsumed to his own. If the White House really lost Iraq--the success of the Iraqi elections suggests otherwise--it was because it subordinated the voice of Iraqis to outside advisors like Phillips, more interested in pumping up their own importance than in the welfare of Iraq.[1] May 10, 2005
First review. I often read reviews of books that I am considering for purchase.  I read "A Brother's Journey" and found it to be a better read, that kept my interest and that had some good writing.  With this book, "A Teenager's Journey" I was somewhat disappointed.  Since I depend so often on others reviews of books, I am beginning to think that I need to take the time to review what I have purchased.  Again, I sympathize with both Richard and David, but this book did not make me feel strong emotions that made me want to turn page after page to see what would happen next
Totally unrealistic. I have read "Open House" and enjoyed it but this was very disappointing. Not only did I not identify with Betta - I actually disliked her, and like many other reviewers I found most of her actions completely implausible - a 55 year old woman renting a room in a house with two 20-year-olds for occasions when she was scared to sleep at home?  They must have been laughing at her behind her back!  There were so many storylines started that never went anywhere - for example the love story behind the letters written to the old lady during the war.
The Japanese Mind: "As a Westerner Interpetes It". I read this book because my husband is a professor of intercultural communication and management. I am from the city where the material was gathered. After reading these 'entertaining' stories, I found myself asking questions to my husband and friends as to why do the Japanese not know how to explain their own culture. But, I then thought that Japanese culture is too complicated, as any other country, and Japanese culture is rapidly changing - even more so with the younger generation for this out-dated material, the  essays are university assignments from as old as seven years ago, to be applicable. It might be important to keep in mind that this book offers some very general opinions of how one British professor interpreted Japanese culture, as experienced by students who had to write an English assignment for a ESL lecture. My friends and I never thought that much about our work when we wrote it, it was school work only. However, it may be especially helpful for someone who understands only the basics of Japanese stereotypes. While the essays on values such as giri, amae, etc. are pointing at key values, I think they might continue further talks and scattered or old views of Japanese young people
Not so great ... This book was far to autobigraphical and the author's attempts to generalize her experience felt shallow. I lost my only brother to suicide not long before reading the book. It just didn't bring me any solace or increase my understanding.On the other hand, I also read "No Time to Say Goodbye" and even though it was not aimed at siblings-only, I found it very helpful. Perhaps it was a matter of not just focusing on one single person's story.
Disappointing. I read a lot of thrillers, and this debut by Casey Moreton disappointed me.  As a previous reviewer pointed out, there is very little in this plot that is original or suspenseful.  It is instead consists of elements recycled from a lot of previous thrillers -- a corrupt President, a reformed hit-man, a father looking for his lost daughter, etc.The most problematic aspect of this book is the lack of a central character.  The author keeps jumping around from person to person, changing narrative perspectives.  I therefore had no idea who the "hero" of this novel was supposed to be.  To me, it's hard to write a good suspense novel unless you have a sympathetic central character, and there really isn't one in this novel.If you like suspense novels, I recommend reading Harlan Coben or CJ Box instead.
Inconvenient and incomplete. If you seriously collect or sell Hull pottery, skip this book.  Only the most expensive pieces have color pictures and valuations, but even for many of these you will only find small black and white pictures, and no  valuations. Furthermore, almost 25% of the book is merely reprints from old  Hull catalogs, with no valuations included.  Valuations are inconveniently  listed in the back of the book, which requires a lot of page flipping (very  convenient for the publisher, who only has to update this section, rather  than the entire book).  I get the impression that this book was merely  published to profit off the interest of collectors, but not really intended  to serve the collector's needs
This book is very disappointing. I was so excited to get this book!  I thought: at last, new adventures with my favorite characters! What a disappointment.  Not only is the premise ridiculous, but the characters are written as caricatures of  themselves.  Joel is only barely recognizable; do you really think he would  close a letter with &quot;Yours in Chutzpah!&quot;???  Would Chris end a  note with &quot;Supremely Conscious&quot;???  Please.  Don't hit us over  the head with it!  Another irritant is the fact that whenever Joel,  Maurice, or Holling sends a letter to a place of business, the personal  address reads &quot;Gentlemen.&quot;  The Northern Exposure series was  always exploring issues of gender with thoughtfulness and insight, but this  book simply reiterates the cultural undertones of sexism.  If you're a real  Northern Exposure fan, don't waste your time on this book
Dull, dull, dull. In this book James Hansen manages the impossible by making the journey of the first men to the moon unbelievably dull! Part of the problem lies with the subject. Neil Armstrong comes across as an intensely private man, modest to a fault and unwilling to "dish the dirt" on his colleagues - time and again, when asked about some of the controversies that have arisen from the Apollo program he refuses to be drawn and usually gives some self effacing response or gives obscure convoluted technical explanations. It makes for a frustrating read. The space program aside, Armstrong appears to have led a fairly uneventful life - during his detailing of Armstrong's combat duty in Korea Hansen is reduced to writing about the other, more exciting missions experienced by his fellow fliers or reeling off endless reams of statistics to pad out some not very interesting events.Perhaps unsurprisingly, the book only comes to life during the description of Apollo 11's mission and even then one has to wade through paragraphs of technical jargon. I realise that to some extent this is unavoidable but then I remember that Jim Lovell's book about Apollo 13, "Lost Moon" (later retitled because of the movie) was similarly full of technical info yet it never felt dull and in fact gripped me from beginning to end.Overall, "First Man" was a disappointing experience. I normally plough through books very quickly but found this one a real struggle to stick with. I have to admit that before I got to the Appollo section I had put it aside for a few weeks as I was fed up with it. I replaced it with "Dear Boy" - Tony Fletcher's wonderfully entertaining biography of Keith Moon. I came back eventually but was left feeling that there must be a better book out there about the Apollo astronauts
A Waste of Time and Money. This book is a waste of time and money.  It presents nothing that two other more significant works do not already present in more accurate, better edited ways.  These two other works are:  1)Inside the White House: America's Most Famous House, The First 200 Years by Better Boyd Caroli, published by Canopy Books; and 2)The White House: Its Historic Furnishings and First Families by Betty C. Monkman, published by Abbeville Press.  Caroli has much more research experience with the White House and the nation's first ladies, and Momkman actually worked in the White House Curator's Office.If it were not for sloppy editing and factually incorrect information, the Whitcomb and Whitcomb book would be a nice addition to these two more accurate, and frankly more interesting works.  Grammatical and punctuation errors pepper the entire book and really take away from its readability.  Worse are the blatantly wrong facts presented in this book.  For example, on page 371 in the chapter on Lyndon Johnson, Clark Clifford's wife is erroneously called "Mary."  Her name was actually "Marny," which was a nickname for Margery (Margery Peperell Kimball).  The authors interestingly cite Clark Clifford's memoir, Counsel To The President published by Random House, as a source of infomration for the chapters on Presidents Truman and Johnson.On page 395, in the chapter about Richard Nixon, the authors state that Daniel Ellsburg was a psychiatrist.  Had the two authors consulted Ellsberg's memoir, Secrets: A Memoir Of Vietnam And The Pentagon Papers, published by Viking Penguin, they would have seen that Ellsberg is indeed NOT a psychiatrist, but that he earned a doctoral degree in economics from Harvard and later worked in the Pentagon under Secretary McNamara.  The authors are undoubtedly confused;  there was a break-in at the office of Ellberg's psychiatrist (a Dr. Lewis Fielding...the real pshychiatrist), which was a scheme carried out by G. Gordon Liddy and E. Howard Hunt.Another misconception put forth by Whitcomb and Whitcomb on page 395 is that the so-called "White House Plumbers" were the infamous Watergate burglars.  The team known as the Plumbers consisted of four men:  Liddy, Hunt, Bud Krogh, and David Young.  Only Liddy and Hunt were present at the June 17th break-int.  However, they were not members of the break-and-enter team.  Hunt had recruited five cuban nationals and two Americans, one of whom (James McCord) worked for the CIA and was director of security for the Committee to Re-Elect the President (CREEP) to go into the Watergate.  The authors negelected to consult the most accurate account of Watergate and events leading up to the infamous burglary, Watergate: The Corruption Of American Politics And The Fall Of Richard Nixon, published by Simon and Schuster.  This book is the accompaniment to a documentary on Watergate developed by the BBC and the Discovery Channel.These mistakes make me wonder what else the authors got wrong....and such factually inaccurate information really takes away from a historical work.  I encourage readers to consult the Caroli and Monkman books for all things White House, as well as the independent biographies and memoirs of the presidents, first ladies, and their staff members (e.g., the memoir by Clark Clifford) instead of wasting their time and money on this sloppy attempt at historical writing.
Save your time. I bought this book because all the positive reviews convinced me that it might be worth reading. My hunch wasted more than a few hours of my life.The book uses the Harry Potter series as a springboard to discuss various philosophical problems. After finishing the book, though, I can't say that I've gained any deeper understanding of philosophy, or Harry Potter, whatsoever.Take, for instance, ethics. One writer essentially summarizes one aspect the naturalist view (if God doesn't exist, then morality doesn't either) and the Christian view (God does exist, and morality is indispensable). The end. To say that the editors skim the surface with this work is akin to saying that Plato liked to think about stuff.Next, consider the editor's treatment of courage. Says the writer: readers, you can build up courage by preparation. No really, hear me out on this! Know that if you fail there will be consequences. Friends can give you support too. Says the reader: oh my god. I can't believe I just used my hard-earned cash on this. This will be the most expensive toilet paper I've ever purchased.Perhaps I was expecting too much. Perhaps I was wrong for being disappointed at receiving a collection of infuriatingly childish essays vaguely connecting Harry Potter to philosophy with all the grace of a floundering fish washed up onto the shore.Perhaps I was wrong. But I seriously doubt it. If you're expecting what I was from this book--some food for thought--look elsewhere. It does not provoke thought, nor does it provide entertainment.In this book's stead, I recommend the enlightening "Looking for God in Harry Potter" by John Granger. I am hardly religious but the truth is the Potter series is religious in tone, very much so in fact. Granger contends that the Potter series is classically symmetrical and alchemical in form. He provides insights rather than platitudes. Sadly, editors, branding a book with Aristotle's moniker and mentioning him once every 40 pages does not make your work profound. It only underscores just how profound it is not
Not the best book on WPF. This book was obviously rushed to market.  While Charles' excellent writing style almost makes up for the lack of illustrations, organization and layout, it does fall short.I highly recommend Windows Presentation Foundation Unleashed (WPF) (Unleashed) by Adam Nathan instead.  Adam is every bit Charles' equal in writing clear prose and both he and the publisher went the extra mile (and a few months work) to "get it right".
Am I missing something?. Perhaps I just bought the wrong book for what I wanted to do, or maybe I just don't get it, but in either case, this book left me very underwhelmed.I work at an ISP where we use LDAP for a number of purposes, from authenticating customers connecting to our network, to e-mail filtering, to htaccess authentication on our internal-use web servers.  While I am comfortable using an LDAP browser to manage our users in LDAP, I really wanted more of an idea about how to set up and run an LDAP directory, so I bought this book to help me understand LDAP schemas.While this book does describe a lot of the background to LDAP directories, it really didn't do much to fill in what I am missing.  How do you design an LDAP schema?  How do you know when to use ou=, o=, etc.?On the plus side, I really *DID* appreciate the overview of various LDAP products currently available, and was pleased to see that all of the LDAP products I have used at work (OpenLDAP, iPlanet Directory Server and, or course, Active Directory) were described, along with their relative strengths and weaknesses.  However, I really expected a little more meat--and maybe not quite as much background--about implementing an LDAP directory than I found in this book.In short, if you want a general overview of LDAP directories, this might be what you want, but if you are looking for a "how to" guide, you probably should keep looking
The Afghan. Sorry, have saved for my trip to the Far East starting next week
Only for diehard Wilkie Collins fans. This book is definitely not another Woman in White or The Moonstone, both wonderfully well-written mysteries.  For those who absolutely have to read every word that Collins wrote, this book is recommended.  The plot is fairly boring and the characters fairly uninteresting.  Overall, a slow and somewhat dull read
Dull and Plotless. While comedian Al Franken is normally quite humorous, this novel was a bit dull. There's very little plot and after awhile every page seems like the one before it. Sure, there's the occasional funny part, but overall this book is not worth reading. Quite frankly, it's just stupid. If it didn't have Al's name on the cover it is very doubtful anyone would pick this up. If you're looking for something humorous read The Idiot Girl's Guide to Action and Adventure or The Bear Went Over the Mountain
Influential but flawed. This book has many biases and flaws.  Other reviewers have already gone into detail on these points, so I won't belabor them.  I gave this book 2 stars because it created huge waves when released: was the subject of many magazine articles and television shows in the following months.  So, if you are like me and enjoy keeping on top of books that have helped shape the news, note that this was one of the most most talked-about books of 2002.  That being said, my other point is this: there is a business in making people scared and prophesizing doom and gloom.  Does a woman's fertility decline as she ages?  Sure.  But it varies wildly from person to person.   Do you really want to put your money towards trying to scare the wits out of high acheiving North American women, making them feel even more pressured than they already do?  I, for one, would rather not
A true disappointment. This book is very disappointing. Poorly written and with weak descriptions leaves the inexperienced outdoorsmen with a false sense of security. Just because there happens to be a section on a particular skill does not translate into the ability of the reader to follow the lousy instructions to complete said skill. If anyone wants to learn survival skills they would be well suited to take a course and view first-hand the execution of the skills by an experienced practitioner of them. Purchase another book and let this one pass
History as teen soap opera. Why do we think that girls won't learn history unless it is spoon-fed to them in People Magazine form?  This book proceeds on the outlandish assumption that the 13-year-old daughter of Paul Revere had a crush on leader of the Revolution Joseph Warren, 20 years her senior, and was angry at him because she thought he had a crush on her step-mother, Paul Revere's wife.  While there's no historical basis for any of this, most of the book is taken up with the daughter's inability to tell Warren that she's sorry for treating him badly, with a few actual facts thrown in.  While Paul Revere's story is one of the most exciting of the Revolution -- and in fact there's an argument there would have been no Revolution without him -- you won't learn much about it from this book unless you already know the facts and can pick up on some elliptical references.  What's worse, you come out of it having no idea whether any particular "fact" you just read has any historical basis.  A much better choice is "In Their Own Words: Paul Revere," by George Sullivan, real history, and easy to read
Disappointed. I had hoped for much more from my first Cherry Adair book - the recommendations had been so good.  But the writing is simplistic, the characters lack dimension, the "suspense" is convuluted and not even remotely realistic, and the sex is formulaic.  Silly me, to want a little romance in my romance novels!  It wasn't so bad that I couldn't finish it, but I'll stick to Susan Andersen, Linda Howard and Karen Robards for my romantic thrillers from now on
Too skimpy to be useful. This is effectively a foldout brochure (laminated) with only a few animals/birds, and very little information.  You can get almost as much information from your general guide book for Costa Rica.  I could only recommend this as something to give children to look at to keep them busy during the trip
This book listed for $6.99 is not Hardcover as noted. It is listed incorrectly as a hardcover when it's not.  The book itself is wonderful
Couldn't wait to finish. Though I'm a great fan of Gleick's other books, I found Faster annoying in the extreme.  True, it is replete with fascinating facts and insights.  After a couple of chapters, however, many of its fascinating facts and insights -- not infrequently organized into endless prose lists -- began to feel like so many bricks to the skullcap, waterdrops to the forehead, ...  Enough was enough was enough.  I listened to Faster (audiotape) on my commute to work.  Mornings 3-8 felt like Groundhog Day.    F(un/interesting 15 page magazine article) + C(affeine) + OCD + T(ime) +/- P(er-word-payment) = Faster.
The Definition of Trash. Trash sells and this is the definition of trash. Unfortunately many readers see this as history instead of fiction. Shaara who may have had a ghost writer obviously never visited a manuscipt library to do research. Readers should stick to reading the history of these events done by people who know how to research and how to write
Unnecessary harsh corrections. I was intrigued by the title of this book, since I come into contact with all sorts of dogs regularly and am often asked advice about issues like possession guarding, dog-on-dog aggression, etc. However, the advice in this book is by no means anything I would ever pass on. Most issues are dealt with by correcting the dog harshly, shaking him, dragging him by the leash, and similar awful methods. The author's 'cure' for a dog that growls and snaps from under the bed is to daftly drag him out by the lead, and if he happens to bang his head on the way out, so much the better! She advises owners of dogs with fear aggression towards strangers to severly reprimand the dog with voice and leash corrections every time he becomes agitated around another person. This is a ridiculous way to 'help' your dog and will most likely only make the aversion worse. I noticed that Ms. Benjamin has also written a book that claims to use positive training methods, but unless her philosophy has changed from one book to the other, I would not recommend any of her material to anyone else. There are plenty of truly humane training guides out there, don't waste your money on this
Hollow and Offputting. When the character who is narrating a lengthy novel is as unbelievable and artificial as Hannah Musgrave is in "The Darling", the book is not worthy of completing.
Collective Disappointment. This book was chosen by my office reading group.  It was generally felt to be a disappointment.  I for one really liked the writing style and prose but wondered why simpler words were not chosen.  Some felt, too, they required a dictionary by their side.  It was definitely a book one could easily put down.  There wasn't much in the way of character development and the story lacked intrigue.  The ending, too, was a disappointment
Weak Modernist Take on Noire Novella. Mr. Auster's Trilogy is strong in stylistic innovation but sadly lacking in imagination. His themes, plots and characters reveal a writer with a broad exposure to European literature, but the sum total of the work feels repetitive, impoverished and too smart for his own good. I lost patience for his empty characters devoid of specificity. At times, it seemed like endless, nonproductive navel gazing on the life of being an artist/sleuth. It reminds me of a much weak version of Martin Amis' Times Arrow, which I rather liked, for all its flaws.
Sick Book. We were forced to read this book in philosophy class some yearsback and everyone was appauled by her hatred of men andinability of see the beauty and wonder of intercourse.Her viewof women isn't much better in that they are supposedly thepoor helpless vessels men prey upon to oh my have such adistasteful act as intercourse.The male in her book is theaggressor and the female is the passive unwilling but willingvictim to only get children and love in return.If she can't seethe pleasure of the sex act then it's no one's fault but hers.Every page of the book was hard to read.I don't know why somepeople bother to read such books because it's a waste oftrees,paper and time!Another problem is she makes it sound as though women wholike intercourse aren't up to her intellectual level,as thoughshe has some perfect world where women hate men and intercourse.She tries to make very subjective material sound like it'ssupposed to be the objective norm for every woman.Not!!!Very dangerous book
A Fine Line Between Being Dead and Being Boring... The author slips over this line once too often to rate the book above 2 stars - and that's in a fairly slim book (just under 200 pages).The forward by backward by forward tale of this couple's ultimate day alive - the details of a past that had them returning to this spot - the nature of animals being their passion and study - and their passion as animals being the authors study - how time moves on and through all of us without paying much notice to us.However, the author spends a great deal of time examining their lives which really are practically unfulfilled and fairly dull lives to begin with - in deep scientific detail.  What they had for breakfast, what clothes they wore, how much and how little they actually feel for one another at various moments throughout the day -But no one ever really wakes up or comes to life - so it comes to matter very little - even to their daughter - whether the couple is alive or dead
Disappointing. While the characters of this story are engaging, there's no follow through.  You don't really get an idea of what happens to people at the end.  You are left to your own imagination for a lot of instances.  I understand that it is Christian fiction since it refers to numerous biblical quotes, but we really don't get an idea of people's faith.  The people don't really seem to have a relationship with God.  I was truly disappointed
Another Awful Book. Let me start by saying that I would have given this book zero stars if I could.  The reviews I've read are all true.  This book is boring, extremely repetitive and a waste of time.  The only reason I finished it was because I paid for it.I truly believe that Danielle Steel has lost her gift of writing.  She has not published a good book in a long time.  I also think that she's lost her editor, because to me, a good editor wouldn't let books like this be printed.This story pretty much follows stories she's done before except it's told from the guy's point of view.  There's the rich guy, Charlie, who can't seem to find the "perfect" girl to marry.  He finds a flaw with every one he dates.  He lost his parents at a young age, his sister left school to raise him, and just before he graduated college, she died of a brain tumor.  So of course he's afraid that anyone he gets close to will die or leave him.Then there's rich Adam, whose wife left him and took their two children with her.  It was a bitter divorce, so he has no desire to ever marry again.  He dates girls half his age and never stays with one long.  His parents blame him for the divorce.  Every time he visits them, his mother let's him know what a huge disappointment he is to the family.The last of the trio is Gary, a struggling artist.  He has no desire to ever marry or date.The three men spend the month of August each year on Charlie's yacht, partying and going on and on about how they don't want commitments.  Well of course, each one meets someone, they start to date, they argue, they break up, they have their epiphany and everyone lives happily ever after.  Same old story.Danielle Steel should stop writing.  You can't tell me she doesn't have enough money to live on.  I for one will not read any more of her books, even a paperback, and I won't even bother renting them from the library.  I won't waste my time having to check the book out and worrying about getting it back on time.  There are better authors available and I'm going to read them
Who cares?. A good story with strong characters lures the reader's imagination, inspires excitement and anticipation of what happens next.  This is not one of those stories.  It's not a bad book by any means.  Shining moments appear.  However, Taita is a character hard with which to sympathize.  All the other characters are as translucent as the page held up to a strong light, and the heaped action reaches a point of banality in its lack of specificity.  Did I mention it's predictable?  You should have expected that.Pick up a Clavell or Jennings instead.  This is Soap Opera history
Disappointing... I was looking for a book of Nielsen's outstanding and unique art work...well this isn't really it.  If you are looking for the same you will be disappointed with the cheap printing, poor resolution and lame detail.  What makes Nielsen's art so beautiful and interesting are his patterned details and gorgeous lines, but these pictures are so small the details are lost.  I'm assuming the original, out of print editions of his work would be the only other place to find these illustrations...what a shame
An entire chapter missing?. This book is very good until just before the end. There are too many things left unanswered at the end.For example - (1)What was the exact relation between Williams and one of the cousins? (2)When was the microphone placed in the office and by whom? (3)What was the role of the personal secretary in the conspiracy?...And many more!
dull, occasionally even silly, poorly edited. What a disappointment.  I was looking forward to Anne Perry's new series, hoping for another set of lively characters and satisfying stories, driven by good writing and informed by history and period details.But the most charitable thing I can find to say about this book is that perhaps it will have been worth slogging through if it sets up better plotting and characterization in the rest of the books in the series.  It certainly doesn't stand alone as a novel:  despite its 300+ page length, it's populated with paper-thin characters, some of whom appear only once and to no purpose, carry on interminable and uninteresting conversations (or internal monologues) that fail to advance the extremely flimsy plot, which HAS NO PAYOFF.This book felt like Perry has become so enamored of her own prose style (which is, as ever, exemplary) that she's forgotten to give us people and a mystery (or at least a story) to care about.
Disappointed. Along with other books, I purchased this one to share with my 5 and 7 year olds.   I was disappointed as many of the reviews commented on the appeal of the book for younger children.   I would recommend this book for much older children (pre-teens)as we feel the language was too formal for our kids' age range.My kids absolutely enjoyed Prince Sidharta, When I was a Monkey and Every Breath a Smile and were able to understand the stories and messages without any explanation
You won't need this one!!!. I just finished passing my A+ exams today, and I must say that this book was definately not much help.  Overall, as a review, perhaps it could be considered useful, but only to someone who can spot the errors.  There have been several reviews already pointing some of these out, but there are more dealing with file system types supported by which operating systems, etc.  As another reviewer pointed out, I think the cheat sheet is useless as a cram tool.  Also, the CD did not contain all of the materials listed in Appendix A, and the test engine interface was pretty cheesy, with absolutely NO graphics or picures.  I wouldn't recommend this one to anybody who is seriously studying to pass their A+ certification exams!!!  For my recommendation, go get All-In-One A+ Certification Exam Guide by Michael Meyers ... it's the only way to go
Tasteless and Bland. I was excited as I flipped through the pages of this cookbook -- many of the recipes sounded tantalizing, and all the color photos displayed tasty looking dishes.  HOWEVER, after trying out my first recipe (the curried tempeh and grains), both myself and my dining companion were rather let down.  We found the dish incredibly bland and not at all what we had expected.  Despite the dissatisfying first attempt, I didn't let that deter me from trying again.  Surely the Thai-Inspired Broccoli w/Coconut Sauce could not fail....  Well, it did.  Again, neither of us clamored for seconds, as the dish lacked any real flavor or punch one would expect of something inspired by Thai food.  Again and again, this cookbook failed to satisfy -- definitely not a keeper
disappointing and... I bought this book since it had the Betty Crocker name attached to Indian cooking. However the book is a huge disappointment, to say the least. It is a mish-mash of North and South Indian recipes, some vegetarian, and some meat dishes, with no demarcation between anything. Recipe titles are poorly translated into English, and the Indian names are sometimes in Hindi and sometimes in tamil. While the pictures are tastefully done, seems like Raghavan iyer is otherwise confused. If you are Indian, you definitely can do without this book. And if you are a non-Indian looking to buy a good Indian cookbook, feel free to pass on this one. There are better books out there
Lots of spirit, though not much of the metaphysical variety... Although this book didn't really live up to expectations, I will at least say it provided an entertaining read.  If you're already familiar with contemporary sci-fi you won't find too many new ideas here.  A lot of the ground in this book has already been covered in works like "The Diamond Age" (Neal Stephenson - nanotech opus), "Neuromancer" (William Gibson - disembodied ID shifting), "Ender's Game" (Orson Scott Card - automated education) or "The Transmigration of Timothy Archer" (Phillip K. Dick - tricked out humans).  Of course the main difference here is that Mr. Kurzweil is not a sci-fi author but a proven inventor and entrepeneur.  He acknowledges the 'speculative non-fiction' aspects of the book but at times gets carried away with his predictions and occasionally sounds like a hokey traveling salesman.Throughout the book he claims some degree of expertise in such broad ranging interests as nanotechnology, neurology, interactive entertainment, visual arts, biology, anthropology, philosophy, ethics and sexuality.  Granted the material draws on many of these disciplines but his arguments often come to conclusions that simply have no scientific basis.  This book, published in 1999 suggested that our brains will be "scanned" in the near future.  The concept sounds very Ghost-In-The-Shell and has about as much plausibility as a typical Japanese animation.  An article appearing in the October 2004 issue of Discover asked the question, "Will anyone ever decode the human brain"? The author, much less optimistic than Kurweil noted that "No conceivable technology will be subtle enough to discern all the memories, emotions, and meanings aroused in us by our perceptions."  He made this assumption based on the fleeting nature of the actual neurons in your brain that change and evolve rapidly every day.  To equate this mush with bits and bytes, jpegs and mp3's, is a little naive and ridiculously optimistic.  Hopefully it will happen someday, maybe even in our lifetime.  Until then though, you'd be better off reading real fiction...This book's (almost) saving grace is Kurzweil himself.  He's obviously having fun writing this book and presumably hopes to raise some eyebrows.  Even when that comes off as legacy-building ("Remember - you read that here first!") it's oddly charming.  Inserting himself into a dialogue with his fictitious creation "Molly" is at first obnoxious, condescending even, but by the end it's actually pretty amusing.That said, if you're holding out for some deep insight as to what a "spiritual machine" might be, I'll save you the trouble by telling you that the author's angle (in the two pages it's mentioned) is that spirituality basically boils down to biological phenomena.  Sorry, that it.  Apparently that was good enough for Mr. Data so it's also good enough Mr. Kurzweil.  Computers will one day magically start loving - once they're smart enough of course.  In the mean time, we can gloss over the fact that subjective AI is still a non entity in our world
Haven't read the book--just the reviews. One year it's: Eat every 3 hours. The next year it's: Eat every 5 to 6 hours. I WILL try taking antioxidants before I go walking in the morning. Frankly, I get so sick of all this diet stuff--everyone wants to get rich on their brilliant ideas. The "elephant in the room" is: Eat less, exercise more. Period. If that doesn't work, eat even less, exercise even more. Sorry, I'm not going to waste any more money on diet books
For those who like this kind of book... If you think you'd find a lot of unrelated platitudes interesting, then you'll enjoy this book.
not my style. too rigid and too religous for my taste. some good ideas if you can get past the pitfalls though
When does it kick in?. If a story doesn't hook by the middle of Chapter 3, there are other books to open, books that kick in by PAGE 3, thank heaven. I bought TIME BOMB because the reviews on the jacket made it look fast and thrilling. I could not even finish chapter 3. I'd read something once by Jonathan Kellerman that made me remember him as a reliable author of great escapist fiction. I can't remember what it was.*sigh* I don't see where these rave reviews are coming from. The book is so boring.Also, the racist meanies I saw lurching up over the horizon, as well as being hackneyed and ho-hum, were unrealistic. Even the meanest harshest republican white adult male doesn't picket a school in a high income neighborhood shouting "wetback" and "greaser". Not even in wacky California, I shouldn't think.
Horrible book.  Did Heinlein really write this?. This book was a rather sordid and ugly look at genders and relationships.  Heinlein is so different here than in his good books (Tunnel in the Sky, Starship Troopers, Door into Summer, or Orphans of the Sky) that I wondered who actually wrote this awful work.  It seems obsessed with sleezy gender roles and is quite anti-woman. The basic premise is what would happen with a man's brain in a female body.  Maybe a good concept, but it is terrible in application here.  I just hated this book. I was appalled at some of the slams women take in this work. Please consider avoiding this work.  Perhaps every writer deserves some grace, but this work is almost beyond redemption.  Maybe Heinlein was ill while writing this, or maybe his editor was on drugs?
Unconfortable to read E-book. Is the first time I tried to read an E-book and the experience was very unconfortable. Unconfortable to read, impossible to record as a file, only to read in 1 PC, and at the end, impossible to print! Please try another way to sell electronics books
Does this man have an agenda?. You bet he does! If you want to read a book by a notorious homophobic, right wing, friend of Dr. Laura then go right ahead. Know your authors!!! If I could, I'd have given him zero stars. Blah
just so-so. Of the 7 or so Grisham novels Ive read this one is my least favorite.It's not a bad story at all but it's just way too long, about 150 pages longer than it needed to be.It also just lacked credibility in many spots. Grisham is normally quite good at presenting characters and situations that are at least plausible, if not really interesting. Most of his books give the layman some insight into the workings of the law that Ive always thought were fascinating. This book, however, plods along and doesnt bring anything new to his body of work.The other thing that really got me was the dialogue he wrote for Mark Sway, the 11year old protagonist. He sounds more like a street-wise 30year old, using words like "wonderful" and phrases that have been out of use since the 70's. I think Grisham forgot he was writing the words for a young boy and not one of his more typically older characters.This isnt a bad book if you just want to escape for a few hours a day but most of his other ones are far more enjoyable
Misleading. Totally disappointed with this book. Basically a list of website addresses that offer tips and information but not free stuff.  This information could have been easily found searhing on line...and for free
A Book of Cliches and Fluff. If you are interested in the entrepreneurial world, you might find this book an entertaining read.  However, if you are an entrepreneur or want to be one, this book is most likely not going to help you.I have read so many business books (including books on start-ups) and invariably with the exception of a couple of books, those for start-ups are of low value and do not provide sufficient information desperately needed by entrepreneurs.With so many fluff books on start-up companies and entrepreneurs, there is a great need for more in-depth how-to books.  This one certainly has not bucked the trend.  It seems that so many of the reviewers are just so proud and honored to speak of Mr. Kawasaki's previous stent with Apple or his garage.com firm (which I still do not think he is sure what their mission is) that they have not given the book a truly subjective and unbiased review.When reviewing a book for entrepreneurs you should ask yourself the foillowing question:Does the book really show you how to be successful?  Is the information so valuable that you will study it and take notes or refer back to it for future use?There are very few sources of valuable education for entrepreneurs anywhere.  Therefore it is important that the authors of these books provide what is left out in business schools.  Traditional business topics are covered well in business schools so there is more room for business fluff books.  Despite this fact, there are still many books on traditional business topics.In contrast, for entrepreneurs, the only source of education is the book market so you should stay away from fluff books or motivational type books, all of which teach you nothing.
There are no specification about the shrinky dinks papers... I was so disappointed, when I receive the book... I was hoping it has all the stuff together.. I mean the special paper.that shrinks.... so I now has to buy  separate... and has to buy it soon,,, cause I was planning and activity with a lot of kids....Too bad... that does not say clearly!!!!!Maby Moritan
Disapointed. I read the first several chapters of this book and found the author didn't have a grasp of the Calvin's basic theological teachings which plainly contradicted some of Bouwsma thoughts. I do not question his historical expertise, but i doubt very serriously that he knew John Calvin In his book he called Calvin a pagan and anybody who knows Calvin knows he was a man of God. He also took a passage from the Institutes that Calvin was addressing the Catholic church and applied it to Calvin to support his claim that Calvin was anxious. I tried three times to get something out of this book and failed all three times. I appreciate Calvin too much to keep this book in my library.Also I crossed referenced some of his notes he claimed he quoted Calvin from and found discrepricancies. If you want a secular oppion of who Calvin was not based on his Theological mindset, then read this book. Otherwise disreguard it
not so good. Much is made of dyson's intellectual prowess; this just goes to show you that all things are relative. There are organisms shuffling down the street to whom dyson's intellect would, one assumes, seem impressive. But that don't necessarily make it so. You may, at some point, have heard the term pinhead. The term signifies that the owner of such a head has a tiny little brain, a &quot;peabrain&quot; if you will. This, in a nutshell, is dyson. He meanders around offering weak commentary and observation that appeals chiefly to the MTV and BET crowd. This is to say, he offers nothing of value other than allowing Penn to make their quota. Do yourself a favor and avoid at all costs
fairly useless book. The maps were available to look at, but most of the events or special items that were denoted were impossible to discern from the text. As far as a walk through goes, I felt that the missing pieces of information were fairly aggravating. ooo, I found a box with a trap and a puzzle that appears to be based on information that is not available to me, what does the guide say about it? nothing. here's a list of bounties I can collect, how much are each worth? can I negotiate higher ones? what is the best way to persuade people? already I want to toss the dumb thing in the waste basket
A plush book, in every sense of the word. What you get for your money: a pastel-colored book with a soft plush cover, some watercolor sketches with text on top of them, and a photo of Mr. Dyer's smiling face on the back.It makes for nice decoration, but it doesn't make for serious reading. The 10 secrets are little poetic statements that you've heard before in "Life's Little Instruction Book", among other places.From Mr. Dyer's talks, its clear he knows a lot about inner peace. Too bad he's more interested in packaging it and selling it for profit than teaching it. (There's also a bit of a feeling like he's trying to indoctrinate you into something...
Disappointing. I love Mollie Katzen's earliest cookbooks - Moosewood and Enchanted Broccoli Forest. Dishes I make from those are relatively easy and very tasty. I have tried a lot of recipes in this cookbook and I have been very disappointed. They just...don't taste as good. I have served some dishes from this cookbook which have remained uneaten on the table. On the other hand, when I use the other two, people usually enjoy the food, and ask me for the recipes. I have learned my lesson, and I don't use it anymore. If you actually want to buy a cookbook which is a useful source of recipes, I do not recommend this one
Do Not Use For Self Study. This book is not meant for self study. This book is too theoretical, and it does not give enough basic examples. It is too abstract. I do not recommend this book to anyone
So many pages for so little to read. I am a strong admirer of Alan Dershowitz.  I especially enjoyed his books The Genesis of Justice, and Reasonable Doubts (O.J. Simpson case).  Unlike those books, America on Trial tries to do way too much.  It is more like his Contrary to Popular Opinion book, where he presents many of his earlier published commentaries on the law.Unfortunately, I found the writings in the current book to lack the cohesiveness and well considered analysis found in the earlier book.  Granted, this is not true for every case that he presents.  However, he includes far to many cases for which he simply wants to inject a personal opinion.  In so doing, he misses opportunities for more developed theories of particular cases.  Frankly, many of his comments on some of these cases could have been presented in a paragraph.I understand that he is trying to explain various aspects of American law by using an assortment of cases.  But, his points become obscure and sometimes repetitive by having too many cases in a format that reminds me of Reader's Digest, or U.S.A. Today.In sum, there is not enough in this book to be useful for serious students of law or history, and too many cases for the casual reader.  I hope that this is not a sign of the dummying down of Dershowtiz.
A Waste of Time... Read the first few chapters and the last few pages.  As usual, the remaining 300 pages were just repetition.  Danielle Steele should come up with a new "formula" (as mentioned in previous reviews) or tuck her pen away once and for all.
Not even close to others in series. For those of you reading the entire series of  " In Death" books this is a real disappointment.  I'm wondering if someone else wrote it.  There is no candy bar thief, Peabody, McNab development,  insights into Eve's past, just nothing!  Yes, Mavis having the baby is progress but that could have been done in 5 pages.  Please Nora, spend a little more time with the characters in the next book.  Or if you are tired of them, wrap it up.  This one is a real stinker.
Blechhh!. Just browsed the opening chapter online in the New Criterion. The words pompous, sententious and bombastic don't even begin to do justice to Kimball's overlabored prose. You would need to reach for appropriately grand phrases like "Pseudo-Mediterranean Wind."
Scatter brain ranting at it finest. I honestly admit I did not finish this book.  The topics jump from one to the next with no focus. The author reminded me of my worst profs in college; a self proclaimed genius with NO ability to write or communicate.
Beware of this substandard effort. If you're a Ludlum fan, like I am, you will be acutely disappointed in this bomb. After the likes of The Sigma Protocol and The Janson Directive, this one is about as interesting as watching the tide come in. It starts with a hackneyed premise of terrorist weapon materials being transported to China, then comes to a grinding halt as the "story" stagnates for hundreds of pages, going on and on, with no advancement of the plot whatsoever, like a car stuck in the mud.
Some very informative text, ruined by useless formulas. Biggest waste of $35 I've ever seen ! This was a required text in school , and approximatly 25% of the formulas were completely unusable. It was if this character wrote these recipes off the top of his head without the  slightest concern for whether they worked or not.I shudder to think how  many copies of this waste of paper have been sold to culinary students and  the general public alike
Simplistic and selective. I was a bit surprised that this book (essay) received such high marks from so many reviews.  For all its purported brevity, it is remarkably repetitive and filled with extraneous tangents.  Its 150 pages (with 2004 afterword) could easily be trimmed down to 50-60 pages without losing much content.Kagan's major claims are the following: (1) Europeans and Americans  have divergent perspectives regarding international relations and foreign policy (Britons tend to find themselves in the middle); (2) These different perspectives are relatively recent and have not been the norm over the long span of history; (3) America has always seen itself, and esp. in the last 60 years, as a pro-active agent of liberal democracy in the world; (4) The United Nations has no practical legitimacy; (5) The precepts of national sovereignty and of moral intervention are mutually conflicting; (6) Barring an unforeseen disaster, the U.S. will continue to dominate world affairs as it sees fit; (7) Unless Europe finally "comes on board" with the U.S., the net power of liberal democracies in the world may decrease enough to threaten world security.It does not take a tremendously perceptive reader to gather that this essay is basically an apologia for the Iraq War.  As such, evidence and observations are gathered very selectively, and a handful of points are drilled at repeatedly.  One of these is the fact that the Kosovo intervention by Europeans was illegal, in that it violated international law.  Kagan argues, in essence, "If Europe didn't mind invading Kosovo illegally in 1999, why should they care about Iraq in 2003?"  This is a legitimate question to ask, but Kagan's analysis is superficial, as it must be to maintain his position.  Today, in November 2005, the differences are all too clear: Kosovo was an intervention into genocide and ethnic cleansing, based on human rights and humanitarian reasons; Iraq was an intervention into a failing dictatorship, taken to satisfy grandiose foreign policy aspirations and provide lucrative contracts for corporations, and based on fraudulent evidence and countless lies.  The issue of the conflict between international law and moral intervention is a legitimate one, but Kosovo/Iraq is a false comparison.There are other glaring omissions and/or howlers that speak volumes: the enormous costs of the advocated "preventive" foreign policy, the mounting defecits and debt are barely mentioned in passing once or twice.  Kagan even states at one point that "Economically, [America] can go alone in the reconstruction of places like Iraq if it absolutely has to -- five decades ago, after all, it reconstructed Europe and Japan with its own funds."  Yes, but not while the government was run by a cabal cutting taxes and spending more than anyone previously.  Henry Kissinger is described as a "quintessential realist"!  Kagan even states, "Americans do not argue, even to themselves, that their actions may be justified by raison d'etat."  I wonder what country he's living in -- oh, that's right, he lives in Belgium now!Kagan set himself up for a difficult task -- defending the Iraq War by deflecting attention from the facts of that sham and resorting to political rhetoric and philosophising.  No wonder it comes across as a badly-written college term paper.  His faith in American moral superiority is unquestioned.  And this is where his thesis falls apart -- if "might is right", and you have the might, you assume you do right...but what if you're wrong?
Oh, the Things He Doesn't Need to Share!. This is not Al's best work. It's more rambling than usual and not so pithy. I got it for cheap and got enough laughs to justify my purchase
silly nostalsgic nonsense. Having spent most of my adult life working in the non-profit conservation field, and as a parent, and as someone who had the good fortune to spend lots of time in nature as a child, I read this book in the hopes of learning important things. That turned out to be a forlorn hope.By a quarter of the way through I was rolling my eyes; by the halfway mark I was actively insulted that this author would expect anyone to buy what he was shoveling. I finished the thing only out of grim curiosity.Louv has about three major points:(a) American kids circa 2005 are much less active outdoors than American kids circa 1965 were;(b) that change is due to computers, personal-injury lawyers, and various other things that people Louv's age don't like;(c) being "in nature" is important to kids' development and to human health generally.Point (c) is blindingly obvious, is not news to anyone, and is the only major point for which he offers any actual evidence which wouldn't get laughed out of the offices of a peer-reviewed journal.For points (a) and (b) he offers zero evidence, nada, zip -- absolutely nothing but anecdotes, leading rhetorical questions, and straw men. He sounds like nothing so much as Joseph McCarthy wondering whether Communists "might be" undermining American foreign policy from within the State Department. Indeed he uses precisely that rhetorical construction repeatedly, always a signpost of intellectual flabbiness.Obvious logic flaws abound, as do laugh-out-loud factual mistatements. In the first half of the book I started jotting down glaring holes in his argument but gave up in disgust when I realized that most of his factual claims weren't even footnoted! Louv isn't even consistent in his straw men: one moment he's talking about when he was a child (1960s, roughly) and the next moment he's quoting somebody talking about how much kids were outdoors in 1910, or 1860!While he offers no actual evidence for his broad proposition of a new "nature deficit disorder", he does throw tangential facts around some of which I am in a professional position to quickly confirm. I checked a half-dozen such, and the score was that he got 1 substantially correct, distorted 2 beyond recognition, and got 3 dead wrong.I could go on but enough already. This thing isn't worth the paper it was printed on
Good...but not worth the effort. I felt like this book never took off like most Grisham novels do.  It was predictable throughout the novel, and the ending was so abrupt- I felt like Grisham thought the novel was getting too long and going nowhere, so we'll just end it with a short chapter about what pans out with each character.  I do really enjoy a good Grisham novel, and have to admit that he is my favorite author- but I just didn't enjoy this one
Beverly Hills Sleeper. Definetly not one of Stu's best. I think he needs to stick to the Stone Barrington character, or make Rick Barron's adventures a little more interesting. Maybe Stu needs to read a couple James Patterson novels
A real disappointment..... As a Human Resource professional I was looking for a book that I could use that would help new and emerging managers and executives with their transitions into their new roles.  This book was a disappointment.  While some of the points were good and insightful, the content could have been covered in a feature length article instead of the book format.  Also, the testimonies from the other executives were tedious and unrealistically presented.  They may all be quite true but the real world does not work in such a straight-forward, linear fashion with few roadblocks, detours, or major frustrations.I did, however,  get some pithy slogans I can use in my discussions with colleagues while I wait or someone to write the business book summary......wait, it's been done by the people at [...]  Get that, save your time, and you will learn about as much as reading the full-length book version.I found "The First 90-Days" written by Michael Watkins to be more practical and actionable than this offering.  I also am looking forward to Goldsmith new book, "What Got You Here Won't Get You There" hoping it might be the one I can recommend
Deserves Negative Stars. Jon Katz is an idiot.  Anyone who sells him a dog better be prepared for him to kill the dog rather than deal with any issues.  Although this book is being sold as a nice dog story, it is anything but.  Jon Katz once again decides to kill his dog rather than put himself out.  (In an earlier book, he killed his supposedly beloved labs because he couldn't bear to see them anything less than 100% healthy.)  In this book, he decides to kill his supposed "soul mate" dog Devon AKA  Orson, because he does not want to be bothered to manage the dog's enviroment.  Orson bites a couple of people, and Katz decides he doesn't want to be bothered keeping the dog in an enclosed yard because it would "be a prison".  If you are a dog lover, do NOT buy this book.  You will just be pissed off by Katz's behavior.
Huntington, Samuel: B-. Had this been a paper written by a graduate student in Political Science, it would have gotten something like a B-. Much like other reviewers have said, the book paints a cartoonish picture of, you know... foreign people, who apparently have all the negative features one could imagine, form being violent to gladly subjecting themselves to the rule of the czar, as opposed to good ol' "Westerners" who are independent, hard-working, law-abiding, individualistic, etc, etc. He does not say it directly, but you can discern that when he says Westerners he doesn't really mean Italians or Portuguese - he means white Anglo-Saxon protestants.Leaving aside the racist/eugenicist air that comes out of almost every page of this book (btw, what do you do with mixed race people?), I take issue mainly with the methodology of the work. If you are a student of Political Science looking for a serious discussion of a theory of international conflict you will not find it here. In a country where the Current Affairs section of bookshops is full of retarded titles like "How Republicans Stole Christmas" or "How To Talk To a Liberal. If You Have To", prof Huntington knows where success lies. His book fits comfortably among these these type of works but causes giggles among real academics.When discussing the causes and mechanisms of international conflict, scholars generally employ some sort of statistical analysis, if only to confirm a qualitative discussion. There exists a database named Correlates of War on which the serious researcher can do all sorts of regression analyzes and find out whether this or that factor plays a causal role in war. Of course this bores the hell out of the typical "How Republicans Stole Christmas" reader, so Huntington prefers laying out arguments on the lines of (caricatural paraphrase) "Since 33% of wars involve Muslims, it is obvious that Muslims are bloody." I have not researched this matter, but from what I've heard, people have run basic regression analyzes on his theory and shattered it to pieces.Most of the ideas he lays out are not supported even by this type of proof. For the most part, he just posits stuff. The Vietnamese are a second-hand miniature copy of the Chinese "core civilization". Romanians are some sort of Russians and they volunteered to fight along the Serbs against the Croats.(!) Of course, all of these claims are delusional and they fit the image of the ignorant American who can't point Louisiana on the map. Unfortunately, these types of people sometimes get to influence US policy and periodically get this country in all sorts of trouble.  Overall, I honestly believe that George W Bush has a much better understanding of international affairs than Samuel Huntington, and that is saying something
One Case Where the Film was Probably Better. This is a product of the lazy, latter-day Leonard who knows he's a great writer who can just sit back and let it flow. The onetime master of concision now takes a hundred-odd pages just to set things up.Even his ear for dialogue has started to fade on him. Now everybody like, y'know, talks like, uhh, some kinda boob, get what I'm sayin'? The line of self-parody is lying a little too close in these pages.He still has a hand with the quirky minor characters, though they can't carry an entire 350-page plus novel. But this one did make it clear to me why Leonard is so popular with the pomo crowd: his characters inhabit an utterly amoral universe, one with no values or standards whatsoever. Here, e.g., the protagonist is that well-known figure drawn from life, the friendly, easygoing loan shark. In your traditional crime novel--Chandler or either MacDonald can serve as examples--the action occurs against a hard-edged moral framework that is at least given lip service. Now I won't demand that every piece of fiction act as a morality play. But this was a case where I finished the thing, and kind of enjoyed the ride, but didn't like myself for it. In Leonard's recent novels, all that matters is who gets to take home the candy. And when you get right down to it, that just ain't enough.
sort of cheating. This book is exactly the same as "Handbook of Technical Writing" by same authors. The only difference is in the cover picture and colors. I think it is not a cool thing to sell the same book with two names without mentioning it. So if you have that one, do not buy this one. They are exactly the same
Disappointment!. The only reason I made it through this book is because it was our book club choice for the month.  Otherwise, I would have quit after the first chapter.  I found the girl's thought patterns unrealistic for a girl of 11.  The plot of story develpment was very weak, it didn't ripen until the very last few chapters.  By that time, I was so sick of the repetitious story line, I skimmed through it just so I could finish it.  The language was very rich and descriptive, but with such a boring story line, who cares?  I'm glad to be done with it!
What Really Works. I find books like this help you with opening remarks, like simple one-liner ice breakers. OK, so they feed you some lines and then what are you supposed to talk about? If you don't know many people at the event, it's hard to come up with something interesting that won't end with you red-faced, or with your foot firmly in your mouth. I find online knowledge services like Agogus.com are very helpful in this respect, more that these kinds of books. I have more confidence to start a conversation, now that I have a wide knowledge of all kinds of topics. It's even fun to go to holiday parties, not a pain like it used to be.
Unpatriotic. Hodge's &quot;Redefining European Security&quot; does not even dwell upon the fundamentals of defense and military strategies. Its a hodgepodge of basic definitions cut and pasted from some of Europe's local newspapers and from &quot;un-named sources.&quot; Truly, the European experiment, most notably Britain, while less drastic in it's security failures, was discouraging. This is in complete contrast to Hodge's Conservatist bias
Almost everything Dan Brown taught us about Christ is false!. Books have been written, and will continue to be written, to try and disprove Christianity and Jesus as the Son of God. What is almost comical is that one has to print lies and errors to try and convince people. That's because you can't disprove the TRUTH. And what are some of the errors, you ask? I will give you a few: Dan Brown tries to use Gnostic gospels (gospels written in the 2nd century and beyond by people who were not eyewitnesses) to try and prove his theory and omitting New Testament Scripture. To say that Jesus and Mary Magdalene were married by using the Gospel of Phillip (written after 250 A.D.) where there are missing words: And the companion of the [...] Mary Magdalene. [...] more than [...] the disciples, [...] kiss her [...] on her [...]. Clearly, there is some problems with this text with the missing words and the fact that it was written over 200 years after Jesus died. This does not prove anything. Also, he says that the word "companion" means spouse in Aramaic, which is great, except that the Gospel of Philip was written in "Coptic," where "companion" does not mean "spouse!" Second, Dan Brown says that it wasn't until 325 AD at the Council of Nicea did people start to believe Jesus was a Deity and that it was a close vote. New Testament disproves that because it shows that Jesus was Deity where Paul writes in 1 Corinthians 15:3-5: "For I delivered to you first of all that which I also received: that Christ died for our sins according to the Scriptures, and that He was buried, and that He rose again the third day according to the Scriptures, and that He was seen by Cephas, then by the twelve." Also, The Council of Nicea met only to sort out some differences among church leaders, all of whom believed that Jesus was divine. The main question was whether Jesus was begotten or made. Jesus' divinity, death and resurrection were not in question. Only two of 318 clerics at the Council did not sign the Nicene Creed. So there was not a close vote unless you think 318 to 2 is close! Third, his main argument is that it Mary Magdalene in the Last Supper painting by Leo. If that were true, then where is John, the youngest and most beloved apostle? John was often portrayed in a feminine manner to convey youth, as is seen in many stained glass portraits in European cathedrals. And also, Leo was just a painter who was not around when Jesus was, so it didn't matter if he tried to put Mary in a painting or not! Fourth, Brown says that The Gnostic gospels and the Dead Sea Scrolls are "the earliest Christian records." While the New Testament obviously came before the Gnostic gospels, The Dead Sea Scrolls refer to a collection of about 900 documents, many of which are fragmentary scrolls written in Hebrew, Greek and Aramaic, that were discovered in a cave and do not contain even a single mention of Jesus or of any other person mentioned in the New Testament as they are Jewish documents! He also says they were discovered in the 1950's when they were discovered in 1947. Oops! Fifth, Dan Brown says that Christianity borrowed its beliefs from the pagan religion of Mithraism. He says that Mithraism worshipped the pre-Christian God Mithras, called the Son of God and Light of the World, who was born on December 25th, died, was buried in a rock tomb, and then resurrected in three days. Scholars of Mithraism would strongly disagree with Brown on all of these points. Nowhere is Mithras given the title Son of God and the Light of the World. Brown apparently made this up because it sounded good. Mithras was born on December 25th, however this proves nothing. The New Testament never associated December 25th with the birth of Christ. The early Christians chose to celebrate the birth of Christ on this day intentionally to oppose the pagan mid-winter festival of Saturnalia. They never claimed Jesus was actually born on that date. The claim that Mithras died and was buried in a rock tomb is just not true. Scholars will tell you that in Mithraism there is no death of Mithras at all. So, there was no rock tomb and no resurrection. So once again, he is nowhere near correct. Lastly, Brown says that the four canonical gospels were chosen from over 80 gospels. First, there were only less than half that many books written about Jesus life. The two Gnostic gospels Brown relies on most heavily weren't written until the second century A.D., long after the New Testament gospels were written. It makes sense that the Gnostic gospels came about in the late second century, as this is when Gnostic thought was most prevalent. However, the New Testament was complete before the end of the 1st Century. Also, the Gospel of Thomas, which Dan Brown lies heavily on,claims women must become men in order to receive salvation. That makes no sense. There are many other errors in this novel, but I think I have showed there are enough lies in this book not to be taken seriously. This is pure (or rather "poor") fiction, without a shred of evidence that Jesus was anything other than the Christ, the Son of the living God! Thank you, Dan Brown, for making my faith stronger
Please Baby Please Don't Make Me Read This Book Again. The sound of fingernails scraping against a blackboard doesn't bother me.  However, the thought of having to read this book one more time to my 2 year old daughter causes me to shudder uncontrollably.This book was given to my daughter in a secret gift exchange at her school (and I wish I knew who the secret gift giver was so I could return the generosity by giving them a DVD box set of The Wiggles).  And while she does like the pictures, I dread having to read this story to her whenever she asks.Do me a favor and read the following sentence out loud:  "Baby Baby Baby Baby Please Baby Please Please Please Baby Baby Baby."  Isn't that annoying?  Well, that's pretty much what drives the story; the parents get on their daughter about different things throughout the entire book, and that's how they end every single sentence - "Don't be so slow, baby baby baby" "Don't splash the water, please baby baby baby please baby please please baby."  GRRR!!!!!!!!!!  Thank goodness it's short, but when has anybody ever tried to coax their child into doing something by saying, "Please eat your peas, baby baby baby baby?"  I read this and I feel like I'm reading about a family living in a mental institution.  And on the very first page of the story, the clock on the VCR is reading 3:00 AM; why is the child still up and the t.v. on at that hour??  I know that children are rambunctuous and full of energy and all of that, but I'M more awake at 3AM than my daughter is.Now, why Dr. Seuss doesn't annoy me and this does, I can't tell you.  Maybe it's because I found the Mars Blackmon character from "She's Gotta Have It" so overwhelmingly annoying.  And someone came up with the idea that that character should provide the narration of a children's story.  He was the one who spent the entire movie trying to get into Nola Darling's pants, right?  Okay.I'm sorry; I like an actual "story" when I sit down to read my daughter a bedtime story.  If the idea is to entertain children with annoying repetition, well then it succeeds.  But I think it's possible to create a story without having to sound like an idiot while telling it
lazy and lame book. i ordered this, based largely on the concept, which seemed like a book on gay history that was much needed to fill in the gaps. instead, the book comes off as if Kaiser got a nice advance and then needed to submit *some* kind of manuscript, but he had lots of other things to do, so he did the absolute minimal amount of new research. instead, he relies heavily on taped interviews with 6 or 7 gay men to fill out the pages. The chapter on the '70s, one of the most important decades in gay history, has nothing more than former bartenders saying that "the Mineshaft was wild, man" and a politico friend of his talking about how he semi-came out of the closet. No sense of the "gay metropolis" here, just a random series of unconnected anecdotes. I hope he got a nice advance, but this book isn't really worth actually BUYING - just check it out at the library, in all its dismalness, and see for yourself.
Great Plot, Poor Delivery. It's summer, and my reading matter always lightens up significantly! I spotted this book at the library and figured, why not!  I know, I said never again for Danielle Steel, but the plot interested me.  How bad could it be, right?Well, there's good news and bad news.  The good news is that the plot is different for DS, and held my interest enough so that, unlike Impossible, I actually finished it in one day.  The bad news is that this book seems entirely devoid of any attempt at editing.  The repetition is maddening. When reading becomes a chore, and you can skip entire pages and not miss anything, it's time to start some serious editing.Here are some suggested areas of improvement:- Shorten up the paragraphs.  They should not exceed a page!- Try spending a little more time developing the characters.  I couldn't "see" Sarah - when I read, I want to be able to clearly visualize the people and after hundreds of pages, I never had a clear vision of the main character- Pay attention to style. Every time she spelled out 30,000, I wanted to pull my hair out.  Small thing, but numbers over nine should always be written in numerals unless they are at the beginning of a sentence.As I've written before, DS needs a good editor. This book could have been one of her best to date.
Overview but too many small errors. I looked for an introduction to the basics of Office automation and bought this book.  Every example code I tried was incorrect and the examples are just all trivial.  Samples from the MSDN was just as good as this book.If you only need a rough overview what technologies are out there, this book is OK.  But for any real programming it is not very useful.
Mega flaw in Mega Best Seller. There is a huge flaw in this book. Below is a quote:"When you make any choice...ask yourself two things:  First of all, what are the consequences of this choice that I'm making? In your heart you will immediately know what these are. Secondly, will this choice that I'm making now bring happiness to me and to those around me? If the answer is yes, then go ahead with that choice. If the answer is no, if that choice will bring distress either to you or to those around you, then don't make that choice.  It's as simple as that."If you follow this advice you would stall any sort of personal growth. Deepak is a great man, and has helped many people, but, if you are interested in consicous choice making, then you can know that this book will not help you, and choose not to buy it.
Watch Your Mouth. The author of this book tries too hard to be clever here. If you want a better book that's smart and provocative, go read Lolita
Trish. I gave this book one star because there are no negative numbers available. The other reviews here are all true! This is a horrible textbook that jumps from subject to subject quickly, gives simplistic examples in the chapter and then throws complex homework problems with new components not explained in the chapter--oh and don't let me forget to mention that the terminology changes from chapter to homework as well! A friend with two masters (business and engineering) became so frustrated trying to help with a problem that he threw his hands up. The terminology kept throwing him off.If you are supposed to buy this text I suggest you either show these to college administration ahead of time, or take another class. This is so bad I won't even sell mine back. I'm throwing it in my grill to burn
Hogwash. I saw the author this morning on "Good Morning America" and I couldn't disagree with him more.  He said that cardio workout's did not burn alot of calories.  That is not true as it burns much more than lifting weights orerall!  Also walking is considered weight bearing.  It is good for so many things including depression, memory and circulation. They even say it can reduce the incidence of breast cancer and other cancers, not to mention that it is great for your heart. Nothing could be healthier to do. It is true that when you lift weight you will burn more calories at rest, but it is not that much. It is actually really low, something like 5 or 10 calories a day.  It is good to do both and don't forget streching.  As far as weight goes, it is true it is just calories that cause to gain or lose.   He was right about that but If I ate 1200 calories a day I would starve.  I workout alot on the treadmill and I am not overweight.  It does not increase my appetite, it just makes me feel really good.Don't waste your money and buy this book.
prepared for what?. this extremely alarmist manual does not offer practical suggestions, but a ritualistic rule of worry that will instill doomsday panic in anyone who tries to follow it. Shame on a practicing physician for coming up with such nonsense
AWFUL!. Wow, where can I start? This book was truly dreadful in pretty much every imaginable manner. Not only was the plot completely absurd and filled with glaring inconsistencies, as already mentioned, but was totally transperant. In this type of book a little artistic license can be granted for the sake of a gripping storyline, but this book offers nothing in the way of suspense. The characters are ridiculous cardboard cutouts which do nothing to fix the book's predictability. I've never read any other of Cussler's novels (and now never will), so I'm not sure if his writing is always like this, but here he seems to have little command of the English language, his prose is drowning in mangled phrases, overblown cliches and pointless technical jargon.A travesty from start to finish - don't waste your time on this book
Poor Quality........High Price!!. I am sure the movie will be great, but this companion/screenplay is quite lackluster. With such beautiful imagery you would think the book would be bursting with wonderful shots. Not the case. Small book, small blurry images. Little or no designs, making of, publicity shots, etc. Save your money!! Oh well...
Childish. This is the third in an expanding series set in a cod-Celtic world focussed on the &quot;kingdom&quot; of Deverry.  I was impressed enough by the first to buy the whole opening quartet, and was sadly disappointed.  Books 1 and 2 are advertised as re-written, and are reasonably polished.  The unrevised 3rd and 4th books have a first draft quality and increasing reliance on dialogue, long stretches that read like film-script, which isn't well-written and expose the poor quality of the character writing.  Book 1 dealt with some adult themes, principally incest, but in book 3 the heroine Jill is just gratuitously and tastelessly sexually abused.  The main gimmick of the series is that the main characters are linked by destiny through reincarnation, and it records their &quot;reunions&quot; at different points in history.  In the first book the stories run parallel and reflect on each other.  As the series runs on the link between eras is weaker and the switch between stories is awkward and arbitrary.  In the later volumes, in an attempt to open the story into an eternal battle between good and evil, the author crow-bars in opposing schools of &quot;Light&quot; and &quot;Dark&quot; magic, obviously &quot;inspired&quot; by The Force from Star Wars.  Her magicians also travel and fight on an &quot;astral plane&quot; extraordinarily similar to the world of Marvel comics hero Dr Strange.  In the final analysis these are teen romances, with very few original ideas, populated by lacklustre characters, adequately written but operating on the law of diminishing returns.  I bought them so I had to read them.  Don't be sucked in
Good writing, good idea. The writing is good from a technical standpoint (I don't have to jump literary hurdles to get through a paragraph because the words flow very well).  The idea is a good one too.  What I can't get past is the character Robert Langdon.  Langdon is supposed to be a sharp academic but he seems to lack foresight in his cogitations and things always dawn on him at the last second.  Another thing I have trouble with is Dan Brown's knack for slowing the pace of the story.  Things will be running strong for a moment and then the author tries just a little too much to build suspense.  The problem is the reader already knows where the particular scene is headed and this attempt to build up for a critical moment leaves me wanting to skip ahead to the payoff.  Like playing fetch with a dog, you can only tease him for so long before he loses interest, especially when the dog has a pretty good idea where the ball will land after it's finally tossed.This book is an easy read but I think it is a bit over-rated.
for children under 12. this book seems to target children under 12 years of age.  It has very few pointers for adolescents. this book tends to be aimed at the education profession rather than parents
Poorly written copycat novel. This book is a feeble attempt to reproduce a "Tom Clancyesque" type novel.  Unfortunately, this author has little writing ability and didn't even come close.  What a disappointment.
Flopping like New Coke. While I agree in principle that a citation book should be readable and easy to use, I find ALWD to be decidedly useless in the real practice of law. Although forced to purchase the book as a 1L, I have to meet an attorney, judge or legal scholar that uses it or would like it to replace the Bluebook. In fact, during a firm interview, the attorney and I joked that we would like to start an anti-ALWD club to prevent 1Ls from being tricked into preferring ALWD over Bluebook. Sorry ALWD
Christian fundamentalism dramatized. Even the avid "trekie" reader of the Star Trek science fiction novels, movies and television series must suspend disbelief, when he finds Captain Kirk saying "Beam me up, Scotty."  But the biblical literalist reading this book need make no such effort, when he reads in this book that Jesus will effectively beam millions of true Christians up to heaven in the world-wide "Rapture."  Though the characters and their roles are fictitious, the book specifically references the relevant biblical passages for the believer.The story line opens with the chaotic moment of discovery after the historic mass Rapture event, and the remainder is a moral melodrama concluding with emotional born-again conversions.In the September/October 2006 issue of Foreign Affairs Walt Mead writes that fundamentalists are not hospitable to the idea of gradual progress toward a secular utopia driven by technological advances and the cooperation of intelligent people of all religious traditions.Instead fundamentalists separate themselves from the world and have a premillennial pessimism about prospects for social reform.  Billy Graham's biography by Strober notes that they criticized Graham's "new evangelism" for its inclusiveness and for its involvement in addressing social problems. Yet their separatism does not preclude proselytizing as portrayed in these novels by the "Tribulation Force" or as exemplified by Jerry Falwell's Moral Majority.They are also committed to an apocalyptic vision of the end of the world and are hostile to international institutions such as the United Nations. Mead notes that it is no coincidence that the Left Behind novels show the Antichrist rising to power as the secretary-general of the United Nations.The U.S. Statistical Abstract reports that the per capita numbers of fundamentalists are growing exponentially, while evangelicals and liberals - e.g. Southern Baptists, Lutherans, Presbyterians, Methodists - and Catholics are continuing their per capita declines.  Such data and the reported popularity of these Left Behind novels indicate fundamentalism's growing appeal in reaction to contemporary American society.I see the readers who seriously respond to this book as the "left behind" in the backwash of the tidal flows of cultural change in modern American society, and as conservative Christians who believe it is better to stay behind.  And in not just a few respects, they may be wise to do so.Thomas J. Hickey
Very disappointed. My bookclub picked this out based on the exciting description.  It was very diappointing.  The main characters, Colin and Mary, are one dimensional and seem to have very little chemistry between the two of them.  There were a few times in the book that I wondered if Mary had multiple personalities.  It is unclear what their history is or what is the full story about her kids, why they are vacationing there, etc.Robert and Carolyn reek of creepy, creepy from the first moment that the reader meets them.  However, they are more interesting then the main characters of Mary and Colin.  At least Robert had a bit more dimension to him than the other characters.The ending was the most exciting part of the book.  The rest just goes on and on about nothing.  Even with an exciting ending it leaves so many holes and unanswered questions that just leave you wondering "What the ? ? ?
Record purchase entry of this book as a bad debt. You know, it's too bad these reviews can't be weighted because there's a class of about 40 people with whom I took accounting in university that would trash this book. Make it 41 for the prof who stepped in and had to use it. It is not well written, with information presented out of logical order. It does not cover the materials sufficiently, nor in enough depth, trying to combine financial and managerial accounting in a book full of "worksheet" style pages that could have, and should have, been cheaply produced in an accompanying study or homework guide instead of built into a hard cover book that doesn't even have a lot of content to begin with. It's a waste of money at just about any price, not being able to teach the material, never mind at its outrageous price. I wish we could sue to get our money back on books that simply don't live up to standards. I also wish there was a zero star rating, or negative ones, which indicate complete waste of time and/or money, never mind zero value to purchase and read
outdated - thy name is the Crying of Lot 49. So, being a fan of all forms of literature, more specifically challenging[faulkner], pretentious[d.h. lawrence] and original[kafka] works, I was surprised at how long it took me to get around to reading what's considered Pynchon's most imporant work.Important 40 years ago, perhaps, but the test of time has totally obliterated the supposed wit in this one.  Oh man, the radio station is KCUF, boy, that's incredibly clever, I bet it's, like, something spelled backwards.  I fully understand what Pynchon was trying to accomplish with this work, to skewer extreme right wing nut jobs, among other things, all while giving us a story with no particular plot, no moral, no message.  I can understand it, but it doesn't mean it's worth my time, I didn't even finish it.  I read about half and then just dropped it to the floor.I've read in numerous reviews of Haruki Murakami's work that he's a latter day, Japanese, Pynchon.  I don't agree, Murakami's ability to create a surreal dream-like atmosphere is amazing, Pynchon is a hack
How did Suskind get authorship credit on this book?. If you are looking for a fresh look at some of Broadway's bomb, do not stop here.Suskind wrote very little in this book of previously-published material by other people.  This book is more accuratly "compiled by" than "by" him.I refrain from entirely discounting this book because it publishes (more or less) in their entirety sources that were used by much better authors by their much better books.  It may be a reference for theatre students, but there isn't much else to recommend this book.And don't get me wrong; flops are a source of morbid fascination for me.  This is why I am so disappointed with this particlar volume -- there's nothing in it that you can't get in other, better written, better compiled, and better organized tomes
It didn't work for me either. I too read this book cover to cover with high hopes for success.  I took notes and paid extra attention on how to perform each technique.  When a particular therapy had more than one technique I tried the first with no improvement and worked my way onto the next and still I saw nothing.  I got no immediate results as promised and no results still.  I've been very disappointed with this book
Peter's Singing Out of Tune. This is the third book by Peter Singer which I have read and therefore I knew what to expect - arguments propped up with poor logic yet nonetheless presented to the reader with the tone one would expect as if Singer were repeating the obvious for the umpteenth time.  Yet like the man who just has to take one last whiff of spoiled milk before tossing it down the drain, I found myself reaching for ONE WORLD on the book shelf to get Singer's take on globalization.  I usually am not such a glutton for punishment but I guess the human psyche is funny that way.The biggest problem with ONE WORLD is the same as with all of Singer's writings.  He assumes that the big questions of ethics, over which some of the most brilliant minds in history have pondered, have all been resolved.  And, of course, they have all been resolved in his favor.  The result is that Singer presents ideas that actually require intellectual defense as axiomatic starting points from which he begins.One need only to examine the introduction to see this. The very first page of text states that national leaders either view things from the perspective of national self-interest or they view things ethically.  Nice false dichotomy, huh?  Even if one agrees with Singer's conclusion, there are numerous views of ethics that point in the other direction.  Some would view a self-interested or national-interested position as good in and of itself.  Others would argue that a non-global view actually benefits more people worldwide through the beneficial interactions between parties and because anyone thinking globally would have far too many factors to consider for any decision and therefore would create mischief through unintended consequences.Also in the introduction, Singer asserts that the United Nations is the only institution that may legitimately project force in the international arena specifically because any nation may join.  He contrasts this with an institution such as NATO which has specific requirements for membership.  Yet once again, Singer does nothing to address the possibility that perhaps ethics points in the other direction, i.e. because any nation may join actually gives the United Nations less authority than a selected group of free states in which membership has its requirements.Such faulty premises riddle ONE WORLD's treatment of issues both large and small.  Singer supports the International Criminal Court and criticizes the United States for not signing on without any analysis as to the U.S.'s unique position as the world's sole superpower and how this might be a solid and justifiable basis for the U.S. to follow a different path.  After all, most countries are not able to project their militaries globally and few are asked to do so.  To compare their actions with those of the U.S. seems rather specious.Singer advocates - uh, I mean ethics dictates - a significantly higher tax rate on people in wealthy nations.  The economics behind this are not discussed nor is there any meaningful discussion of how economics and ethics might intersect on this issue.  If lower tax rates produce more overall wealth due to expansion of the economy (which, by the way, is the case), then any ethics worth its name should advocate such.  This would produce more money for those in affluent nations while providing poor nations an impetus for changing inefficient economies.  Singer attempts to get around this by focusing on poor people rather than on poor nations and stating that these people need help now.  Maybe so, but so will their children and their children's children, etc. etc. etc. until systematic changes are put into place.  Singer's ethics would prevent this from happening.  Examples of such sloppy thinking and inferential leaps go on and on throughout the book.Singer even fails to properly support his apparently boundless enthusiasm for the United Nations.  Although he acknowledges that the U.N. needs reform, his discussion of this is anemic.  He suggests that the U.N. should refuse to recognize any government that rules without the support of its people but fails to explain how this differs in any meaningful way from a collection of self-selected states, such as NATO, which he has already deemed inferior to the U.N. on the specific ground that the U.N. is open to all nations.  No mention is made to numerous U.N. scandals over the years.Nor does Singer address the U.N.'s rather pathetic history of negotiating relationships between its members.  What does it say that the one single nation which has had the most U.N. resolutions passed against it - Israel - is a free, liberal democracy that guarantees free speech, freedom of religion and civil rights to all of its citizens regardless of race or ethnicity?  Are we really to believe that Israel's neighbors have better track records with respect to human rights?  Of course not.  Yet no other Middle Eastern state feels the lash of the U.N.'s whip like Israel.  Singer does nothing to address either this specific issue or, more importantly, the larger issues about how the U.N. functions that this example illuminates.Singer is so blind in his devotion to the U.N. that he writes, with respect to Kofi Annan sitting by while a genocide was taking place in Rwanda, that Annan has learned from this situation.  Let us put aside the uncomfortable argument that there is little evidence to support the proposition that Annan has learned anything.  Instead, let us focus on Singer giving Annan what amounts to little more than a slap on the wrist while harshly criticizing the United States for taking military action that has a verifiable track record of destroying tyrannies, freeing millions of people and setting up the foundations for free, independent governments.  Like to hear it or not, more people in this world are free because of U.S. military power than because of any other single factor.  What could possibly account for this discrepancy other than a results oriented approach, i.e. Singer gives Annan the pass because Annan's aspirations of one world government are consistent with Singer's own?Not surprisingly, the United States comes in for heavy criticism in ONE WORLD.  It is telling that Singer feels the need to employ verbal inflation about the U.S. "dominating over" and "ruling" the rest of the world.  But Singer's criticism of the U.S. depends on one buying into his views.  As I do not, I point to Singer's criticism of the U.S. as evidence that the U.S. is doing things basically right.  It will be a sad day in America if its foreign policy is ever complimented by Peter Singer.
Bad Book?. This was the worst book I have ever read.  It was so boring.  I have never spent so much money on such a stupid book!! I can't believe that anyone would say that they liked this book!! And I really wouldn't recomend anyone else buying or reading it!
Do not recommend. This book is full of typos; what happened to proofreading...is that a lost art/job?This book is also a good example of what Andy Rooney spoke of; authors making thousands on the backs of others.  Nothing is original by the author in this book; it is merely a compliation of the works of others.  You would think at least, since the author did have to compose anything, she could have at least proofread it
Grappling for a Christian niche in philosophy. Grenz initially usurps postmodernity as a tool to echo the death of modernism.  It seems his primary purpose in this task is the conflict between modern thought and Christianity's feasibility.  Once he feels he's accomplished this he goes back and asks us to, in certain instances, ignore the triumph of the postmodern over the modern he's just outlined that we may embrace those few elements of modernity that may prove useful in allowing his yearning for Christian legitimacy to continue with the least amount of resistance.  Then he audaciously asks us to simultaneously ignore the nuances of postmodern thought that don't fit particularly well with Christianity.If you are used to picking favorable parts out of texts to support your position and blatantly ignoring all points to the contrary, this book may be for you.  It appears that Grenz is adeptly applying the traditional Christian technique of selectively quoting Bible passages out of context without regard for the overall message to his analysis of the modern and postmodern.Fortunately, we don't need to perform any act of deconstruction on this text as the deconstruction is always already inherent in the text
Bio-tech Neo-Lidite??. O.K. I didn't buy the book, but I searched for reference to "immortality", which, as I suspected would give a very concise philisophical snapshot of the author. Lets see now, he speaks of the "demographic" problems associated with longer life and lower firtility. First obvious flaw in his reasoning is that we would be marginally active and retire for the last 40 to 50 or so years of a radically extended life(or 1000 years or so). The premise is rediculous because the goal of adult onset gene doping would be to extend health and vitality. Immaging a world in which you could live to 150 years or so with the strength and clearity of a 40 or 30 year old? Are you going to just "sit down in your rocking chair"?Even going with the worker ratios, in Japan for instance that he speaks of, only 2 for every 1 retired, we could adjust the theory that social security operates-if you retire at age 65 with indefinite life span, you should collect for just 20 years-go back to work, start a business. Go back to school-learn something new-all better ideas than just infering that we should just roll over and die because redical life extension might cause some potential "problems" with systems put in place when humans were suffering and dying at young ages.Also, "age differences" between the developed world and the underdeveloped world. Yes, there will be definate philosophic differences but they exist for other reasons rather than just "older women"(refering to aging populations that will have a slight increase in female to male ratios) in the North and "younger men"(refering to a higher male to female ratio in younger populations-as well as selective gender bias) in the South, or underdeveloped world. Maybe the influence an older, somewhat more femine population in the West might be a moderating influence governing our policies with regard to the rest of the world? Just a thought. But-waite a minute! Life extension will be available to the men as well as the women, unless we find more men just wanting to "roll over and die".Mr Fukuyama seems to be saying that changing anything that"makes us human" is wrong.I have a question to pose to him and any of you out there.What is so good about being "human"? Lets see, we are a vehicle for the "The Selfish Gene" which only cares about its transmission from one temporary entity to the next-and after the age of reproduction-who cares? Right? So we are disposable!Birth-Shcool-Work-Reproduction-Death. Right about when we start to begin to live, the genetic time bomb begins to visabley manifest itself.Like Francis, I was born in the middle of the "Baby Boom" generation. I am looking forward to human intellegence being able to preserve precious consciousness indefinitley. I have always known it would happen and I have a better than 50% chance at seeing this. This was considered impossible 30 years ago and I (and others like me) would state this and be shrugged off. What is really of concern to me is that now, we know it is possible but that some believe we should just "roll over and die"! Rediculous! We should persue radical life extension and also encourage near zero total birth rates so we can escape the Birth-School-Work-Reproduction-Death senerio!
The Definition of Trash. Trash sells and this is the definition of trash. Unfortunately many readers see this as history instead of fiction. Shaara who may have had a ghost writer obviously never visited a manuscipt library to do research. Readers should stick to reading the history of these events done by people who know how to research and how to write
One of Galbraith's shorter and more polemical works. Canadian-born John Kenneth Galbraith is probably one of the most influential economists in the West over the last 60 years.  As a flag-bearer of progressive politics and liberals, he has a steady history of writing economics treatise that argue his beliefs.  His latest offering is a short polemic against corporate bureaucracy.  Titled "The Economics of Innocent Fraud", this book shows how the modern capitalistic economy found in the US is really an economy driven by a small class of corporate managers.  They, not consumers and not share-holders, are in the driver's seat.  They determine what gets made, who gets paid, and what people can buy in the marketplace of goods, services, and most importantly, ideas.  As such, this class is beholden to noone but themselves.  The books ideas are not new, though for such a major economic figure to take it up and argue it with such obvious partisanship is quite new.  The problem with this book is its writing style.  It seems to follow a stream-of-consciousness style, which makes it difficult to understand what the author is trying to say.  The book contains many sentences that are not grammatically correct in any sense of the word.  Overall, the book's editors needed to have done a better job
C.R.A.P. This book and Hogg's parenting philosophies if anything induces stress and guilt in new moms. Some of it isn't even really logical. Five archetypes of babies? Take your new baby on a tour of your home? And her foolproof E.A.S.Y.? Jeez! IF it only were as easy as she claims it could be. I didn't like her condescending tone in her anecdotes about parents that can't or don't embrace her "E.A.S.Y." plan. Parenting by acronyms--rubbish
It should be called Cower in Shame. Ms Howard is usually a dependable author but she really let her readers down with this one.  It's OK to expect a reader to suspend disbelief every now & again but one would have to have a frontal lobotomy to buy what she is selling in this one.  So disappointing, especially after her wonderful & hilarious "To Die For."  The trees (for paper) that gave up their lives for this book die for nothing this time.
Who's the real &quot;Mr. Boring&quot;?. I have read this book through and through, and I have read the brief review pannning the book and the response by the author, Eugene Taylor. I had two reactions: First, I found the author's &quot;rebuttal&quot; rather  spooky. It was a mean-spirited response, not at all polite or -- dare I say  -- spiritually enlightened, although the author hints at his own ability to  see into the great beyond and to know more than the rest of us who are not  blessed with such . . . experiences. He is apparently thin-skinned, and  perhaps, after I read this book, I now see that he has reason to be. Which  brings me to my second point, my review of the book: I found myself in  total agreement with the reviewer from Lincoln, Mass. I'm sorry to say  this, but the book is boring. And repetitive. And offers a thesis that is  not very original at all. I have read many books on the history of New Age  spirituality, and this is just so-so
Replica of her Amanda Quick's Scandal. If you've read her Amanda Quick novels, this contemporary story is almost the exact replica of the novel, "Scandal".Heroine proposes to hero, who has a hidden agenda. Of course he's rich and he has almost the same history as "Scandal", whose father has gotten into debt and gets out of the picture leaving the family to deal w/ the debt, and the oldest child having to pay back debts that his father's friends/business associates want paid right away.  Of course hero grows up and wants vengence for this when he grows up. But his plans get waylaid when heroine interferes and convinces hero that vengence is not the right path.The book is so similar that a couple of times I caught myself looking at the cover to make sure I had the right book. The only difference in this book is that one is set in contemporary times and the other in historical time
Um, the 50's are over... Robert Putnam's book bemoans the declne in "civic participation" among Americans since its heyday in the 50's and 60's.  Although few would argue that bridge clubs aren't what they used to be, who would have predicted the rise of 20,000 member mega-churches back in 1962?  This underlines the basic problem with this book: it focuses too much on what constituted "communities" and "activities" in the past, without looking at how people form new and different kinds of communities today.  While I agree that television has dramatically increased the couch potato index, and participation in traditional FORMAL organizations has declined, I would argue that membership and participation in new kinds of groups that are more relevant to people in the 21st century has risen.  For example, while young people famously are less likely to vote in our dual-party system, college students today volunteer more that any generation before them.  In addition, while participation in mainline Protestant churches has stedily declined, engagement in evangelical churches has risen dramatically.  While I personally feel that the sterile suburban, drive-everywhere-in-my-SUV existance is soul crushing, and the popularity of reality TV may be a sign of the apocolypse, I also don't pine for the days where mom was expected to stay home with the kids and go to the bridge club once a week, while dad worked 9-5, returned home to supper, and went to the Men's Club on Tuesdays at 8.  And while Putnam's basic premise may resonate with many, its fetishization of days past blunts the strength of his overall argument
an austrian primer. This book's title is deceptive in that it suggests the author is going to examine the place of capitalism within formal Catholic social thought.  Sadly, Dr. Woods foregoes the opportunity to examine the teachings of the social magisterium in favor of the standard bromides of the Austrian school.  Admitting at the outset that he's no intention of bringing up the pronouncements of the popes throughout the ages, he instead nit picks about the sorts of things which have traditionally annoyed Austrians.  In most things, Woods follows the lead of others, contributing nothing himself in the way of original analysis.  He acknowledges his intellectual debt to Murray Rothbard in the introduction and, later on, draws on Rothbard's arguments concerning the 16th century scholastics, some of whom wrote opinions in accord with Austrianism.  Unfortunately, a few 16th century theologians does not the Church make and it's of course silly to even think that these men, grounded as they were in the thought of the Angelic Doctor, would in any way endorse Austrianism or the anarcho-capitalism of Murray Rothbard.  It would be the equivalent of saying that the popes are Austrian because they view private property as a pillar of society.  Nonsense!According to Rothbard, the error of Thomists and all classical natural-law theorists is that they viewed the state as a "major locus of virtuous action".  Elsewhere, Rothbard defines the state as a monopolistic criminal enterprise.  Each of these views is well outside of the social magisterium; no where will you find a pope who rejects the validity of the state since it holds authority by the will of God.  St. Paul addresses the state in Romans 13, not the all-powerful market, and he does not fall on the side of Murray Rothbard.  The errors of the non-Catholic Rothbard on political issues are not enough to persuade Woods that he's suspect as an authority in economics.  He clings instead all the more tightly to the luminaries of Austrianism in a book ostensibly dedicated to Catholic social teaching on economic concerns.  For myself, if I detect a serious error in the realm of political theory on the part of a writer, I become very cautious in following his lead in economic matters.  Rothbard's political views are inseparable from his economic theory since the state exists solely to destroy the fruits of the market (cf. Man, Economy & State).The supreme irony is that Dr. Woods continues to defend the compatibility of Austrianism and Catholicism, even against the condemnations of economic liberalism by popes like Pius XI, to whom Woods appeals against the errors and confusion which have plagued the post-conciliar Church (cf. The Great Facade).  Here, Pius XI addresses Woods and his ilk in his encyclical letter Ubi Arcano Dei:"Many believe in or claim that they believe in and hold fast to Catholic doctrine on such questions as social authority, the right of owning private property, on the relations between capital and labor, on the rights of the laboring man, on the relations between Church and State, religion and country, on the relations between the different social classes, on international relations, on the rights of the Holy See and the prerogatives of the Roman Pontiff and the Episcopate, on the social rights of Jesus Christ, Who is the Creator, Redeemer, and Lord not only of individuals but of nations. In spite of these protestations, they speak, write, and, what is more, act as if it were not necessary any longer to follow, or that they did not remain still in full force, the teachings and solemn pronouncements which may be found in so many documents of the Holy See, and particularly in those written by Leo XIII, Pius X, and Benedict XV.There is a species of moral, legal, and social modernism which We condemn, no less decidedly than We condemn theological modernism."Liberalism takes many forms.  In our own day, most faithful Catholics assume it is primarily concerned with corruptions of human sexuality.  In fact, the popes remind the faithful that liberalism appears under varied guises.Dr. Woods evinces a poor philosophical foundation and he is easily taken in by all sorts of assumptions.  For example, Ludwig von Mises, critical inspiration to Rothbard and other Austrians, claims in his work Human Action that praxeology "is the science of every kind of human action", rejecting any who would claim that his new science, heretofore unknown to the doctors of the Church, is not limited to those actions which lead to an improvement in a man's material well-being.  This claim of course is fundamentally at odds with St. Thomas and Catholicism at both a natural and theological level.  From a Thomistic perspective, one wonders how anyone can have a perfect science of all human action that does not weigh good or bad actions.  This is true whether it's philosophical ethics or evangelical precepts.  The error of the past, says Mises, is that philosophers like Aristotle sought to explain human action by notions of good or bad, just or unjust, or even worse, the "interference" of a Deity.  Instead, human actions are not ordered by objective valuations, but rather by the dictates of the market.  Virtue and vice are subjective notions which have no place in economics.  If a man is to "succeed" says Mises, he must adjust his actions to economic law.  In his intro to Human Action, he uses the example of a man who wants frequent sexual intercourse: if he's going to get it, he's going to have to know economics.  Austrian economics, not Chicago economics.  Elsewhere, he quips that "simple faith and economic rationalism cannot dwell together.  It is unthinkable that priests should govern entrepreneurs."  Meaning, the Church has no business at all talking about the market.  The social magisterium is just so many opinions which may or may not be the correct way to establish a just and felicitous social order.  Rothbardians would go further and say that the Church can be ignored without moral peril whenever She posits the notion of a common good capable of being guarded by the state.Woods argues that economics is not a species of ethics but is instead a pure science studied in the same way that physics is by physicists.  As St. Thomas says, "external goods that are used purposively by men have a moral consideration."  It's precisely this ethical cast that Mises and other Austrians have sought to banish from economics.  The Church has claimed the right to decide the moral lights which should guide Christians in formulating a just economic order.  Woods does not meditate upon the question of whether there is a moral calculus in the laws which the state passes to regulate the exchange of goods or in relations between labor and capital.  How can he?  His mentor Rothbard had already taught that the state was criminal by nature so it follows that its decrees are only the threats of a crime syndicate having a monopoly on the use of violence.  Rothbard took Mises to his logical conclusion, deciding that the market would necessarily find the most humane and efficient way to secure corporate goods with the state tagging along as an unwanted parasite.  Woods uses the same line of thought in his discussion on safety regulations.  The market will always do a better job of implementing safety in the workplace than any public regulation because it is rational.  If an objective moral evil exists in the social order, it cannot be addressed by a ruler or rulers.  The market is infallible and will eventually solve any problem, whether it takes days or decades.  Positive laws to remedy or palliate a condition are by definition always worse than doing nothing.  It's kind of like a doctor telling his patient to forego any treatment since death will eventually cure his illness.Woods wants us to accept that economics is a value-free science, a set of observations about the way things work in a world marred by scarcity.  At the same time, he can't help dipping into moral considerations (e.g, p. 47), predicating moral or immoral of certain economic choices.  In addition, he favorably quotes the Jesuit Mariana, who calls any ruler "wicked" who sets a price by edict.  Mises and Rothbard of course also resorted to various moral arguments when discoursing on economics; their gift for moralistic psychologizing has been picked up by anarchists like Hans Hoppe at UNLV.  The question is then:  whose morals guide the discussion?  Are they Catholic?  Do they reflect the mind of the Church in her magisterium and her liturgy (cf. The Feast of Christ the King)?  The Divine Liturgy of St. John Chrysostom, used by Byzantine Catholics, is very un-Rothbardian: the priest prays for the good of the civil authorities and the armed forces, major no-no's in Murray Rothbard's School of Politico-Economic Anarchy.  Passages like 1 Peter 2:13 become problematic at best, candidates for expunging at worst.  To be deep in Austrianism is to cease to be Catholic.At the very least, we can dispense with the pretension that economics is just a pure science about the way things are.  This claim can also be found in fields like sociology and psychology.  It's foolish to predicate pure value-neutrality of the political science, but the Economic Man is a powerful myth, so it happens that the whole science of economics gets a pass when it does this very thing.  The Austrian School is a marginal school at best (no pun intended), with Noble Laureates and scholars coming from other schools like Chicago.  The variety of theories would suggest that economics is a science in an equivocal sense only.Woods has repeatedly shown that he's out of his depth in tackling the question of the Church and the market.  For those who accept Woods' thesis, think more carefully about it after reading Rothbard and Mises.  Both authors have good insights and much of what they write is reasonable when they discuss the minutiae, but this book is nothing more than an Austrian primer.  Woods limits much of his effort to sniping at individuals like Belloc.  Heinrich Pesch gets two whole pages even though he's hugely influential in 20th century Catholic social thought. One senses that Woods is really only interested in regurgitating standard Austrian doctrine.  We don't need this book for that purpose since many others have already been written.  A concise but potent antidote to Austrian ideology is the recently released Compendium of the Social Doctrine of the Church.  Unlike this book, it actually delves into the heart of the Church's teaching on economic, political and cultural issues.  Citations are copious and far ranging and, alas, authoritative.
TV-sitcom-gone-book. Native Tongueby Carl HiaasenThis book is fast paced, has a lot of energy, and a zany weirdness.  No doubt, it is a page-turner.  And it is better than the other book of Hiaasen's I have read, Double Whammy.  But all that does not a good read make...A strength of Hiaasen's books are his characters, well defined and numerous.  Most are straightforward stereotypes, from the out-of-luck journalist-turned-publicist, the vapid sex-phone girlfriend, a steroid-doped strongman, the crude-and-sleazy millionaire bad-guy, a muscular-but-clear-minded black good-guy cop, to the dumb-but-intrinsically good-guy burglars, and loads of redneck Florida "crackers".  Hiaasen makes this cast interesting by having them jump through zany hoops, and by casting two characters that are quite original, an environmentally-militant 70+ aged woman, and an environmentally-crazed former-governor-gone-wildman.  And we meet psychotic whales and sex-starved dolphins.  Etc. etc.So what's wrong.  Mainly, it's that the book stays at a level of TV-sitcom-gone-book.  It achieves zero depth in dealing with any subject.  One might think that the exception is the environment, but the story is so inane that it cannot achieve traction even here.  So perhaps Native Tongue is just pure entertainment?  If you like brainless action, gratuitous violence, gross humor, and zany "fun", Native Tongue might satisfy.I have one additional problem with Hiassen, and it's similar to the problem I so often have with Michael Crichton.  These books stink of hypocrisy.  Crichton makes a (seriously good) living off nifty science ideas while constantly bashing that same science.  Hiassen's heroes work hard to rise out of the trash heap of modern society, but Hiaasen's writing routinely wallows in that same trash heap for supposed laughs and zaniness.While I enjoyed a few sections of Native Tongue, I had no doubts at the end that I had wasted many hours that should have been better spent
A show book?. "I have to admit the title and discription of this book was very alluring but it was merely a mask. I have had the book for two months and just cannot seem to get though it. "Psh. That's nothing. I've had mine for over a year, and still haven't finished it. For starters, the characters aren't especially likeable.  And the author seems more intent on impressing us with his (obviously thorough) research than on telling a good story.I suspect this is a show book: One of those books folks buy because it looks good to have on one's bookshelf, but that doesn't necessarily get read.I was disappointed
ties that stress.  is it really that insightful?. although elkind does give some insights into the new post modern family, he merely points out and reiterates the obvious.  elkind makes mention of the shift in familial focus from child centred to adult centred .  but all  adults work and make schedule acommodations for their children.  daycares  and afterschool cares are a neccessity because in order for parents to earn  a livelihood to provide for their children, they must be able to be in a  surrounding in which they can do that. this means they need to work and  thus they find suitable care for their children while they are away.   elkind also makes mention of a vital family and how this is what people  should be striving for.  again, this seems quite obvious.  no parent wants  to miss his/her child's recital or sporting event.  no parent wants to have  his/her child growing up in an unstructured environment.  all of the  qualities of the vital family that elkind describes, is what most families  are trying to achieve.  his insights here are not profound nor are they  even innovative.  it is easy for an academic such as himself to stand back  and critique society.  what is he doing to change these  &quot;deficiencies&quot; that he comments about?  as a sociologist, elkind  writes his book as if he is a historian.  dates and events are written in  such a manner that appears to be fact, while in essence he is simply making  value judgements.  ties that stress is a book which gives a good outline on  societal problems.  what it lacks in is an ability to instill in the reader  a sense of activism.  after reading ties that stress, i felt no sense of  wanting to change the faults that elkind found.  instead, i felt like i was  being told what i was suppose to think because elkind deemed it so
A self-contradicting and and completely inaccurate book. This book is filled with incorrect misleading information on ways to manipulate the human voice to achieve sounds (ie. belting) that are scientifically proven to be damaging. Many of the techniques described in  this book require the physical manipulation of the vocal apparatus, a  process which can lead to undue strain on the vocal folds and surrounding  musculature. Though this books does occassionally contain accurate  information on the process of healthy singing, there is far too much that  is incorrect and poses permanent damage to the voice. The author frequently  contradicts herself  as she explains her process of vocal  &quot;training.&quot;  The techniques of this book ask the reader to embark  on an unhealthy and permanently damaging course of vocal study. I recommend  this book only to those wishing to know how NOT to sing
Painful!. There is nothing practical about this book. It is a looooong, purely theoretical torture with only a few examples that don't work too well in the real world. I had to buy it for one of my graduate classes and here I am three months later even more clueless than I was when I started. This book is very boring, painful to read. It doesn't help that the author is clearly biased in favor of traditional HRM and refuses to give much room to more modern thinking. The exercise book is a nightmare. The exercises are either impossibly difficult and time-consuming because the textbook does not offer valuable guidance for any practical problems, or they are an absolute waste of time - students basically have to copy a chapter. I could go on like this forever. In a nutshell: buy this book if you have to, but sell it as soon as you can
Hate Book. I was once a christian, no more, I grew up.  This book, for what I picked up from the reviews is a hate book, and nothing more.  It is the forcing of one religious views unto another person, and all it will cause is war, murder, stupidity
Scattered, superficial treatment. The book is trying to do too much but end up delivering little.  There is also not enough code to illustrate the concepts.  I would recommend Matt Buckland's AI books if you are actually looking for a practical guide to help you develop your own AI system.  If you must buy, check it in the bookstore before you do
Mid-fi with little explanation. This is an extension of Slone's earlier book and it is a little better, but not a lot. He reiterates everything he said earlier-ranging from opinion to nonsense-and then as before launches into his pet designs with little good explanation.If you want to build a Class B semi-serious amplifier for instrument or PA or non-serious-listening use this will probably work, although there are a lot of old 70s and 80s designs readily available at your local library in old electronics and audio magazines.If understanding the trends in serious audio work today is your goal, start with the "horses mouth" JAES paper "Tubes vs. Transistors: Is There A Difference?". This was hugely important because it was the first published paper in professional reviewed circles that addressed the possibility that traditional metrics such as THD,frequency range, and S/N might not fully address problems in professional audio
Disappointing. I picked up this book hoping it would live up to its title, but what I found was that it was rather boring and lacking in character development. The ending seemed rushed and many of the issues raised were left unresolved. I was disappointed.
Spanish madness. Perhaps there is a novel somewhere in the midst of this story of a Seville policeman attempting to solve a series of gruesome murders only to find himself investigating his own family history. A large part of the book are the journals left by the detective's father, a fearless Legionnaire turned famous painter; these give an interesting view of Spain before and after the Civil War, and contain some artistic insights. There are also interesting thematic connections throughout the book centering around ideas of blindness and of memory. And Wilson at his best writes quite well -- there is one superb bullfight sequence near the end -- but at his worst he descends to the foreign-phrase-spattered tourism of a Dan Brown. Furthermore, the police procedural makes an inadequate container for all this, the plot is all too clearly assembled rather than evolving naturally, and the depths of tormented psychology and even perversion revealed are just too macabre to be put to rest by the inadequate ending
Text offers little if any scientific merit... The book was an interesting enough read to keep in my library, but I would not consider it a legitimate argument for the Aquatic Ape Theory - nor, specifically, for the aquatically influenced evolution of the human female and the proceeding ramifications. It approaches the issue in a simplistic, unscientific manner that is not at all convincing. Keeping in mind that this book is dated (having been first published in 1972) could not save it's argument either. The Descent of Woman left just me as I was before and I'll be looking further still for writings on the subject
Disappointing!. I wasn't too into this one. I'm a big fan of Steinbeck's fiction, but this memoir is rather dull. I was looking to hear what he had to say about the zeitgeist of America at the time he wrote it. But as an older man (as he even admits) he isn't as inspired to talk to or rub shoulders with people whom he crosses paths. The ones that he does write  about come across as a bit uninspired. Nothing much happens on his journey and it almost seems like he doesn't have too much to say.The one highlight was the last couple of chapters, when he goes to the South (New Orleans) and witnesses all the slimy, seperatists as they scream and holler, with pure craven hatred at the first little black children to be integrated into public schools. He is disillusioned and angry and when he tells the tale of what he saw it is absolutely heartbreaking.As much as a mediocre work as it was, I did take an interest in it because I am a fan of Steinbeck. It was cool to hear him write a memoir. Other Steinbeck fans make get something out of it as well and for them I recommend it, just on that basis. As long as you take into account the stuff I said above. If you haven't read Steinbeck, please...start with "The Grapes of Wrath" or "Tortilla Flat." Those are much better works and will give you something to go on if you try to read this
I hate this book. This is the worst textbook I have ever bought for any class!  It is a huge waste of money and super frustrating to read.  This book is horribly written.  The explanations are boring, drawn out, and unclear.  The early chapters draaaag on forever.  The later chapters get a little better, but they state a lot of obvious or useless information.  I have spent hours and weeks studying from this text and learned very little.
What a mistake... Before I bought this book I read all the reviews, some were bad, some were good... I decided to listen to the good ones... What a mistake this has been... How can anyone say this is a good book..?  It's unreadable! I loaned another book from the library, and now I understand Ada95 much  better than before - just by looking at the examples from the other book.  Learn from my mistake - DON'T BUY THIS BOOk
Unrealistic, repetitive, couldn't finish. This book was interesting at first.  It shatters what most of us think the typical millionaire looks and acts like, but that only takes a chapter.  After that, it just keeps repeating itself over and over.  "Who do you think bought the $1000 watch and who bought the lower priced watch?"  Yeah, yeah, I get it; the millionaire has a lower priced watch than the overspending, no real wealth guy.Then some of the examples are so over simplified or exaggerated that you know they are made up to make a point.  I want real examples.  I don't care if you give them goofy code names to protect identity, but don't come up with such bad comparisons to prove a point if it isn't real.Then there is the advice on being frugal.  I am pretty frugal, but some of what they said would put me in the crazy house if I had to live like that.  Sure, I could cut out every unnecessary expense from my budget, but then I wouldn't be very happy.  Who cares if I have a million when I'm 60ish if I had to live miserably up until then.  What is that worth?  I know not to go out and buy a brand new luxury car, but driving around my 20 year old Jeep is no fun either!This book is good for the first chapter and if you are just completely clueless or a compulsive over spender.  People with common sense need not buy this book, just check it out at the library like I did
Known as America's Poet, Whitman is not poetic. Walt Whitman's life's work is his "Leaves of Grass", enlarged over the years with additional poems.  Regarded as America's poet, Whitman wrote in the 1840s through the 1880s, encompassing both the "Manifest Destiny" ideology of the pre-war, through the Reconstruction period of US History.The poems are diverse and upbeat.  The language, for the most part, is clear and easy.  Nevertheless, like most poetry today, the poems are so little different from prose, except in the presentation into lines.  Very few poetic devises are used.One may correctly criticize my critique as one who does not appreciate contemporary poetry.  But, in comparison to rhyhming verse by Longfellow, Frost, Byron, Browning, or Shakespeare, current poetry appears meaningless.Although a classic, "Leaves of Grass" offers only one or two poems that qualify for a standard anthology.  None of his poems are memorable.  Not a single line is considered worthy of citing anywhere in literature.I give two stars to the work, simply because I must admit my own incompetence in modern poetry appreciation.  Whitman is considered important enough to be the major poet in the movie, "Dead Poet's Society"; so, the reputation of the work must be quite impressive, though it beats me how that is
The word-to-content ratio is dismal. I was hired as a cable subcontractor last summer, under the assumption that the contract owner was going to make me his company manager and crew supervisor. Knowing more about public relations, marketing and journalism than management, I did what any good college student would do - I ordered some books and got to studying.Michael Gerber's books sounded good in the summaries and had promising endorsements and blurbs on the jackets, but they were misleading. His books (Manager and Contractor) have little in the way of tangible methods and practices that you can jot down into notes and use. The book seemed to focus on anecdotes and points that were spread out over so many meaningless paragraphs that their consistency was almost that of vapor.As I said, I tried taking notes. Or, more accurately, I sat there with a pad of paper and pen on the verge of jotting something down. None of it seemed worthy of the effort and what little of value there was was spread out over so many pages of verbosity that the undertaking would have been headache inducing.This book, and his others, seem to be aimed at managers who need self-help assistance to fix their life away from management. In this case, the subtitles should read "The E-Myth Manger: Why your life sucks as a manager - and what to do about it" and "The E-Myth Contractor: Why most contractors' marriages don't work and what to do about it."Seriously, these books are that bad
turned me off to doulas. This book turned me off to the whole idea of a doula.  For financial reasons, I was unable to hire a doula but had heard they could be a big help and this book came highly recommended.  I was hoping for a section on breathing or relaxation techniques.  I came away with the feeling the authors felt no birth experience could be a success or enjoyable unless a doula was present.  There was a very clear message that the father could not be a sufficient coach and his role was periphery to the doula.  I was disappointed in the lack of encouragement the authors gave the father to be an active participant in the whole birth process or that the mother would lose control of herself if a doula was not present.  It was almost a throw back to when my father had to fight to be at my birth and that was 30 years ago
Paperback edition blues.  Time for a new editor. There are so many publishing errors in the first paperback edition (2004) of Leon Kass's book that it is almost unreadable.  It is obvious that no one even bothered to look at the book before sending it to retail.Do a quick read of Chapter One and you will see what I mean.  Sentences are left entirely unfinished from one page to the next, leaving the reader wondering how much other text has been omitted.  Although page 35 starting with the word "nogoly" is pretty classy, my favorite example is the transition from page 37-38.  Here, Dr. Kass is begins to frame an argument, but the sentence is never completed.  Then, the next paragraph begins, "Crudely put, the argument could be stated this way."  What way?  Of course the irony is all the more poignant because this series of publishing mistakes follows Dr. Kass's meta-observation about the technology used in producing this very book.  Good stuff.I would not be nearly as concerned had this book not been a god-send for my present research project.  But $17 later, I guess I have to track down a hardback copy in the hopes that I can actually read what Dr. Kass has written
Please..., Let it go. Absolutely pathetic.  I held out hope right up through the last four pages, thinking somehow there would be something there at the end to make up for such a tortuous read.  Here's the deal - there is nothing here to care about - the writing (especially the dialogue), characters, and story all come in under the column-heading TRITE.  The comparisons with Margaret Atwood are unfounded.  Save yourself - this is a dud.  And, a wet one at that.
One side of the story. This book was published 2001 by Brookings as part of a pair; the other being Unseen WealthLev's book comprised his view, whereas Unseen Wealth included about 20 views including Lev'sLev is primarily concerned with helping the accounting industry fill its black hole; intangibles being the difference between market value and the tangibles that the 100 years rules of tangible accounting prescribe for. Formerly this blackhole was also known as goodwill.The trouble is as the service and globally/locally networked economies compounded over the last quarter century, goodwill (or transparent trustflows of an organisation mapped in flows of productivities and demands and across to partnering organisations) became the larger dynamic explaining how most value compounds (both finacially and in human terms like learning, community, social progress that take more than 90 days to invest in and may have diverse views of development).I dont find in Lev's book any answers to such issues as how to resolve the wicked assumptions that all tangible accounting revolve round. These include:people are costs, only machines are investmentsseparate units, separate 90 day periods rather than want to map how they interact and compound in non-lonear waysWhat is really needed for tracking, strategizing, transparently governing, leading, developing intangibles (and human relationships) is an opposite type of maths that value multiplies instead of separating out bottom lines as if everything in teh world adds up perfectly in 90 days periods. Whilst Unseen Wealth is clear about the magnitude of the Intangibles Crisis, Lev is not so clear. However, his work is the middleground and epicentre if you are looking at intangibles only from the perspective of what to do if you are intent on perpetuating the traditional accounting profession as nearly as possible as is
Nothing inspiring nor new here... Dertouzos churns out the usual 'information wil change the future' vision that dominates books of this nature. Unfortunately, nothing here is really new, nor does Dertouzos write with much passion nor pizazz - his pronouncements come across as somewhat pretentious and trite. I prefer Esther Dyson's Release 2.0, which hawks much the same vision but in a nicely homey, conversational style that reveals how personal her book is compared to this one
Not so much... This is the first in the Shopaholic series. Rebecca Bloomwood has a very serious problem. She can't stop shopping. She has crazy money issues, and literally just hides her bills in a drawer and goes and shops more to make herself feel better. This novel takes place in Britain, where Bex (her nickname) spends all of her money earned as a financial journalist on the latest designer clothes. PS she knows nothing about finance, which adds humor as she bumbles her way through the work day in order to attend another press meeting that serves free champagne. The irony of her job and compulsion are cute, and Bex really means well, but honestly, can't you just cut up the credit card? How hard is it to not buy more sweaters? I'd only recommend this book if you're a big shopper, because that's the fun part. Otherwise, it's hard to like Rebecca because she comes across as irresponsible, endlessly without any willpower, and materialistic as they come. That said, I still must confess that I also read Shopaholic Ties the Knot and Shopaholic & Sister
sent wrong book. they did not specify that it was the study guide instead of the actual book I needed.
Blah, Blah, Blah. This memoir was painful.  Painful in a "oh my God, could it get any worse?".Boring, mundane, cold, flatlined.  It feels as though the author is emotionless and it got to a point where I just felt like shaking her and saying "oh enough already".Sincerely, just pass this one buy.  Not even worth a library visit.
How to coach Tee Ball with out going INSANE. This book is a good book for older kids playing Tee ball.  I am coaching a YMCA league comprised of 3 and 4 year olds.  If you are coaching little guys/gals - I would recommend videos more than books
Not my favorite from Koontz.. I love Koontz but this book fell far from the mark.  It started off slow and I found myself thinking, "Where is this going?"  And, in the end, I felt it took me nowhere.  And, the T.S. Elliott quotes got a little annoying.  If you're a fan like me, I know you'll read it despite this review but if you're a first-time Koontz reader, don't start with this book.  It is definitely not his best work - try Odd Thomas or even (going way back here) The Funhouse instead
Nearly worthless. I bought this book because of the excellent reviews it got.  However upon reading this I can't see any justification for these reviews.  First of all it is very  high level; I mean appropriate for your manager's, manager's manager maybe.  This book is all about fawning over Diffie Hellman and philosophizing about how pki should be used etc.  There is no technical information in this book, no code, no flow charts, no diagrams, no data structures. It doesn't even explain how pki is applied, for example to ssl.  All the real information in this book could have been condenced to a few pages.  I really needed this book to be good and it was not.  Look if you want to go to a cocktail party and impress someone with no technical exposure then maybe this is your book.  Otherwise there must be better choices
Worst sticker book. Don't buy this book.  You need to be a surgeon to be able to remove the stickers from the sticker pages.  You then have to search endlessly with your child to find the proper location for it.  There are many other more enjoyable options that do not provide as much frustration as this product..
Outdated edition. The seller needs to list the edition he/she is selling This is a very out dated edition that was sold to me.  The seller did not sent any return information like the other agencies did
ONLY FOR D-STUDENTS!!!!!. I will tell you why I did not read this book. The back cover shows it is unnecessary by telling you every single tip you will get to know in this book. The tips are so simple, TOO SIMPLE, you will wonder how this guy even managed to make a book out of tips your teachers and your parents have told you a billion times. If you are a D-student, this book will help you by telling you to start working instead of writing notes to your girlfriend/boyfriend of 1 day and plans to break up. Just read the back cover and write down what you plan of doing.If you are a A/B student, go home.A poster can do the job of this book.Another problem would be that since this tips are so simple, you may not have the attension span to read every atom of a detail behind it.
Really a religious book. I'm giving this book 2 stars because of it's engaging writing style, and because Mr. Brady does a good job of identifying and describing the 5 major "pain-prone personalities."  However, if you have physical pain that is caused by  actual anatomical dysfunction, such as in my case, severly herniated disks, this book will probably not help you. The mind-body connection has been massively documented in countless medical, phychological, and metaphysical literature, and there is no doubt that the mind can heal as well as cause illness.While the reviews of this book do speak of the "spiritual" connection, what if fails to tell you is that Mr. Brady uses the terms "spriritual" and "religion" synonymously.  Further, the religion that Mr. Brady identifies is the Christian Religon, specifically Protestant Christianity.So, what it really boils down to is faith healing.  If you are a Christian, this book may be of some help to you, if you believe in faith healing, and have not yet been helped by your church or prayers. Dr. Brady asks you to do extensive journaling, and guides you with many questions, including "What is your relationship with God?" "What was your relationship with God when you were a child?"Mr. Brady takes the work of Dr. Sarno, and expands on it to fit his own conception of mind-body healing, even changing the words that Dr. Sarno uses to describe the pain that is felt because of muscular tention. For those that have been helped by Dr. Brady's method, I say Wonderful! Good for you! Dr. Brady was also helped by Dr. Sarno's work. But, for me, this book was really a dud
this is perhaps the weakest book that iles ever written. this one simply is too mediocre not even qualified being good. i've read all iles' complicated yet fasinating novels, most of them carried the weight as any great book should be except some of the endings felt lame and rushed. but this 24 hours didn't hang on in my hands and lock up my eyes' over 24 minutes, i just returned it to the library the next day and would not think about re-reading it again. the other books such as the quiet game, sleep no more, blood memory, dead sleep are all great reading experiences, his first and second ones were just too jewish focused. concentrating on the south is a trade mark of iles, although after hurricane katrina, the nopd police force seemed to be a totally ridiculous lame duck and incapable of doing anything right, not as good as what iles described in his novels. all said, this time no cigar for you, poncho
A Morality Play?. Overall I felt that this book could have been, and should have been, much better. The ever-increasing level of credit-card debt is a real problem, as are the abuses of sub-prime lenders. But, the author's perception and description of the problem is often off, and the proposed solutions are inadequate.The author offers a morality play in which the Merchants of Greed victimize both the poor and the middle class, while convincing users of convenience to think of themselves as more virtuous than the debt-ridden (even though their perks come at the expense of the less fortunate).No doubt our ancestors would be horrified to watch us incur debt to buy a pair of shoes, fill the gas tank, or buy a restaurant meal. But, their horror would come from not from morality but from fear: in their time, mortgaging the farm often led to its loss, and mortgaging one's future income might lead to the poorhouseToday there is a balance (which the author does not acknowledge) between easy credit (which leads some users to "max out") and restricted credit (which prevents most low-income people from obtaining a credit card). Speaking as one who lived for years on a near minimum-wage salary, I'd have to say that it was to my benefit to obtain a card, because (1) although I could not afford to own a car, I could occasionally afford to rent one; and (2) the Internet functions somewhat as Sears did 100 years ago in that if the local merchants charge too much, one has a ready alternative.In this author's morality play credit merchants appear as the devil- and the devil's voice is advertising. Thus, welfare moms obtain bedroom sets they can't afford from Rent-A-Center because "it's hard not to succumb to the industry's aggressive marketing campaigns."But, we're talking about adults, and there are alternatives. I did not buy entertainment products I could not afford and, when I could afford them but local merchants charged too much, I ordered through the mail (or,for more portable items, took a bus to a discount store). For furniture, I bought from a Salvation Army thrift store and hired a truck to take it home.The point is not that I was more virtuous than a RAC customer, but (1) some people's lives are just too chaotic to plan more than a week or two ahead, and for these everything must be bought on credit because saving is impossible; and, (2) "have it now" and "it must be new" are very important values to RAC's customers. Government regulation cannot address either.Regulation (the author's prime solution) can curb some of the worst abuses. For example, gaming commissions can forbid casino operators from locating ATMs inside the casino; payday lenders can be forbidden to roll over loans more than three times; credit card lenders can be required to set higher minimum payments (to shorten payback time).Nonetheless, market forces and the creativity of lenders and merchants will defeat most well-meaning regulation. For example, Native American casinos can evade most state regulation, and the high price of credit is easily hidden in the price (or rent) of consumer goods. Indeed, rent-to-own was largely invented to evade state usury laws. Short of a government bureaucracy to establish maximum prices (and rents?) for everything what, exactly, would he do about this?The author describes real problems. But, his insistence on seeing "Credit Card America" primarily as a morality play limits both his vision, and his range of possible solutions and remediations.
The Scavengers Guide to Haute Cuisine. Steven Rinella, big game hunter of sparrows and squirrels, doesn't know the first thing about the value of wildlife to human well being. Wild birds eat insects, including mosquitoes. Squirrels bury acorns and thus spread oak trees across the landscape, providing food for more wildlife. During the reign of Chairman Mao, the Chinese tried to eradicate small birds, believing they were pests. Instead, they discovered that they were critically important predators of crop pests. If we continue to disregard the value of wildlife, as Rinella does out of ignorance, we do so at our peril.He is the real backyard pest and should be ignored, both for his advocacy of destroying wildlife and his claims to haute cuisine.Eric Chivian M.D.DirectorCenter for Health and the Global EnvironmentHarvard Medical Schoo
Don't!. Possibly the worst book I have ever read.  The "style" could be bested by a not-too-bright fifth grader.  The plot is an imbecilic rehash of the Divinci Code.  Don't bother keeping track of any details, because everything turns out to be irrelevant.  If you want to entertain yourself and your friends, however, check this out of your local library and get mildly drunk.  Now open the book at random and read aloud.  This should cause hysterical I-can't-believe-this-got-published laughter.
Terrible... I guess this is an okay guide if you just want to get the game over with, but why would you waste your time doing that? This guide misses out on so much. I've found items on my own that weren't even mentioned in the guide. The bestiary has no organization and it's still missing many monsters/enemies. You can tell that they tried to make it in the order that you'll encounter the enemies, but many of them can be found before and many of them aren't even listed at all. The weapons, items, and materials information at the end is not detailed enough. "Side Areas" lacks organizations and it isn't very helpful. Where is the help on Enemy Skills? On the walkthrough section, they don't even tell you the right buttons most of the time (not that you need it, though). The numbering/lettering system gets a little bit confusing. A lot of their "strategies" are based on the same party that they like to use. Not everyone likes to use Aeris, especially if they have played the game before. I could go on and on but I don't want to bore you. On a side note, the PC version (black and white, I can't find it anywhere anymore) by the same author was so much better. Everything that this guide lacked was in the PC version (except for color, but they made that up by having color maps and stuff in the back)
There's a sucker born every minute. This book is an excellent example of how creationists approach science: write a book with a lot of bafflegab that sounds scientific but is actually devoid of any meaningful content, and then finish up by concluding that evolution is impossible. What a bunch of baloney.First of all, evolution, in the sense of "common descent," is not impossible. Even ID-iot superstars Michael Behe, Stephen Meyer, and Jonathan Wells have admitted as much. (See a summary of their recent testimony in the Kansas biology curriculum hearings in the evolution/creationism forum at the West Virginia Gazette. (wvgazettemail) (put "/forums" after com) So any ID-iot who thinks all that bafflegab about irreducible complexity (IC) and the nonsense in this film is the death knell of evolution is simply ignorant.  Man evolved from non-human ancestors. Get over it.Thaxton in particular ought to read that summary, since he himself was one of the witnesses and looked particularly ID-iotic.In any case, the empirical data discussed in this book is indeed nothing but bafflegab. Talking about the allegedly empirical foundation for intelligent design makes it sound deliciously scientific, especially to poorly educated ID-iots, who generally are clueless about real science; but even if the empirical data is accurate, it's nothing but a facade, because it has nothing to do with the book's main conclusion.For example, imagine your neighbor told you that his dog could play Beethoven concertos on the piano. Skeptical, you ask for proof. "Simple," your neighbor replies. "See, here's my dog, and there's my piano." Only a moron would accept that as "proof," and yet ID-iot Christians are more than happy to accept exactly that kind of "proof" from ID-iotic films like this.The problem with your neighbor's "proof" is that it proves only the existence of the dog and the existence of the piano.  Neither of those issues, however, was the real cause of your skepticism, so the "proof" was entirely meaningless. The critical issue, of course, was not the mere existence of the dog and the piano, but rather the ability of the dog to play the piano, and your neighbor's "proof" was completely silent on that issue. Again, only a moron would accept evidence of mere existence as proof of piano-playing ability.In this book, there's a lot of talk about how complex certain biological systems are.  That is nothing but meaningless bafflegab, because the mere existence of complex systems is not a disputed issue. The disputed issue is how those systems came into being, and on that issue the book's "evidence" is completely silent.This book was designed to fool poorly educated, easily impressed ID-iots.  Judging from the five-star reviews, it seems to have succeeded.  Well, there's a sucker born every minute, and apparently a lot of them are found in evangelical churches and seminaries.  In one of the very first evolution debates, Thomas Huxley accused Bishop Wilberforce of using his intellectual and oratorical gifts to mislead and bamboozle people.  Things haven't changed much since then.Instead of meaningful evidence, this book substitutes a God-of-the-gaps argument. "Gee, look how complex it is. It must have been created by an intelligent designer. Maybe, just maybe, it was God. Wink, wink."God-of-the-gaps arguments are dumb. Only ignorant suckers are taken in by them. So if any of those folks who wrote five-star reviews for this book would like to buy a nice bridge in Brooklyn or a dog who can play Beethoven concertos on the piano, please give me a call.  I'll be happy to provide evidence!
Description is misleading. The Amazon description says Vol. 1-3, boxed set, hardcover.  That is all true.  What they don't tell you is that there are actually six volumes.  The box in which it comes is clearly marked, "Volumes 1-3 (of six)."  That would have been a much better description for Amazon to have used.  If you have volumes 4-6 and you are looking to complete the set, this book is for you.  If you are looking for the complete set, look elsewhere
Horrible Book. The only great thing about this book is its small size and thats about it. The text doesn't do a very good job of explaining the ideas and concepts. Say you are given certain parts of an equation it doesn't really show you how to use to components to solve for the right number. Instead it gives you a wonderful GENERAL overview of an idea that is minimal in explanation. I'm almost at the point of flipping out because the lack of explanations and I'm only on Chapter 2
If you have a choice choose a different book. I bought and used this book for a probability class and for preparation for the Society of Actuaries (SOA) exam course 1.  I had never had a probability or statistics class and this book did a very poor job of helping me to understand the topics.  I had to resort to using other books not required for the class in order to understand anything.  I did not pass the the SOA exam and I blame that, in part, on this stupid book.  I also had about 50 class mates, all of which had just as much disgust for the book as I did.  Not disgust for the class but for the book
Baking Recipes Are a Disaster. Have the people who've written such rave reviews of this book actually attempted any of the baking recipes?  My second attempt was as bad as the first, and according to one of the online forums I found, I'm not the only one who's had trouble.  I like the ideas behind many of the book's suggestions but putting them into practice made for very flawed results.  The Banana Bread overflowed the pan and over-browned on the top without ever cooking through.  The Breakfast Pastries were so wet, even after adding more and more flour, that rolling them was a joke.  Then they just dissolved into very flat cookies, but considering the recipe didn't call for any rising agent, what else could be expected?  It's like whoever wrote these recipes never even tested them.
Groaners every page. This book was difficult to get through.  The writing felt very, well, written.  Imagine an FBI agent talking for fifteen minutes while apprehending a bad guy.  Imagine this same agent uttering such phrases as "this weapon should evidence your homocidal intent" and other such phony and cacaphonic tripe, and you will only begin to understand how silly this book is.Baldacci comes across like a librarian in an argyle sweater trying to write tough "zingers" on every page.  He has no idea how real people might talk in dangerous circumstances, so he tries to overcompensate with embarassing results.  I personally blushed or groaned nearly every page at his feminine rage being spewed out in dialogue and descriptions that miss the mark in every conceievable fashion.Add to this the idiocy of the main character--acting in ways both too stupid and too intelligent to be any real protagonist, and the contrivances of plot needed to milk this meager theme for hundreds of pages, and you see the frustrating experience it is to read the work.I shall regale you with one more fine example of the action scenes--when Sydney has met with a "deadly" [Baldacci's thesaurus apparently has only two words: deadly and murderous] intruder in her home, Sydney has a weapon trained on him at near-point blank range when he suddenly catapults into a swan dive behind the couch!  "Milliseconds" before she can fire, he launches himself behind the couch.Is this "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon?"  No, just Baldacci sipping cups of cocoa on doilies trying to make up action sequences before returning to his needlepoint
Hawkes Harbor. A terrible book, what happened? Something about an orphan boy meeting vampires and zombies. What's that supposed to mean? The second half of the book is terrible. A third person omniscient view. Hinton needs to be a better writer to make it entertaining. Overall, this book was an absolute CHOKE!!! I regret having wasted five days of my life reading this book
Terrible Mis-Representation of the Baha'i Faith. This book has several mentions of the Baha'i Faith in it, referring to the Faith as &quot;an offshoot of Islam&quot;, and in one part quoting someone as making the Baha'is out to look like violent animals. I will never read anything by this author again, she may be aware of Iran's history and politics, but is very miseducated in the area of the Baha'i Faith (not Bahaism as she writes it). The Baha'is are quite the opposite of what this author believes
a tease. A book which is not bad as a quickie read on the basics of Camille, but it comes up quite short as an authoritative source on the storm. Many survivors stories, while compelling at times, begin to sound repetitive, and, strangely enough, leave the reader with a sense that not all has been told.It is also quite apparent that the author is a born-again Christian, as he often elects to print survivor contentions that they were saved from the storm by their personal Lord and Savior, Jesus Christ. Not that this is bad per se, but is does add to the repetitiveness of the narrative, and after hearing it once it seems superfluous, as well as adding a hidden agenda to the text.This is not a National Geographic-style book about Camille; it tends to stay on a base emotional level; hardly detached, never scientific, and certainly not the last word on the topic. A disappointment, in short.
Needs To Be Updated. Published in 2000, Videohound's DVD Guide is already outdated. Why? Because so many DVD titles -- both old and new-- are being released on a weekly basis that it is simply impossible to keep current. Anyone using this guide is bound to be disappointed in the large number of currently available DVDs not listed. Until studios complete the transition of all -- or at least most -- titles from VHS to DVD, such guides will continue to be out of date and of little use. As for the actual content of Videohound's Guide; it is adequate. The reviews, which are all subjective, will strike a chord with some readers, while striking a nerve with others. One useful aspect is the rating of extra features (outtakes, documentaries, trailers, etc.) which make DVDs so much fun. Unfortuneately, Videohound is inconsistent with its extras reviews. For example, the entry for the James Bond classic &quot;Goldfinger&quot; fails to mention the two commentaries and two documentaries featured on the &quot;Special Edition&quot; release. However, the entry for another Bond film, &quot;Thunderball&quot;, does list all the extras. Overall, this guide is a great idea. However, it needs fine tuning. Videohound's VHS guides are very good and I suspect that in a couple years -- when the transition from VHS to DVD is complete -- that Videohound's DVD Guide will also be up to par. Until then, I'd wait this one out
For die-hard Conrad fans only. And I thought I WAS a die-hard Conrad fan!  He's one of those writers by whom I must read a book every two or three years -- but this one I did not like at all.  Despite the usual brilliant prose, much of it as good as  anything Conrad has done, &quot;Tether&quot; is a let-down -- astoundingly  depressing!  Most Conrad work posits a world that is inimical and uncaring,  yet holds out hope that courage and integrity will serve to help us endure  it all; &quot;Tether&quot; holds out no such hope.  It concerns a captain  who continues to pilot his ship even though he is legally blind, doing so  in order to provide for his family.  Nothing turns out okay, and no one  ends up happy.  I don't ask for a lot of hope from the books I read -- but  at least a little
Snotty and obnoxious. Bryson is certainly witty. But any pleasure in the book was ruined by the author's snotty and obnoxious tone. I can not understand why the author thinks he is better than the people everywhere he visits; there is certainly no objective evidence in support of his inflated self-image. What a whining, immature, mean jerk. And by the way, there's a fair sprinkling of gutter language in the book.
Disappointed. This book looked promising when I picked it up, but after struggling through the instructions I now regret buying it.  I bought the book to learn right angle weave...but ended up looking up a free tutorial online instead because I could not figure out Christine Prussings instructions and examples.  The right angle weave stitch itself is actually not that complicated...but Christine makes it seem extremely complicated.  Unless you are really good with a compass I do not recommend this book.  I started a beautiful project that she had on the front cover, but once you get done with the base of the piece...her instructions become unclear and confusing.  Now, I have a beautiful unfinished necklace
Not what it appears to be. The play "Into the Woods" not only contains sinister elements, but has an overall dark message to convey.  It preaches moral relativism as blatantly as any catechism teaches religious doctrine.  It teaches is that lying, stealing, cheating, and even murder can be justified as long as it is not against one's perspective on life.  Also, that life is grim and experiencing things forbidden will help you.  This religious doctrine of corruption is conveyed through the story and through specific lyrics of the songs
Huge Disappointment. It's hard to explain exactly how horrible I think the female heroine was written in this book.  I can not believe any female would ever act as she had in her position.  This heroine had no brain in her head.  She got turned on by a trespasser rubbing himself up against a window naked yet thinking about how he was such a disgusting pervert.   Understanding that this girl only has a quarter of a brain in her head but to not call the police even though she thought about it was idiotic and that includes her thinking she was safer with her carrying the sword and then blaming someone else for her killing a person.  This heroine had a mentality of a 12 year old.  I'm normally a fan of Richard Laymon's books but this is one I definitely could have done with out.  The two books I have read where he has female heroines have just been horrible
Intially engaging, but prys itself from your attention... My initital impressions of 'American Gods' were nearly uniformly positive.  Although I had not read any reviews previous, I was aware of the level of hype and praise for this novel.  But like a doomed traveler in Fred Pohl's 'Gateway', the book never achieved "turn-a-round".  The central storyline is further and further pushed off, and often seems to occur on the sidelines.  Gaiman's prose is engaging and easy to slip into, but I felt empty in the end, without significant payoff or a true sense of journey.  Those wishing to delve into urban fantasy may be better served by Tim Powers.  "Last Call" in particular serves as an excellent counterpoint to "Gods
BOOK IS OUTDATED AND INACCURATE. Evangelists like Lee Strobel and Hank Haandegriff often quote Simon Greenleaf in support of their belief the Gospels are accurate and historically reliable.  What they fail to mention is that Greenleaf died  nearly 150 years ago.  His book is filled with inaccuracies and faulty  logic.  In his defense, he was obviously unaware of all the New Testament  research which has been done over the past century and a half.  For  example, Greenleaf was unaware the authors of the Gosples are unknown.  The  names were merely assigned by the early church.  He believed Matthew and  John were actual eyewitnesses although those accounts were written 50-80  years after the death of Jesus.  What court would accept as valid a report  by unknown sources written several decades after the events? Greenleaf's  book is very biased.  He often refers to Jesus as &quot;our Savior.&quot;   His book is also filled with illogical assumptions.  He assumes the authors  are &quot;good&quot; men and would not lie.  On the one hand he states the  Gospels are trustworthy because they have discrepancies and contradictions  and on the other hand they are believable because of their uniformity.   Which is it?  He states the disciples had a &quot;vigorous  unerstanding&quot; of the sayings of Jesus.  So why in the Gospels is Jesus  constantly having to explain his parables to them?  Greenleaf goes on to  claim there was no possible motive for fabrication and that they were  &quot;eminently holy and of tender consciences.&quot; Again, assumptions  are made with no supporting evidence. Greenleaf does not undertake any kind  of fair and rational examination of the evidence.  Some examples of his  groundless statements follow: &quot;That the text of the Four Evangelists  has been handed down to us in the state in which it was originally written  that is, without having been materially corrputed or falsified, either by  heretics or Christians; are facts which we are entitled to assume are  true.&quot;  How does he know this? No support or proof are offered.    &quot;It is always to be presumed that men are honest, and of sound mind,  and of the average and ordinary degree of intelligence.&quot;  The author  also appears very naive. Another example:  &quot;It is quite erroneous to  suppose the Christian is bound to offer any further proof of their (the  Gospels) genuineness or authenticy.&quot; In summary this is an outdated  book full of unsupported assumptions.  It does not offer a serious  examination of the Gospels by any legal means
The Golden Rule works, This Book Falls Short. The application of the Golden Rule to our everyday lives is something that we can all agree is good.  John Maxwell does a good job or defining the golden rule, its worldwide acceptance, and how we can apply it to our everyday.  It was more like a walk down memory lane; to a time when a teacher or mentor first explained the concept to us.  However I do have a few concerns with Mr. Maxwell's book.  First there might need to be a better job at researching Fletcher thoughts on Relativism...in his book he labels Fletcher as the father of mordern day Realativism...quoting (or rather misquoting) Fletcher's statement that love can justify anything.  I am in not postition to defend Fletcher, for I am not that familiar with his work, however he does not just use the term love.  Rather he uses the term Agape Love, coming from the ancient Greek...the highest and purest form of love...one that God would have for us, a term any minister or pastor of the Christian Faith would know very well.  Second after page 86 the book get repediative and seems to get off track.  This links to my last issue with the book and why it gets a bit off track, as it turns into an advertisement for Mr. Maxwell's corporation, the last several pages are nothing but adverstisements asking you to visit their web site for free character quiz and then taking you down a road of Buy...buy...buy our products.  Not what I expected and was somewhat disappointed.  In short taking some know concepts, putting a somewhat of a new spin on them and then publishing to add another book to the list of those authored.  Part of the disappointment is that I know this book could be better
Snotty and obnoxious. Bryson is certainly witty. But any pleasure in the book was ruined by the author's snotty and obnoxious tone. I can not understand why the author thinks he is better than the people everywhere he visits; there is certainly no objective evidence in support of his inflated self-image. What a whining, immature, mean jerk. And by the way, there's a fair sprinkling of gutter language in the book.
Not what I was looking for at all. I admit it, the 12 steps to Raw foods should have given away that this book is just a rehash of 12 steps.What I expected was an actual 12 step program to familiarizing myself with raw food, and processes, and grocery lists.This book is so subjective it kind of turned me off from the raw movement. It's a little creepy actually. Someone, please suggest me a better raw food book
Too dense!!. As a student reading this book for a class focusing on the French Revolution I found it too dense for someone who has no previous knowledge of the revolution.  Doyle packs A LOT of information into these 425 pages.   He does not place emphasis on any particular people or events which makes  understanding specific turning points difficult.  However, I can imagine  this book would be ideal for one who already has a thorough understanding  of the French Revolution and is simply looking for a new perspective
sloppy. I think better information can be gained by reading wikipedia than can be gained from reading this book. As a metalhead, I have the feeling that Moynihan is an outsider writing about something he doesn't really understand. Maybe he is just catering to people who aren't familiar with metal, but it's to the detriment of the book's accuracy. I think he misses the point of some bands.  He also does a very quick and sloppy job of some sections, which is annoying.For example, he states "the Misfits mutated into Samhain...by 1988 the band had changed names again, to simply Danzig", which is totally false. The Misfits ended when Glenn Danzig left the band and formed Samhain, which later became Danzig. Furthermore, the Misfits reunited (without Danzig) in 1997, meaning that Danzig and The Misfits existed as separate bands at the time of the book's printing. It's one of many sloppy errors/hasty summaries in the book that make it frustrating to read.If you are a fan or already know the story, this book will be nothing but agravation.  If you are an outsider to the genre it should be an interesting read
I do not respect this author. These guys are douches. The author insinuates a lot of nasty stuff about peope I'm close to which was utter malarkey considering that none of these people would talk to him. So yeah that's all I have to say. Rudy Giuliani, whatever, I don't know about all that and I'm sure he's a douche too. But I know sometimes the authors read these reviews and so I just want you to know that some people (perhaps not yourself) have feelings and morals and that your conjectures of conspiracy are in some cases just a desire for DRAMA! Anyway I just wanted to tell you thatyou have won the Biggest Douche in the Universe Award OVER Ursula the Giant Douche AND David Blaine, congratulations, and I hope you feel bad
Historically significant..but that's about it. I gave this book 2 stars because it is historically significant to understand the thinking of the gender feminists of the 1960s.I also found the discussion of the equality feminists from the 1800s to be interesting. The right to vote for women was of course important as were several other causes that the equality feminists fought for.I rated this book low because the author attempts to explain the housewife phenomenon but ends up overgeneralizing and trying to speak for all women. The author is very snobby and self-rightous, thinking she is able to determine which women are really fulfilled and living their life to it's fullest potential. The ideas in this book are what caused people like my mother to talk negatively about "dumb housewives," and to eat their words when their own children, such as myself, grew up and became...housewives (or what we now call "stay at home moms." Which, I might add was mostly fueled by watching my workaholic mother (who I do love very much) who didn't seem to enjoy anything in life...except work) Fortunately, we can teach our biased and prejudiced mothers that some women really do get fulfillment from raising their own children/homes.I am only going to touch on some of the ridiculous arguments in this book, because there are too many to list:Ms. Friedan gives "evidence" that children in other's care actually turn out better than those raised by their mothers. Great. So, she was teaching a generation of women that they are better off working than caring for their own children; that other people can do a better job than they can. What a vote of confidence.The author goes on and on about how mothers were smothering their children, and this is why many turned to a life of the "feminine mystique." Sorry, but a 1950s mom with 7 children and a lack of modern conveniences did not have time to smother her children. Basic care for as many children as women had in the 1950s would consume most of a mother's time. If you want to see parents who overwhelm their children with attention (and material goods) and live vicariously thru them, look around in 2006.According to the "research" (and I use this term lightly because someone as depressed as Ms Friedan must have had trouble seeing the happiness in others) in this book you are either: 1) WORKING MOTHER- mentally stable, able to do household tasks in lightning speed and raise completely competent children. 2)EDUCATED HOUSEWIFE- most likely on drugs and/or are alcoholic, are so depressed you contemplate suicide, have dysfunctional children and a husband who is trying to get away from your sexual advances. 3) UNEDUCATED HOUSEWIFE- content with life because you are a complete idiot.Ms. Friedan completely ignores that there were (and there still are...) a significant percentage of women who WANT to be at home caring for their families and homes. I'm sure there were millions of women who were benefitted by being emancipated from their homes. That is good that they were happier with more choices. However, Ms. Friedan should have encouraged them to do this without dragging millions of other women thru the mud.With her chapter on the "sexual sell:" I'm glad that she figured out people make money thru advertising by manipulating people. Advertisers manipulate everyone, not just women. And, I am sure the "thing-buying" housewife of the 1950s was nothing like the guilt-ridden working or stay at home mom today who's child has so many toys he/she doesn't know what to do except claim, "I'm bored" due to being so overwhelmed.p. 85: Ms. Friedan quotes someone who says, "To make one half the human race consume its energies in the functions of housekeeper, wife and mother is a monstrous waste of the most precious material God ever made." The fact that Ms. Friedan would even give credit to this comment by citing it in her book speaks volumes about her mentality.When I thought the ideas in this book couldn't get any more rediculous, Ms. Friedan started talking about homosexuality...The Feminine Mystique is driving men to be gay! Men are so repulsed by their over controlling wives and mothers that they are turning against women and "turning" homosexual! Also, Ms. Friedan thinks housewives are sex-crazed zombies in search of any man...and finally this comment: "I am convinced there is something about the housewife state itself that is dangerous. In a sense that is not as far-fetched as it sounds, the women who "adjust" as housewives, who grow up wanting to be "just a housewife" are in as much danger as the millions who walked to their own death in the concentration camp..." Is this woman serious? This stuff is so warped I can hardly put it into words!!It is my opinion that this author was 1) extremely depressed and/or had psychological problems 2) was insanely jealous of happy wives/mothers.
A Waste. This book will not benefit anyone. It is repetitive and lacking the necessary detail to truly plan and install a radiant floor heating system. It's unfortunate that books like this are not screened before being made available to the unsuspecting public
Not so hot. Page 13. of the book, "when I conceived this book I had a brilliant premise: I would take every excersive in the gym and look at it in terms of possible role in human movemement." Then later goes on on to list the moves they think are important, even debating what should be included. There is no scientific method to this, only apparently two individuals conceiving an idea for a book. I'm sure there strength books are good, but this a "me too" book on core performance
Slaughterhouse is Shallow and Not Very Useful. If you know much about the Eastern Front, DO NOT GET THIS BOOK! Although its advertising makes it sound like it is a thorough, in depth book on its topic, it is a actually just a shallow grab bag of random facts. A lot of its material is freely available, in greater detail, on the Web. Some of it is available in much greater detail -- Slaughterhouse's section on weapons, for example, is so poor you have to wonder why they bothered to include it.Your money would be much better spent on something like the Oxford Companion to World War II. The Oxford Companion has a different emphasis that Slaughterhouse, but it is comprehensive, and includes all of the war.If you don't know much about the Eastern Front, this book may have some value. But, I still recommend the Oxford Companion instead, plus the free material on the Internet
Avoid this prudish edition resurrected from 1932. Despite translating thousands of worthless Latin quotations, the editor of this edition leaves large passages from the section on Love Melancholy, which Burton waggishly wrote in Latin, untranslated. Burton demands enough of one's patience; one shouldn't have to put up with this sort of nonsense from his editor, even if one's Latin is good. After plodding through over a thousand pages, the reader has earned a little titillating trivia. Also, if you've forgotten your Latin, Burton's notes are left untranslated. Finally, I'll say that although Burton is amusing, the book is too long with too little content. Go back to his sources, read Swift, read Marcus Aurelius, read Kierkegaard on religious despair; and then, if you have time, read Burton-- or skim him
souls of black folk. was worthless...was not the correct match for my class book requirement.  Never used it...if someone wants it you can have it for free
Lost  $10. I was waiting for something to happen in this book but nothing did. There is no plot, the characters described very poorly and the writing is definitely unimpressive (I would not mind the writing so much if the plot was there). Throughout the whole book all the main character does is answers the phone and gets coffee ... how exciting is that?
The Real ACT Prep Guide: Bad Buy, Not what you are expecting. I bought this book expecting to have some practice questions and some tutorials on the subject matter that I will inevitably have to face during the actual ACT.The only thing that it really gave me was just the type of information that was going to be on the test, but no workable problems or tutorial information on subjects that I have either never taken or am rusty at for lack of practice.This book, in my opinion, was a waste of my money and did not fulfill the objective that I had previously expected it to
The Cover Tells the Whole Story!!. I'm surprised no other reviewer noticed! Why did Penquin place Ronald Colman and Douglas Fairbanks Jr. prominently on the cover? In this reviewer's opinion, they must secretly realize that the wonderful 1937 classic film vastly outshines the printed word. I found the  story to be poorly written and hard to follow. Its' style is too formal, too flowery and too wordy!	If I had not seen (both) versions of the film, I could not have followed the "action". I constantly referred back to mental images of the movie to orientate myself. A review of "PZ" boils down to a basic truth: While most agree that the book is usually superior, occasionally the movie wins out. "PZ" is a prime example. ("Strangers on a Train" is another!). As for the so -called sequel, "Rupert of Hentzau"- don't even bother, unless you are an Anthony Hope fanatic. Reviewing the book makes one appreciate-once again- that wonderful film fadeout as Ronald Colman rides off over the hill. Since it happens to be available on amazon, click on the movie reviews. Therein will lie the essence of the wonderful adventure story of "The Prisoner of Zenda"
Into the deep, drowned in the cases. This student textbook assumes a basic of management accounting. Well, I was known with the terms, and understood their examples, but completely lost track at the cases. At first I thought it was due to my language  knowledge, but colleague students had the same problems and couldnot  explain to me which information to use, which parts of the cases was useful  and what was rubbish. Of course 'management accounting' is about retrieving  the correct information, but it was a few steps to early for me
a lukewarm thriller with a pathetic marriage. the on-the-rock marriage scenes are pathetic, making this already lukewarm and loose thriller become even worse. from the very beginning, this female washington reporter knew what mitch rapp did for a living, yet she continuously whined, intervened, demanded, complained, pried into her husband jobs and duties. what is this? trying to make rapp look more humanly realistic, making him look more like the stereotyped american husband? making us enable to enter rapp's bedroom, wathching 'war of the roses'? come on, this is a thriller, not jackie collins or danielle steele's 'honey, no sex tonight'. get rid of the nagging wife pronto! also, this novel is not up to the standard of a good thriller. a story falling apart in many ways
Awful. I bought this book purely on the strength of its being written by Jeffrey Deaver.  However, less than 3 pages into this terrible novel it becomes very hard to believe that it was written by the same man who brought us The Bone Collector and the Coffin Dancer.  The fact that it was written in 1988, before Deaver was established, may explain some of its mediocrity but there is no excuse for the fact that this is simply a terrible book.The basic plot is that Rune, a supremely annoying "punk" discovers a favourite customer of hers shot to death when she goes to his apartment to collect a video he has rented 18 times in one month.  The film is a "true" story about a Manhattan bank robbery in which a police officer steals a million dollars which he hides away and which has never been found.  In the biggest jump to a conclusion I have ever come across, Rune decides that the the depiction of what was done with the money in the film is real and that Mr Kelly found it, and makes up her mind to find it herself.The plot of the book probably could have been fairly good, but Deaver ruins the entire story with Rune, the most unrealistic and annoying "heroine" I have ever read.  She lives in a fantasy world that a 5 year old child would be too mature for, and has no concept of the real world whatsoever.  Everything about her, from her appearance to her manner of speaking to her ridiculous inability to lie makes the reader want to punch the book as it's the nearest thing possible to punching her in the face.Another major problem with this novel is its glaring predictability.  There are no twists and turns in it and if Deaver thought anything in it was going to shock the reader, then he must have been as naive as Rune herself.  This book is chock-full of cliches that were probably old even in 1988.This book has nothing to offer the discerning reader and it probably better left to those who see reading as hard work and only do it to reassure themselves that they can once in a while.  Complete and utter rubbish
Fails to get the message across. As other reviewers have mentioned, because of the made-up disease which causes her to gain weight, and failure of the character to really learn what she needs to learn from this experience, it is sort of a waste.  Could have been written better - and doesn't get to the heart of the matter
NOT for beginners. I got a used copy of David Weller's book:  "Beginning .Net Game Programming in C#" from Amazon.First of all, using the word Beginning in the title of this book is deceptive. It's not a book for beginners in any way.The author not only assumes you are an experienced Windows programmer, but that you already know how to work with graphics and are more than familiar with Creating Event Handlers using OnPaint, etc.In the first chapter, in the classic Microsoft style of documentation, he begins by bragging about all the wonderful graphics things you can do with C# like; Gradients, Alpha Blending, Cardinal Splines, Transformation, etc. but doesn't have the courtesy to supply a single code example to show you how to do any of these wonderful things!In fact, if you leaf through the book page by page, you will find that there is not a single complete code example in the entire book. What the author refers to as "snippets" are nothing more than poor, incomplete code examples. As we reach the first code "example" the author says "The following code shows how to draw a simple red rectangle... " No it doesn't! All it is, is a lonely OnPaint method. The author doesn't bother to explain how to make it work, but proceeds to tack on one of those little Note: fields saying that you need to create an Event Handler. The example supplied however, is an Event Handler for something else entirely! The next example shows you how to create graphics objects from an image but doesn't bother to explain how to import the image! You are expected to magically how to do that I guess.It is clear that the author: David Weller doesn't even understand the topic material. What he did was go to somebody that DOES understand how to program and got a half dozen cheezy programs which he devoted a chapter each to, with a feeble attempt to tack a bunch of comments inbetween.If you want to make a Tetris clone and not much else, there's a very slim chance you might get something out of this book. Although you will have to type up pages of code yourself before finding out whether it will even run or not because there is no CD included with the book. The author assumes you know so much about programming already that, quite frankly, if you knew that much, you wouldn't need his lame book.The author is neither a programmer, nor a writer. I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone. It gives me a big knot in my stomach thinking how many other sincere beginners will end up wasting perfectly good hard earned cash on this complete waste of trees.Dillinge
I made it to chapter 3. I bought this book immediately after reading Enquiry, which I liked very much.  Unfortunately, I was disappointed with this one.  I made it to chapter to three....barely. I wanted to like this book, but frankly I was bored by both the plot and the characters.  Maybe next time
In a word - DRY. Not to put too fine a point on it but this book is DRY - almost like a text book.  There is very little action and/or suspense brought forth about involvement in the Angola operation and what could have been was quickly blunted with operational and bureaucratic detail.  And that's how the book drags on, with excruciating detail. In one part, Mr. Stockwell describes what he did to finally get a desk to work from at Langley by sitting in the hall in everyone's way and stacking his papers up beside him.  What took him pages to describe should've been done in a simple paragraph.  To be fair, the book is written from the viewpoint of an intelligence staffer not a cloak and dagger operative. Yes, there might be some interest in how inefficient the CIA was operating back in the mid-1970s but that's true for most large government organizations. He also describes some of the "political" machinations between officials within the CIA.  Again, mildly interesting but nothing notable. Some of the descriptions of dialog and reactions of persons seems contrived, almost as if he (or some ghost writer) added these things for effect. It almost "reads" like a fiction novel in that respect. Rather than writing a solid, crisp account with thoughtful and concise opinions about CIA policy and inner workings the book devolves often times into monotonous detail. However, in the latter chapters the account does get more interesting as he discusses "plausible deniability" and the deception of the CIA to "hide" their involvement. One of the more interesting parts is the organizational background and resources needed to run an operation of this type including the shipping of weapons and ammo, the propaganda strategy, the political workings thru committees, the State Department and the President to gain support, etc.  The book does makes one wonder what other rebellions or conflicts the CIA was involved in over the last 30-40 years and is an eye opener about our nations espionage policies. On this level, the book succeeds.  But, in the end the book was almost a grind to finish.  I'd only recommend this one for the hard core 'spook' fan
Am I having a bad hair day or is this novel boring?. What's wrong with me? I love Eudora Welty's short stories. But this novel was exasperating. The story opens at a family reunion in backwoods Mississippi, where the author "overhears" endless conversations about nothing carried on by the Renfros and their kin.  For hours, they debate whether the family antihero,, Jack Renfro, will appear at the reunion (after several years in the penitentiary).For 60 pages, I waded through trivial dialogue as family members eagerly awaited Jack's appearance. I gather from other reviewers' comments that the family bad boy did show up eventually, but by that time I'd left the party. I'd closed the book and drifted off to sleep.If you want plot action, this is not the book for you. I'd suggest you pick up Carson McCullers, Flannery O'Connor or even William Faulkner
Buy Buhllmans Book. Okay, this is the first book on the subject I bought... I found the instructions long and questionable.   I think if you want a good book, buy &quot;Adventures Beyond the Body&quot; by Buhlman.  Its much better
Not the best for confronting cultists. If you are looking for "Short and Snappy Answers to Defeat the Cultist on your Doorstep", this is not the book you want.While each Saying is considered in a brief page or two, the style of this book is to discuss and analyze the text very closely, but so closely that the discussion bogs down into such things as transitive vs intransitive verbs, etc.  Yes, it explains the subtlety of the text but in such detail that the answer can only be appreciated by a Believer. Unfortunately, I find that it does not answer my questions about the Hard Sayings of Jesus very well either.Nothing in this book equps me to answer the Hard Questions of the Cultist who stands on the street corner passing out tracts or comes to my door offering "The Truth". On such occasions, which often degenerate into a theological streetfight, I need to use the Word as a sword. Therefore, I want a big sword not a magnifying glass.As a Christian, I appreciate this book as it requires me to ponder the depth and richness of God's Word. But this is not the book to present to a skeptic who needs simpler, more direct, less obtuse answers to his or her questions.
Not as good as &quot;The Collector&quot; and &quot;The Magus&quot; .. John Fowles is a talented writer, and I think that if you end up buying this book, you will not be disappointed. It has some interesting points in  it. Many deep thoughts, some interesting chapters. But, the problem is that  I don't think that the story of &quot;Daniel Martin&quot; is a good one. It  is not fascinating, atleast it didn't raise my interest. At some point I  started to dislike this Daniel Martin.. He seemed boring and dull, just  like any stupid, chauvinistic, self-centered, egoistic middle-aged man you  can see. Maybe there is a point in describing a person like that, but  frankly: I am not very thrilled to read about a man like that, I think I've  met too many &quot;daniel martins&quot; in real life
Perverted. I think that Wayne did a humiliating job with this book.  He mostly focused on the [...] things that Warhol did in his lifetime.  You know what i think, i think that Wayne had a crush on Andy himself, because the are both[...]and Wayne seems to like to talk about Andy's [...]
Not well researched and partisan. This may be the worst book I've ever finished.  I was expecting a book that would offer small tidbits of funny information, some shots, and some glorious facts about the great men who have led our country over the various centuries.  Instead, we are treated to a salacious compendium of president's peeing on secret service men and other president's blaming secret service men for farting.  If you are looking for "The Man Show" version of the presidents, then by all means fork over your hard earned dollars. We are informed that every Republican from IKE to Bush were bumbling idiots, and every Democrat from FDR to Clinton were mere victims of circumstance. If you are looking for a Michael Moore or Al Franken version of the historical lives of some of the greatest men who ever lived, then by all means add to cart. Thanks to this author's portrayal of U.S. Presidents, I will forever read an author's portrayal of the two most divisive presidents of our time, Nixon and Clinton, before I make such a purchase again. Nixon and Clinton were both failures in their own right.  Nixon and Clinton were both men blessed with an overwhelming amount of potential, but they both flushed it away with their individual incidents. O'Brien ends each portrayal with an accurate summary of the unfortunate end of each of the individual tenure, but it is within the body of these portrayals that O'Brien lends his creative writing skills to the eventual manipulation of the reader.  Examples to the point, Newt Gingrich is snide and rapacious, and Kenneth Starr is a ruthless Republican bloodhound. Do we really need these adjectives?  We read no such adjectives to describe the behaivor of the Democrats in power during Nixon's term. We see no adjectives or adverbs to describe the activities of a Woodward and Bernstein. I would consider it silly for a compendium of this sort to glorify the presidency of Nixon, for his tenure was not one to emulate. Nixon and Clinton had their otherwise promising presidencies brought down by silly incidents that would've been seen as such were it not for the cover-ups that followed. O'Brien goes onto to proclaim Bob Jones university as preposterously Conservative, he declares The Great Society as a legislative success. It maybe true that The Great Society was a success in accumulating enough votes for passage, but can the Great Society be considered a success in an historical perspective? He portrays the anti-American Carter as the greatest living former president in recent memory.  He mentions Carter's farcical Nobel Peace prize as testament to this fact. What is this? Everyone knows that that prize was a joke provided by the Nobel people looking to make an anti-American statement. It should be noted that the great peace activist Yasser Arafat also won this award. O'Brien fails to mention the Johnson administration's propaganda involving the Gulf of Tonkin incident that Johnson used to convince American's that America's role needed to be escalated in Vietnam. It was an incident historians are now claiming never happened, but this isn't used to define Johnson's administration? He maintains that every Republican since Ford gained office with shenanigans and slick marketing. He ends the book with the Moore/Franken style rants against the George W. Bush election, which many nonpartisan publications--including the Democrat Miami Herald and the USA Today--are saying they could've recounted until the end of time and Bush would've won.  He comments on Bush's slick maneuvering to enter into the war with Iraq. I will grant you that this book was written before news of the the oil for food UN scandals broke. These scandals involved France, Germany and Russia, and this scandal may have affected the manner in which pre-war activities were conducted. All in all, shouldn't a book of this variety be written to open debate rather than close it with propaganda material? I found some of the portrayals of presidents one rarely hears mentioned, such as Zachary Taylor and Franklin Pierce, but I found myself reevaluating all of these portrayals after reading about those with which I am much more familiar. I am currently an unsuccessful author, but I have written enough, and studied the craft enough, to know a writer's manipulation when I see it. It's a shame too, for this could've been such an interesting idea. As I have mentioned, Cormac O'Brien has taught me a valuable lesson when buying historical perspectives: try and learn the author's agenda before buying his book. I have read a couple of books of this sort that will lambaste and glorify an LBJ or a Clinton as often as they lambaste and glorify a Nixon or a Reagan. While I will agree that it is difficult for an individual to separate himself from his perspective, it should always be the responsibility of said author to keep this to a matter of degrees. It is my hope that the anxious readers who share my love for information, regardless of their individual biases, will search elsewhere
Hopefully This Series Will Improve!. Unlike Cussler's other series, I found this first story of the "Oregon Files" slow going at first and rather confusing. There are just too many things going on (no problem, I suppose, for multi-taskers!) and way too many characters to keep track of. Also, there's little to no character development even of "Mr. Chairman", Juan Cabrillo. The fact that he and his companions are mercenaries (with a penchant for good deeds that pay well) doesn't compare favorably with the NUMA heroes. However, the plots were intriguing and getting the golden budda out of the country was exciting and more like the roller coaster rides I expect from Mr. Cussler and co-writers. I look forward to the subsequent Oregon Files with high hopes.
other methods. Meanwhile a lot of other people written very good books in a very different stile:Suzanne Clothier (Bones would rain from the Sky)Patricia McConnell (The other end of the Leash)Turid Rugaas (Calming Signals)We have three Irish Setter and we prefer a soft method for our dogs
You're Kidding!!. I read this book only because it was lent to me by an unfortunate person who was lumbered with it for Mothers Day. It was the only BTB book I've read since "Woman of Substance" and I fine it hard to believe that it was written by the same writer! The dialogue was unbelievably twee and some of it was out of a Victorian novel---the heroine calls her brother --Brother mine!!!!!Oh brother! I finished it because it was so bad that it was funny
Boooorrrrrriiiiinnnnnggggggg. Inticing beginning, but quickly drops off into the most DULL details of useless information.  Even the ending was dull and in my opinion, and unfinished
Unreadable scholarly techno-babble. This book takes a fascinating subject---the lives of Gypsies in the USA---and reduces it to anthropological formulae and scholarly babble. It might be impressive to other anthropologists, but it's largely unreadable  to mere mortals. It's a shame, because obviously the author has done some  interesting research on a people that are hidden within our midst
So What?. I barely got through this book and I love this genre.  Two things kept annoying me in this book:  1) it was poorly edited and 2)poorly written.For a reader, a little humility from the author goes a long way - we are naturally rooting for the author and will forgive and overlook many things until it is just too annoying.  We are seeking reasons to cheer on our protagonist and like her.  Muleady-Mecham did provide some reasons but too frequently, I got turned off in the next paragraph when she bragged about how good she or her team was.  Over and over, it was about what a star she was and how great she was.On one page she started 12 consecutive sentences with "I".  "I did this," I did that", I did this", "I did that"  Very timesome reading.I found only 2-3 of her stories to be interesting, the rest were boring stories that read like a journal she wrote as a Christmas present for her parents.  They were so unexciting that only her family and friends could have enjoyed them.  For example, one story was about how she worked excessive hours.  Another story was about being involved in a fire (she only saw it and called it in), arresting someone, driving someone to jail, and getting shot at - all in one night.  None of the incidents was terribly exciting but since it all happened one night, she was very impressed with herself.  For me, like many of her stories, I thought "So what?"
PPD is serious. This book isn't. This book is written entirely in bullet points and one-page "chapters" consisting of more white space than text. If it were subtitled "Positive Affirmations," rather than "Practical Solutions," I would not object. But I would also not have been misled into buying it.The author has an informative website that I would endorse, and the content of the book is appropriate in that format. It would make a good give-away pamphlet to families in treatment.  As someone who truly is looking for practical solutions, however, I was disappointed that Postpartum Husband does not delve much deeper than, "Be patient and supportive."And despite the title, the book gives surprisingly minimal attention to what a postpartum husband might do to take care of his own well-being while patiently supporting his emotionally struggling wife and fulfilling all of his other family and work obligations.The book promises more than it delivers, which is unfortunate because there is a real need for advice directed to the practical-minded husband
A total disappointment and very depressing. I've always been a huge fan of Nicholas Sparks, and I couldn't wait to read Dear John. Well, there was no reason to rush. It starts out okay, but then just gets more and more depressing. The main girl character is annoying and you hope that John will find someone who deserves him, instead of just pouting over her for most the book.I cannot wait for another Nicholas Sparks book, but only because I want to know that he hasn't lost his touch, and that this novel was just a fluck
Am I missing something here?????. Excuse me, but I see no literacy, historic wonder here, what I read of this piece of trash is:  this is a piece of obscene garbage!!!  Men with objects shoved up their butts, men forced and enjoying to perform explict graphic sex with other men, extreme cruelty, women having graphic sex with each other, women having their butts spanked and blistered.  WHAT PLOT!!!!!!What I don't understand is how these series of books ever passed a censor and why they don't have some kind of warning on the covers.Don't be fooled into thinking this is a profound work of art, it is an excuse of writing.  It should be rated XXX and kept out of the hands of anyone under 21!!!  If booze is illegal before that age, then this vulgar sex book should be also.I don't care if this is Ms. Rice fantasy, she should keep to Vampires and leave her imagination on this field alone.   I can just see some weirdo sex offender feeding on this stuff for his performace on the next victom.  It can give any one ideas on how to hurt people in the real world,  There are enough bad things being done to others without fresh new ideas to apply to the world of cruelty.
Christians !!       Be Afraid..... Be very Afraid. I gave this book 1 star because I was so offended as a ChristianI have to admit I am an Evangelical Christian who had never heard of Hugh Hewitt until I found this book in the .99 bin at a Christian Bookstore. After reading it I truly wondered where the Moral Outrage of Christians has gone.This is pure Machiavellian politics that has nothing to do with anything in Christ's Gospel. Sure there are Moral Absolutes, but for Christians to associate themselves with this kind of xenophobic, racist and unscriptural totalitarianism is at the very least as much an affront to the Cross of Christ as anything in the "Gay Agenda". I am embarrassed and personally truly repentant that a book like this even carries the imprint of a Christian publisher. I would also like to apologize to anyone who might assume that this is a Christian view of the world. The Jesus of the Bible, who is my Savior and Messiah, does not fear either terrorists or multiculturists, but gave his life for them, only asking that they "go and sin no more" and "make disciples of all men". It is the "whitewashed tombs" of Pharisaical hyporites that He condemns.  We can only pray that the kind of America Hewitt envisions never comes about or if it does that we face the Inquisition as "good and faithful servants".
The unorthodox bible to building fat. Apparently the authors don't know the strength of the word bible. If this book is a bible, then I hope that I'll never find it in the drawer of a hotel bed-side table. Absurd information about nutrition. Someone should  tell the people from Gold's to start from the beginning instead of writing  books for their, already huge, friends. If you're a beginner, don't join  the gold's religion; find another bible that's realist
Keegan strays from his usual standards of excellence in attempting to tackle intelligence in war. Intelligence in Warfare is a simplistic, arguably inaccurate, and often times pompous attempt by noted British historian John Keegan's personal theory that intelligence operations play little part in warfare as a whole.Some have argued that this book is about how intelligence in but one piece of leadership, but Keegan's arguments refute this rather than support it. To Keegan, intelligence is sometimes crucial, sometimes not, and most of the time just a minor part of a whole. If that is the case, then why write this book? At numerous times in each case study, Keegan observes that the outcome would have been different had the intelligence gathered been acted upon, rather than cast aside. A chapter later he will complain that the intelligence should have been cast aside, and that basing decisions on faulty inteligence caused the defeat. He essentially contradicts himself chapter by chapter.You can't have it both ways. Though his writing is fluid and poetic as always (Keegan makes the age of sail come alive better than anyone) this book is a prime case of "staying in your lane" of expertise. Intelligence is merely one part of the battle, and rarely tilts the decision one way or another. The challenge of intelligence is recognizing the value of specific bits of information in a sea of speculation. In this case, there are many other books out there on the topic that are worth the expense.
A More Timid ..."It's not our fault". And I suggest anyone reading this take it with a grain of salt.The opening disclaimer of what is and is not "anti-americanism" is nice, but definitions coming from Israelis does raise the hairs on the back on my neck since there has been such a concerted effort by some Israelis to seperate American from American. Not to mention the effort to seperate America from every one in the world except...guess who?...Israel.I gave it two stars from being not totally overt in the popular gimmick of .."everyone hates you and even some Americans hate America but...drum role...it's not because of what you do, it's because your rich and free.If you like your propaganda served straight up, bypass this book...on the other hand if you like served with umbrellas and a cherry on top this is for you
An excellent book but problems with the edition I purchased. I've read excerpts from this book before, specifically the excellent Judith Butler essay.  However the edition of the book I purchased printed pages 75-106 in place of pages 27-58, while printing the same pages in sequence as well.
not that useful. I have read many adoption books, and found this one to be the least informative.  Many other better books available for less money
Not Mieville's best work. I'm a big fan of both Perdido Street Station and The Scar, compared to these earlier works Iron Council was a huge disappointment in both the writing and story.  It was at times very painful to read and I was so excited to finally be finished.  If you are new to Mieville, start with Perdido Street Station, if you are a big fan and looking for more from New Crobuzon be prepared to be disappointed
Simple. This book is painfully simple covering only common sense issues.  This book is will be redundant for anyone who has studied the martial artts for more than a month
Really not much here. Sue Grafton has written many good books but this one is weak, weak, weak. Try 'A is for Alibi' or 'J is for Judgement'. They show off Grafton's writing talents much better
A nice companion to McQuarrie's text. I thought this was a terriable book by itself, but makes for a nice companion when reading through McQuarrie's book.  McQuarrie skimps out on some of the explanations and instead leaves it to the reader to figure it out for themselves by solving his problems at the end of the chapter.  One can usually find the answers (or at least some hints) within this book
Don't bother to wake me up. I have enjoyed several books by Anna Quindlen and looked forward to her latest offering. I settled down for an evening of reading 3 nights in a row before I finally gave up. I found the writing trite and boring. I didn't care about the characters as it took too long for them to become something. I'm wondering if this was something she wrote earlier in her career and tried to make a silk purse from a sow's ear. Rise and Shine? Not this time
One of the worst books I've ever read. good grief!  The book is basically a crash course on new age thinking disguised as fiction.  Unfortunately, the "insights" are bad philosophy full of circular reasoning and self-contradictions.  The details that are not relevant to the message are inaccurate - for instance, the point that looks out over Machu Picchu is not accessible by Jeep, Martin Luther never called for an end to the Papacy and only two very small portions of the Old Testament were written in aramaic.  It's bad logic, fruitless philosophy, bland dialogue, and just generally awful fiction.  The only thing I got from this book was a better understanding of why the New Age movement will never get anywhere. When your whole world view is a circle, all you see in front of you is the back of your own head.  How could you ever find enlightenment like that
Broken. I gave this cookbook 2 stars because although it was exactly what I was looking for, it came in an unacceptable condition. My mother had the original book for as long as I can remember and it had become well worn. Pages were falling out of it. This book was for all intesive purposes the same. When I gave it to my mom for Christmas she was so excited. Unfortunately, the three ring binder on it was broken. This is very bad considering that you need them to turn the pages. I would say that considering it was brand new, this was unacceptabl
Not a completely sympathetic portrait. The author is very articulate and humorous in describing the horrible experience of having a life threatening illness and severe disability.  She is obviously witty and intelligent.  However, I found her often cruel remarks about other people, doctors, nurses, bystanders to be unnecessary.  While sometimes her rude and immature remarks were a response to insensitivity, at times it was directed towards people who because they were in a professional capacity, could not defend themselves.  For example, she chose to make fun of a nurse who wore a hat she thought looked funny and didn't give her the eye contact that she wanted.  I work in the health professions and occasionally meet patients who are bitter and angry about their situation, venting it on others. Ms. Garrison reports her snide comments to others to the readers with glee. I wondered if the stroke had caused some kind of disinhibition or if she was merely somewhat nasty even before the stroke.  In any case, it detracts from her overall account and reduces the level of sympathy of the reader toward her genuinely unfortunate situation
weak greene. i have read 5 graham greene books and this is by far the lamest of them. this was conceived of first as a hollywood movie, and it shows. the book is not much more that a silly, corny thriller (just what hollywood orders over and over and over). there is very little character development involved, & the the sense of place (vienna after world war ii) could have been given much greater depth, as well. this is simply a plot being rushed onto the big screen ( a half-baked, lame plot, at that) to make some cash. pass this one by.
Boring. The research was remarkable...almost a minute-by-minute description of George's daughters. Never did I think that research could result in a book SO boring. Dare I admit the entire work was not read? My eyes kept going cross-eyed from all the minutia Ms. Fraser offered...not to mention the swarms of characters active in the princesses' lives that appeared, and disappeared, just as quickly.How happy I was that this book was borrowed from the library. It would have been dreadful to have spent the money for such a disappointing effort.Detail can be wonderful...in this case it was overkill
a book without structure. One expects one's textbooks to present material in a structured way. This book is all over the place. It is full of references to material &quot;covered in the next section&quot; or &quot;I explain this later in the book&quot;. It is also full of incomplete sentences, spelling errors, and uncoordinated subjects and predicates. For failness' sake on must admit that some useful information may be gleaned with some effort
NOT A  KEEPER. This is a beautiful book for the coffee table but forget the kitchen unless you have a brigade of chefs. Most of the ingredients are special purchase not something you would have in your pantry. A cup of blood anyone?? And what the hell is "paradise" as in "a few grains of paradise". I can't even find that one in my dictionary of foods and cooking terms. I am an excellent cook with more than 40 years of cooking experience Thomas Kellers "The French Laundry" was workable, albeit complicated. A cup of blood anyone, I think I have 1 left after paying more than $35.00 plus $8.00 shipping for this book. (not from Amazon) Amazon I have learned my lesson I will write 500 times I will not buy books from any source other than Amazon and I will not pay shipping on purchases over $25.00 Thank You!!! However I will keep this book and frame it as a reminder never to purchase thru over priced cook book clubs. Membership now canceled.
Don't waste your money. The other reviewers are right - this dog of a book should never have been published. In fact it seems to have been published by the author himself by way of a vanity press. Well, he shouldn't have wasted his time or his  money, and I shouldn't have wasted mine. This author knows NOTHING about  philosophy, but that doesn't stop him from complaining REPEATEDLY that  philosophers are a bunch of idiots. If possible, he's even more ignorant  (and prouder of it) than Rand herself
Zoolander on the Wagon. Interesting observations about rehab and kicking a bad drinking problem, so part of the book is worthwhile and inspiring.  About half way through I had to quit.  It was too much like reading the diary of a shallow teenage girl.  (Will he call me?  Did the gorgeous guy wear that tight shirt to impress me?  All I do is think about him.  Is he thinking about me? Oh, please, please, please, let him say something to me.  I love you, but I'm not in love with you.)  On and on. The humor is mildly amusing, but seems forced; it doesn't ring quite true, like the author is trying too hard.  An earlier negative reviewer said they didn't like the author.  It didn't prevent me from reading the book - I like the writing of a number of unlikable people.  But I now understand - the book is completely about this shallow person.  His struggle with alcohol is one of the few interesting/humane things about him.  His colleagues force him into rehab, which turns his life around.  He returns to work a changed and invigorated man, loving life, but continues to mock the people who saved him.  It doesn't dawn on him to thank them.
Poor service. Product misrepresented. The book we received was not the full book with the ISBN number we ordered. It was volume one of two with a different ISBN number, which was clearly noted on the back of the book. We had to send the book back AT OUR EXPENSE
Way too general. This dictionary may be good for the layman, but it is far too general for a law student or lawyer.  Only the most common legal words are included, so most of the words are familiar to lawyers.  Those words that are obscure enough to require a dictionary are not included.  I would recommend this dictionary to a layman who wants to understand simple legal terms, but not to a lawyer or law student
It works? NO IT DOESN'T!  Goal-setting squeezed onto a pamphlet. I understand the fascination with this 'book.' People want to make changes in their lives, find love, money, family, happiness etc - but people want to do it the cheapest way possible! Come on guys, are you kidding me? What do you actually expect for $5 dollars?This book attempts to show you how to use goal setting to change things in your life, but there are so few pages, each with a tiny amount of information. I have seen one extended review here on amazon by a man called Brad Jenson. The pamphlet isnt much longer!If you want to change your life then you have to INVEST in your future. Two books i have to recommend are 'THE ULTIMATE GUIDE TO COSMIC ORDERING' by Andronicos Andronicou. Its expensive, but its worth it. A really fantastic book that expects you to go 'out there' but trust in it and you will get some amazing results. The other book is 'ASK AND IT IS GIVEN' by Ester and Jerry Hicks. The book will help you to find balance in your life.If you are still wondering if this pamphlet will work for you let me give you a little bit of advice. Go outside, take a 5 dollar bill from your wallet, and set it on fire with a cigarette lighter. You may wonder 'what is the point in that?' my answer is that i just saved you a 2 day wait for an amazon delivery.There is so much better stuff out there, go find what interest you, buy it, and change your life
The Most Boaring Book Alive. The book is called The Circuit. This book is about a boy named Francisco Jimenez who wants to be another person. He had a hard time in school because he almost knew no English. He couldn't understand her. He had 3 brothers and 1 sister and a mom and dad. The worst thing to him was getting deported.In school he had a problem with 2 kids named Curtis and his friend. They were the bullies. Once Francisco had wore a sweater that belonged to Curtis. Of course he didn't know. He was lucky they didn't beat him up. Later they became friends.His brother that was born after him had a rare disease, but he made it through. I think that people who would like this book are people who have boring lives. After every chapter he wanted you to put the book down. He didn't leave any suspense. I hated the book so much.
A very credible book, except......... It was interesting to read a review that commented " It is still true, you can not find any study in those countries about Christianity".That statement is absolute fiction of course - especially in the 33 Jesuit schools in Syria. Perhaps in the west, it has slipped our minds that Jesus was born in the middle east, and we adopted this middle east religion from them.... The eastern Churches very much study Christianity, and many Muslims around them in the Levant, since Jesus is reverred in Islam. John the Baptist's head is maintained in a memorial monument in the middle of the Ommayad Mosque in Damascus.The most noted manuscripts used for our common bibles today, were discovered in Alleppo (Syria).Cursory research reveals Lewis's connections to Intelligence, and that speaks for itself. This book should be read, to balance it, in conjunction with 'Hostage to Khomeini' and 'Venice's War Against Western Civilization', unless one wishes to be taken for a very sophisticated ride. Better still, one could reside in the middle east for a while and see for one's self instead of amplifying other people's writings without the slightest ability, credential or experience to determine whether or not they might be accurate. But be ready for shock - it has little in common to the Psy-Ops portraits we have been spoon-fed with by western media, moronic television porgammes (suchas Fox), and artful books such as this.It's still a fine read, and awfully convincing - it hit it's mark in that respect. Much knowledge on Christianity - one wonders of the author hails from Christian ancestors ?Continuing the other review - that people in the middle east would supposedly benefit greatly from reading this book was also amusing, to say the least. People from the Middle East would benefit best from a good lawyer and a truth serum, given the looting and plunder of their resources..
A Typical Case of 'Padding' a Thin Volume. Sorry to be the wet blanket at this book party, but I was very disappointed in this book.  First of all, here is a case of what I call 'book padding'--an author repeating himself frequently and dragging in material that has no real relation to the subject--all in the interest of filling up pages.  Had the author deleted most of his repetitive material, and all the extraneous matter having to do with the singing group Peter, Paul, and Mary, this book would probably be less than 100 pages.  As it is now, the reader has to skim through endless repetitions, and also the author's feeble attempts to somehow connect the book to a folk singing trio.  Printing the lyrics to 'If I Had a Hammer' in a book dealing with three New Testament characters is just plain silly.If you think the book is 'brilliant,' that is probably because you agree with the author's deep skepticism about the New Testament.  Liberals will like this, conservatives won't.  I read this book not because I expected to agree with the author (although I tried to keep an open mind), but because I was wondering how he would deal with the various legends that sprang up around the three characters in the title.  For me this was the meat of the book--but again, he repeats himself endlessly.  The valid point that the Bible tells us very little about Mary Magdalene is worth stating, but not repeating a dozen times.I'm thankful I did not actually buy this book.  It is certainly not worth the cost
USEFUL METHOD FOR CONTROLLING BRAINLESS DRONES. Oh dear. This is another book like the horrible "Who Moved My Cheese?" that attempts to manipulate grown adults by treating them like children.Like the aforementioned "Who thinks my cheese stinks?" (or whatever it is called), I saw some people in the organisation where I work trying to sneakily weave it into the corporate culture and it lasted about five days.It's all about making work "FUN". Yep, work can be "FUN". Tell that to the folks who work in hospital waste disposal. Or maybe those who deal with animal cruelty cases.Of course, it's just great "FUN" to deal with children who have just had their parents killed, or folks who just lost their kids.Because that's what work is - "FUN" - or so this book would have you believe you can convince your workers.Of course in the examples I have listed above, it doesn't really work too well, because this is really about getting people in perceived lower-end occupations like factories or call-centres to believe their mind-numbing daily tasks can be "FUN".Myself, I do have some "FUN" at work, but probably like many people with more than one brain cell, it is based on having a laugh with my co-workers about the sheer absurdity of where our work life often takes us.You can call this cynicism, which is probably how it would be viewed by people who buy into this dumb "Fish"-style "WORK MUST BE FUN" philosophy. I'd call it black humour, but it keeps people sane and makes difficult work more bearable.As to the title of my review - this method of making the workplace "FUN" in a forced way is very useful if you have employees that you wish to isolate and marginalise.First immerse people in the cult-like atmosphere and tell them that they are now to regard work as "FUN".Second, let them know that they now "CHOOSE" their attitude - if they are unhappy in any way (regardless of them doing their work well or not), they are "LETTING THE TEAM DOWN" and not complying with the obligation to "MAKE WORK FUN".Third, while the majority of victims or workers, however you choose to view your prey, swallow the "WORK IS FUN" message and display the behaviour of sea lions clapping to get a mouthful of FISH, you can point to those who have shown a small streak of individual identity and are not HAVING FUN AT WORK and use the Enron-style message that they "just don't get it".In this way, the resistant individual can be said to be "incompatible with our mission and values", "bad for morale" or just "out of step".In this way, the "FUN-LOVING" workers, who have now taken on the costume of "FORCED FALSE FUN" can be set against them.Of course this will compound their unhappiness and isolate them further until they are totally marginalised and can be tossed on the scrapheap or forced to resign.This book is useful then, if you wish to convince idiots that their "WORK IS FUN".Just don't try it on a group of people with a brain between them who might take their work seriously.They might tell you to stick your "FISH" where the sun doesn't shine
Oh Danny Boy... First off, I love Dan Rather. He's a wonderful, passionate man whom I love to watch on the news. The problem is, he's not a writer. Not a very good one at least. This book is a noble attempt, but there is just so much that's wrong with it.For one thing, there is just some bad writing in it. It has a lot of errors in fact and a lot of typos. Among others, he writes that Texas A&M University (rather than Texas Tech) is in Lubbock, and he says that Ryne Sandberg in in the Baseball Hall of Fame (he just should be soon). There is also bad grammar (this is beyond the Texas colloquialisms in the book which I think are fine-I'm a Texan myself). These are fairly small problems, but they are oftly annoying, and they are not good signs in a book written by a journalist who's supposed to report facts. Furthermore, he just has few narrative talents, at least not those required for a book. He tells the stories as a journalist on Headline News would--concise, to the point, and without much flavor. They're just there; the reader is rarely drawn in.The most glaring flaw, though, is that there are a lot of flaws in logic in the book. For instance, one of the stories is about a ten-year-old boy who realizes that many of the underpriveleged at his school cannot afford school supplies, so he works together an organization that collects and disperses those needed supplies. This is all obviously a good thing. But then, Rather relates a joke told by the boy's mother who said she needed to haul the school supplies around so she "traded in [her] Lexus for a Durango, and now [she's] getting a Yukon because the Durango isn't big enough." My problem is the huge contrast here. On one hand, there are all of these kids lacking necessities and the heroes who are helping them are laughing about purchasing one expensive SUV after another for themselves. How is this inequality emblematic of the American Dream? How does this book manage to lament the rising poverty rates and terrible living conditions and still manage to promote excessive materialism? There are some people in the book who are praised for having overcome hardship to make millions (some of them stepping on other people's heads to do so) and others who are praised for having given up millions to help those in need. Frankly, these two "ideals" don't go together. Nevertheless, these people, according to Rather, have all attained the American dream. There are a lot of contradicting ideas expressed in these stories. Furthermore, I don't really think Rather has a great concept of what the American dream is. When Sister Sylvia Schmidt founds a homeless shelter in Tulsa, OK, I don't think she is following the American Dream. I think she's following dreams that go far beyond the American Dream, and I think she's rejecting the prevalent, primarily materialistic, concept of the American Dream of today's society.I'm giving the book two stars because I like Dan Rather, and because some of the stories were rather inspiring. Neverthess, it's not a good book. I will continue to watch Dan Rather on tv, but I'm quite sure I won't read a book by him again
Silas Marner review. If you do not have to read this book, don't.  It is very difficult to understand and catch on to, especially because of the slow plot build-up and the overall slowness of the book. It has a nice meaning to it but hard  to understand because of the way the author words things
Just a bunch of pictures. and none i haven't seen elsewhere in my other DIY garden project books. I was NOT inspired
An OK Book. The writer has great style and all, but it's really written for newcomers to this profession.I was impressed by the title of the book. I like the presentation. But what's really lacking is the content when I dig into it. I had reasonably high expectation of the book, that it's for the 'take-your-career-to-the-next-level' readers (seasoned office professionals).  However, it disappoints me in this department.The information provided, particularly in the "Appendix" is relevant to the US, but may not be the case for other parts of the world.  The concepts and principles are useful. Having worked and still do, in large American corporations, I find it easy to relate to the book.Having said all that, it still makes a GREAT book for everyone who is NEW and ASPIRES to be the BEST admin you could possibly be - A KICKASS ASSISTANT. Happy reading
Don't bother. Rarely do I just write off a book especially of such a prolific writer as Coetzee but this book is such an utter disappointment in his career and its only value lies in that it will prepare you for the even bigger disappointment of his most recent novel, Elizabeth Costello which this book is a precursor. I am not violently opposed to this book neither is the writing that excessively bad...the book is a definition of the utter waste of time.
Disappointing and Dismal Writing. Although the premise of the story is a good one, the way it is handled literarily fell very short of expectations.  I kept wondering whether his editor was on vacation for allowing the contant ranting and philosophical tangents, leaving absent the &quot;showing&quot; that might have been more appropriate to a novel.  The story had interesting ideas to explore regarding holocaust victims and their children, but doesn't bring any light to the ideas, just a overblown ghost story which doesn't deal with the concept of &quot;golem&quot; at all and instead virtually slanders a generation of disturbed writers, despite the apology at the outset of the novel.  I finished it only because I had assigned it for my book group and was embarassed to have done so.  Steer clear
Bull. None of these covers &quot;changed the world&quot;. Whether they will admit it or not, the American media don't rule the world. Least of all Life Magazine. If they're so important, why did they go out of business
you can find better. I have been evaluating, and managing corporate marketing for years. too much fluff here. save your $10.00 unless you collect branding books
Now this is just too boring. Kriss Stephens knows one thing for sure: ghosts (whatever they are or however you choose to define them) exist, and she really knows how to find them. And take their pictures. She refers to herself as a "paranormal investigator and a professional photographer", and FEAR is the story about some of the hundreds of ghost-hunts she's done over the years.There is, in Stephen's world, no such thing as a world without ghosts, and there's no point trying to prove their existence, because, well, they exist. She's very sure about that. What's worth investigating, though, is how and why a certain location becomes haunted. And yes, I agree, those are definitely questions worth asking. But just make sure not to do it they way Kriss Stephens does it.Because I don't think I've ever seen a so-called paranormal book of such low quality. There's no reason doubting that Stephens believes in what she does; she's both honest and motivated, but honestly, if she's really a "paranormal investigator" and especially a "professional photographer", then my parents' dog could be that too.The book is absolutely packed with black and white pictures, and they're all just as boring, pointless, uninteresting, and stupid. In each new chapter, Stephens alone or together with a group of "colleagues" goes to a haunted location, and wherever she goes she has some sort of ghost-related "paranormal" experience. As soon as she arrives at a new site, be that a house with a violent history, a battlefield from the American civil war, a cemetery and so on, she starts taking picture with her digital camera, and she always ends up with photographic proofs of the presence of ghosts.Well, then, what are those proofs of hers? Orbs, orbs, and more orbs. In other words, perfectly natural phenomena that has nothing whatsoever to do with the world of the paranormal. And in case it's not orbs then it's fuzzy details or smoke or something else very much mundane that in Stephens' eyes turn into ghosts.And that's how the story goes throughout all of the book's 234 pages. More or less every single page has at least one picture, and most of the pictures don't even show anything interesting at all. The book is not one bit investigative, there's no critical thinking to be found, and I doubt that I've ever read a book where the author has been as gullible as Kriss Stephens.Yet, I still had a good time reading it, because gullibility can be extremely entertaining. Still, I cannot help but to feel sorry for Stephens, who apparently lives in her own little fantasy world where ghosts almost seem to outnumber real life humans
"SW:..." -- is a Grave Disappointment...!!!. "Silent Witness:..." by Roxanna Ferllini (Timms), NY, Firefly Books, 2002 - ISBN 1-55297-625-6 (pbk.), 7x10 in., 192 pg., has many photos; glossary, index & bibliography are short."SW:..." invitingly promises more than it gives:  It has an bold enticing cover, c. 300 ample-sized full-color photos of crime scenes, criminals, forensic trace evidences & diverse illustrations, etc., on premium stock semi-gloss paper -- obviously a very expensive printing, especially for paperback.Table of contents lists 8 chapters:  History of Forensic Anthropology, Bone Talk, Exhumations, Surface Bodies, Altered Remains, Air Disasters, Fires/Explosives & Human Rights.The talky text has many deficiencies: Throughout, it is overly rambling & verbose, i.e., (pg. 157) "Fingerprinting was one of the various processes utilized, and identifications were also made by molecular biologists who applied DNA analysis."  Why not say "DNA & fingerprints were used for identification" and use 7 instead of 20 words?  Author uses abject word choices, solecism or inaccuracies in medical/forensic phrasing as, i.e., (pg. 27) "since female humans are predisposed to pregnancy and childbirth" is non-comedic, corny.  Why not say "childbearing women" and use 2 not 9 words. And, (p. 31), "cygomatics" referencing cheekbones should be "zygomatics", but problematical is wandering & wayword use of medical/forensic jargon as might a lay person.The author's credentials (MA in Biol. Anthro.) are restricted to a 2" small space on the inside back cover & indicates she worked with UK Foreign Office as Forensic Anthropologist in Kosovo and for UN in Rwanda, and her interest in facial reproduction, political conflicts, genocide, & human rights is notable & praiseworthy.  Thusly, her final Chapter 8 on Human Rights is the single textual useful strong point of "SW:..."In summary, the book is geared to HS grade level of introductory forensics -- it has many excellent & remarkably good photographs & few hints of favorable text.  What this book needs is an insightful editor who could salvage the text of "SW:..." to gain more serious readership, but Chapter 8 is okay.
This Book Rocks Because... I found this book to be very good. The reason I thought this was because it has a great story line of mystery, adventure, and action. It also has a great them to it. The theme came out to me as that you can't hang over something for a long time because if you do it will only drive you insane, adn make you mad at yourself and the world.I thought that this book was good and all, but I could'nt really focus on it after about 20 pages. So I read around a chapter or two every other night or so.The easiest aprt for me to read was toward the end of the book because thats when it got really exciting and the mystery startd to unfold.I think that this book is excellent for anyone who enjoys mystery stories. This book is also i think good for teenagers because this story is fiction, but a situation like this book could very well happen to any teenagers life.
If I had wanted a romance novel, I would've looked in that part of the book store. I first picked up on the Anita Blake series a little over a year ago. I was absolutely enthralled. Not only was the main character witty, intelligent, and kick-butt, but there was a memorable set of supporting characters to see her through. Who can forget Zerbrowski's antics (even in the worst of times) or the cold-hearted killing of everyone's favorite bounty hunter? After reading my share of the books and floating around to some of the other reviews here on Amazon, I am left wondering the same thing many of the other fans are: what happened?I just finished Narcissus in Chains. Normally when I finish a book, I'm left with a sense of fulfillment, like I've accomplished something. Unfortunately, that was not the case. I've always found this series to capture me from the get-go, but trying to convince myself to read this one was hard. Not only was the plot rather weak, but Anita seemed to keep on debating the same situations over and over. Jean-Claude, Richard, Micah, and even Asher seem to plague her thoughts. And although she will do anything to save a member of her pard, or anyone else for that matter, her focus always seemed to drift back to the boys. And did anyone else notice the repetitiveness in the writing? Hamilton used the exact same wording for certain feelings or actions throughout the book. Unlike the earlier part of the series, the writing in Narcissus in Chains is less imaginative and less memorable. On top of it all, come the end of the book, we have this bad guy who I can't even remember where he came from in the first place!My favorite part of the books has always been Anita's police work. I am honestly ten times more interested in her career than I am in her love life. I miss having a tight, intense plot that flows, instead of drifting around like some kid with a short attention span. And as pointed out in the book, the charming Anita Blake we used to know and love really has become a monster. A literary disaster of a monster.Although the reviews for Cerulean Sins are probably just as grim as the reviews for Narcissus in Chains, I plan to go ahead and continue the series. I can't give up on something that has such great potential, and from the sound of it, this next one has a more recognizable plot. I can only hope. Unfortunately, I believe that Obsidian Butterfly was probably the last of one of the best series and best characters ever created
outdated. I returned this book after opening the cover and scanning the contents. If you are looking for help with computer based recording this is not it
A Real Chore to Make it Through. I approached this title with all the expectations fostered by many friends endless promotions. I did my best to like it, to find some secret meaning, some redeeming quality within, to no avail. Actually finishing the book was an accomplishment, in my opinion. Ultimately I found the book aimless, soulless, and the promoter of everything negative about the human species. I know this sounds harsh, but time after time I felt let down by On the Road.No, I don't "dig" it, Dean
Disappointing. Unless you're into spamming folks, who filter out junk mail anyway, you won't find much value in this book. Each chapter has some hypster claiming wild successes from their email (spam) campaign in order to get recognition (and thus advertise to the reader).
Series hits a brick wall. This is the third installment in the Mitch Rapp series and the author's fourth book overall. (I'd suggest reading the previous books both for chronology reasons and that they're better reads.) Mitch is America's #1 "go to" guy when it comes to fighting terrorism. In "Separation of Power" he is faced with cleaning up some open issues from his last mission (someone tried to kill him), the political "in-fighting" surrounding the naming of a new CIA chief, rogue Mossad agents, Iraq gaining nuclear weapons and falling in love. One could be forgiven in thinking this last issue would make for a pleasant diversion while our hero prevents WW III. Not so. Mitch's romance takes a front and center position and in a word is well ... comedic. The "action" threads of the plot - which this author has worked so well in his previous books - is hinted at in the first 100 pages, doesn't really begin until after 200 pages - and then proceeds in fits and starts. There is an inordinate amount of "character development" - self-serving, amoral, scheming politicans & our world weary, battle scarred reluctant hero Mitch, who must once again pick up the sword to do what no other man can do - which like the "romance" impedes the plot. The book hastily concludes, (20+ pages), in an unsatisfying and simplistic finale. Hopefully this book is an anomaly in the series because the author's previous books were great roller coaster rides and provided entertaining reading at the beach and in airports. Unfortunately the much rushed conclusion and Mitch's "new" situation doesn't guarantee that.
Poor writing, short on detail. I bought both this book and Al Linders Walleye book. Save your money and do not buy this book. Al's books are extremely detailed and full of uselful techniques covering all situations for walleye fishing. Great on the biology and life cycle of these fish. This book was not worth the money
unauthenticated foolishness with some good tangents. While the ancillary material on cryptid hominids is well organized, representing a reasonably clean presentation of typically widely scattered material, the lion's share of the book is valueless for one simple reason: not one claim is substantiated. It would indeed justify rewriting human history were a machined steel component unearthed in an Ordovician matrix or a precisely carved stone tool found embedded in Mesozoic strata. Yet, despite the copious bibliography, there is not one footnote associating any of the outrageous claims with a verifiable, published source. Beyond that, some of the claims are just plain silly: for example, I have trouble seeing through the authors' eyes how a vaguely dumbbell-shaped outline in archaic shale is ironclad evidence that a shod human foot walked past in remote times. Mine the Internet for the useful cryptid material and save your money otherwise
Narcissistic Twaddle. All I could think was, "Damn, if I had so many friends at my beck and call to talk me down off the ledge, I'd never be depressed." I don't know quite how to explain it, but I felt no empathy for him. I only ended up feeling more depressed. As a history of depression, the level of research was quite impressive.If you read Prozac Nation and wanted to punch her out, steer clear of this one as well
I can't STAND this woman... This was the only Bertrice Small book I could find in the gift shop of an airport.  That should have been warning enough not to buy it.Rosamund was an unlikeable character.  She left her 3 young daughters so she could "make love" constantly and then was oh-so-superior with her maid when Annie did the same!  I guess being a rich, snotty noblewoman means you're not held to the same standards of behavior as the mere household help.I found the love at first sight meeting to be flimsy and contrived.  Small's readers are smarter than most, so I'm surprised she expected us to swallow it.  Like some other reviewers here, I thought it was more lust than love.  It was clearly a mid-life crisis hook up for Patrick.  And if Rosamund truly loved Patrick, she never would have left him when he was ill, memory loss or not!Not planning to read either "Rosamund" or "Phillipa", the other books in this series.  It was hard enough getting through this book, let alone another one with her uppity daughter.The good stuff?  Getting to meet Patrick Leslie again.  But it was heartbreaking to witness his grief over losing his daughter Janet decades ago.  If you've read "The Kadin", you know that Janet eventually returns to her home, but only after Patrick has died
Bad Flaps. Great little book except the pictures under the flaps are totally off.  This makes it frustrating for little ones to know what they are looking at.  Usually Thomas the tank engine stuff is much better quality
Don't read it if you're black. Or gay. Or female. It's fragmented and feels like it doesn't know whether it wants to be funny or serious, but I could have lived with that if it hadn't been so scarily oblivious and unpleasant. One example: "And I'm secretly thrilled that I might actually be starting a friendship with someone as cool--and as black--as Angie."Oh, great. Because black people just LOVE that. I mean, how cool is that? Rich white lady wants to be my friend because I'm black! Groovy! I love to be an accessory! She doesn't have to feel like she's a self-centered, useless rich boob anymore, because she's different! She has a black friend! And a gay one! How rebellious!And don't get me started on how she fancies herself some wild-and-crazy partier but still thinks oral sex is "taboo" and "antifeminist" and that any guy who wants to do a woman up the butt is necessarily gay.Who is this book for? Not for black people, gay people, non-rich people, or any woman who has ever enjoyed any kind of sex beyond the standard missionary type. In other words, it's for Dr. Laura, and that's about it
Disappointing book about a fascinating subject. I picked this book up after after enjoying "Savage Pastimes," another book by the same author, and hoped for an informative and gruesome book about an infamous serial killer.  "Depraved" was, in places, but the presentation was lacking, and the book had no focus and far too much irrelevant courtroom drama.It opens up properly, with a thumbnail sketch of the times, H. H. Howard's infamous crimes, and more background info. It then lists some formative experiences from his childhood, and gives a short bio of his life up to the point he turned to murder. After that it loses its way though, with endless discussion of Holmes' travels around the country as he tries to perpetrate a minor insurance scam, and then far too many pages on his murder trail. Surprisingly, his trial is for the murder of a henchmen in an insurance scam, and he's never charged or prosecuted for the dozens of other far more interesting murders he committed. Unfortunately those are hardly mentioned in the book at all, and are not discussed in any detail.Going by the middle 80% of the book, you'd think it was a biography about a small time hustler, scam artist, and bigamist who eventually got carried away and murdered a partner, and was subsequently tried and executed for it. The fact that he killed maybe 50 other people, built this incredible murder mansion, tortured dozens of people, and was the world's first documented serial killer, is almost an afterthought.Let's be honest; the hook of the book, the reason anyone reads it, is that it's about H. H. Holmes, who killed a lot of people in various horrible ways, at a time in history when that sort of thing was almost completely unknown. That's' what the reader wants to know about, in as much detail as possible, with lots more about the, "mazelike corridors, soundproof rooms, sealed vaults, oversized furnaces, and chutes leading down to the cellar" that the book jacket talks about. Unfortunately, you get hardly more detail about those things than the book jacket says, with no detailed descriptions of anything, no charts or diagrams or photographs, no eyewitness accounts, and not even any speculation about how the crimes went down.What you do get are maybe 200 pages (out of the 360 total) covering his seemingly endless and aimless cross-country travels while dodging the cops and tediously plotting to murder his assistant in a life insurance scam, hoodwink his widow, and dispose of the guy's children.  Ten or fifteen pages would have been sufficient for that section, but instead it covers at least 100, most of it of the, "traveled from Chicago to Baltimore, checked into two different hotels under different names, didn't buy the poor girls new shoes, etc..." variety. It's as boring as it sounds from my summary.  Worse yet, we then revisit that entire story when it all gets relived during Holmes' trial, which ends in his conviction for the murder of his henchmen, as part of a life insurance scam.The author covered that section in so much detail for an obvious reason; he could just pluck it all from newspaper articles at the time, since there was extensive coverage of Holmes in the media of the day. Far, far less coverage is given to the castle itself, or Holmes' serial killing, and there's virtually nothing about why Holmes became what he was. We get one short childhood incident, lots of unsourced comments about his practicing torture on animals as a child, and then bang, he's being hung for one minor murder with almost no details about the bulk of his crimes. We know everything about a crime we don't much care about, and almost nothing about all of the crimes we wanted to learn about, and that's a definite flaw. I was skimming paragraphs and whole chapters by page 250 or so; bored with the irrelevant courtroom drama and wanting to get past his conviction for one life insurance scam murder, and on to more about his real crimes.Basically this is a decent first draft of a book about H. H. Holmes, but it needs substantial editing to add detail about his castle and murders, needs to have at least 50 pages of redundant and boring reportage about his travels removed, and needs much more psychological analysis and discussion about Holmes and the society in which he lived.My final, seldom-used non fiction scores:Concept: 7Presentation: 4Writing Quality: 5Presents/Explains the Topic Clearly: 5Entertainment Value: 4Rereadability: 3Overall: 3.
Ridiculous book. I like most of Jodi Picoult's books, but this was the worse one I have ever read. The story line was ridiculous and unbelievable. The main character in the book, Trixie, is a teenager with problems but her parents never seem to realize this. They go to incredible lengths to protect her and never hold her responsible for any of her actions. The drawings in the book were distracting and annoying. I would not recommend this book to anyone
Following your own footsteps in the snow. Crossan regards the Gospel of Thomas as an early, primary source concerning Jesus and uses it to revise the portrait of Jesus found in the Gospels. Now what reasons does he have for dating the Gospel of Thomas so early? Amazingly, his whole approach to this question is reasoning in a circle. It goes like this:1. The Gospel of Thomas is an early, primary source."How do you know?"2. Because no apocalyptic sayings are found in the Gospel of Thomas."Why is that evidence of an early date?"3. This is evidence of an early date because Jesus wasn't into Apocalyptic."How do you know he wasn't?"4. Because the Gospel of Thomas proves he wasn't."Why believe what the Gospel of Thomas says?"1. The Gospel of Thomas is an early, primary source.In his review "Taking the Text with Her PleasureA Post-Post-Modernist Response to J. Dominic Crossan The Historical Jesus: The Life of a Mediterranean Jewish Peasant" (T & T Clark, Harper San Francisco, 1991) NT Wright says this approach is like Winnie the Pooh following his own tracks in the snow around a clump of trees and each time he sees more tracks he takes this as evidence that his quarry is even more numerous and more real than he thought before
Not as good as it sounds. This book is fun to read, yes, no question about that, the problem are the facts inside.In the first pages I found the first error. I continued, but without knowing if what I was reading was true. For example, Mr. Comfort, in page 12, states: "It was another 2000 years later (at a time when science believed that the earth was flat) that the scriptures inspired Christopher Columbus to sail around the world." Well, the problem is that, first, Columbus wasn't inspired by scriptures and, second, in those times people didn't believe that the earth was flat.I am a Christian, and I'm very disappointed. Mr. Comfort's efforts to find evidence of modern science, modern hygiene and even dinosaurs in the Bible are simply unbelievable, and many times feels forced. He even quotes famous people on the Bible, I mean, if Napoleon said anything good about the Bible, that is a proof of is supernatural origin? He founds what his eyes want to find, he understands what he wants to understand... The worst is that he sees things that are not there and compares it to data that is wrong... The result is a fun but messy book.
oh my god, no.... i love music and i love making music, but i don't read music or study it.  to me, that would take all the fun out of it.  if you're like me, you might dislike this book.  this book is HUGE... excluding the appendices, it's about 440 large pages of instructions.. are you kidding me?  it says things like "do this one particular thing for 5 minutes, then this for 7 minutes" etc..  i would never try to follow so many detailed, lengthy instructions..  i like other OOBE books i've seen better.  maybe this is great for some people, but i need something easier, and more to the point.
Not what I expected. I ordered this for a friend, thinking it was the same Bruce Fisher book I bought when I divorced.  It is ONLY the workbook and really needs a workshop (or maybe just a book) to go with it.  It was a total waste of money and not what I expected when I ordered.  Make sure you are ordering the book, not the workbook, when you order
Good book... for a PhD student. This book, is not for newcomers to statistics. It often assumes a well versed backround in probability and statistics (and I suppose a decent background in calculus). There is often little explanation for examples and theorems. Often the exercises and examples require the solution to previous exercises. This is extremely frustrating and often discouraging. Many times I would find myself being refered to an example in a previous or future chapter whose solution refers to a problem that needs to worked out. I have an undergraduate degree in math and am by no means a genius, but compared to many well written math texts, the clarity and conciseness leaves much to be desired. The exercises do not go from easier to more difficult but from difficult to difficult. Often the concept that is trying to be illustrated could be done in a much simpler problem.That all said, the book is fairly well written given the aforementioned weaknesses. My professors seem to like it as do a couple of PhD students
Repetitive rehash. I loved Mr. Darcy Takes a Wife and didn't want to see it end.  So I was delighted to see another sequel by the same author.  Unfortunately this one just continually rehashes previous material in slightly different ways. The storyline jumps all over the place, contradicts itself, and does not feel cohesive. Perhaps better editing would have made this a worthwhile read. While Mr. Darcy Takes a Wife will find a permanent spot on my bookshelf, Days and Nights at Pemberley will not.I do hope to see more from Berdoll.  Perhaps she should take on a sequel to the characters in Emma
Being Greek. While this book is a relatively interesting read, as a Greek woman I find it extremely insulting. This book takes every stereotype out there and looks for evidence that it is true. Robbins goes looking to find the information she needs to prove that Greek life is sordid and scandalous. This book also over generalizes implying that all sororities are like this one, not caring that this is the account of a very small selection of sororities and Greek women. As a member at a smaller school I can honestly say that most of the stuff that goes on in this book I have never even come close to seeing happen. Robbins goes into researching this with a very biased opinion and it shows throughout the novel. While some parts are true, they are not true to the extreme Robbins makes them. There is also very little focus on the good done by a sorority, philanthropy is a huge part of who we are, some schools may not take it as seriously as others, but there are many sororities who focus on doing good. The sisterhood also isn't shown in the best light in this book, I have met so many girls that I am so close to now, this book doesn't show the closeness between sisters a sorority can bring. This book starts off with a very offensive tone by the way Robbins describes the girls at the Greek Boutique, we were our letters with pride, we want others to know how proud we are of who we are. And Olive Green and Green are two extremely different colors, thus why the distinction is needed. To get a truly accurate account of a sorority life, it would take more than the word of four girls, at one or two schools. Interview hundreds of girls from all over the country at all sizes of schools and all sizes of chapters for an accurate account, this book is just another stereotype that we will have to fight.
Gary - Lost Christianities. Ehrman's work is not for a person of faith. It does not take faith into consideration. It is a wonderful research project based on limited documents available - most forged and falsified; and none which can be validated. I read it as an immediate follow-up to his work "Lost Scriptures" - Books that did not make it into the New Testament. I was warned by my minister who is also a Bible scholar and has two Ph.D.'s - and my minister was correct. In Lost Christianities, Ehrman seems to make an effort to discredit our current books of the New Testament by implying that many New Testament books may be false, forged, translated incorrectly, altered to serve a purpose, etc... Ehrman clearly attempts to form a relationship between the New Testament books to those falsified books that did not get into the New Testament. Ehrman's Lost Christianities starts out strong, but ends weak to the point of losing and disinteresting the reader. If for nothing else, it is an attempt to test your faith, but in the end your faith will be strenghtened - if you have faith. The book leads one to believe that the author is as much a Bible critic as he claims to be a scholar. He does present all sides of the New Testament story and it is interesting how the New Testament was formed. However, the lack of confirmed and validated documents will lead one to begin to question if Ehrman is accurate or merely sensationalizing much like the media does. To save you the time and money, simply let your faith answer any questions you may have on the validity of the New Testament and how came to be. Ehrman and other Bible critics (ie., The DeVinci Code) seem to be profiting by creating questions about the truth and validity of the New Testament story. Save your money and give it to your church instead.Gary
Did you all actually read it?. First off, I am an avid reader and love a long challenging read, however, this novel is one of the worst I have ever read! It is long, boring and has absolutely no plot. I purchased it when it first came out without reading any reviews. Although from the looks of most of them here, I personally suspect that many of those who raved, never actually read the book
preachy and whiny. While this book brought up some very good issues about how terrible overweight people are treated, I found it preachy and many times got irritated with Lara's whining.I can understand that she's feeling sorry for herself because she used to be a beauty queen and now she's one hundred pounds overweight.  But I don't want to read that same thing a zillion times, right up to the end of the book.  It made me lose sympathy for Lara, and by the end of the book I thought she was a stuck up brat.  I also had difficulty with her disease, Axell-Crowne Syndrome.  It isn't real - the author made it up.  And because of this disease, Lara felt superior to other overweight people because gaining weight wasn't her fault.  Stuck up brat strikes again.  To top it off, she gets mad at other people for assuming she was overweight from eating too much, yet she assumed that exact thing with other overweight people.  How does she know the person she's looking down on isn't also suffering from Axell-Crowne Syndrome?  It's hard to relate to a hypocrite, especially one who never seems to learn her lesson and grow from it.  I didn't like other messages in the book either, such as Suzanne's gorgeous boyfriend, Tristan, hating that Suzanne is overweight.  If the point of the book is to say not everyone can be thin and that's okay, then why doesn't Tristan love Suzanne for who she is, regardless of her weight?Anyway, I could list all the things I didn't like about this book, but it would take too long and I've got other things I'd rather do
Great Premise + Really Bad Author = Awful Book. GWTW certainly was one-sided in its portrayal of the Old South, and I can see how that could be a deal killer for a lot of readers.  Although I consider GWTW to be one of the greatest pieces of American literature ever written, I was VERY excited by the idea of TWDG.  The idea of building a "back story" around the black characters in Mitchell's novel is BRILLIANT!  So much could be done with this idea to address issues of race and slavery, as well as to broadside a popular piece of American literature through counterpoint.Unfortunately, this great idea is wasted because Randall is utterly lacking in talent.  The thing that immediately bothered me about TWDG is the extraordinarily poor use of dialect.  One sentence has the main character narrating in perfect grammar with strong vocabulary and then in the next sentence she's all "he do dat" and "me go sleep."  Randall should have picked one voice for her main character and stuck with it.  This alone represents terrible hack writing, but I must go on and say something about the (snicker) "plot."The plot, which should be subversive and controversial, fails to rise above the trashy romance novel level, and the (I think they're supposed to be shocking) sex scenes wouldn't shock anyone except my Amish Aunt Minnie.  I actually laughed out loud several times as I read them because I pictured Clark Gable/Rhett Butler saying some of this ridiculous dialogue.The plot here is so flaccid that Randall inadvertently undermines her own book.  The white characters remain more interesting than any of the black characters.  This despite the fact Randall gives them tons of dirty linen to air in an obvious (and pathetic) attempt to make them interesting.  Her black characters are non-entities, which I believe was her beef with Mitchell in the first place....right?!As a result, by writing TWDG, Randall is only spray painting a nasty word on the castle walls of GWTW when what she needed to do was bulldoze the original, dance gleefully on its grave, and create something very powerful in its place.  But that would take a skilled writer, and Randall just doesn't have the goods."Taking on" GWTW is a great idea, especially to stir up discussion around issues of racism and slavery in our country and our history.  However, to do an idea like that justice requires a talented author (i.e., not Alice Randall).  Maybe Toni Morrison should take this on?  I'd read that
The book was as rocky as the characters in it. I saw Jessica Hagedorn speak at the 92nd street Y, which is where I recieved her book. Once I began to read the book I became absorbed into her book. Jessica Hagedorn does a good job at describing the essence of the bohemian/ punk rock culture. My only problem was that the book became really confusing once in the middle. The beginning of the book was straight forward and easy to read, but once Rocky becomes pregnant , the whole book seems confusing. The book became really boring once it got to a certain point, and I became really dissapointed
Marginal. This is the most misleading of books. The title would have you believe Gouverneur Morris wrote the Constitution. A few more founding Fathers naturally participated. However, Morris was Chairman of the Committee on Style which means Morris was primarily responsible for making printed sense out of the legal mumbo jumbo. He did this and did it well to include the Preamble, no mean feat. But he certainly did not write the Constitution as Thomas Jefferson wrote the Declaration of Independence. Nor did Morris himself ever claim to. If Morris did write the Constitution, as Richard Brookheiser claims in the title, why did Brookheiser spend less that 10% of the book reporting on what this work is purportedly all about, the Constitution and Morris' participation therein?Aside from being misleading, this book just also happens to be very poorly written. It is cluttered and confusing. It is a shame the author does not give the reader a better opportunity to know Morris. Morris lived and participated in some of the Nation's most formative times. If the author had given his subject more attention, if he had said more about who Morris was and how he interacted with the events of his time, then this could have been a slam bang winner, a blockbuster of a fine work. Instead, the best thing that can be said is that it is a very cursory survey of the times in which Morris lived.Mercifully, it is short.
Delayed and Disappointed. The product arrived after the estimated arrival date; it took over 3 weeks for my book to arrive.  The book itself was also not in as good of a condition as mentioned in the description.
....why...oh...why. For a 'teach yourself c++' book, this book has VERY little actual code in it.  IT should be called "Teach yourself structure and math of c++" because that's about all you're getting.  Reading the other reviews I see everyone is having the same problem I am, the author rarely includes sample code, never really shows you how to create a program, just kind of rambles on about structure and function.  Not  a good starter book at all
Too much story telling. This book was recommended for me to read by my husband's personal therapist.  He's in anger counseling, after coming back from Iraq, and I'm the one reading about six books right now.While it was worth the read, I need MORE:  More instruction, more direction.  More getting to the point!  Lerner goes on and on and I found myself bored with the stories.  I'm reading for answers.  There are so many stories and you really have to hunt for clues as to WHAT TO DO IN YOUR OWN LIFE.  If you're reading a self-help book, then obviously you just may need some help now.  And fishing for "what to do" isn't productive.I just didn't like the flowy, story telling way of writing.  To me, she spent a lot of time writing the history of a problematic relationship and then what the patient WANTED to achieve and then not so much as to what was needed to fix the problem for a positive outcome.  Too many times I read the phrase, "we'll get to that later."
Too basic and touching mostly on the surface stuff. This book was not covered in details for almost very subject in import and export.  Some examples are complete mismatched with the text.  It is over rated by other reviewer.  I learned about import/export from the US custom web site and the internet more than the content of this book.  It is not worth the money or time to read.
Confused. This book has interesting episodes- Lucknow, Seringpatam , Egypt and the role of France versus the British,-but lacks a logic or argument which would justify the book. It touches on europeans collecting local objects and local rulers buying foreign technology and advice to defend themselves However as it starts in North America, there should be discussion of why artefacts of North American Indians were not collected. On the other hand there could be some reference to the tradition of  collecting of antiquities ( see Jonathon Scott Pleasures of Antiquity or the catalogue of the exhibition at the Gulbenkian Foundation   Exotica  )The role of France in opposing the British in India should have been argued through  : intriguing in the Mutiny but allies in the Crimean War ?In general the prose is  over adjectived, why is the Dictionary of national Biography " compendious ", when is is actuaully comprehensive  ?And the illustrations are a disgrace, too small and  dark, the wonderful Col.Mordaunt's Cockfight reproduces as a black postage stamp
Needs a parental rating. This was assigned for entering 9th graders as summer reading. The story of a dysfunctional family (alcoholism, child abuse) is maudlin enough on it's own. The author apparently thinks that teenagers need to be exposed to graphic sex and X-rated language to relate to the dilemmas of growing up. I found the story tedious, the language unimaginative and the message simplistic. Skip this one
The Phaidon Press Book is Better. The quality of the art covered in this book is highly uneven and many of the theories are terribly dated by today's standards. I get the impression that it was written more to promote the friends of the authors than to give an objective view of Feminist art. The Phaidon Press book from the Themes and Movements series, Art and Feminism, is MUCH better to the point that I am almost embarrassed to compare the two books.There is a school of Feminist research that seems to equate technical accomplishment with patriarchy which conveniently allows mediocre art to seem quite important. Overall, the art in this book lacks guts, although some of it is good. Since it is no longer the only book of its type, get it only if you want to round off your collection. Otherwise, stick with the Phaidon Press book to which this one merely pales in comparrison
A FRAUD, A CON MAN, A SOCIOPATH. GIVEN KERIK'S REPORTED MOB TIES, AMORALITY AND CASHING IN ON THE 9/11 TRAGEDY, IT'S NO SURPRISE TO READ THIS CON JOB PIECE OF FICTION. HIS GHOSTWRITER IS PROBABLY A FICTION WRITER BECAUSE ALTHOUGH IT IS WELL WRITTEN, THE STORY IS A FRAUD. WHAT REALLY HAPPENED IN SAUDI ARABIA? HE STALKED AND TERRORIZED WOMEN ACCORDING TO THE WASHINGTON POST. WHY DIDN'T MR. LAW ENFORCEMENT WHO CLAIMED TO BE SO HIGHLY SKILLED THAT HE COULD TRACK DOWN THE BIGGEST DRUG LORDS IN THE WORLD...TRACK DOWN HIS OWN INFANT DAUGHTER --THE ONE HE ABANDONED? HOW ABOUT THE TRUTH? HE IS A CON MAN, ABANDONED HIS OWN CHILD, IS EGOMANIACAL AND IS NOTHING MORE THAN A THUG. HE WRITES ABOUT SOME TEACHER IN SCHOOL WHO TOLD HIM HE WOULD NEVER AMOUNT TO ANYTHING. GUESS WHAT? HE WAS RIGHT. BERNARD KERIK IS JUST WHAT THAT TEACHER SAID HE'D BE. A BIG ZERO
Not a useful book for learning and reference. This is not the kind of book that you want to keep on your bookshelf for future reference. It comes with relatively poor index, examples, and structure. It's always hard to find useful information from this book when you want to find something for reference. I'll go for other Verilog books
Did you all actually read it?. First off, I am an avid reader and love a long challenging read, however, this novel is one of the worst I have ever read! It is long, boring and has absolutely no plot. I purchased it when it first came out without reading any reviews. Although from the looks of most of them here, I personally suspect that many of those who raved, never actually read the book
MEDIOCRE. I read this book, it was okay but the story flashed back to much, and I couldn't folow all of it but I read all of it anyway. I wouldn't recommend it. TOO SLOW MOVING, and BORING because of the flashbacks. The movie was the same way
Is he kidding?. I'm hoping that most of the people who wrote these reviews didn't actually stoop so low as to buy the book.  I read a few pages of it, and this is truly 7th-8th grade level writing.I didn't realize that Bill's narcissism extended to the point at which he actually thought his writing was INTERESTING, rather than just blatantly one-sided and sickeningly arrogant.  Bill should stick to repetitive, "I know better," conservative babble - it gives us liberals/radicals/freethinkers something to make fun of
Worst Purchase on Amazon Ever. DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT UNLESS YOU ARE A NASA COMPUTER PROGRAMER!!  I'm pretty computer savy but could never make this work.
New Age Mitford Book. If you want a Jan Karon Book with adultery, gays, and  anti Christian values,  read this series! Jan Medlicott has "modernized" the Mitford series-but included "familiar things" such as a sweet red haired boy character and drawn sketches of the town of Covington for examples-right out of Mitford-- there are so many similarities that I wonder how she "got away with it"!  Come back Jan Karon
More a Mystery than a Comedy. This is a rudderless work.  For the life of me, I can't figure out why it's so often performed.  It's as if the work were written on commission. Every single act bears the mark of duty.James Yanni comes close below when he remarks that "there is little to recommend this play that wouldn't likewise recommend almost any of Shakespeare's comedies."  I think the problem, more precisely, is that the devices used to such wonderful effect in Shakespeare's other comedies -- shipwrecks, twins, transvestitism -- are deployed here to no effect at all.  There is not a single sympathetic character in this play.  Everyone is obsessed with either booze or money.  The fool is more annoying than amusing.  The rushed, climactic scene in which Orsino, having pined for Olivia for five acts, turns his love abruptly to Viola (whom he has never seen outside her male disguise) speaks to how urgently Shakespeare must have wanted to put the finish on this awful mess and bring down the curtain.For a taste of Shakespeare's comedic power, read -- well, read any other comedy he wrote
too much fat. This book has some good information but you have to wade through the fat to get at it.  It may be written mainly for aspiring college students, but I feel it is not complete enough or deep enough for parents.  There are many other better books out there on the subject (notably Fiancial Aid for Dummies and Discounts and Deals at the Nations best 360 colleges)
Cookbook to fancy. I enjoy food but most of the recipes in this book are things I wouldn't eat in the first place
science-lovers only.... ugh.  as a confessed bibliophile, i honestly try to give every single book its due.  but this one was impossible...poetic, but impossible.  barrett attempts to weave these stories about antiquated botanists into one connective tissue but it is too far a stretch.  unless you eat, breath and sleep xylem and phloem, don't waste time trying to pad through this book
You can't judge a book by it's cover or title. It just goes to show, you can't judge a book by its cover, or it's title for that matter. This book is just awful. Awful. Bukowski wasn't a Beat, he didn't hang with the Beats and he had nothing in common with the Beats. This book struggles through it's 255 "pages" attempting to find any connection, regardless how tenuous, linking Buk to the Beats. It is like saying "Lawrence Welk and the Beatles". They only thing they have in common is that they lived at the same time and made music: Buk lived at the same time as the Beats and they both wrote. There are two separate stories going on here: one about the life of Bukowski and the other is a history of the Beat movement and there is no coherent thought connecting the two. The book is heavily referenced and quoted with a complete lack of original thought. It is so flimsy that the author had to include a 61 page interview with Bukowski and a 61 page notes section just to get the book to a reasonable page length. The interview is also terrible, after reading it one has to ask 'Is Ham on Rye the only book by Buk that Duval ever read?' The actual discussion of Bukowski and the Beats is limited to a weak 118 pages. The whole thing reads like a bad high school term paper. Save your time and your money, skip this one. Go watch grass grow, it would be more interesting
Waste of time and money. This book is by far the worst book I have ever read.
laughable. This book will tell you nothing about &quot;history&quot;. It reads more like a novel and uses a series of literary devices which do violence to the material it deals with. Human history is not a story - why should it be, it doesn't have an &quot;author&quot;. Real rubbish
sub-standard. I refuse to believe that some apprentice intern ghost writer didn't really write this.  I will try to describe him or her.  Definitely a vegetarian - possibly a member of PETA.  Dry writing style (well, Crighton is dry even when he's excellent).  It bothers me how many unrealistic characters Crichton uses - it seems every character in some of these books earned a PhD from MIT by 16, was an alternate on the olympic swim team, a top researcher, an accomplished pilot, beautiful or handsome, and wealthy.  These people do not exist in nature.  They also have an annoying habit of speaking in complete, complex sentences, quoting research in casual conversation.  But at least MC has a gift for crafting believable, plausible sci-fi - much like Isaac Asimov.  But this is so beneath him, I refuse to accept it
Ridiculous. While I think Laura Albert writes beautifully in her next published work The Heart is Deceitful Above All Things, Sarah is very poorly written.  Anyone who has ever even visited the South should know that this is the product of an imagination scarred by Beverly Hillbilly's reruns and repeat viewings of Deliverance.
Readalbe but junky. Timeline is equivalent to a 99 cent taco. It's an indulgent bit of junk food.Timeline starts with a Hillerman-esque scientist turning up in the middle of New Mexico - an intriguing idea, but goes to the land of mediocracy right after that filled with cartoon characters.There are so many preposterous story elements that it's just really difficult to take seriously. The story is ever-predictable and ludicrous.But, a 99 cent taco is worth the effort if you're real hungry.Go back and read Andromeda Strain.
A mishmash of proven lies and half truths. I read this book years ago when it was first published.  Mr. Sick allowed himself to be taken in by a collection of Iranian liars as well as some phonies claiming to have experience in intelligence.  Some of the people Sick listened to were shown in the Iran-Contra hearings to be con artists who also took in Ollie North and Bill Casey.  These con artists are experts at saying what the listener wants to hear.  One guy claimed to have been in Special Forces and was an eyewitness to one of VP-candidate Bush's flights to meet with Iranians.  It turns out that he was not in Special Forces at all and he had been dishonorably discharged from the US Army.  In addition, he could not have been an eyewitness to the event he claims to have seen because he was in jail at the time.  The phony intelligence specialists have also been proven to be liars with no experience in intelligence or anything resembling national security work.  By the time I finished this book, I actually felt sorry for Sick because he had allowed himself to be taken in by these jokers.  He clearly wanted to believe that what he was being told was true.This book does not prove anything except that even an experienced researcher can be fooled if he really wants to believe.  Subsequent investigations by a Democratically dominated Congress proved that there was no October surprise
Neopaganism Nonsense. This book is anything but a source of information on REAL magick....Bonewits (whose name is appropriate)....claims to be a Druid AND a Wiccan....Although wicca has taken a lot from druidism, They are not the same... and you can`t be both. Mr. Bonewits is nothing more than a hippie/ yuppie environmentalist...ie, a college puke, who, like nicholls, and gar gomm, invented Neo-paganism as a new movement just to put themselves at the forefront of it....If you go to this mans website, you will see that he will do, or say, or SELL anything to make a buck. Beware!True druids will know this to be true
it would be a waste of fire to burn this book... reads like it was written by an elementary schooler during recess and stereotypes every culture/character it tries to relate to the reader.  insulting to the intelligence of its audience. possibly the most laughable piece of garbage ever put into hard cover.
I felt that this book did not provide enough resources. This book did not offer enough resouces for parents.  It was also pessimistic in terms of the outcome for dyslexics.  It was very helpful in terms of identifying characteristics that are not often associated with  dyslexia,yet it still appeared to be very general in catergorizing these  characteristics.  One of the methods for teaching reading skills, however  was very helpful but other methods should have been given as well
Nothing too inspiring. I was disappointed with this purchase. The cover is so cute, but the only design that is really interesting is the pink and green hat with the pom poms. That just isn't enough to warrant buying the whole book
Light overview. There's a lot of fluff and useless opinions littered through out the book. Some references to researched material were made but the author didn't expand on them too much. For a person who had never done any reading on this subject matter will find this very easy to read and will have a general understand of what book they should buy next :). For the rest of us that demand more, this book doesn't cut it
this book sucks. who is the reader that gave this book 5 stars? this booklet is a bunch of rambling from a guy who knows nothing of the medical billing industry. his computer illiteracy is apparent from his writing, but i don't think he knows it. he suggests backing up your hard drive with 100MP disks. what is MP? he gives advice on how to "sound" professional in order to impress health professionals. I am a health professional and I would laugh in your face if you came to an interview telling me that junk. he claims to have a formula for success: make 2 cold calls a week, send out literature 5 times a week. that's all it takes to be successful in this field! NOT.  He also devotes 3 chapters on insurance, no not health insurance, but insurance to cover your computer in case it gets hit by lightning, like his did. three chapters for something that should take one sentence. this book is a total JOKE. i wasted $3 plus shipping, plus time spent scanning the pages. I ordered his full sized book on medical billing but decided to cancel once I sampled his writing style in this booklet. total garbage, which is where I tossed this booklet after reading it
BORING. We read this book in ILA and it was so boring! The character had no emotions and it was very slow moving with no excitement. I almost fell asleep. DON'T READ THIS BOO
Christian fundamentalism dramatized. Even the avid "trekie" reader of the Star Trek science fiction novels, movies and television series must suspend disbelief, when he finds Captain Kirk saying "Beam me up, Scotty."  But the biblical literalist reading this book need make no such effort, when he reads in this book that Jesus will effectively beam millions of true Christians up to heaven in the world-wide "Rapture."  Though the characters and their roles are fictitious, the book specifically references the relevant biblical passages for the believer.The story line opens with the chaotic moment of discovery after the historic mass Rapture event, and the remainder is a moral melodrama concluding with emotional born-again conversions.In the September/October 2006 issue of Foreign Affairs Walt Mead writes that fundamentalists are not hospitable to the idea of gradual progress toward a secular utopia driven by technological advances and the cooperation of intelligent people of all religious traditions.Instead fundamentalists separate themselves from the world and have a premillennial pessimism about prospects for social reform.  Billy Graham's biography by Strober notes that they criticized Graham's "new evangelism" for its inclusiveness and for its involvement in addressing social problems. Yet their separatism does not preclude proselytizing as portrayed in these novels by the "Tribulation Force" or as exemplified by Jerry Falwell's Moral Majority.They are also committed to an apocalyptic vision of the end of the world and are hostile to international institutions such as the United Nations. Mead notes that it is no coincidence that the Left Behind novels show the Antichrist rising to power as the secretary-general of the United Nations.The U.S. Statistical Abstract reports that the per capita numbers of fundamentalists are growing exponentially, while evangelicals and liberals - e.g. Southern Baptists, Lutherans, Presbyterians, Methodists - and Catholics are continuing their per capita declines.  Such data and the reported popularity of these Left Behind novels indicate fundamentalism's growing appeal in reaction to contemporary American society.I see the readers who seriously respond to this book as the "left behind" in the backwash of the tidal flows of cultural change in modern American society, and as conservative Christians who believe it is better to stay behind.  And in not just a few respects, they may be wise to do so.Thomas J. Hickey
Erroneous from the Very First Sentence. If the reader knew absolutely nothing about oil production and read this book, then he or she would believe his claim that global production of crude oil will decline permanently in the very near future.  Deffeyes takes his cue from price fluctuations, and I, knowing nothing about petroleum exploration and refining and hearing a lot about 'Peak Oil' (made popular by such conspiratorial tomes as The Grand Chessboard, The Party's Over and Crossing the Rubicon), keep hearing that little statistician's nagging voice in my head, saying:Could there be some other explanation for the price fluctuations?We have seen this sort of thing before, folks, and we have covered this terrain before.  Whether the subject is the population bomb or the direction of stock prices, the drama is always the same: someone, usually an academic, grabs the media spotlight with dire prognostications emanating from his high-tech crystal ball (typically some mathematical formula or computer model bearing the illusion of precision), and predicts doom on the horizon if we do not change course and adopt his (typically totalitarian) prescription for renewed prosperity.Unlike the endless parade of kooks past who have predicted The Demise of Civilization (or life as we know it), the author's  claim to fame is three-fold: first, he has worked in the oil industry, and had the good (?) sense to abandon it for academia just before the first oil shock (consider the historical performance of the global petroleum industry over the last four decades to see just how sensible that decision was); second, he is a geologist, and tries to impress (or rather, bore) us with an endless recitation of arcane technical information on oil exploration; and third, the coup de grace- he actually worked with the infamous M. King Hubbert.  All of these things are supposed to make his pitch both credible and ring true, and I guess for those who do not like to think too deeply about things,  his position really does overflow with truth and credibility.Since I (nor anyone else) can not check the data he used to generate the estimates sprinkled liberally throughout the book for their truthfullness, that alone sends up red flags in my mind.  These estimates form the basis for his dire conclusions, and the admittedly amateur scientist and statistician in me says that if those estimates are flawed, then so too are the conclusions flowing from them.In reading this text, and others like it, I am constantly nagged by the following questions:Did Hubbert predict that all oil production would decline, or did he really say something else?  Oddly enough, Mr. Hubbert is long dead, so much the (in)famous Malthus, we can not consult him to hear what he has to say about things.Could there be another explanation for the U.S. decline in oil production?  Could that explanation, in fact, have little or nothing to do with the amount of oil in the ground?Given that we have some idea of the situation with OPEC (and to some extent, the U.S.) with respect to production and consumption, what about the situation outside of these two regions- such as in the oceans or in the Arctic/Antartic?If the oil supply trend globally is on the decline, why in the hell are we seeing the trend for fuel economy standards in automobiles on the decline?Could there be some other explanation for the recent rising trend in oil prices- one having perhaps a little something to do with causes firmly rooted in a history of misguided economic and foreign policy?The author contends that poor countries will suffer the most under the scenario of world oil shortage because poor countries need energy to run the irrigation pumps necessary to produce food to feed themselves.  Granted, fuels from petroleum are one possible energy source, but there are others.  Ever hear of natural gas?  Since most of the poor countries also have abundant renewable resources (Brazil for example has both hydro and solar resources, as well as biomass) why not use this?I strongly suspect (but can not prove with any certainty) that pricing problems we see today may have something to do with the sort of oil that we could produce versus the kind of oil we would ideally like to use, which incidentally OPEC has a lock on.  I also suspect that maybe domestic oil production has declined not because of Hubbert's Peak but rather, much like the decline of US domestic forestry, it costs less to import the kind of crude we like than it would to produce it domestically.In sum, this book runs on par with other erroneous Apocalyptic tomes that depend on numerical tricks, intellectual sleights of hand, strangely hidden sources and data sets, illusions of precision and rigid certainty, such as those produced by Bjorn Lomborg, Lester Brown and Stephen Moore.  Readers looking for a bit more insight into the crude oil pricing problem, albeit in a historical context, would do well to consult Robert Stobaugh's and Daniel Yergin's eerily prophetic book Energy Future
Big Bummer. I cook healthy all the time and just got this book as a gift...I'm so unimpressed.  I'd seen Ellie's show on the Food Network a couple of times then stopped watching because the stuff she makes is still fattening if you're trying to stay in shape.  Sure it has healthy fats, blah, blah, but that doesn't keep you in shape.  I'd be a bit forgiving if the stuff actually tasted great, but it's mediocre at best.  The book is no different.  And she's not even fun to watch like Rachel or Giada.  I have a pile of healthy cookbooks and diet books this one is definitely my least favorite.
Amazing. So, Butch gets his own book.  The question is why?  This secondary character introduced in Dark Lover has appeared throughout this series  as a weak, pathetic drunk.  The meaning of V's vision and his destiny with the brotherhood is revealed here, but surely this could have been incorporated into one of the other brother's book.  I feel the author goes too far to justify or validate his story with the predictable storyline regarding Wrath's lineage.  Not to mention the uncomfortable relationship between V and Butch with Marissa caught somewhere in the middle.  I was unprepared by how bad this book really is.  Butch's story ends my interest in this series, but I must say I really wish this author success with her future books, because the first three books of this series were awesome
Borrow or check this one out from a library. I'll start by saying I know first hand that writing a novel is NOT easy...with that said, I didn't care to much for the author's style with this book...She chose to narrate through the voice of her main character, Ceazia but she often mixed that up by telling what the other characters where thinking and feeling...You can either tell it from one person's perspective or in order to incoporate everyone's thoughts and feelings, tell it from the outside as you the author being the main narrator...That was my biggest pet peeve with this novel...Another one was that certain instances and situations could have and should have been elaborated because after reading them I was like--HUH??? and because I read this one after Married to the Game, it's sequel--I know those situations were not spoke upon ever again.  I think she introduced too many characters and tried to juggle too many story lines...It could have been a better book if she either elaborated or eliminated certain aspects of the story...All in all, I give 2 stars for effort...
Good ideas, but fails to follow through. The book categorizes software testing for security defects into attacks on software dependencies, user interfaces, design and implementation. The book focuses on 19 attacks (one being "overflow input buffers"), which form the core of the book. Parts 2 and 3 of the book explain when and how to apply each attack and what faults they find. Part 4 takes a more hands-on look at how to perform the testing.In my opinion, the book is too dependent on the Holodeck 1.3 program provided on the CD. Rather than explaining security testing in a tool agnostic way, the book often simply explains how to use Holodeck to perform an attack. I use Linux and Holodeck is Windows only, so it was useless to me. Reviewer Yvonne Eu said the tool did not work in her test environment. Holodeck is currently maintained by Security Innovation who charge $1495 for a single user license, but they also offer a 30 day evaluation license. If the version on the CD does not work for you, these are your two options. The book is a lot less useful if Holodeck does not work for you, so bear this in mind.The focus on Holodeck also limits the scope of the book. The use of other types of tools such as web proxies, port scanners and tools to exercise user interfaces is not adequately covered.Finally, I was disappointed by chapter 6, which looks at security testing three applications: Windows Media Player 9.0, Mozilla 1.2.1 (for Windows), and OpenOffice 1.0.2 (for Linux). This is an ideal opportunity to dive down and show how security testing tools should be applied, common pitfalls, and hands-on techniques for finding security issues. Instead, the chapter only explains how attacks should be planned and goes no deeper.If you are new to security testing and want an overview of some common types of tests that should be run, this book will be useful. If you are interested in using Holodeck for your testing, this book will also be useful. If you do not fall into these categories, there are other books which are a better fit. If you want more detail, I recommend trying one of the Hacking Exposed series
As authentic as a daytime soap opera. I'd heard the buzz (both pro and con) and thought I'd take an independent read. I was dismayed with this book.James Frey has insulted anyone who has gone through a real experience with substance addiction by trivializing the truth of whatever experience he really had. One of the hardest things an addict has to grasp is the TRUTH so that he can take ownership of his actions and take the 12 steps or whatever is necessary to save his life and often the lives of loved ones tangled up in the mess with him. Lies are what enable "slips" and "enabling" and "denial" and those other catch words that describe continued misery and failure. Recovery is nearly impossible without honesty. So, can we look at this man's "memoir" and expect it to offer anything of value? It's poorly constructed, repetitive, and narcisitic. Even if Oprah hadn't exposed him, the writing takes the tone of "whoppers" like Frey's account of the drug house visit in which he "rescues" Lilly. Other reviewers and Smoking Gun have written about the fantastic episodes one by one, and I can't improve on that.Suffice to say this mockery of misery and hope is no more real than a daytime soap opera.  Story lines in a soap may look like real life to one who is isolated from real life, the same way A Million Little Pieces might look to someone who has not been touched by real addiction. A real addict with typical delusion could be misdirected from a true course of treatment with tragic result.I was left with the impression he thinks institutions and people who help others with substance recovery are pitifully misdirected or inept. Like a joke of some kind. I'm not laughing.
All's well that ends well. This is a novel in superlative style: 'heroic, magnanimous, exalted, brightly, caressingly, exquisite, fascinating, wonderful, sublime, radiant, delightful ...'It confronts and mingles very superficially two impoverished Europeans with members of a wealthy Boston bourgeoisie family in a play of misunderstood sentiments and love.There is absolutely not a shade of a discussion of the social/mental difference between Europe and the US at the end of the 19th century.This book doesn't 'say nothing' (Thomas Hardy, quoted in the introduction), but nearly nothing. It hardly surpasses the level of a three-penny stationary novel, compared with the works of a Dostoevsky or a Flaubert.It is terribly sentimental and the tears flow easily.Only for Henry James fans
Editorial Review. I was hoping to purchase an actually funny take on life and the crazy relationship between pets and their owners. All I bought was the comparability between terrible and horrible. Have we not seen this formula before in other strips? It tries to be cute, then it tries to be sarcastic, all to poor results. I have a cat but that does not make this lame strip likable. My cat has more personality than all the week characters portrade here. How about something original
Nothing new to offer...available freely on website. There are more than 140 popular chart pattern. I returned this book becuase whatever he mentioned is freely available on websites. I do not want to publicize any website. But do a search in Google for 'Stock Chart or Technical indicator' and you will get better explanation and tips than what is in this book.I can not believe people go to seminar to hear this guy. The GOLDEN RULE... If the system works then may be start a hedge fund.. If it does not then write a book...hold seminar...
Profoundly dishonest. The careful reader of the book's footnotes will notice that the author admits to concocting pivotal scenes for dramatic effect.  Such practices are worthy neither of history nor of journalism.  Moreover, early in the book the author spins out a series of speculations that somehow transform themselves into assertions of fact by the end of the book:  that the hero of the book radioed the first warning of the first Soviet atomic test, that he was ordered by CIA to remain where he was, that he was sent on a mission to Tibet rather than just tried to escape the Chinese communists.  The author also relies far too much on the reminiscences of family members far removed from the scene, who of course have an interest, perhaps subliminal, of sprucing up the story.  Finally, the author's animus toward CIA and his disagreement with US policy toward Tibet drives the narrative often in bizarre ways:  at one point, the hero, caught on the Tibetan plateau, is transformed and transported in time and space to Vietnam in the 1960s, only to betray that people, too!  This is a frustrating book.  The subject has yet to receive a fair, balanced, and well-researched treatment
Warning - Recipes Don't Compute. The book may be easy to read and a good overview of the ZONE diet plan, but...  the first recipe I've tried, vegetarian lasagna, turned out to be a disaster.  To begin with, the ingredient list is faulty.  It calls for 3 tablespoons of Italian seasoning, but in the procedure, you only use 3  teaspoons.  It then tells you to blend the cottage cheese until smooth -  what cottage cheese - it was never on the ingredient list?   Finally,  right when you now know something is definetly off with the recipe and your  assembling the noodles, etc. - IT DOESN'T FIT IN THE PAN.  So much for  40/30/30 for tonight's dinner and the two hours in the kitchen.  The recipe  was a good idea and I'm interested in a solution if you ever read this Ms.  Gittleman
Keep your money honey. Big Boom said everything he had to say in the title of the book. The rest of the book looks good on the outside, but is very empty on new revelation. Poor editing, repeating statements, rambling on from tangent to tangent. Take your $23.00 and carry a little old lady to Starbucks, and get the same information, plus, you will be doing a good deed
Soul by Soul by Walter Johnson. The principle question that arises from a reading of &quot;Soul by Soul&quot; by Walter Johnson is why was this book written? It is touted as history, yet not only does it lack any original historical material, it  also lacks any discernable historical facts. Rather than history,  &quot;Soul by Soul&quot; seems to be a mean-spirited, emotional tract  designed to promote two fundamental ideas: 1. that white people living in  the antebellum South were universally loathsome, brutish and cruel and 2.  that black people living in the antebellum South were universally noble,  good and abused. To support his views, Professor Johnson strings together a  loose collection of repetitious snippets from antebellum abolitionist  literature and excerpts from gossipy litigation proceedings. His personal  contribution is represented by his miraculous ability to enter the psyche  of the book's long deceased characters and divine their true, but unspoken,  motives and thoughts. Quite a feat for any historian!      One loses count  of the number of times that the reader is treated to white people using  their &quot;probing fingers&quot; in this book. Fortunately, in between  probes, the reader can be shocked by the &quot;killing fields of the lower  South,&quot; the &quot;historical sexualization of black bodies,&quot; the  &quot;slaveholders' inevitable failure to live through the stolen bodies of  their slaves,&quot; and the &quot;brutish perogatives of whiteness.&quot;  This is heavy, hate-filled stuff worthy of a TV mini-series but it is out  of place in a supposedly serious history text.       I live in a former  slave quarter in New Orleans. In the antebellum period, this building and  its resident slaves were, interestingly enough, owned by a free black who  was financially ruined in 1863 by the Emancipation Proclamation. As an  amateur historian, I would have thought that a book about the New Orleans  slave market would contain some pertinent historical facts about these  markets. What were their addresses? What percentage of their customers were  black? What percentage were white? How many slaves did the typical New  Orleans household have? How were they fed and clothed? What were their  working hours? These are basic questions that should have been addressed  but instead, the reader is given an emotionally charged, repetitious,  boring rehash of tired, previously published material. In short, this book,  for the most part, reads like a rambling, overly long sermon. Anyone  seeking serious scholarship on the subject of slavery would do well to look  elsewhere and should consider reading the &quot;Slave Narratives&quot;  compiled by the Federal Writers Project, &quot;Time on the Cross&quot; by  Robert Fogel and Stanley Engerman and &quot;The Slave Trade&quot; by Hugh  Thomas. The first of these is a collection of interviews of former slaves  performed by the W.P.A. in the 1930's. The latter two works contain  original historical research and both deal with the facts of slavery, not  the emotions
Nudge, Nudge, Wink, Wink: David Laskin Among the Intellos. David Laskin's journalistic and scatter-shot approach to this group of significant American intellectuals is disappointing.  The emphasis is on anecdotes rather than motives, psychology, ideas, or works created.  The book is lightly documented, and if you already know anything about the  individual writers or the movements they were part of, you'll look in vain  for new insights.  It's certainly readable, but because it treats the  subjects with so little context, the reader wonders after a bit why one  should care about these folk, who sound more like a bunch  of dysfunctional  celebrities of the nineties than the  defining minds of  a complex and  fascinating historical era
Some cowardly Editor who said, "Hey...looks fine like it is!. Before all the Graham Hancock fans out there get twerked off at me for the low  2 star rating on this book...hear me out.Go back and read my 5 star Fingerprints of the Gods review and you will see that I consider Hancock a genius of sorts.The man is brilliant.....too brilliant. But in Fingerprints Graham clearly latches on to Einstiens theory of Earth Crust Displacement as researched by Charles Hapgood. but in Underworld  that seems blown by the wayside. His work here and his conclusions seems like a book that someone who is writing a version of history that relegates Fingerprints to the sidelines would write; only problem is...both books were written by the same man.There is a really fascinating book within the pages of this mass patience warping accumulation of information.Hancock just over did it this time.Here is what I mean: In Fingerprints of the Gods you can do a neat trick...just pick up the book and open it to any section on any page and you can start reading and be totally fascinated by the subject.Fingerprints  is that good. Almost every sentence is riveting!!!Underworld is at times as boring as a government information manual.Huge sections of information about Hindu gods blah...blah...blah...TOO MUCH Graham....There are sections of Underworld (if you are willing to look for them) that are just mind boggling in what they present and propose...but you will have to approach the book as if it were a raw manuscript and you were a tireless editor.Perhaps Hancock is a big and powerful man in publishing now and no one is willing stop and say...."Hey Graham lets just put half of this in the woodstove and heat the house for a few days!"Hancock is one smart puppy...no doubt...and I suppose there is no crime in going through life knowing more than you need to...but there is something that seems vaguely sadistic about making folks listen to everything you know or can find out about.In Fingerprints, Hancock seems at times impatient and indignant with the arrogance of the establishment and their often ludicrous assumptions and declarations.Yet in Underworld, there is a definite and distasteful undercurrent of Hancock's own arrogance....a side of him that is not complimentary to the theories and information he is trying to present.Drunks babble on in this manner a lot, and intellectual drunks are the worse...but if Hancock was sober when he handed this megalithic manuscript in....then perhaps it was some cowardly Editor who in a drunken stupor said, "Hey....looks fine like it is!
Why did I waste my time?. I've stayed away from this series for a few years but chanced on the Blow Fly and thought I'd give it another chance.  Why ever did I even attempt it?  I've missed a few in the series, having given them up a few years ago, but nothing has changed.  Apparently Kay S is as misunderstood but perfect as ever.  How a totally self-centered and egotistical character could gain a following is beyond me.Her fan club of dysfunctional people continues to swarm round.  Every one of the characters in the book is as demented as the criminals in the story.  And almost nothing happens in the book except her niece becomes a cold-blooded murderer but no one seems to think this an inappropriate way to act.I'm now hoping Kay goes on the hunt for a terrorist and all her friends and associates somehow are blown to bits as a final installment.  I could go on with the many reasons why this book was such a waste, but the book simply doesn't deserve that kind of time
Bad Editing, Alot of Errors. This books is fraught with errors that will drive you crazy if you're trying to learn Flash for the first time. It's a great example of what happens when a book needs to get to press before it's been thoroughly edited. I'm actually on Amazon.com to get another Flash 5 tutorial book to replace this monument to bad editing. In a word... don't waste your money. :
got insomnia?. this is an interesting subject but it is way out-weighed by the turgid writing
Maybe later. Snapped this up from bargain books, after reading all the good reviews. I found it boring and trite from the start and then it got worse. After 70 pages I gave up on it. Maybe later
"The Glorious Cause" is glorious. This is one of the best books I have ever read on the Revolutionary War.  Even though it is technically classified as a novel, it is accurately presented history. Mr. Shaara obviously did a lot of research for this book, and presented the historical events accurately, as well as presenting dialogue in such a way that it was totally believable.  The main participants in the Revolutionary War were presented not as gods, but as truly great and courageous men and women.  He also presented the details of battles, troop movements, condition of troops, and maps of battle locations in such a way that the reader is completely captivated and a vicarious participant in the events.  I have a better understanding of the Revolutionary War years than I have ever had, and would highly recommend this book to every American who would like to have a better understanding of the founding of our wonderful country.
Over Rated, Unussually Boring. Some books, in my opinion, are just plain overrated.  The characters in this novel are dull and uninteresting.  Likewise the tale.  The reader takes nothing from it. Put this in a list with Franzen's The Corrections and Frazier's Cold Mountain of award winning novels that did not deserve the accolades
Is Hillary Clinton a lesbian?  Who Freaking Cares. I rarely ever fail to complete a book I've paid for but after about sixty pages of Edward Klein's docudrama I don't know if I'll be finishing.  Instead of a historical summary about Hillary Clinton's life and policies, Klein elected to open with a series of tenuously credible accounts from interns who witnessed marital strife between her and Bill, accusations that she's a secret lesbian and obvious observations such as criticism of her seemingly inborn political nature. I didn't see the makings of any ruminations on the real reasons to question the merits of Mrs. Clinton's candidacy (i.e blatant nepotism in federal government, her relative lack of charisma to inspire the masses,  the failure of the first Clinton administration in response to the USS Cole bombing etc.)Instead Klein seems content, at least in intoductary chapters, to make glib carpet muncher referances about Mrs. Clinton his thesis for why she would make a bad president.  The minimum price of this book is skyrocketing upwards of twenty dollars.  If you don't like money then buy it.
Worst Leonard I've read. This novel comes off like a high schooler wanting to write about the movie and music industries.  In between the entertainment biz cliches, the author can only think to put various assination hits.  some of the characters are interesting but not believable, and they  certainly can't make up for the braindead plot.  Read some of his other novels and skip this one
I was disappointed. I had not read Ted Dekker until I read his collaboration with Frank Peretti with the recent "House".  I really liked that book so I was looking forward to reading more by Dekker.  Unfortunately this was the one I read next and I was very disappointed.  It was hokey.  I'm hoping that some of his others are better
Don't waste your money. The more I read of this book, the more it seemed like a little mind-trip of self-indulgence for the author.  It's very difficult to take this book seriously when observing some of the comments the author makes.  For each book he rated there was a section called &quot;What I liked about this book,&quot; and more than once his only comment in this section was, &quot;everything.&quot;  While it's nice to see that he's truely writing about something he enjoys, maybe the author should stick to something more modest, such as a column in the local paper, rather than such an ambitious undertaking as this.  While not truely awful, the ambiguous format makes it painful reading
Not as good as it could have been. It starts out like Laura Bush's Rules for Driving, but skydives after the opening pages, in which the then 17-year-old Laura kills a young man with her car, who just coincidentally happens to be her boyfriend!My interest in the book sharply dove after that, as it appears that coincidental killing is the most appealing thing about Laura Bush
A Christian Copper Guide to Paganism. A Christian book for Christian police that encourages the police to seek out evil "occultists" and arrest them. Note how the system does not have a guide book on investigating Christian and Jewish groups. The Christian coppers only have a guide book for Pagan religions. The sooner America falls the sooner we will have freedom.In Odin's name, Wyatt Kaldenberg
Invented History. Although it is true that peoples had contacts through trade, and therefore the sharing of ideas, however megalithic structures on Malta most likely are not connected to the British Isles and vice versa(http://sociologyesoscience.com/index.html).  Instead Christopher Knight and Alan Butler create a new myth: "Like the British Isles and Brittany, Malta and Israel have Megalithic structures scattered across them and the Old Testament gives detailed evidence of how the Canaanite rituals were adopted for king-making. The memory of these prehistoric secrets was transmitted by the remnants of the Order of the Knights Templar who took their rituals to Scotland at the beginning of the 14th century.
iTrash. All things considered, I must say this is one of the poorer hard-cover book I have ever read, from the standpoints of intellectual content, style, and (mis)use of the English language. I have seen some lesser books in paperback, but only a very few.  Wozniak comes through as an absurd human being, uncultured and obsessed with his trivial self. The whole busines is trash
Stick to Romance, Sparky. Sparks must have had a momentary lapse of reason when he decided to take a stab at suspense by writing The Guardian. This book is awful. The storyline is weak and predictable, the dialogue is excruciatingly lame, and the characters are poorly developed and lack depth and chemistry. There is virtually no romance, which is the reason to read Sparks' books. I can't tell you how many times I rolled my eyes at the stupid things people said, the way the dog seems to be human, and the predictability of the plot. This book is so poorly written and so lame I have trouble believing Sparks wrote it. If you want a good plot with romance mixed in, read Message in a Bottle or A Walk to Remember. If you want suspense, read Mary Higgins Clark or Agatha Christie; they do a far better job with it than Sparks does.
Implausible thriller with a twist that just doesn't  work. Having a novel's narrator turn out to be the killer is a fairly common staple in the mystery and suspense genre.  When this plot device is done well, the reader is pleasantly shocked by the twist, not left wondering what the hell happened.  When the twist works best, the author hasn't actually lied to the reader, but carefully choosen his or her words to create false assumptions.  When the twist comes, the reader experiences a `light bulb moment', realizing they were duped, but that they should have seen it coming.In Beach Road the ending doesn't make much sense, and the reader ends up feeling betrayed when the twist is revealed.Beach Road features multiple first person narratives and includes a preface that warns the reader that some narrators may be lying.  My question to Mr. Patterson is:  If one of the characters lies to the reader for the first  of the novel, why do they start telling the truth near the end?  Why not lie all the way through(or tell the truth right from the beginning)?  I think it would have been much more interesting if the character's lies were exposed, not by their own confession, but through the observations of other characters.Of course the unlikely twist is only one of the problems with this novel.   My other major gripe is that so much of it doesn't make sense.  For example, the elusive and ruthless drug dealer known only as Loco turns out to be a character that everyone in town knows.  Somehow Loco and the killer maintain a drug dealing operation in a small community without anyone knowing.  This is ridiculous.  Drug dealers need to be known and they need to be easy to find.  How else do people buy drugs from them?  It's ridiculous to think that they could become major drug dealers in this small community without anyone knowing, even with silly nicknames.Second case in point: the killer dispatches a number of people with ruthless efficiency by putting bullets through their brains, yet inexplicably tries to kill the only person who knows their secret by shooting them at close range in the abdomen. They don't notice the absence of blood, and don't check to make sure the shot was fatal.  It doesn't make sense.Patterson churns out novels faster than Nora Roberts these days and apparently isn't worried about quality.  Beach Road is fast paced but the gaps in logic and far fetched ending make this a Patterson novel to avoid.
Not sure what he's trying for. If you read this book looking for ways that your product, company, or whatever could be marketed for wild success then you will be disappointed with Tipping Point.  Gladwell has some interesting anecdotal stories about a few products that he hammers on but it wasn't at all obvious how these unique tales could ever be duplicated.  He builds up a theory of things needing to be Sticky, which is fine, but that was the closest i felt he had to a generalized theory.  Anyway, the stories of the businesses he covers are intersting and he's a good writer so you are likely to enjoy the read none-the-less
Wish I had not Bought It. Great concept; timely topic; wrong author.  She is whiny thoughout the book.  She buys an elephant lawn ornament but only pays $0.25 to go the art museum?  This book needs to be written by someone else and then she needs to read it
Meticulously researched, but... Meticulously researched, but dry as an official communique from the Foreign Office itself.  There's a great story within the panoply of names and facts here, but Dorril wastes no time with a striking narrative.  An unfortunate loss
Leonard, how could you?. I can't believe Leonard Maltin would put his name on this compilation of  misinformation. He must be spreading himself too thin and hiring interns to  do his writing. This book is so full of wrong dates, films, facts--I hope  if he comes out with a second edition, Maltin hires someone to go over it  with a fine-toothed comb and make corrections. I expected better of him
Does Not Live Up to Its Potential. An important note on what is graphic in this novel and what is not: obviously, the account of Runyon setting himself on fire on pages 16-17 is harrowing and disturbing, but not really graphic or gory.  There are several references to erections, some using slang, some not. I think those were relatively tame and mature.   What is graphic and disturbing is the account of Runyon and his father brutal killing of a wild possum for no reason whatsoever.As an English language arts teacher, I have read a lot of press about this book. Looking back, I wonder if people who reviewed this book actually read it. Why? While it is very easy to sympathize with the author, this is a memoir that falls flat of any expectations, even the lowest.  Having written that, it should be noted here that one of my eighth grade students really liked this book.Brent Runyon is an eighth grader when we he soaks his bathrobe with gasoline, climbs into the bath tub, and strikes the match that will leave 85% of his body covered in burns.  Thankfully, Brent manages to turn the shower on and douse the flames. Then he summons his older brother Craig who calls 911 and saves Brent's life.  His subsequent recovery comprises the entirety of the narrative.Unfortunately, this story is excruciatingly flat and extremely superficial.  Runyon recounts his recovery in hospitals and rehabs by recounting endless inconsequential details about his surroundings and caregivers.  This in itself is not bad.  In fact, I expected it as diversion from dealing with the root problem that lead to his suicide attempt, depression.  However, as the narrative progresses, so do these details.  Not until a very short epilogue does Runyon address the issue of depression and only in a superficial manner.As I read this book, I kept waiting for insight into something, anything, in fact.  But Runyon avoids issues like teenage suicide, self-esteem, disfigurement, and regretfully, depression.  Nobody in the story is redeemed.  No one transcends anything.  The experience of attempting suicide isn't used to gain insight or help other people prevent suicide or treat depression.  Runyon's character develops into a spoiled brat, enjoying the attention of everyone but resisting the attempts to help him unless attractive female nurses provide it. By the last third of the book, I was very bored with Runyon's pity party, but read faithfully until the end anyway.  I began the book rooting for the memoirist but by the end, I found him to be an unsympathetic character.Now that fifteen years have passed since he attempted suicide, I hope Runyon and his publishers will consider another edition of this book.  In it, they can probe more deeply into what has the potential to be a compelling and redemptive story
Good Fireplace Book. This is a great book to read by the fireplace. After about thirty pages you can conveniently toss it IN the fireplace! This is the most boring, disorganized, pointless book I have ever read. I read it because it was recommended by Stephen King. If you want a good book, I would recommend looking elsewhere
My first review. This is my first review for Amazon.  I write this so that some reader can avoid the pain I suffered.  The book was the worst mystery I have ever read.  Wild plot twists have been mentioned by others, nonsensical plot twists are a better description. I found none of the book to be believable and must admit the the only reason I finished to the book was to see if the final half was worse than the first half.  This book was factually wrong in so many ways. Here are a few; 1) The prices listed were off. 2)College professors held office hours late on Friday afternoons. 3) Someone was paid with $1000 dollar bills.I will give away one plot twist.  Someone has been stealing rare books for months.  Someone is given a contract to kill a girl two weeks before the first attempt is made to kill the girl who happens to be reading the rare book.  The brillant detectives assume the book thefts are to a smart way to cover up the murder.  I would have found the book less offensive if the plot twist was that young aliens were playing with their parents' time machine and that the aliens had given the murder contract in order to prevent their parents' from discovering the youthful indecretion
A FAIRY TALE FOR ADOLESCENTS. I am a huge Berg fan, but this book did not cut it with me. The main character, Patty, is approaching mid-life and desperately wants a child.  Ethan was her first love and continues to be "the love of her life."  He also loves Patty dearly, so what is the problem?  Ethan is gay and his love for Patty is that of a cherised, long-time friend; they feel comfortable together. Patty asks Ethan to impregnate her so they can raise a child but, of course, marriage is out of the question.  We are not talking in-vitro fertilization here or anything that might be plausible, but a pregnancy developed by a good old-fashioned "romp in the hay"...or in the case, the bed!  Patty gets her wish, she has a baby girl.  In the end, Ethan also gets his wish, he finds "the love of his life" in another man.  As for the baby, well, we can only hope everything worked out well for her, too, but we will never know because that is where the story ended.The problem with the book has nothing to do with sexual orientation but the fact the plot and events were just too inconceivably far-fetched.  For the past 20 years, two of my very best friends (men) have been in a committed gay relationship.  They are literary scholars and avid readers.  When I ran the scenario of this book by them to see what their reaction would be, they thought either the book was nuts, I was nuts for reading it...or possibly both. On top of that, the book has a juvenile writing style that makes one wonder where Berg's thought process was when she wrote it.  Like Picasso, she must have been going through her "blue period!"  Ms. Berg, you missed the mark on this one
Disapointing. If you are going to get a book to help you restore your Ducati twin,you better pass on this one and get a good shop manual .There is litle material of use and the content is mostly a repeat of is other Ducati books .You would expect a step by step knowhow aproach with usefull imputs like the Dave Richardson Guzzilogy book for Moto-Guzzi .A good restoration book is  about guiding the reader with how to hints,tips and tricks  from pros that have done it many times .There are lots of photos that will show you a Ducati part with a typo description an no more ,like for example (this is what  a Ducati clutch looks like +PHOTO
It doesn't even deserve ONE star!. This was by far one of the worst books I've ever read. Who in the world dreams of becoming a hooker? And who in the world is a hooker while they are engaged to an amazing man, and continues being a call girl even after she gets married? This is one of those books, that as an author, has you fuming that it ever got published in the first place. Tracy Quan must be sleeping her way through agents and publishers, because this was the most stupidest story ever written
utter garbage. I didn't find this funny, satirical or humourous in any way. Poor drivel and a waste of time and brain matter
ok,.....but,.....not really impressed,... Hi,...Maybe its me,..but I was not as happy with this as I thought that I'd be,...I will keep trying to listen to the CD,...& read the book,...though,.just in case,.I haven't given it as fair of a reviewas I should have,...,...L
Uncle Isaac  Asimov Tells It As It Is. After the 1700s, this play fell into obscurity. It was later revived in the mid 1900s. Its period of obscurity does not surprise me. Believe me, I am a champion for Shakespeare's underrated "Timon of Athens" and "Coriolanus." I honestly TRIED to like this play, but I was forced to concur with the great Isaac Asimov who said: "Though it ends happily and is therefore technically a comedy, it lacks a carefree fun and happiness of the previous comedies. it is, indeed, rather an unpleasant play..." Well, onto the play. We meet the widowed Countess, her son Bertram, and the elder Lafew. We learn that the king is ill and quite possibly terminal. Possibly, Helena's father could have cured the king, but alas, he is dead. The Countess gives Bertram some advice that is not so far from the advice Polonius gave Ophelia. (Though the bumbling Polonius ends up being easier to like!) Helena loves Bertram, but feels beneath him and contemplates virginity. One comical moment is when Parolles reveals that in a way, virginity is a form of vain self love. Later, Helena cures the king, and Helena asks for Bertram as a husband. Now this is where I have a problem. Bertram is made out to be a villain. But how can we possibly not sympathize with him? Maybe Helena deserves something for saving the king, but does she really have the right to impose marriage on someone who doesn't like her? Well, Bertram is forced to go through with the marriage, but he quickly decides to help Florence against Siena. Poor Parolles who knows this forced marriage was unethical is constantly made a subject of ridicule in this play. This is where I have another problem. Rather than the clever misunderstandings of "The Comedy of Errors," the clever marital confrontations and errors in "Midsummer Night's Dream," or the comical and clever passages from Jaques in "As You Like It," the comedy in "All's Well That Ends Well" is reduced to the lowest possible form. (Flat out ridicule! It is interesting that in the word ridicule, we have the letters for cruel, but I am digressing.) In one decent elemenet of comedy, Bertram makes it clear that he would rather go to war than lie with his wife. (And perhaps in time, Bertram can appeal to the king to release him from this marriage. It wouldn't be unheard of.) One interesting thing is that Bertram remains honorable in the sense that he does not 'ravish' Helena. He doesn't love her, and therefore will not engage in sex. It is rather repulsive on his mother's part how she fails to understand the situation. Even if she was on Helena's side, she might AT LEAST understand Bertram's frustration in that he did not consent to the marriage. (And possibly try to at least talk things over in hopes of coming to a peaceful solution.) But no. She just rants and raves. Later the Countess reads a letter from Helena stating that she will leave so Bertram can come home from the war. This throws Bertram's mother into yet another rage on Helena's behalf, and perhaps moves the reader into sympathy with Helena. THAT IS, UNTIL OUR GOOD OLD UNCLE ISAAC ASIMOV points out the hypocrisy of Helena: "Helena is not quite as unselfish as she is presenting herself to be. She does not go to the shrine at all but sneaks off to Florence in disguise as a pilgrim hoping that she may yet return her reluctant husband." Well, onward. In Florence, Helena meets with Diana (whom Bertram loves). And Helena thinks she can trick Bertram into making her pregnant. We then have the cruel practical joke on Parolles where he is blindfolded and threatened to reveal military secrets (to friendly forces of course) or else. Perhaps even Shakespeare felt bad over this scene as he has Parolles say: "Who can not be crushed with a plot?" (4.3.340). We also see Bertram try to win the affections of Diana. Diana of course feels nothing for Bertram. But again, the hypocrisy of the play is prevalent. If we accept the fact that Bertram should respect Diana's wishes that she doesn't love him, how do we account for the fact that Helena imposed an unwanted marriage on Bertram? But of course Diana consents to meet Bertram and of course it will really be Helena who meets him. But even tricking Bertram into getting her pregnant is not enough. Helena decides to throw a sympathy party for herself by spreading the word of her death back home. Now in "Much Ado About Nothing," Hero had a valid excuse for staging her death. She was humiliated and disgraced in front of several people for something she was totally innocent of. But Helena was the one who imposed an unwanted marriage on Bertram, and she still wants a sympathy party. One redeeming element of the play is that Lafew shows some sympathy for the disgraced Parolles and offers him a job. And of course, in the end Bertram feels bad over Helena's staged death and is happy to see her alive again. Helena may very well be the Britney Spears of Shakespeare's characters.
Barely Relevant. Mr. Ferrazzi ignores the distinct advantage that he has had throughout his career: he is an Ivy-league grad.  While I found some of his insights to be helpful, he glosses over his educational background as though he presumes that all of his readers come from privileged upbringings.  While he attempts to diffuse his obvious advantages by opening with a discussion of his working-class roots, Mr. Ferrazzi loses steam on the very next page, writing about all of the the great schools he attended and the fact that he caddied at a country club. Caddying at a country club is not a degrading, confidence-busting job for a kid, working as a cashier at CVS is.  How does the CVS kid network his way out?In one point in the book, Mr. Ferrazzi creates a lot of build up about an event he attended and how much anxiety he felt.  The big denouement was that he had a connection through Yale.  This is not compelling.  I was expecting him to have had to actually overcome something.There are some good insights in the book, but few that I hadn't heard before.  I'm not sure that this book has shed any light on anything aside from the advantages of belonging to ivy-league networks
Perfectly Useless. This book deals with older Palm Operating Systems; so old in fact, that my year-old T5 was way beyond it. It has a copyright from about 2000. If this was in a real bookstore, I owuld have been able to see this fact and avoid this out-of-date product.Perhaps my worse Amazon experiece to date
Another piece of trash from fringe-left cooks... This is perhaps the most liberal textbook I have ever read in my entire life. The authors come across as subjective and emotional, espousing the evils of capitalism and taking responsibility for one's own actions.
Newberry Winner?. I am a retired teacher and work part-time in a school library.  I read the Newberry Winners each year.  For the second year in a row, I am disappointed in the choice!  Last year's "Kira-Kira" was a disappointment as is this year's "Criss-Cross." I'm not certain of the standards by which the books are chosen.  "Criss-Cross" remains a mystery to me because I see no outstanding literary value in the writing or the story itself.
Boring Disappointment. Don't waste your time with this one. It'll be a long while before I read another Patterson novel
You'll hate the characters!. This book did not live up to its hype. It tries to do for Guenevere what Mists of Avalon did for Morgan le Fey, but it fails sorely because the title character is an embittered shrew. The plot repeats itself endlessly over the course of three novels. Guenevere loves Arthur, she hates Arthur, she forgives Arthur, she loves Arthur again, no wait, she hates him.... Arthur, by the way, is a weak, feeble-minded, doddering simpleton. This is not the great king of Arthurian legend at all. Lancelot is still a tasty dish, but there is no apparent reason why he would love a bitter, jealous, middle-aged woman who repeatedly casts him away. Morgan le Fey starts out as a promising character, but becomes a demonic harpy-type creature. And the tone is excessively anti-Christian. I'm not a religious person at all, but even I was offended by the way Christians are depicted in this novel. It's just not a pleasant read. If you want a great trilogy told from Guenevere's point of view, read Persia Woolley's Guenevere trilogy or Nancy McKenzie's Queen of Camelot. They're well worth the time and effort
This book does not live up to its title of &quot;Making Sense&quot;. Walters becomes very wordy in her second chapter and continues throught the entire book this way.  She has several interesting chapters in which she gives critical interpretations of popular films and television shows,  however, they fail to make up for the dullness of the entire book.  She is  overly critical of previous methods of feminist criticism, while at the  same time almost cocky about her own superior viewpoint.  In the end, she  never actually has a viewpoint of her own, except that someone else should  pick up the ball and develop a new feminist methodology.  Her wordiness  seemed to be nothing more than a cover for a lack of original thought.   This book is definately not for the new student of feminism or for the  skeptic.  There are many other enlightening books on the subject.   Unfortunately this is not one of them and it would be terrible for the book  to turn off any more people to the subject as it did myself
Why rule of thumb in computer era?. As a desginer, I can not understand the meaning of this book.1.Take any scantling rule of classification societies and compare. Scantlings section of rulebook is much more thin, but provides more optoins and engineering basics for calculations of strength.2.What is the meaning of Gerr's own scantling rule, if You have to proceed design approval from classification society? You better use the rulebook of this society, aren't You?3.The book use several assumptions that I mind. For example, the recommendation to add some per cent of hull thickness for every knot over 10 knots is not reasonabe. The designer should deal with speed/length ratio to determine planning/non planning bottom loads.4.The book does not give any idea of hull loads. Overview of loads is desired as soon as he write about strength, something like provided in L.Larsson R.Eliasson "Principles of Yacht Design".But I really like other Gerr's books, indeed!Best regards,A.Nazarov, Naval Architect, Ph.D.
Please don't read this. What a terrible book. It's slow and mostly pointless at times. Think of all the excitement you have working in a cubical with situations much less funny than those you'd see in Office Space. That is the premise of this book. I went into this book thinking:1. This a great author!2. All the characters are about my age!3. I'd love to see what working in Microsoft was like when things were just starting to get huge!4. My friends and I are all computer nerds. This is EXACTLY what it are going to be like when I graduate college this year!I was wrong on all counts. There is nothing I, as a 21 year old tech-savvy, internatioanl business major, could relate to. It lacks an interesting plot. It lacks characters  the reader can enjoy. The only reason I'm giving it 2 stars is because of a few mildly interesting situations scattered few and far between in the book. Go. Read ANYTHING else
Entirely awful book. Great Expectations was perhaps one of the worst book ever written. I'm no Dickens' expert, but I do know a little about literature- I don't know how this even passed through the editing stage. It is slow-paced, boring, pointless, and an all-out waste of time to read. I have read challenging books with strong points like this before, and have sometimes enjoyed them,  but never have I read a book this pointless and difficult to read, with such a stupid ending.  DONT WASTE YOUR MONEY AND VALUABLE TIME ON IT!!!!!!
Wise Blood. I had to force myself to finish this book. After reading two-thirds I felt compelled to finish it simply in hopes of finding some redeeming value to the time I'd already invested.  Upon finishing the book (unlike the insightful and eloquent analysis by the Reader in New England) I shut the book and said, &quot;This is the stupidest book I have ever read!&quot;  After calming down a little I began to wonder if perhaps Wise Blood represented Flannery's life and emotions?  One has to imagine being stricken with a debilitating disease that eventually robbed her of life at a young age must have tortured her to some degree.  She must have wondered where is God in all this without being able to deny Him.  Could Hazel represent Flannery? A life of seeming despair, allowed to waist away slowly in a drainage ditch only to be finally found yet treated with complete disregard and with utter contempt by the police sent to rescue and redeem Haze (Flannery) by thumping him (her) on the head with a death blow without any apparent feelings.  Was Flannery making a statement about being treated thus by God?  Is it possible Flannery used Wise Blood as a cathartic for her own emotions towards God for the cards she'd been dealt?  I don't say that judgmentally in the least.  It just makes sense now that I am calm enough to think about it. I'm hardly qualified to dish out such psycho-babble.  Basically, I still agree with the New England reader in terms of regretting the read.  Perhaps this story will have more meaning should I face personal suffering and loss like Flannery.  Faith does not make one immune to the multi-levels of agony.  This story was agonizing
Well Researched, Poorly Written, Miserably Edited. In all my (very many) years of reading, I've never come upon so haphazardly edited a volume as this one.  It reads like the second draft of a manuscript that required four or five.  Large chunks of text reappear verbatim on later pages.  Sometimes it seems as though the publisher simply gathered up the author's notes on a work in progress and published them.The writing itself is ungrammatical, filled with constant misusage of the sort that should make any reader wince, and unendingly in need of the rewrites which, clearly, never came.  In sum, this book reads more like an average student's eighth grade test paper than a scholarly work.The author has also decided to include some short, odd, entirely fictional writings of his own on the subject.  These make an uncomfortable, indeed pointless, addition to what purports to be a carefully researched work.That having been said, there are indeed points of interest here.  In occasional, almost random, spots along the way, you'll find revelations and statements that indeed shed new light on the Fall River murders.  The book's also loaded with pictures and drawings--a good many of which I'd never seen before.In sum, this is a book which makes a good, though small, reference addition to the library of a serious Lizzie student.  But be prepared for a rough ride.  The writing and the editing are, throughout, in keeping with the title--amateurish and sorely lacking
Guess I'm Just Jaded. Maybe I've read too many of these serial killer fiction novels, but I have noticed that they're always disappointing:  He heard a doggie barking and wanted to ring its neck.  He saw the old lady coming and wanted to bludgeon her in the face with a rock.  Hee-hee, ho-ho, ha-ha, I have you tied up now, you 12 year-old Kimmie Gibbler ho, and I'll talk stupid to you because the author makes me until you actually die because it's better than my dialogue!I'm sick of every other current mystery I read being about serial killers, though it doesn't always imply the fact, and I hated the heroes, particularly stupid sunglass wearing Delilah.  I hated the cop and his horny brat, and I hated the girl the pervert killed too.  What was her name, Janey Kemp?:  "Like, ohmigawd, he's such a babe, and I am totally going home with him cuz I don't know his name.  I'm like, ohmigawd a rich, wild retard judge's daughter and am totally going to have an affair with the looozah, and get in trouble with bondage and dirty pictures.  I am so totally hot.  Hey, loser...hey, loser, you possessive, kinky freak.  Like, ohmigawd, don't go leaving me here when I'm so totally hot."  What's really sick is when he has the snotty little brat tied up with the radio on after six weeks of knowing him and she says, "His name is Valentino?"  Um, yeah.  I hated the girl and didn't feel sorry for her when he killed her.  In fact, the other characters only seemed to agree that she was a hot bee-otch.  Along with other characters that made me want to puke, this was a bad reproduction of the similar, yet far more superior, Ashes to Ashes by Tami Hoag.  Don't waste your time unless you also enjoy reruns of Cop Rock.  If this book were mine I'd have burnt it along with Mein Kompf.
Did a six year old write this?. This is the first Patterson novel I have ever read, and it is certain to be the last.  Most good authors draw the reader into a story by offering vivid descriptions and in-depth characters, but Patterson does none of that.  The author's writing style is akin to that of a small child's, as he uncermoniously plunks the reader in the middle of boring locales populated with one-dimensional characters.  Patterson then holds the reader's hand as he matter-of-factly recounts the explosion or gunshot du jour and then moves on without explanation, presenting a book written by a Ralph Wiggums-like child for immature children to enjoy.  How does the reader know Alex was scared? The reader knows because Patterson clumsily beats him about the head and shoulders with writing similar to the style: "The man pulled out a gun, Alex was scared, Alex shot the man and he was happy, and the man was dead."Don't believe me? Simply graze through the book and find where the hero handily dispatches an arch-nemesis in a scene so brief and without fanfare I had to read it twice to make sure the protagonist killed who I thought he killed, or skip to the end if you prefer and painstakingly wind your way through a series of forgettable characters each deadpanning that he or she is responsible for the antagonist's evil deeds.Quite simply, this author shows a complete lack of imagination and creativity and this book should be avoided at all costs
Health text?. A book of words and dubious references by &quot;experts&quot;.  I cannot find any important educational references in this book.  As an expert in the field of Natural Medicine this is one book I would NEVER use
No Student Solution Manual. As a student, how can I study without a solution manual? Is all Abstract Algebra classes this way? I have an awful time to study. I'm sorry
Ignore this turkey. Keegan started out years ago with a bang with The Face of Battle, in which the post-Vietnam and, for the UK, a post-Empire spirit made for a genuinely innovative military history.This early promise has NOT been fulfilled, and Keegan has declined considerably in quality because he's become co-opted by the Establishment, a post-Empire, Blair establishment every bit as corrupt as Haig.Keegan has never served in combat yet loftily recommended in the 1980s that the "tempo" of the next war (which as a Sandhurst insider he was probably planning) be increased to 24/7. In this, he gave NO consideration to the high levels of post-traumatic stress and the war crimes that have resulted from the US policy of "no sleep until Baghdad" in the second Iraq war.Keegan is post-Sixties, all right, but instead of peace and love, he's a Nietzchean who'd wage war with the poor man's body.His "war" is chateau generalship by the rich, actually fought, 24/7, by British working class lads, blackfellows from Britain's few remaining colonies, and of course Americans.Keegan popularized and made respectable for a new generation the old lie, subtly and over time, dulce et decorum. Precisely by foregrounding war's utter brutality he made it somehow acceptable and ONCE AGAIN a test of manhood, and this has gotten people killed.His book on Military Intelligence managed, idiotically, to dismiss MI as secondary and not critical precisely, almost to the day, when the American and British MI was declaring victory (remember Mission Accomplished?) and failing to see how disbanding the Iraqi army would create the insurgency.The Iraq War recounts the war as a board game with neither any anticipation of the postwar mess nor any compassion whatsoever for the men and women who fought it, or the Iraqis brutalized. At key points, it expresses a puzzlement about the failure of Iraqis to greet their "liberators" which shows a willful incomprehension of anything outside military science.Ignore all writings by John Keegan until he issues a public apology for the lives this twit has destroyed while sipping pink gin at Sandhurst. For a good history of the Iraq War cf. Thomas E. Ricks, THE IRAQ WAR
A hot book on tape in 2001 proves an embarassment for the authors in 2005. This book on tape was published early 2001 just in time for listeners to lose a ton in the 2001-2002 stock bust. Almost every investor lost money on stocks then, but a listener following the advice in this book on tape would have lost much more, with some tech stocks never recovering (because of bankruptcy).Some of the advice is quite good, but about 25% is downright wrong and dangerous. If you know enough to know which advice is good and which is bad, then you don't need this book.Perhaps something went wrong when abridging the longer written text to produce these audio tapes. In any event, if you still want to give it a shot, or if you just love the Motley Fool, then look for something by the Gardner brothers that's newer and/or not so abridged
This hurts me more than it hurts you. It breaks my heart to write a negative review of a Curious George book.  I love Curious George as much as anyone.  Even the original books don't quite stand the test of time.  After all, the man with the yellow hat basically kidnaps a young ape away from his mother.  An ape who is obviously quite an intelligent animal and capable of very complex emotions.  By the way, I know this is a weird beef, but please help me spread the word: Curious George is a Chimpanzee, thus an ape and not a monkey.  He is just as distantly related to monkeys (cousins about 20 million years removed) as you are.Anyway, the old books still capture the imagination, but what could they possibly be thinking with this new series.  I know it's a book for kids, but honestly, if a fifth grader wrote this book I would be embarrassed for them.  If the author is over the age of ten and spent anymore than an hour working on this book, then shame on them.  My three year-old put on a brave face, but I think even she was dismayed at the striking lack of nuance.Go buy the old ones, like when Curious George swallows the puzzle piece and has to go to Boston's Children's Hospital to get endoscoped
The Witch's Tongue. The Charlie Moon series is getting more amusing and more "spiritual", for lack of a better word, as it evolves. Certainly, Moon has become a more interesting character.  He was always more interesting than the earlier protaganist in the series Scott Parris. I enjoy the series but it is not my favorite reading. I find hiding of clues and information from the reader irritating.
I expected something workable. My expectation from the big book of sales games was to find an informative book that can provide creative ideas for making training more enjoyable. However, the content was very ordinary and nothing creative. Especially, ideas on objections was not applicable
British Sensibilities. Save your money.  Or, if you need to spend it, buy plain yogurt -- you will find the bland white stuff much more exciting than this novel. If you do buy this book, you will wade through pages and pages waiting for the story to get started and then you will not care about a single character you meet.  In the course of the book, there are love affairs, savage beatings, and a kidnapping or two, and all these incidents unfold without an ounce of passion, desire, or emotion.  Anna, the long suffering wife, is so strangled that she can't bring herself to demand a new washing machine.  She and her obtuse husband never talk to each other or to their children.  And we are supposed to care about the marriage of these two?  Buy yogurt
How Much Help Did Mr. Buffone Really Get?. Mr. Buffone criticizes parents who financially help their children but I wonder, did Mr. Buffone's parents pay for his high priced college degree?  Did they lend him money for his down payment on his first home purchase?  Always look deeper than what you see on the surface
this book has an agenda.... Anytime the Christian Right has a chance to undermine women,it will take that chance and run with it.Please read "The Myth Of Gender" by Fausto- Sterling.Your eyes will be open to new possiblities for your life and family.The whole point of Dobson's book is to controll people so they fall into a limited mindset - male or female,with no room for the individual.The individual is reality not this sexist nonsense.I have always found it more easy to be out in the world and explore.Dobson makes women sound like natural cowards and fools.Very insulting
So glad I'm done!. This book goes on my list of the worst books I have ever read.  It took me 3 tries and a five days to get through the introduction. I had to read it for my Ap US History class, and sure, it was very educational. (I have a test on it tomorrow, so let's see how much I retained) It just took FOREVER!  I spend 7 days locked in my room while on vacation in the beautiful Smokey Mountains. Those 5 days it took me to read the intro are not included. I read all day every day and it bored me to death.  I constantly drifted off and fell asleep reading it four out of those 7 days.  I liked the last chapter... because it was the last.
Not one of Stuart Woods best work. I usually enjoy his books, even though they are formulaic, but this one was so thin in plot it was sad.  It was obvious from the get go who the bad guys were.  Of course there was the usual requisite sex scenes, even these were thin.  The dialogues were stilted. There was no character building if per chance you hadn't read his other books.  I agree with the reviewer who said this must have been a churn book.  I don't usually write reviews, but felt compelled to comment on this boo
Not really worth it. I didn't like this book. I thought it was a waste of time and money.
"An Accountant's Dream" or "Mozart on the Couch". I read up to chapter twenty (about 300 pages) and stopped reading the book, realizing I had more important things to read.  My major complaints are (1) that there is too much discussion of the Mozart family finances, which I'm sure would be fascinating to economists and accountants, however tedious to someone concerned about music; and (2) too much retroactive Freudian analysis of the subject, Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart.  Think about this:  Solomon uses an obsolete, and now debunked, system of psychoanalysis to describe a subject that cannot be interviewed.  The best discussion of music is concerning the Salzburg serenade style in chapter eight.  Other than that brief section (pp. 125-133), I was not impressed.  Short of reading Mozart's letters and making your own analysis, I recommend Stanley Sadie's "Mozart: The Early Years, 1756-1781" for starters.
Not really interesting enough to be predictable. A group of disaffected Viet Nam veterans/cab drivers calling themselves "Green Band" blows up several buildings in a carefully orchestrated attack on Wall Street.  In the chaos they steal a large number of securities which they plan to sell in an attempt to ruin the American economy.  Archer Carroll, a US anti-terrorist agent for the DIA(?) teams up with the beautiful and multi-talented Caitlin Dillon of the SEC in trying to track down the mysterious organization that doesn't seem to have any specific demands.There's plenty of action, but none of it's very interesting, and the story never really hooked me.  I finished it more out of curiosity than anything else (and lack of something else to read).  And the characters, while sympathetic, aren't very well-developed.  I couldn't understand why Carroll, who supposedly had a whole team of men reporting to him, was the only one who was working on a case of such importance.  Also, there's a minor Brazillian character at one point, but she speaks Spanish (I thought everyone knew they speak Portuguese in Brazil)!?!  Overall, marginally interesting, but I'm sure you can find something better to read
Tiresome, simplistic romance. Jane Austen's last novel, published posthumously, receives this year's Clunky Boring Classic Award.  Anne Elliot, on the verge of spinsterhood at 27, is reunited with the man she let her friends talk her out of when was 19.  Lauded by the literary types as exemplifying Austen's wit and irony, it's really just a simplistic romance in which all characters spend far too much ink flapping their gums
Sick and Sad. I was brought up evangelistic Christian, I was forced every sunday to go into church where "SOME" were turned away.At a very young age I saw such unjust intolerence for other people and thier belief systems, example:All who are not "BORN AGAIN" will go to hell.Unfortunately it was that attitude that was so common within the church, and not the actual teachings and love for christ that turned me away.I do not descriminate about the teachings of Christ only of the fact that MANY BUT NOT ALL Christians believe all who are not Christian will not be welcomed by god.I simply cannot and then could not understand why only christians who belonged to the same series of churches could go to heaven and all others were going to burn in hell.As a very young person  I made up my mind that I could not be apart of an organization with such prejudice and overwhelming and sickening,self righeouness.I however never abandoned my faith in jesus christs love  but decided to learn more about these other religions that in the evangelistic church I was told were "EVIL" and wrong.Upon my research I found that most religions are based on a higher being often called upon different names only because of difference in location and language, in wicca there is a god and goddess however they are only represenatives as different sides of a whole.In every aspect of life there is a male force and a female force one cannot exist without the other and neither can life.Wiccans believe that the Divine spirit is within everything and all so revere nature, and show a great respect to all creatures, rocks , plants , animals , and of course human beings.They simply show the Great spirit or god respect by acknoledging the creation and recreation of all life.I do not believe that any one religion is wrong or right I believe that religion is man made and therefore  imperfect, but I know that one should research the "dark" and "light" side of everything before  being capable of coming to a real educated decision.I would also like to point out that whatever is right for one person may not be for another and vise versa, and so it is with ones spirituality.Now about this book, I read this as I have with many books related to neopagan religions.All I got from it was a great reminder of why I an no longer affiliated with the Evangelists Christian church.It was quite apparent to me that this book was not researched, because I have done my own research.This book was very Biased, and many things that were taken from other books and used as examples were twisted around to reveal something negative when much about Wicca is about living life positively.Please if you do decide to read this book to gain knoledge on Wicca dont forget to do further reading on the subject before you make up your mind(it is only fair),And remember not all Wiccans use Witchcraft and vice versa.Also try to remember that everything we see on telivision is not accurate or truthful.Wiccans and witches are not learking behind trees in dark cloaks waiting for some poor Christian to put curses upon , and People who claim they are Wiccan or Witch and commit terrible crimes and murders are just psychopaths and nothing more just as the claimed to be Christian cult in Wacco Texas 15 years ago.I would also like to say something to the teens who are interested in Wicca, If you are searching for a way to get whatever you want without hard work and dedication Wicca is not for you, If you want to harm others because of injustices done to you, Wicca is not for you, If you want to gain attention by wearing all black and listening to death metal,That is not Wicca that is Called "goth Style", and it does not validate any religion it is just a personal clothing choice, and makeup choice, ones religion or lifestyle GOTHIC or otherwise does not REQUIRE one to look any certain way. in my opinion One does not need to alter thier appearance to "BE WHO I AM", in my opinion that is exactly the opposite of being who you are, use your personality,open communication and, intelligence to throw out a better signal of who you are.Of couse feel free to have fun with the way you look if you so choose.And for Christians, One cannot ever be fully knoledgeable about anything.A few hundred years ago we knew the world was flat,In order to become wise one never stops learning, and thus does not stop with learning about the spirituality your family forced upon you at birth.It continues with the unbiased research of other religions, do not only read about other religions through the authors of Christian writers , that would be stupid.Would you learn anything about politics in a cookbook?If of course you do not want to delve into another belief system , and actually learn what it is about then please do not descriminate against the people whom follow another belief system.That would be like a child insisting that he/she does not like yams without actually tasting them first.Edited to limit any confusion my first statement about goth may have inflicted upon some
Not the great book people seem to think it is. This is a book that could (should?) have faded into history without being a great loss to the world. Yes, there are a few interesting bits of political philosophy, but they're far and few between, and mainly either just thrown out as Montesquieu's personal opinions with little to no evidence or examination, or flimsily based on historical examples. As a reader, I didn't find most of his arguments (where he didn't seem to be contradicting himself, which happens frequently) very convincing. This was obviously written with the 18th century French salon crowd in mind, and reads as such. I'm sure it provided a lot of aristocrats with conversation fodder to make them appear intelligent and educated at the time, but these days it just seems like an antiquated bit of history.He claims the book has to be read as a whole to see the structure and his overall goal; well, I did read the whole book and at the end couldn't see an overarching structure at all. The work just seemed like a long, rambling, unorganized mess. The only people I might really recommend this to are people interested in Greek, Roman, and French history (especially legal history), but not to people interested in political science or philosophy.Bump this one to the bottom of your list of classics on historical thought, there are much more interesting reads out there
character assassination. While there were some interesting bits in this book and it was readable, for the most part it completely undermined the character of Raistlin, contradicts previous books, and is generally annoying
Whisper of the hatchet... The most telling remark I can make about this book, which I picked up for about $5 off a "publishers' overstock" pile in a bookstore, is that I learned far more facts about Mencken from the brief, anonymous wikipedia.org entry than from the 432 leaden pages of character assassination found here.  And... that I wish I had my $5 back.Teachout (whoever that is) seems to appreciate Mencken as a writer and despise him as a person.  There are two aspects to Mencken's character that can be best understood by noticing two stereotypes he fits into.  Teachout notices neither.  Let me illucidate: (1) Mencken fits into the familiar modern stereotype of "nerd"--- he lived with his mother for most of  his life, and did most of his work in the same bedroom he occupied as a small child.  He was a compulsive worker, tended to avoid entanglements with women, was overweight and out of shape... need I go on? He held at arm's length any female he knew who was interested in  sex (to judge by the contents of their surviving letters to him), only married after his mother died, and married an invalid whom doctors had (correctly) assured him could not live more than 5 years.  After her death, he immediately moved back to the old homestead, living now with his unmarried brother and two servants inherited from his brief married days.  (2) He was self-educated, and so never examined the received prejudices about "alien and inferior races and cultures" and the unworkability of "democratic" institutions he had absorbed as a small child.  The writer H. P. Lovecraft (whom Teachout might never have heard of, and who was also and not coincidentally an ur-nerd) invites very close comparison with Mencken in many, if not in all, such aspects.  Like Lovecraft, he wrote many public and private diatribes against the Jews in the abstract, yet had many close Jewish friends and associates. Like Lovecraft, he tended not to view with alarm the rise of fascism in Europe.Mencken is still of great interest as a social and political critic, as a scholar of American english usage, and as the master of a prose style so forceful and vivid that it practically leaps off the page and strikes you between the eyes like a vaudeville slapstick. What Mencken needs is for more of his books to be brought back into print and adequately publicized.  Teachout, to his credit, has worked effectively to get more of Mencken into print, but still, on a recent visit to two large bookstores, one carrying new books and one used books, I was able to locate precisely ZERO works by Mencken on any topic.Let me give HLM himself the last word: "As democracy is perfected, the office [of the President] represents more and more closely the inner soul of the people. We move toward a lofty ideal. On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart's desire at last, and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron." [HLM in the Baltimore Sun, July 26, 1920.] We had to wait 80 more years, but...
Bleeding Heart. Do not waste your money.  I bought this for class, and almost had to burn it after the class was over.  It is nothing but bleading heart liberal nonsense
Militar Policeman in Vietnam. I found this book to be well written and all the individual stories very interesting and factual. War is Hell
Ouch. Barber is painfully boring and his views are over the top liberal.  Read it for school and would not wish reading this on my worst enemy
Lemony Turns Sour. I don't know about anyone else, but this book was the one that made me completely lose interest in this whole series.  This is the most boring one of them all in my opinion, and, well, how many times can the same story be told?  Bad guy wears horribly obvious costume to try to get children, children figure it out, but all the grown ups in the world are too horribly idiotic to see anything, even when it's pointed out to them.  6,000 times.
A Letter To Sean Hannity... Dear Sean,Thanks for sending me your book "Deliver Us from Evil : Defeating Terrorism, Despotism, and Liberalism." Before I put the book down and turn off my light and go to sleep I just wanted to dash off a quick letter to you so you could clarify a thing or two for me. Let me get this straight. You'd like to see all Liberals vanish from the face of the American political system and have only Conservative Republicans running the show...is that right? Hmm...Let me see, if my memory serves me right there were some political states or nations that did function for a while under a one party system. There was the Soviet Union 1917-1991, Fascist Italy 1923-1945, Nazi Germany 1933-1945. Those are three just off the top of my head. They didn't like Liberalism either. Well, Sean I got to get going. I'm sure I'll write again soon.All my best,BillPS. Remember, fanaticism is far from being fair and balanced
Unsubstantiated. I have only read the Neon Genesis Evangelion section (for a paper). From what I've read, it seems to me that Redmond makes provacative assertions that are annoyingly lacking in evidence. The Evangelion chapters largely consist of episode summaries, the majority of which has nothing to do with his thesis (that Evangelion is an allegory for East Asian regionalism). Redmond occasionally throws in generic terms such as "Asiazilla" and "East Asian subjectivity" to maintain a link to his thesis, but his weak analysis and sparse evidence on them only confused me. A book worth a glance only for its brevity and originality, as there isn't much literature that closely examines anime in the scope of East Asian regionalism.
So unbelievable dull.... and annoying. I will usually read and accept anything, but this book is just so beyond fact for even realistic fiction.  I could have handled this book a lot better if there was no "Frankie".  The character Frankie is just too unbelievable.  I work with "talented and gifted" children that are Frankie's age (8 years old) and not one of them is even remotely this advvanced.  If Frankie was say, 12 or 13 I could accept her maturity, her dedication to her music and so forth, but this is not even believable to anyone who has a child or works with them.  It would be tolerable if Frankie was not the center of the book.  They spend more time about Frankie this and Frakie that, then on the main plot of the book.  This is the 3rd book that I have read or at least tried to read from Iris Johansen and it will be my last.  I just don't like the way she writes or her main characters.  Evertime I buy another one of her books I am always hoping that this will be the one that changes my mind.  Oh well, another book to donate
Bad customer service. I ordered this book and realized the day after I placed the order that my boyfriend had bought it for himself. When I emailed the seller to see if it was too late to cancel my order and the reason I got no response. I sent another email 2 days later and I still never received a response. I then got the book (which I'm stuck with) and not even in good condition! BAD EXPERIENCE
Good until page 86. I read the Subjection of Women for my 17th Century Philosophy class.  I found it interesting, but hard to read.  Mill tends to be repetative and wordy.  He is very much the early feminist until you get to page 86 or 87 when he tells you that for all women can do, they should stay home and care for the family anyway.  I would suggest that others read this book, but give yourself time, because about 20 pages a night was all that I could muster.  At 100 pages it's not too long, but could have been said with more clarity and organization
60% Filler, 35% Anecdotal, 5% Worthwhile Information. When I first bought it for myself and skimmed the first few pages, I was very excited about the book and thought that it would be a worthwhile read.   As I kept reading, though, it became increasingly apparent that this guy was just trying to sell copies of his book, and didn't have much worthwhile information to say.  He constantly repeats that he is showing you how to "get rich" without providing any substantive advice.  He repeats lists that have little or no value, including things like "Work Hard" over and over again.From the outside in it seems great, but after going through it you will have learned very little from the book. All of the worthwhile information in the book could be sufficiently summarized in two paragraphs. I find it hard to believe that most of the other reviewers actually read the entire book.  Do yourself a favor and read the better books out there, like Clason's the "Richest Man In Babylon.
didn't live up to my expectations. As it says in the title this book is a lipogram (and dictionary.com gives us this definition: A writing composed of words not having a certain letter or letters.)  It is a very neat idea and the book creates a clever way of making the structure part of the story itself.  However, it reminds me of communism in that in theory it sounds incredibly good...but in actuality it is a failure.Everything about the story from plot to characters is boring and 2 dimensional.  There's no development beyond the basic lipogrammatic theme and that gets old after a while.  Espeically since after more and more letters go away the book just gets written with alternate spellings using the remaining allowable letters.  And even at 200 pages it went on too long.  It was too repetitive.I appreciated the author's love for language, but at times that even got annoying because it felt forced.  (although I was happy to find a book with interesting new vocabulary in it!)In short, I give credit for the idea but I would not really reccomend you read this book
Tedious!. I was very disappointed in this book. I found it tedious, rambling, and disjointed. There were a few interesting facts thrown in for good measure, but you have to slog through so much drivel that the trip just isn't worth your time.
Not Smart or Low-Carb. I picked up this book because of Rodale's reputation for excellence. However, this one's a real disappointment. The recipes are not low-carb  and  the nutritional data doesn't add up correctly for many of them.  And, it's hardly smart - since when is half a bagel a &quot;smart&quot; choice? Or half a cookie? And who can eat half? That's like giving half a cigarette to a chain smoker and calling it a &quot;smart choice&quot;.  No- pass on this one. There are so many really good choices now, that  purchasing this one would not be very &quot;smart&quot;.  I would suggest Dr. Atkins and the Drs. Eades programs, that  are backed by research, clinical documentation and  a great track record for success
An Aimless Book. In each chapter and throughout this book, the author writes whatever comes to her mind and therefore, it is hard to understand where she heads and concludes what.  I don't know in which category this book fits but definitely not in technical anaysis.
Didn't interest me. I found this book boring.  Her message was good, but her delivery did nothing for me
Alright already!. This is a case of a lot of filler to make what could be communicated in a short essay into a book. The basic message "The music industry has to embrace digital technology." This and a few other salient points are made early in the book and then repeated with different wording ad nauseum. I would suggest standing in the store, reading the introductory stuff and skimming the rest. Too many authors are doing this these days. It should have been a magazine article
no stars. lack of talent leads to jealousy that inspired the author to create his "theories".
Big on inspiration (for boys), short on facts. Bell's book has been an inspiration to several generations of mathematicians, encouraging them to pursue the creative discipline of mathematics.  For that, he has done a great service to mathematics.Unfortunately, that is the only good thing I can say about this book.  E.T. Bell was a respected Caltech mathematician, who dabbled in writing books about mathematical history.  He was a great writer with style, which has led many to believe he was also an eminent scholar of history of mathematics.  Nothing could be farther from the truth.  Bell manages to perpetrate fiction in almost every other line, mangling known facts, making unwarranted judgments and characterizations of personalities and motives.  Whatever he needs to do to construct an entertaining story, he does.  His name is universally cursed by historians of mathematicians.Making up stuff for a good story might not ordinarily be bad.  After all, a lot of people do it, and certainly encouraging youngsters to study mathematics is not a bad goal.  But there are several ways in which this book is insidious.  One is the negative potrayal of women mathematicians.  As the astute reader will have noted, the title is *Men* of Mathematics.  (On my paperpack edition, the word "men" is even set off by a different color than the rest of the title!)  The forgiving reader may be willing to forgive this; after all, the book was written in less politically correct times, and certainly most of the famous and well-documented mathematicians are men.  Gauss?  A man.  Euler?  A man also.  Etc.  On the other hand, there are notable examples of great mathematicians who happened to be women.  Emmy Noether and Sonja Kowalewski, for example.  Women who are mentioned in Bell's book, but are either paid little attention to or treated rather badly, in a way that clearly highlights Bell's own prejudices.  Some readers will be struck by sentences like "Sonja's sex had got the better of her ambitions and she had been living happily with her husband."  Rather than list more examples, let me stop by adding that this kind of sentence is typical of Bell, and doesn't stand out much.  What is perhaps the most revealing is that Chapter 22, "Master and Pupil", which is about Weierstrass and Kowalewski, spends undue amount of time discussing Kowalewski's sexual attributes and their effect on her mathematical colleagues and teachers, and little explaining her contributions to mathematics.Bell also shows prejudice when  he explains that the dispute between Cantor and Kronecker was due, in part, because:"Rightly or wrongly, Cantor blamed Kronecker for his failure to obtain the coveted position at Berlin.  The aggressive clannishness of Jews has often been remarked, sometimes as an argument against employing them in academic work, but it has not been so generally observed that there is no more vicious academic hatred than that of one Jew for another when they disagree on purely scientific matters or when one is jealous or afraid of another.  Gentiles either laugh these hatreds off or go at them in an efficient, underhand way which often enables them to accomplish their spiteful ends under the guise of sincere friendship.  When two intellectual Jews fall out they disagree all over, throw reserve to the dogs, and do everything in their power to cut one anothers' throats or stab one another in the back."This quote was later modified (I think it might have been after Bell's death) to be about styles of academic infighting, rather than a commentary about Jews and Gentiles.Bell typically exaggerates or just plain makes things up in order to make for a better story, but I think such a false potrayal of mathematicians cannot be good.  The chapter on Galois, the most famous part of the book, is replete with historical errors and omissions, including rearranging order of events, leaving out the less savory aspects of Galois' personality, and basically saying Galois invented Galois theory the night before the duel, even though parts of his work were published and known by that time to other mathematicians.Bell consistently paints Galois as misunderstood and his older mathematical colleagues as buffoons.  This is a seductive thought to some, but the reality is that great mathematical ideas don't have to be suppressed in order to be dormant.  Truly great ideas can sometimes take years to sink in.  Not a romantic viewpoint perhaps, but I think Galois' greatness is enhanced, not diminished, by this realization.  (Of course, Galois's inability/unwillingness to better communicate his ideas didn't help!)This book is certainly inspirational for some, but especially for today's audience, I think it'll be glaringly biased and I doubt very inspiring for young girls in particular.  The worst thing you can do is give this book to your child to read.  There have been many books since then that are more accurate and less prejudiced in flavor
I thought it would never end -- utterly tedious. I'm not sure Byatt had in mind as a prospective readership for this novel.  I read a lot and am not a stranger to the world of literary criticism, but this tome was virtually unbearable once I hit about the halfway point.  The first half was somewhat interesting and I had high hopes.  But as the book quote-unquote progressed, there just was more and more nothin'.  Endless, lengthy quotations and, frankly, boring observations.  I'm not sure I have anything of value to comment on, specifically, but I would like to forewarn readers:  this is one of the most trying, pretentious, uninteresting books I have ever read, and I think it would not likely appeal to the vast majority of readers.  It could conceivably appeal to lit crit buffs but even then.  Yuck
Where is it?. I ordered this book and eventually amazon cancelled the order because it was not available.  The then ask me to review it?  Where is it?Rev bruce
shallow self-indulgence. I like to use the Amazon reviews when purchasing books, especially alert for dissenting perceptions about higly rated items, which usually disuades me from a selection.  So I offer this review that seriously questions the popularity of this work - I found it smug, self-serving and self-indulgent, written by a person with little or no empathy, especially for the people he castigates. For example, his portrayal of the family therapist seems implausible and reaches for effect and panders to the"shrink" bashers of the world. This "play for effect" tone throughout the book was very distasteful to me
The insufferable Anna Wulf. Like many other reviewers, I struggled with this book. For more than 600 pages, Anna Wulf explores every thought and emotion that comes into her head and tries to make sense out of her life. This might be an interesting book for fiction writers, who might understand the elaborate process Anna goes through to create characters and combine her life with her art. But for the average reader, this is just too much and too long.I am very patient with novels. Perhaps too patient, because I should have put this one down sooner. I got all the way to page 500 before I realized I just couldn't go on. And it's quite depressing to invest so much time in a book and then put it down. Doris Lessing says herself that no one should force themselves to read a book they are not connecting with. I should have taken her advice sooner. But while some books you might not just be 'ready' for, I don't think I will ever be ready for this one.It's disappointing because I am a Doris Lessing fan. The Four-Gated City explores many of the same themes - an emotional breakdown can be constructive in order to build yourself back up whole and understand the world around you. Anna Wulf did have a fragmented mind, as demonstrated through her keeping of four separate notebooks. She was kept together by the routines of her life, such as making breakfast for her daughter. When she didn't have anything constructive to do, she thought herself to death. And if you read this book, you'll likely be right there with her - going crazy.
Left Behind. Certainly a nice looking book.  From what I understand, Marvels launched the careers of its two principle creators, and it's definitely not a bad place to start.Alex Ross's work is nothing short of spectacular.  His art is the closest comics will ever come to fine art, and demands respect.However, I cannot give this book a glowing review because it failed on a very base level.  It failed to pull me into the Marvel Universe.  Sounds odd, I know.  But as a man in my early twenties with little to no understanding (or appreciation) of the Marvel Universe, I'm left in the dark.I could easily understand why an older man, or a Marvel Comic enthusiast, would love this comic, but as a newcomer, I was left behind.There is a very fine difference between inventing a concept, and perfecting it.  Marvels serves as the prototype for future masterpiece Kingdom Come, which also featured an everyman POV.Naturally, there's a frustration on my part that comic creators often make allusions or other nostalgic call-backs to the Silver Age of comics.  This is problematic for comic readers who, like myself, have no intimate knowledge of that bygone era.  And from what I've read of it, there's not a lot that impresses me.Do not buy this book unless you are very much aware of Marvel's content history.  Otherwise, you'll be left scratching your head.  (God only knows what was happening during that Galactus bout.
Like a comic  book with no pictures, but fun, I guess. In need of a fun, adventure read, I picked up an author I always seem to see on the shelves - Cussler. It was a fun, easy read, but I expected better from such a prolific author. This is a book I would have loved when I was 14 years old, but have now come to a be a bit more demanding of realism. I found the syntax and grammar of the narrator to be very poor, which detracted from the book tremendously - I was left wondering if the editor just rubber-stamped this one.  My main issue with this book was the sci-fi level of belief suspension needed to get through it *Spoilers*: 1) fully functioning artificial intelligence robots able to carry out casual conversations, circa 1993  2) Japan has secretly created a perfect missile defense program  3) an adventurer/underwater researcher sent in to take down a heavily defended fortress, instead of a trained team of SEALs/Delta/etc. 4) That a Japanese tycoon created over 100 nukes from one salvaged "Fat Man" atomic bomb from 1945.  5) That a super-secure vault would have a convenient ventillation duct large enough for a man to squeeze through.  6) Robots that drive cars 7) several ridiculously convenient coincidences that save the day  8) the usual near death witty comment, etc...all in all, kind of fun, but don't think much or you'll ruin the plot.
Confusing! I'm Sorry but I DEFINATELY did not like this book. This book was extremely incomprehensable!!!It was BORING and it kept bringing new characters in without introducing them or anything.I'm not a stupid person and I'm not to young to read this &quot;hard&quot; book,but  it simply was a bad book!!
Flyboys. I had a difficult time with this book. Having ready "Flags of Our Fathers", I had hopes this would be as well written and informitive. However, from early on this book came across as just another piece of "pagan liberal propoganda". The ethnic cleansing of American Indians by the United States was an early warmup of typical pagan propoganda and it headed downhill from there.The pagans liberals have a prospensity to always color whatever the United States does in the worst light and make the atrocities of our enemies to be minor indiscretions. This book is another pagan apologetic for what's wrong with the US and right with all nations who wish us ill.
Eww!. This is the worst book I have ever read! It is ssssssssssssssooooooo dull! Even "Grunt" is better than this-- eww eww eww! Go try some real books like The Chronicles of Narnia, The Underland Chronicles, Inkheart, and the Inheritance Trilogy-- it will do you some Good Great Thing NOT to read THIS awful book! :
Steer clear of this one. When I had first heard of Dream Boogie, a 700-page biography of the late Sam Cooke, I was ecstatic.  Up until that point, I had only known of one other biography of Sam Cooke - You Send Me, which I haven't gotten around to reading.  I eagerly bought a copy of the book from my local Barnes & Noble, expecting an enormous gem of truth about Sam, that would prove to be both through and entertaining.  For readers of this review, there is now a third Sam Cooke biography, written by Erik Greene entitled:  "Our Uncle Sam".  Who is Erik Greene, you may ask?  He's Sam's great nephew.But let us return to Dream Boogie.  Peter Guralnick is known as the definitive biographer of Sam Cooke, having written liner notes for digitally-remastered CDs and much more.  Peter Guralnick worked on writing and gathering the materials for Dream Boogie for more than fifteen years.  Therefore, one might well assume that he would write an enormous gem of truth that proved to be both through and entertaining.Let us begin with the good points of this 700-page biography.  Peter Guralnick chose to interview a large portion of the Sam Cooke family, something Daniel Wolff did not do.  Naturally, Erik Greene did.  Guralnick includes commentary from his father, his brothers, his sisters, his business associates, his close friends, and most importantly, his widow.  Barbara Cooke, ever since the death of her husband, has never conducted any interviews regarding Sam for the past forty years.  Naturally, she provides a unique but also a brutally honest commentary regarding her life and Sam's.  However, Guralnick does not deviate from his course - he is still extremely through (to say the least) in the actual history of Sam's life.  He doesn't miss a single thing.In my opinion, there is a flaw to this.  In the art of writing, if you're too through with a subject, you will bog the reader down immensely.  Guralnick gets an A+ on this one.  Throughout the 700-page biography, Guralnick succeeds in providing the reader with so very much information that is indeed interesting, but not important to the overall history of Sam.  He also succeeds in doing the exact opposite over the more important and memorable aspects of Sam's life.  In the 1950s, he stood up against the police in Memphis after the police told him to push the car to the side of the road.  Specifically, he told him:  "Sir, my name is Sam Cooke.  If you haven't heard of me, your wife knows me.  When you get home tonight, you ask your wife if she knows Sam Cooke.  I don't push no car.  This is my car, my brother ran out of gas.  I'm not pushing it.  You want to put a ticket on it, put a ticket on it.  But I don't push no car.  Not mine, not yours, not nobody's elses.  I'm not a pusher.  I'm a singer."  Sam then proceeded to sit back in his car, his brother came with the gas, and they left.  The police left them alone.Depending upon your interpretation, this could be seen as one of the first steps for Sam regarding the Civil Rights Movement, which led to his greatest composition, "A Change Is Gonna Come", an African-American response to Bob Dylan's "Blowing in the Wind".  This also leads to another flaw in Guralnick's work, a complete lie over an important television appearance of Sam.  Daniel Wolff also makes the same mistake.  In February of 1964, Sam appeared on The Tonight Show and it's known that he sang "Basin Street Blues" as the performance still survives.  However, according to both Guralnick and Wolff, Sam also sang "A Change Is Gonna Come" on the same show.  I'm not sure what Wolff does in an attempt to prove this, but Guralnick uses a cue sheet with a similar title to "A Change Is Gonna Come" to prove that Sam did indeed sing the song.I recently contacted a Carson archivist, and Sam never sung the song.  It took me a day to figure it out.  Guralnick worked on this book for more than fifteen years.  If he went through such work to that the song was planned, why wouldn't he check the log book of the episode to see if Sam sung the song to be completely sure?  During the days of The Tonight Show, some guests would exceed the length of time they occupied and therefore, some guests would never make it onto the show.Perhaps that's not a very big flaw in the biography of Sam; it's only a single event.  Consider this.  On the eighth page of the biography, there is a picture with the caption "A very young Sam Cooke".  The eighth page and Guralnick makes a major mistake.  It's not Sam.  It's his brother, L.C.  Three months after the book was released, the mistake was corrected.  If Guralnick cannot properly identify a photo of the person he's writing about, what other mistakes is he prone to make in the book?Perhaps the biggest mistake Guralnick makes is stating that the official version of events concerning Sam's death was how it went down.  As I read the chapter regarding Sam's death, I seriously considered whether or not Guralnick was employed by Allen Klein, whom Sam was planning to fire.  Who was Allen Klein?  I don't know too much about him myself, but I do know that he swindled the Cooke family out of the royalties of Sam's catalog with help from one of Sam's daughters and his widow.  I do know that he also conned The Beatles as well as The Rolling Stones.  That's about it.  Yet, he uses Allen Klein's and Barbara Cooke's commentary exclusively.  If you do a Google search about the death of Sam, you'll find an analysis of the "official" version of events that pokes five large gaping holes into the official version of events.  In addition, the coroner's inquest was a complete joke and contradicted itself numerous times.  Daniel Wolff didn't believe the official version of events, Sam's fans don't believe the official version of events, and Sam's family doesn't believe the official version of events.  Pretty much no one believes the official version of events other than Guralnick.I'm not sure what Wolff does to debate what really happened that night, but Erik Greene includes a report in his book that is extremely different from the official version of events.  Well, you may say that he would naturally do that, considering Sam was a member of his family.  Instead of using the "facts" from the coroner's inquest and related events, Greene chooses to tackle the mystery of Sam's death via a pathology report.  Scientifically speaking, I believe that it's quite accurate.Here's the rather discerning part.  Peter Guralnick is known as the definitive biographer of Sam Cooke.  But of course, no biography doesn't have its flaws.  However, keep in mind that I do not cite all the mistakes made in Dream Boogie.  I can probably cite four or five more off the top of my head.  But I think I've trashed the book enough.  What's the worst part?  The flaws in Dream Boogie, known as the Sam Cooke Bible, could be perhaps passed off as truth by a less-than-familiar (historically speaking) Sam Cooke fan, and are blatantly obvious to the die-hard fans of Sam Cooke.If you want a good biography of Sam that is entertaining, through, and truthful, either check out Wolff's biography or Greene's biography, which I highly recommend, which was by a member of the family of Sam Cooke
Another City - no angels. It just didn't do it for me.  Like so many other people, I loved Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil.  It was such a rich, unexpected book and came alive in the reading.  But, I fear John Berendt had only one in him - one great story.  He found a crime and a city and another series of characters, but he just didn't find the magic.Good writing?  Yes.  Interesting characters?  Somewhat.  Compelling plot?  No.Maybe it's just that he tried too hard to make Venice new to his readers.  Maybe he tried too hard to replicate the formula and twists of Midnight, even though reality didn't afford him similarities to work with.  Maybe he just tried too hard.
Old News. Far from containing any ground-breaking revelations, this book is essentially old news. Except for a few details that Block has added, virtually everything in it can be found in Harold Peterson's "The Man Who Invented Baseball," which was published in 1973
Back pain no more. I thought the information was useful at times and other times i felt i needed a stronger back ground of schooling to understand the author. Overall good for understanding how the mind works but there are better books on exercises to help with my back pain. Buy a more up to date book.
Facts Dulled By Unimaginative Presentation. This may be a five-star concept, but the execution leaves much to be desired, particularly in the illustrations. The best that can be said is that the pictures are deeply colored and might make a good stained-glass project. However, the almost uniformly bird's-eye view of this "global village" fails to show much difference between the haves and have-nots, or, really, to illustrate the facts of any given page. We simply see a colorful village from the air... over and over.  The very imagery that might make these facts come alive in a child's imagination is missing. Some sense of interaction - this is a village, after all! - would help. Instead of faces, we are given a fly-over. Thus, the facts remain mere lists, and not emotionally compelling
too good to be true. If something seems too good to be true, it usually is.  That's the case with this book as well.  It seems that all of these authors in this book are continualy trying to sell each others products.  No real practical advice is given.  They suggest making money by building a huge mailing list and selling products to the reciepient through emails.  First of all, how do we build this magical list, and secondly, who enjoys receiving spam of any kind these days.  Let's call a spade a spade.  The only ones getting rich off this book are the authors
Zuh?. How Germaine Greer came to be an authority on Shakespeare, I'll never know. Actually, I can't believe people are still writing about this guy at all
Stuffy, predictable and annoying!. I borrowed this book a while ago, hoping for an enjoyable light read. Unfortunately not.The main character of this series, Amelia Peabody, is supposedly interesting. Unfortunately not. Obsessed that men are the evil of every age, her rants occupy almost every page. Her "supposed insights" and commentary were so long that I found myself speed-reading through the pages, scanning as many as 20 pages every few minutes.The sidekick is just as annoying. While she isn't complaining about the weather, she is busy fainting.Anyone who has read a handful of mystery books would already know who the "Mummy" was. What little intrigue there was, was ruined by the predictability.Although the writing was quite enjoyable, it was ruined by many of the characters. I'd take one of the case studies of Sherlock Holmes over this any day. Or any book by PD James or JD Robb.
So very dissapointed. Like most successful certification seekers, I'm on a schedule.  A delay of even a week or two puts off that final test.  I gladly ordered this brand new from Amazon with two-day shipping.  When it arrived, it was without it's included DVD.In all the time I've purchased products from Amazon I have never been burned, until now.Shame on you Amazon
Hated It!!. I did not like this book at all! It was all over the place and I couldn't get in to it
Practical Design of Safety-Critical Computer Systems. Much of the content of this book is devoted to fault tree analysis and common sense applications of redundancy. The book equates safety critical with low failure rates. Failures of any frequency are intolerable.  I was expecting to see fault coverage techniques using inference instrumentation and safe-fail methodologies.  Contrary to other reviews, I found this book to be very light
Bad. I was looking foward to this book and then I read it and was so shocked! It could have been a really great book if only the characters had morals. It was suspensful and like I said could have been a good book if the characters didn't jump at the first hormonal chance to cheapen what could have been a good romance. I strongly advise that anyone with the smallest shred of morality stay away from this book. I only wish someone could have warned me
Barely Entertaining. I can't understand how this book won the World Fantasy Award.  Touted as "horror", it was barely scary.  Lieber filled his book with a string of impossible coincidences, then pulled a rabbit out of his hat at the end.  Avoid
Long on introduction, short on strategies. I enjoyed this book and very much "empathized" with the subject matter, but was so surprized when the book just ended and I had not really learned much about further strategies in dealing with empathetic ability. I was amazed that flower essences were the first strategy given by this professional, but still trying to keep an open mind. I was quite annoyed the book just ended and now I will need to search more for more advanced handling of this topic. I would suggest that anyone who reads the book, identifies with this trait, has to remember that this ability is a great gift. The best strategy I have found to accept, live with and really enjoy this ability, is to spend alot of time and effort in increasing your spiritual identities (NOT RELIGIOUS !!!). Spirituality is YOUR relationship with God, and Religion is experienceing someone else's relationship with God....quite a difference. The flower essenses therapy I feel is a way to mute the empathy that needs to be accepted, nurtured and not medicated out of your life. I cannot imagine taking anything foreign that would mute this most precious gift....like taking an anti-depressant or anti-anxiety pill. Sure, if you can't handle this gift, maybe you need these aids, but once embraced, you really can't get through the day without that wonderful guidance your own spirit is providing you. So, this book is OK for the beginning on their quest for self-understanding, but it certainly does not present enough strategies to help empathic veterans
This is not the textbook. We thought we had ordered the textbook, Microeconomics: Principles, Problems, and Policies by McConnell and Brue.  This book however is Selected Material from Microeconomics.  The Table of Contents is the same  as the textbook, so this is really confusing.  Be sure you get what you  want
already in "Citizenship Papers". These nice and thoughtful essays were already in Berry's "Citizenship Papers:  Essays"  I wish I had known that before I bought both
Well...not Exactly. Actually I have not read this book and probably won't anytime soon.  I understand there is more than one side to everything but am totally offened at the response to Dr. Barach from ISSD.  The organization helped me tremdously when I first found out I had MPD/DID.  I could not find Dr. Barach's response anywhere on here but I would think that in defending the organization the Dr. is also defending those of us who have a legitimate diagnosis of MPD/DID
Don't buy this for the art. The previous reviews gave me the impression there would be great concept art in this book. Instead the few artworks are completing lacking in imagination, technical skill and the "Disney" design feel. The artworks have a '70s look about them, with psychodelic pastel rainbow streaks smeared across what would otherwise be dull sketches. Take away the colour and the line art is woeful. This guy cannot even draw a decent Mickey Mouse (a half talented 10 year old could do better). The best visuals herein are the photos of the theme park. Don't waste your money on this guy ... like Disney did
Worst Airline is still the worst. The book may provide a business model but the airline has not "come back."  Continental is still the worst run airline in the U.S. so the entire premise of the book is moot
To the devil with it!. When I was introduced to Goldberg at a conference a few years ago, the first words out of his mouth to me were (almost a direct quote), "See, I don't have horns and a tail." Other than my name and that I am a journalism/mass communication professor, he knew NOTHING about me, not even my politics or whether I had read his book. The man doth protest too much, me thinks. I have read his book, and there is nothing like a completely one-sided book complaining about the mass media being one-sided in the other direction. If all of the mass media companies (which includes book publishers) were one-sided in favor of liberals (other than Fox, National Review, Weekly Standard, etc.), Goldberg wouldn't have been able to get this book published, let alone advertised, reviewed, etc
I disagree. We used a chapter from this book for my graduate Philosophy of mind class.  To be fair, I must note that I was not favorably disposed towards eliminative materialism to begin with (nor any other materialism, really).      My preference aside, though, I found at least this chapter (#2) to be  rife with misunderstandings of other fields like AI and neuroscience.  Even  when you are generous to Churchland's arguments, they often turn out to not  be arguments at all.  Granted, issues like materialism, mentalism, and  dualism are difficult to find solid ground on.  What I object to is that he  portrays as crystal clear arguments which aren't even logical, even if you  grant his premises are true (which they often aren't).  Obviously I can't  give an in-depth criticism here, but I have a short paper on the topic.     Anyways, you may want to find a more complete and more careful text.  It  succeeded in provoking thought, but I was dissapointed in the quality of  the author's thought
Not What We Expected. Although everyone empathized with June, we couldn't understand her loyalty. We wished she had been as loyal to Aunt Peggy. There were some readers that didn't finish because they felt the story was going nowhwere.  Then you had those that finished only to be relieved that it was over.  We hope that June has sought some type of professional counseling behind this, because this was not something that you just "get over".  Having been rejected by her mother and knowing that it wasn't just her (but her white brother and sister too) should have made the blow a little easier.  It's evident that June placed a barrier around herself to shield her feelings as an adult.  She is a successful lady despite her past and that matters most.
You only need one Atkins book. Dr. Atkins' New Diet Revolution contained far more relevant information than The Atkins Essentials.  Frankly put, if you already have one of the Atkins books, don't waste your money and buy more.  All you need is one
More than 8 minutes . . . Just a warning - 8 minutes doesn't count warm up, stretching, or the time it takes you to get up from the floor and situated to the next exercise (something that I find really annoying and ineffecient!).I have not read Jeorge's book.  I got the routine from an excerpt in O! I don't understand why he doesn't pair exercises that are both on the floor or both standing - it's such a pain getting up and down, up and down.  Plus, I feel like you lose that whole idea of "no rest".  I'm sure I expend more calories to get up an down, but it's all too easy to take a sip of water or just in repositioning yourself.I have been following WW while I have been doing the 8m workout (more like 10-15 for me), and I have not lost one pound.  I'll keep doing it, because it's probably better than nothing, but I'm not impressed so far (about 3 weeks)
No maps, but lots of oral history. How can you write a book about the Battle of the Bulge and have no maps. I knew when he said oral history there would be no detailed analysis of the battle
Why is the cost so reasonable?... ...essentially you get what you pay for. This book is certanly NOT representative of what I have come to expect from National Geographic.I had eagerly anticipated the arrival of my book, but was dissappointed to find within the first few pages that it is uninspiring at best. Most of the pictures are poorly executed and at times seem amateurish. In the past I've found photographs by professionals like Steve McCurry ('Portraits')visually arresting. Not so here.At least it only cost me $20 oredering from Amazon. If I had been able to preview it beforehand, I would not have thought it worth even the discounted price
GAVE IT ONE STAR BECAUSE I COULDN'T GIVE IT ZERO. There are two types of writers...one writes to inform the reader, the other writes to try to impress other writers.  Mr. Reese tried the latter, but didn't acomplish either.Reading this book is like trying to understand a sloppy drunk stranger explaining why his wife left him....it doesn't make sense and it's b-o-r-i-n-g.It's ironic that a Frenchman with a German mother, who also spent WWII in the German Army on the Eastern Front and who never claimed to be a writer (Guy Sajer), wrote the book that is everything that Reese's book wanted to be, and isn't.If you are looking for the ultimate "can't put it down" memoir of a soldier that brings home the horrors of war along with humanity at it's best and worst, get "Forgotten Soldier" by Guy Sager.Like Coke, it's the real thing
Bones. I bought this book expecting to share some fascinating stories and experiences, instead each chapter began a buildup and then suddenly you were left standing there alone wondering what happened where did the story go. Very aggravating, then oh yes, this is by the way, where we were, toodle oo on the next tale, or a portion of it anyway
Not for me. You can find all the information (and more) this book provides on the internet. So if you have a little time to search the web, you don't need this book.And it doesn't answer all the questions you may have. You still need the help of a lactation consultant or your baby's doctor. So if you have more problems than mastitis and engorgement, this book won't help you
sub-standard. I refuse to believe that some apprentice intern ghost writer didn't really write this.  I will try to describe him or her.  Definitely a vegetarian - possibly a member of PETA.  Dry writing style (well, Crighton is dry even when he's excellent).  It bothers me how many unrealistic characters Crichton uses - it seems every character in some of these books earned a PhD from MIT by 16, was an alternate on the olympic swim team, a top researcher, an accomplished pilot, beautiful or handsome, and wealthy.  These people do not exist in nature.  They also have an annoying habit of speaking in complete, complex sentences, quoting research in casual conversation.  But at least MC has a gift for crafting believable, plausible sci-fi - much like Isaac Asimov.  But this is so beneath him, I refuse to accept it
Don't bother. The Irish culture according to an an Englishman's perspective. Truth? Maybe some of it. Stereotypes? Yes
2.5 stars for this one... probably the most over-hyped book I've ever read. No SpoilersWhere to start. This could easily turn into a long review, but I don't want it to be so I'll try to keep it short. Also, I'll stay away from the religious views regarding this book and focus on the writing because religion is subjective and everyone can (and should) think whatever they want about their religion) Having said that, the one recurring thought I had about this book while reading it (and while thinking about it after completing it for this review) was that it is without a doubt the most esoteric and pedantic book I have ever read.Now I'm not stupid, and I can appreciate the beauty of words and the importance of diction, but so much of this book was Rushdie writing in such a way to make sure that you had no idea what the hell he was talking about. There are times when you can be extremely metaphorical and lofty and times when you should just be blunt, but for Rushdie, there is no bluntness, and everything must be doused in the most stringy and free-formed words he can think of. Why? In some cases it adds to the story... in this, it doesn't. While there are some very good parts in this book, they are all surrounded by a lot of words that don't really say anything.Bottom line: you can skip this book. However, those interested in religion and questioning said relgion will probably read it anyway. I would suggest you get a durable copy because you will want to throw it against the wall a few times.PS: The best part of the whole book for me was towards the end in the scenes between Saladin and his father. If the whole book had been written like that, it would've been a pleasure
Don't Waste Your Money. My fiance was a best man in a wedding recently and had never given a speech before. So I bought this book and another one. Boy am I glad that I bought the other book, because this one was no help at all. It only gives you examples of specific toasts and speeches for specific families. It doesn't help. It's not generic enough for someone to put together their own speech from it. It doesn't tell you how to write a speech or do's and don'ts about writing toasts. I would not recommend this book to anyone. If you want a good book for this, buy The Best Man's Handbook. It has way more useful information on speeches and toasts than most speech books
How many VT students are buying  this book?. John Lott is a first class wack job. His research is questionable and he even invented a person (a woman named Mary Rosh) to defend him on various websites and blogs. How sad is that?Hey John, FYI guns kill innocent people
Boring. I am 15 years old and was required to read this book as summer reading for my school. Let me just say that this is the most punishingly boring book I have ever opened. I say opened because I just could not finish it. I was doing fine until I reached his section about the future of computers. I had to skip the entire section...about 50 pages or so. It, along with almost every other section of the book is impossible to understand, at least for a 15 year old. After that, the book just kept going downhill, and I gave up. This book is not interesting in the least. Avoid at all costs
Dullsville. Perhaps I'd put too much stock in all the praise I'd seen heaped on Charles McCarry and this book. What a great espionage writer he is, the party line went. Our Le Carr, etc., etc. But this book, which I purchased at full price in hardcover, was so dull and disappointing that I gave up in anger and disinterest not even half way through. McCarry probably has been as good as his admirers say, but in this book, he seems to have switched on the auto-pilot, taken the money, and run. I quickly grew tired of all his fancy brand names - dropped, it appears, as a way to suggest authenticity and insider knowledge - and all the exotic locales he pushes his characters to, as if scouting locations for a movie. I have not given up; I will now try his earlier books, starting with 'Tears of Autumn,' and keep my fingers crossed. I remain hopeful
Nothing new. I was hoping this book would help us all get a better nights sleep, but it's the same old &quot;cry it out&quot; method we've all heard about. Not our style
MySecret. i was sorely dissapointed when i bought this book. it was so short and the secrets were silly. there was nothing heartfelt about this book. the first one was WAY better
Nothing learned here. Can sum this book up in one word:  disappointing.  There is nothing artistic in any of the pictures.  No commentary given.  As amuturistic as nude photos can be
Horribly muddled. This is one of the most horribly muddled "thrillers" I've ever read.  By the end, I wasn't sure who was "winning" or "losing," nor did I really care.  Clive better quit sub-contracting out his writing.  He should dump this cast of characters and concentrate on Dirk Pitt.
Kaffeeklatsch with a curious housewife. After following Oprah's Book Club, I came to the sad conclusion that my gender "woman" cannot write. Period!  Oprah's book club is a booster for the book printing industry now drowning in an avalanche of incompetent female writers, a disaster for the American culture.  She promotes female writers who, due to the lack of brilliance, cannot write themselves safely out of a telephone booth.  Though warned, I purchased the above book because the subject of this book has stirred my interest greatly, noticing an ocean of burning candles always at the altar of the black Madonna in the Theatiner cathedral of Munich.  I learned that she is a replica of the famous Loreto Madonna of Italy. There are many more black madonnas throughout Europe than encountered in China Galland's path.  In kaffeeklatsch style she narrates her trips to other continents in pursuit of the black Madonna and fails her attempt to fit the peaces of her puzzle together to a coherent picture.  In her travels she visits Auschwitz-Birkenau and makes politically correct statements which are historically incorrect: "Hitler was popularly elected".  Hitler was appointed chancellor by President Hindenburg in 1933.  What does this have to do with Longing for Darkness?  The author is safest when she quotes (copies) men who have done research on her subject, the origin of the black Madonna throughout history.  And only when quoting others does her book gain some merit.  I give her a star for being industrious; however, skip this book!  I highly recommend for readers interested in this subject "The Cult of the Black Virgin" by Ean Begg
slow, wordy. i really liked the first one and even went to my mom's house to pick up the second one (this) at 10:30 at night right after i had finished it because i was so pumped to read on. from the get go i could not get into this book and i had to force myself to get to page 120. not much has happened to make me want to finish it. very boring. not really into roz and mitch characters, i don't think they are very well developed, they seem kind of blah. and the story is kind of blah. blah, blah, blah, and just words for the blah, blah, blah going on and on.
virtually fraud. Be warned. The Office Project program advertised as included is a trial version. The ad does not say this. Now I have to turn around a buy a new program- Amazon customer service says it isn't their fault. I really needed the book and the program for a class due to start in four days. Now I'm really stuck. Amazon is even trying to get me to pay for the return shipping
Don't waste your time. It was all I could do to finish this book. The subject matter interested me because I knew someone who committed suicide, so I was curious as to how a humorous spin could be put on such a dismal subject matter. There was some funny dialog, but I was disappointed in this book overall. The characters were unlikeable: an abnoxious teenager, a wimpy middle-aged woman, etc. Not only were the characters totally annoying, they didn't like each other - yet they kept hanging out together. Yeah, I get the whole idea that they were depressed and had no one else to hang out with or anything else to do, but the author didn't convince me of why they would want to keep meeting up, going on vacation together, etc. There were also some rediculous threads in there, like lying about the angel on top of the building. That was when the book started to lose me.I made it through to the end, but it was a great effort and I just skimmed the last 75 pages or so
just so-so. Of the 7 or so Grisham novels Ive read this one is my least favorite.It's not a bad story at all but it's just way too long, about 150 pages longer than it needed to be.It also just lacked credibility in many spots. Grisham is normally quite good at presenting characters and situations that are at least plausible, if not really interesting. Most of his books give the layman some insight into the workings of the law that Ive always thought were fascinating. This book, however, plods along and doesnt bring anything new to his body of work.The other thing that really got me was the dialogue he wrote for Mark Sway, the 11year old protagonist. He sounds more like a street-wise 30year old, using words like "wonderful" and phrases that have been out of use since the 70's. I think Grisham forgot he was writing the words for a young boy and not one of his more typically older characters.This isnt a bad book if you just want to escape for a few hours a day but most of his other ones are far more enjoyable
Hollywood Movie. No wonder this book has not been translated into Spanish. It would be an absolute fiasco. "The Story of Spain" was so obviously designed to be a good seller among American tourists, that it would make an excellent Hollywood movie -such is the distortion of history!The author did very little research or none at all, and never submitted the manuscript to the scrutiny of a Spaniard scholar. To prove what I am saying I need only to state that he committed the two most capital of the sins: first, to be wrong about Spain's Saint Patron; and second, to mix up the most precious symbol of hispanidad.In page 44 you can read: "Popular legend says that Saint James the Elder (Santiago), believed to be half-brother  of Jesus, brought Christianity to the peninsula around AD 40."Some confusion has arisen over the identity of James, the Lord's brother, who was not one of the original twelve apostles, and St. James, son of Alpheus, also known as James the Less. Neither of them is Spain's Patron Saint. In about AD 44 King Herod Agrippa I beheaded the Apostle St. James, James the Great, son of Zebedee and St. John's the Evangelist's brother. This is the one we venerate. Every Spanish man, every Spanish woman, knows the difference. Ask them.As for the symbol of hispanidad, there is one Virgin of Guadalupe whose statue lays in a monastery near Caceres, Spain. There is another Virgin of Guadalupe, with no relation whatsoever to the first one, whose picture was, according to tradition, miraculously imprinted on an Indian's cape, that of san Juan Diego. This picture (not a statue) can be seen at a Basilica in Mexico City. The latter was declared "Queen of the Americas" by the Catholic Church. Most Latin Americans don't even know that the first one exists, let alone that She is "the symbol of hispanidad".
Who cares?. Why do we need another history book about ignorant cowards hiding behind bed sheets? Perhaps include details on the bed sheets thread count
too mushy. It makes Peter Horry and Francis Marion to mushy. I wanted the fighting side not the staring into each others eyes and appearing to fall in love scenero.Peter Horry was not pleased with it and told the Rev. to do what he wished with it and it was printed.This could have been addedlater but for the beginning it turned me off
Fraud. Michael Bellesiles resigned after a panel of scholars from places such as Harvard and Princeton concluded his failure to cite sources for material in his book, Arming America
Well written, but low on content. I found this book very entertaining and interesting to read. Watts surely excels at presenting his work to as to make it appealing to large non-technical audiences. However, I happen to have a technical background, and while I cannot comment on the sociological value of the results of this new "science of networks," it seems fairly clear that there are no hard results of any significance in this work.Watts claims to be a mathematician, but all he seems to have done is to construct some simple mathematical models and run computer simulations on these. What's wrong with that, you ask? Well, that is just... how should I put it delicately.. trivial work. No mathematics department would let him get away with a PhD for this... which doesn't really mean anything in and of itself, but this was all the book, written by a self-proclaimed mathematician, has in terms of hard facts or rigorous results. There's a lot of discussion and speculation and interpretation, which is all very interesting, but very little scientifically rigorous original work of any value.I noticed some other reviewers saying that this is not an easy read, but is worth the effort. I'm not being the least bit snobbish or arrogant about this, but I found the book fairly easy to read (as would anyone with some knowledge of mathematics), and wouldn't advise any laypeople to waste their time. Don't bother following Watts' intellectual travels as a researcher; it may not be easy to read, but there's not much there anyway.I haven't said much about the actual content about the book, so here goes. Watts identifies the small world phenomenon, aka I can reach the president of the US through at most six steps, as occurring surprising frequently in the world around us. He sets out to understand the why and how of such a phenomenon. Now this is a rather hard problem to answer in a mathematical framework, because such real world networks are very difficult to model.Watts and his PhD advisor evidently realized this, but went ahead and constructed some very simple models of such networks, and tried to analyze these models. So far so good. But even these simple models proved too hard to analyze mathematically, so they had to resort to running computer simulations, and explain the results in qualitative, rather than quantitative, terms. They made some interesting observations, but frankly, this ain't no work of genius, or anything close. Running simulations when one can't analyze a mathematical model is something all too many graduate students in various engineering disciplines do on a regular basis, but most of them don't have the gift of writing and finding the right audience that Watts does.In my opinion, these toy models and simulations have nothing deep to say about anything in the real world. Further, in my opinion, this so called new science of networks, which seems to be attracting a fair bit of attention, will have absolutely nothing useful to contribute to any real world problems. In the words of Dennis Miller, that's just my opinion, and of course I could be wrong. But stay tuned, and we'll see
UNFAIR!!!. I usually like this author and have read almost all of her books; however, after reading this book I definitely felt cheated. The book is well written, and the characters were pleasing, although I thought Faith was not being true to her character as presented in earlier books in the series. Agatha Christie used to say that a mystery writer must play fair with his or her readers. All of the evidence and the clues must be laid out for the reader to try to solve the mystery before the author resolves it. To do otherwise is to cheat the reader who has invested time in reading the book. No reader had a chance to solve this mystery unless by sheer guessing. Once the murderer is revealed, the reader realizes that it really could have been anyone, and all the clues have meant nothing. I was very disappointed, so I will think twice about getting any of her new books
Medical Genetics. This book is extremely limited in discussing how these genetic disorders manifest themselves clinically.  I would not recommend this book for students who plan to apply their knowledge in the clinical setting.   Explanations of certain genetic terms are not always clearly defined nor  are certain biologic processes such as meiosis.  Overall, a poorly written  book for anyone but a graduate student of genetics
Social Commentary from a Marxist. To appreciate this book you need have at least a general understand of the work of Karl Marx because the book is written from a Marxist perspective. From this 'perspective' the author is able to draw certain conclusions about American society (or a capitalist society) in which a reader may mistakenly infer as to the intent of the actual participants of that society. Its one thing to describe a particular outcome as a result of advertising and it's another thing to say that this outcome is the actual intent of advertising companies and businesses. A casual reader (or biased reader) may have trouble distinguishing between the two. The book title is a little misleading, saying `Captains' of Consciousness when the author does not focus on any 'specific' advertising company or business. The book cover is also a little misleading, with a picture of the store front NikeTown with heavily armed police. The book was written in 1976, no where in the book does it mention the Nike company and book contents does not convey any sense of power struggle thingy going on. Overall, it's an okay book for those who are familiar with the work of Marx and sociology in general. If you are not, then you would have no understanding of where the author is coming from or really the conclusion he is making. To sum I would say that is book is really just social commentary from a Marxist.Here are some notes I've taken from the book (word for word) that I feel are most meaningful to me:Modern advertising was concentrating upon a type of copy aiming to make the reader emotionally uneasy, to bludgeon him with the fact that decent people don't live the way he doesMass industry, requiring a corresponding mass individual, cryptically named him "Civilized American" and implicated his national heritage in the marketplace. By defining himself and his desires in terms of the good of capitalist production, the worker would implicitly accept the foundations of modern industrial live. By transforming the notion of "class" into "mass", business hoped to create an "individual" who could locate his needs and frustrations in terms of the consumption of goods rather than the quality and content of his life (work).In an attempt to massify men's consumption in step with the requirements of the productive machinery, advertising increasingly offered mass-produced solutions to "instinctive" strivings as well as to the ills of mass society itself. If it was industrial capitalism around which crowded cities were being built and which had spawned much of the danger to health, the frustration, the loneliness and the insecurity of modern industrial life, the advertising of the period denied complicity. Rather, the logic of contemporaneous advertising read, one can free oneself from the ills of modern life by embroiling oneself in the maintenance of that life. A 1924 ad for Pompeian facial product argued that: unless you are one woman in a thousand, you must use powder and rouge. Modern living has robbed women of much of their natural color.. taken away the conditions that once gave natural roses in the cheeksThe advertising which attempted to create the dependable mass of consumers required by modern industry often did so by playing upon the fears and frustrations evoked by mass society - offering mass produced visions of individualism by which people could extricate themselves from the mass - mass pseudo-demassificationAppealing to dissatisfaction and insecurities around the job, certain advertisements not only offered their products as a kind of job insurance, but intimate that through the use of their products one might become a business success - the capitalist notion of individual "self-fulfillment".Much of American industrial development punctuated by attempts to channel thought and behavior into patterns which fitted the prescribed dimensions of industrial lifeIf you are advertising any product never see the factory in which it was made. Don't watch the people at work. Because when you know the truth about anything, the real, inner truth - it is very hard to write the surface fluff which sells it.Speaking of seeming purposelessness of American industrial life itself, this lack of purpose in life has an effect on consumption similar to that of having a narrow life interest, that is, in concentrating human attention on the more superficial things that comprise much of fashionable consumption. The mass-produced goods of the marketplace were conceived of as providing and ideology of "change" neutralized to the extent that it would be unable to effect significant alteration in the relationship between individuals and the corporate structure. "Fatigue" with the futility of modern life might, if all other avenues of change are eradicated, be channeled toward a "fatigue... with apparel and goods used in one's immediate surroundings".The concept of consumption as an alternative to other modes of change proliferates within business literature of the twenties. Given the recent history of anticaptialist sentiments and actions among the working class, the unpleasant possibility of "deeper changes" gave flight to a more pacified notion of social welfare that emanated from comsumerization. Recognizing the irreversibility of frustration among those who felt trapped in their surroundings, change would be "the most beneficent medicine in the world to most people", mass consumption is offered as a means of acting out such impulses within a socially controllable context. "To those who cannot change their whole lives or occupations, even a new line in a dress is often a relief. The woman who is tired of her husband or her home or a job feels some lifting of the weight of life from seeing a straight line change into a bouffant, or a gray pass into beige". The basic issues of industrial capitalism were fractionalized, isolated and reduced to trivialities in her formula. "Most people do not have the courage or the understanding to make deeper changes".The logic of using consumption and mass leisure as ameliorations for boredom and social entrapment was not merely an underlying trend in advertisingFear in itself is paralyzing; it robs one of the power of action. No one buys anything through fear, but rather through the instinct of self preservation or some other reaction that is almost inseparable from fearAGAIN, if you don't understand what the hell the author is taking about then I don't recommend this book to you.
this book teaches that being beautiful is wrong. This book is so beautiful on the outside it's a pity that the words are so incredibly hurtful and wrong.  The story is about a fish who is covered with beautiful scales.  Another fish comes up and asks to be given one of the scales and the beautiful fish says no, after which none of the other fish will play with it.  The fish is advised by someone "wise" to give away its beautiful scales so that the other fish will like it.  It follows that advise and gives every other fish a scale so that by the end of the book the page is filled with a bunch of pathetic looking fish that all have one shiny scale and everyone is supposedly happy.  For me this is a terrible moral!  It's wrong to be prettier or smarter or more talented in some way?  You should try to make yourself less pretty or dumber or ignore your talents so other people won't be jealous?  It's OK to demand other people give you things that you covet?  Yuk!
The book sucks, but there may be hope. To rehash about 2,000 other reviews: this book is tripe.  Worthless.  Offensive to anyone who felt any connection to this series' world and characters.I think I may have a pretty good idea of what happened, though, and I hope it gives some hope for the future.  It's the Michael Crichton syndrome.Remember long ago, when Michael Crichton wrote extremely entertaining novels based wholly on his strengths?  He is obviously very bright, and has a real talent for turning ideas about hard-science into fun dramas, like The Andromeda Strain.  Then he became so popular, and so lauded, that he started to believe his own hype.  He read so many reviews of his own books citing him as the greatest writer ever, and as the man whose every word was golden, that he started to believe it.  And so he started to write books filled with what he thought was subtle intrigue, pithy character interaction, and literary depth.  Unfortunately, he wasn't that kind of writer.  He wasn't Delillo, or Dickens, or Wolfe, and he shouldn't have tried to be.  So those books ended up being further towards the 'crappy' end of the spectrum.Then something happened - I don't know if his editors pulled in the reigns, or if his family sat him down to have a talk, or maybe he started to pay attention to the fans that he was disappointing (I hope).  Whatever it was, it got him to accept a bit of humility, and to go back to his strengths.  The results being Timeline, and then Prey - fun books about hard-science extrapolated into entertaining dramas.So therein lies my hope for Robert Jordan.  His strengths are in describing an interesting world, in creating things that are mysterious and engaging, and in writing very cool action sequences.  Recently he seems to think he's the next F. Scott Fitzgerald; and failing spectacularly.  He obviously, for example, thinks that he has something deeply important to say about the sexes and about the clash of cultures, and maybe he does, but he sucks at saying it.  More importantly, IT'S NOT WHY WE READ THE WHEEL OF TIME.  If we want to read about the subtleties of culture and its affect on the interactions we have, there's plenty of Dostoevsky available.Mr. Jordan obviously possesses a stubbornness akin to that he ascribed to the people of the home village of his protagonists (whoever they are anymore).  I just hope that eventually someone will smack him hard enough to wake him up, and we'll find ourselves with another "Eye of the World" or "The Great Hunt"
Completely wrong on all 10 reasons. Anyone who is looking for an economic analysis on why the IMF and World Bank (something that should be done rigorously) should be abolished should look elsewhere.  This book is not a condemnation of the IMF and the World Bank, but a condemnation of free trade and capitalism.He talks about how markets create inequality.  My response to that is: so what?  People by their very nature are unequal, with skills that are in various states of demand.  It is not surprising that an electrical engineer is more valuable, thus gets paid more than and cashier and that a CEO gets paid more than an electrical engineer.  The more scarce and in demand (i.e., valuable) your skills are the more you will get paid.  Another example is the following: Suppose John makes $20/hr and Jason makes $15/hr, then at the end of the year John gets a 10% raise and Jason get a 5% raise.  The inequality between the two have increased, BUT they are both better off because they each make more.  Even more importantly, though, is that countries that evolved using markets (the West) have far less economic inequality than countries using so called "planned" economies, i.e., markets do NOT increase inequality, but centrally planned economies do.He then talks about how businesses will deplete any and all resources in the name of the bottom line, using the logging industry as an example.  No industry is so foolish and short sighted.  The logging industry knows that if it cuts down every last tree, then it will no longer be in business, so they take steps to avoid this.  They modify trees to grow faster, plant a tree for every one they cut down, and rotate through different patches, coming back to the same patch of trees when they are matured, thus they are able to produce on a finite amount of space, without having to expand.  The faster a tree can grow the less space is needed to get the same amount of logging.  In fact, forest coverage over the world has increased over that last 80 years.  Not only is this push for efficiency (doing more with less) true for the logging industry, but is true for all industries.  And as technology improves, so does the environment.Outrageously, he says that the average worker in developed countries are worse off due to free trade.  Any check on the facts shows this to be clearly false.  Todays average citizen in any developed nation has so much wealth as to be incomprehensible to anyone who lived 100 years ago.  In fact, we live in a time of such abundance that even those who can afford cell phones, cars, microwaves, refridgerators, cable TV, etc. are considered to live in poverty.Another of his 'reasons' on the fallacy of free trade is that none of the developed countries developed in the absence of government intervention.  While this is true, what he ignores is that the developed countries developed in an economic atmosphere of substantially less government intervention than in the past.  In all of economic history, all around the world, governments have controlled and directed the economy.  But most technological and commercial advances took place when governments were weak.  As a result, the idea of personal liberty was established during the Enlightenment period.  When this took place, the economies of the Western world exploded, giving them the capital to explore and develop.  This is the primary reason for the dominance of the West.Another idea about the evils of capitalism and free trade is downsizing.  Companies downsize because they can do more with less.  The agricultural revolution means that 1 or 2 people can create enough food for 98 or 99 people.  This frees up the 98 or 99 people to do other things besides worry about where they are going to get their next meal.  Today, the manufacturing sector in America produces 95% more than it did in 1970, with only 75% of the people in manufacturing during the 1970s.  This means that productivity per worker increased by more than a factor of 2.  When this occurs companies will naturally lay off workers.  Instead of viewing this as an evil, it should be viewed as what it actually is: allowing labor to go where it is most needed.  Due to the efficiency of agriculture people were free to work on other things (creating the division of labor), like manufacturing, and creating newer and better services, instead of toiling away on the farm.I can't remember all of his 'reasons' since I wasn't foolish enough to buy this book, but all of his other 'reasons' are just as weak in fact and logic.  Don't buy this book.  All but 2 or 3 sentences are wrong
As sick, pretentious and nasty as could be. We all know that O.J. Simpson is 1000% guilty of this horrific double-murder and that he was able to buy justice thanks to his shameless "Dream Team" lawyers (or liars) and their utterly despicable tactics. Despite the countless lies found here, what I find most offensive, nasty and sickening is how Simpson refers to himself as being a "battered husband"--Say What???!!! Lies, more lies and nothing but big, nasty and fat lies
This was a really pathetic excuse for a seller. The first book that was sent to me was defective.  The pages in it were out of of order and the book was missing about 80 pages.  The seller assured me he would send another book, which was also defective in the exact same way.  The seller has not contacted me despite several efforts to contact him and resolve the issue.I am never speaking to/dealing with this seller again
United States Navy Seal Workout Book. Very basic and largly a disappointment.Too many pictures on free hand excercises .A much better book is Lofty Wisemans SAS Personnel Trainer ,more content ,much better sections on swimming,running,heaps better on weight training and motivation ,not to mention nutrition,the section on maintaining positive thoughts is excellent
Overall, there is no need to purchase this card set. The main problem with OrgoCards is that it is not really a set of two sided flash cards.  It is simply a shortened text book in card form.  The cards are not 3 X 5 index cards and they contain a lot of information on them, much of which is not really necessary.  You are better off making your own flashcards
Really, really bad. This is my first time dipping into Barnes's Carlotta Carlyle series, and I can't say I was in any way impressed.  This novel is both underwritten and clumsy, full of cliches, poorly drawn characters, false tension, silly narrative developments, and ultimately a revelation that makes absolutely no sense.  I don't believe in putting spoilers in these reviews, so I won't describe the utterly absurd revelations that come at the end of this novel, but suffice to say that to call it half-baked would be to insult all the half-baked books out there.  I am glad Barnes's many fans find enjoyment in her works, and I hope they can continue to do so, but for a reader who is looking for something other than a lifeless installment in a feisty female detective series, do yourself a favor and look elsewhere
waste of money. I'm very interested in innovation and reading almost anything is out there. This book is horrible. Disguised in an "innovative" format, it is absolutely useless
I would not recommend it to an associate. The books attempts to give the reader a short introduction or insight into process mapping. Yet, it would go to in-depth for the basics. In addition, the author guises the reader by using different terminology for maps, such as deployment flowcharts, and IDEF models. The astonishing fact about the  book is that in the end it attempts to tell you how to analyze a business.  Readers are better off reviewing rengineering books
Annoying. The author's failed attempt to be cute and clever is very annoying. I guess he wanted to follow the style of Hofstadter, Paulos, Berlinski, and others. The problem is he's just not a good writer.
Nap time. This was the first and last Iris Johansen book I will read. I thought oh I need something to do at work since its going to be slow today (I work in a library). So I broght it with me and it was so boring I actually fell asleep! I will not be finishing this book. It has no substance. I do not recommend it to anyone. It is a waste of time and money. Although if your looking to take a nap then go ahead and read it
I get it..... The game of golf is racist and sexist.  I get it.  In fact, I got it after the first twenty times Sounes whines about it
There's no future in Murray's dreaming... This book came highly recommended to me.  With all the hype surrounding its apparent genius I expected to be blown away.  Sadly though, this book comes across as someone who has just played a video game for the first time (MYST) and decided that the kids might be on to something.  Murray proclaims that one day in the distant future, they'll make a 'holodeck' and we'll finally have true immersion.  In the mean time, we can gloss over all the interactive components that make such an experience compelling in the first place.  The future of gaming/narratology/ludology whatever-you-want-to-call-it is already here.  You don't need a "VR Suit" or some imaginary technology to have a truly immersive experience.  Her woefully uninformed look at the games of her day are completely inexcusable:"...interactors will be lured into worlds where they float, tumble, and arc through thrillingly coloured spaces, fly through imaginary clouds and swim lazily across welcoming mountain ponds.  The nightmare landscape of the fighting maze, in which we feel imperiled may give way to enchanting worlds of increasingly refined visual dealight that are populated by evocative fairy-tale creatures."At the time of this book's publishing (1997) games such as Jumping Flash, Mario 64, and Tomb Raider had already taken the world by storm. By reducing contemporary gaming to mindless, juvenile violence (while championing those themes in 'War & Peace', 'Hamlet' and 'Star Trek') Murray shows a complete lack of interest and imagination.The heavy hand of narrative is not the only way to tell a story.  We don't need a "cyberdramatist" the likes of a Dickens or a Shakespeare to show us the way.  She could have explored the work of Miyamoto, Wright or Kojima and the stories that arise out those gaming experiences.  Instead she focuses on the Miller Brothers because they offered up the most conventional form of storytelling.  Eight years on, their impact is almost forgotten.  Above all, people want to act - not in the theatrical sense, but in the name of imaginative 'play'.  Maybe someday she'll prove us all wrong and the "Dr. Quinn Holodeck" will sweep us up in the rapturous joy of existing in a town populated by:"...blacksmiths, barbers, general store owners, saloon keepers, scouts, and, of course, female doctors and who could be given their own homesteads or boardinghouse rooms in particular physical locations within the fictional world."Sounds like fun.Criticism aside, I did enjoy the chapter "Eliza's Daughters".  Murray's look at procedural characters and believable agents proved informative and intriguing.  If only the rest of the book were as objective and plausible then I might actually believe the hype surrounding, "Hamlet on the Holodeck".
It upset my mother. I bought this book for my mother, who is currently battling ovarian cancer. I bought it to inspire her, and let her know that there are survivors out there. Well, the introduction was written to dramatize the book. It went on and on about how few people survive ovarian cancer (not true!!) and what a miracle it was that the writer survived. Consequently, my mother got extremely depressed. She never read the whole book because the introduction upset her so much
Unfulfilled promise. The premise of the store is interesting.  How did left tackle become one of the most important positions in football?  The first half of the book does a fair job of walking through the reasons.  (West Coast offense, LT, etc.)Unfortunately, at that point Lewis runs out of things to write about, so he starts talking about Michael Oher, an O Lineman at Ole Miss.  Oher's story is intersting, but it is too early to tell.  He is a "superstar" but only a sophomore.  I also think that Lewis overdoes how great Oher already is.I also don't really understand what Oher's story really had to do with the original premise of the book.  Is Lewis saying that because left tackles now make millions, Oher wants to be one?  I would think that if Oher had come around in the 70s people would still have thought of him as a football player.  Last time I checked lineman were big and strong (and quick) in that era too.
It gets no stars from me. My professor for separations was really smart, but like most chemical engineering professors that I have met, they are too smart for their own good. He chosed this book because it was "easy to understand".Chemical engineering is hard enough, and the fact that this book is used in most separations classes does not help. Each chapter starts off with an industrial example, which is confusing if you're not familar with it already. The authors just throw out concepts that you've never heard before and assume you're an industry expert. As thorough as the book is, you won't feel like a better person after having read it. The authors don't seem to want to teach the subject but rather flaunt their knowledge. The most annoying thing is when the authors get to solving problems. They just start applying equation after equation and don't tell the readers where they get it from. Sometimes, it's not even an equation from that chapter or from the book!I don't consider myself a bad student, but I seriously could not do most of the assigned problems at the end of the book. How do I become a chemical engineer then? I prefer McCabe's Unit Operations in Chemical Engineering. Although it is not as thorough, and the equations are presented differently, I actually learned something and was interested in the subject matter. The authors relate the theory to real life, and it actually makes sense. In fact, I had to use the McCabe to solve some of the problems from this hellish book
All I  Can Say. I've given up on Dickey, this book wasn't good at all, and I gave an extra star. Nothing like his first books, and I know he can write better. I'm afraid to even read another after this one and Drive Me Crazy which wasn't much better to me.
Poorly Written. This book is poorly written with no editing done whatsoever.  There are constant misspellings and grammatical errors that detract from the book.  Although there are some interesting aspects to the book, I could not get over the way it was written
He gets important stuff wrong. I come with an axe to grind.  I wrote two playwriting books of my own.  But one of the reasons I wrote them is because I found so much in this one so wrong-headed.  The idea of starting with a theme or intellectual premise is so bass-ackwards as to be jaw-dropping.In my experience, you don't start with a theme, you find yourself attracted to characters in a situation that compels you to explore them and it.  Sometime during the middle of the writing (if you're writing honestly), you may find out what the play's theme is.  But theme should emerge organically, not be imposed from the beginning.  To start with theme is like trying to build a skyscraper from the top down.  It may be where you want to go, but, like building a building, you need to start with scaffolding and a foundation.I trust that when I'm grabbed by character and situation that there has to be some underlying thematic pull.  I don't want to force finding what this is out too early.  If I surprise myself a little, I have a good chance of surprising and delighting the audience.Now, there is a different craft to writing the first draft and doing rewrites.  I suspect that some of Egri is more applicable to the second stage.So, yes, obviously I prefer my own books (THE DRAMATIST'S TOOLKIT and SOLVING YOUR SCRIPT).  Also, Thornton Wilder wrote a terrific short essay on the subject in which he talks about the differences between writing fiction and drama.  Since he is the only writer to have won the Pulitzer Prize for both, he comes to the subject with credibility.I mean, when is the last time you saw a production of an Egri play announced?
Bad Compilation. Although compiled by someone who is supposedly an English expert, the manner in which verses are compiled in the book is much like ready on very long run-on sentence.  More thought should have been given to a format that is more readable
King Rat the Worst of the Clavell Saga. James Clavell's "King Rat" is hands down the worst of his Asian saga. Only related to the other four by the main character's possession of a "gold ring, signet of the Clan Gordon" (italics) mentioned once on the seventh page. Any reader of Clavell would expect this to have some significance later but the thread never reemerges. Did the author forget about it, carried away by his clearly sophmoric adulation of his Hero?  Or did he toss it in at his publisher's request in order to somehow justify this waste of print by weakly connecting it to his better works. And what is this shiftless down-and-out motherless drunkard's son doing with such a treasure anyway?  Surely that would have made a more interesting book. Of course, the matural answer is that Clavell is telling his own story, what he lived through as a POW. He has, however, forgotten the first rule of freshman exposition: "Just because it happened to you, doesn't make it interesting."  Certainly, there are traces of the Clavell magic--despite his always hackneyed prose, he is a master storyteller, but in this case the threads lead nowhere and peter out where a quick death would be more merciful. A large theme is built up around a secret radio, but when discovered not once but twice the Japanese commander who has been built up as a terrifying menace offers cigarettes to all involved. None are tortured,jailed or even questioned.  It is as if he is uncertain as to whether he wants to write The Gulag Archipelago or Catch 22 and settle for Hogan's Heroes" (of TV sitcom fame).  Changi makes Stalak 13 look the Hanoi Hilton. There is even a Corporal Schwarz-like Japanese guard who, like his sitcom counterpart has "no stomach for war" and comes close to saying "I know nothing-Nothing!"  Clavell,who knows how to spin yarn, would be great on a campout and we cannot forget the majestic sweep of his four ?good? books, but, like the t-shirt says, "I spent nearly four years in a Japanese POW camp and all could come up with was this lame book. I was going to give the book away but instead chucked into the recycle bin.
Was it worth it?. I found the book "A Gathering of Days" interesting and filled with small pieces of history, but it was hard to comprehend and hard to read. The format of the book, journal entries written by a young girl, is neat, but her usage of out-dated words is odd and it takes time to grasp her meaning. Although this book was directed to a younger audience, I believe that older kids would better understand the phrases and words used. If you are interested in reading and seeing for yourself how life was and how people spoke in the 1800's, this book is perfect. The story was sweet and descriptive, but in my opinion, it is a one-time around book, and did not leave a huge impact on me.
Round holes and square pegs. I enjoyed re-reading the fables by HC Anderson again but by trying to link it to the business world, it seemed like the author is trying to make a square peg fit into a round hole. So, to enjoy the book, read the fable, read the wisdom for the workplace portion as a stand alone. Some of the ideas suggested by the author are gems although no new ground was broken
In Hindsight. Nearing completion of my first semester of law school, I can say that the gross majority of advice in this book was totally incorrect. It was actually detrimental to me to read this book
Spare your 4th grader... Let me start by stating that im a 24 year old university educated individual.This book was thrusted into my face and forced into my brain when i was in forth grade.  It was by far the most driest and boring book i've ever read at that point in my life...and continue to be so until college.  Now, i dont remember anything at all about this book other than the fact it was about some boy writing letters to some man; but the fact that i dont remember anything gives you an idea at how little i stimulted.Till this day, im reluctant to even bother to re-read this book and give it another chance.  I've been scarred for life.I have no doubt that this books contains a lot of substance and insightful tales, but the thought of reading some poor pathetic boy's letters causes me to shriver.If i would have to chose any book of my childhood that discouraged me from reading more, it would have to be this.  PLease spare your child/student from the tortures of this book.  Maybe once they've grown mentally and have the capacity and patience to understand it, it would be a great book.  But at such a young age, its a horrible read.I noticed that this book recieved some high marks from young readers; for some reason i feel that those ratings may be incorrect and the young children's opinions may have been "clouded".  Do you teacher's know no shame?
Only Promises What It Delivers. In this book, Byron York only promises to present the evidence of a vast Left-Wing conspiracy - and that is all he presents.  The discussion here is limited to what left-leaning money has done. Primarily, this amounts to a muckraking castigation of George Soros for pointing out the fascistic tendencies inherent in Bush Administration policies and a denigration of Soros' concerns that the US is now, currently, moving in the same direction as NAZI Germany in the period between the World Wars.There is no discussion here of any sort of moneyed conspiracy on the other side of the aisle:  no reference to the vast amounts of AmWay (DeVoss family) money available to smear Democrats and moderate Republicans; no reference to the vast amounts of  WalMart (Walton family) or Timkin (Timkin family) money available to do away with a justified and justifiable estate transference tax; and absolutely no reference to the extremely close, and extremely profitable, relationships between George Bush and Ken Lay (Enron) or between George Bush and Jack Abramoff (Republican corruption and treason)
Wolf in Sheep Skin. If you are a Christian, this book isn't for you. It is full of blashphemy, concluding that we must "... forgive God" and that we must love God "... even if He isnt perfect". Kusher even has the will to say that "...God would not be God..." without our love for Him. At one point he reduces God to an aminal saying that in the garden of Eden, when God said "...let US make man in OUR image" he was speking to animals and creation. Kusher explains that God created the world, and in the next paragraph that we came by evolution.Since when was God in need of forgiveness? Isnt it that "... God so loved the world" and it wasnt us that loved God? I have no words in describing this book. It is full of error, because it does not base it self on the Gospel of Jesus Christ. All this book does is frees you from the thought that you are a sinner, and that it isnt your fault, and that actully you are a good person. Why do bad things happen to good people? Wrong question. There are no good people in the world in the first place. " for all have sinned and come short of the glory of God..." The world is in sin. The world DOES NOT HAVE GOOD PEOPLE!! Only by the grace of God, through faith in Jesus Christ you are made righteous. I beg you in the name of Jesus Christ to stay away from this book. It hasnt helped 4 million people, but it lied to them. Kusher, please turn from your ways and come to Jesus, then will you understand the life question "WHY"
A Poor Imitation of Michael Crichton!. Iles tries to imitate Michael Crichton with bits of Dan Brown's Digital Fortress in this book.  Unfortunately this book does not make it.  The NSA is backing a project called Trinity which is to develop a super quantum computer that is controlled by a brainscan of a human mind.  Two of the individuals involved with the project want it halted and one dies in an apparent stroke which was actually induced by the NSA bad guys (why does the NSA always have to be portrayed as the bad guys in these books?).  David Tennant is the other individual and he gets away by stopping an unstoppable hitman and then persuades his psychiatrist to run with him, even though she thinks he is mentally unstable.The plot really gets out of hand with Tennant having visions of being Jesus, being portrayed to the Secret Service as the next Oswald and escaping the entire Washington DC police and SWAT units and ultimately getting out the country with a false passport, going to Israel and then persuading the head of the Moussad to help him.  As crazy as it sounds the end is literally unbelievable that would even make a James Bond fan cringe.The author has written some great tense books (24 Hours, Sleep No More) so I just chalk this one up to an experiment gone awry.
Wow, how did this ever get published?. This is just a REALLY bad book.  First I blame James Patterson, but I really REALLY blame his editor.  What editor worth his salt would allow this mess to be published?The villains are so grotesque as to be almost cartoon villains.  Just - over the top. The plot line is unbelievable.  Aside from Alex Cross and the two villains, nobody in this book gets more than a few pages before they disappear forever.  Alex Cross spends more time eating meals than using the resources of the FBI to foil the villains.  This is supposed to be one of those "the villains have given us a deadline before they blow up the world" type thriller but - there's no sense of urgency, and the law-enforcement agencies on the case are poorly sketched, and inept (but not deliberately written that way).I could go on and on but it's not worth the words.  This book is REALLY a waste of time.  I can't believe anybody published it
Nice idea but poorly executed. While it is interesting to imagine what a great composer would think of the modern day, I have to say that this attempt fell short. Much of Schubert's character seems cartoony and under-developed. While many of his activites are true to form, the manner in which they are portrayed undermines the real man. Granted it is incredibly difficult to give this character a life, especially without dialogue. However, Marson's lack of understanding of music of any kind handicaps the novel beyond repair. The story suffers from dead wieght and that is given in exchange for more meaningful development. I know that many people enjoyed the book, but I did not. I suppose that as a musician, I am more critical than other readers. I do seriously doubt the long term quality of this book and I suspect in 10 years it will be forgotten.
Polaroid Nudes. Why would a photo artist choose a large format for Polariod-sized pictures?  That's what you get with Andreas Bitesnich's Pola Nude.  There is not one picture in the entire book that takes up more than half the page.  With approximately 60% of the pages what you get is two polariod-sized pictures side by side-- quarter-inch white borders and the rest is black background.  I get so tired trying to see what the picture is about, that I literally get fatigued looking at this book.Many of the pictures seem interesting.  However, with much of the magic of the human form obscured by small format photos lost in a sea of black, there are too few rewards to justify the price.
Let's act like we have something to hide!. What does it mean when someone gets excessively-defensive?It doesn't express that they have peace or comfort with themselves.Writing sludge like this just fuels the fire - that I suppose they are trying to put out. If .. there .. WAS .. ever .. a .. fire.
Disappointed. I don't know whats going on in the art quilt world these days, but it seems to me that the more you can change the structure of the fabric, the more chance you have to get into a venue like this. These quilts pretty much all look alike to me, and it appears to me that the artists have qualified for this venue by slopping,dropping, and plopping as much gunk on the fabric as it can hold. There is more to art quilting than surface design!  I do have to say that there are some truely breathtaking works in this book, but over all I was extremely disappointed. There is more to art quilting than pure abstraction and embellishment
Don't waste your money!. A very poor effort from the point of view of a child.  There are many errors in the book that will be caught by a four-year-old. Examples, Mesosaurus (a non-dinosaur marine reptile) and Eryops (an amphibian!!) are classed as dinosaurs and my four-year-old found these and about 8 others immediately.  This book does have a saving grace, though, you can use it to introduce the child to critical thinking skills
Snotty and obnoxious. Bryson is certainly witty. But any pleasure in the book was ruined by the author's snotty and obnoxious tone. I can not understand why the author thinks he is better than the people everywhere he visits; there is certainly no objective evidence in support of his inflated self-image. What a whining, immature, mean jerk. And by the way, there's a fair sprinkling of gutter language in the book.
Uninspired. Neither thoughtful nor thought-provoking, this book provides no meaningful information for adults, nor for children.  What a disappointment
Very disappointing, not a good Arthurian retelling at all!. I haven't read King Arthur and His Knights of the Round Table since I was in high school, but I have become fascinated with the retelling of the Arthurian tale written by various authors.  I picked up Guenevere, Queen of the Summer Country because someone had recommended the book as one of the best retelling tales centered on the legend of King Arthur.  Bah!  This uninspired, uninteresting novel has left a bitter taste in my mouth.  In this retelling, Queen Guenevere lives in the Summer Country, where women rule and take on various lovers other than her husband.  Marrying King Arthur, a Christian instead of a Pagan, means trouble and destruction in Camelot, especially after she meets Sir Lancelot.  Guenevere and Arthur try to create a more peaceful environment for all faiths in Camelot, but there are people who will not allow it, like Merlin and Arthur's sisters, namely Morgan Le Fay.The aforementioned synopsis is similar to the original tale, which means that not much has been added in this version.  The only difference between this book and the original Arthurian tale is the manner the story is told is quite insipid to me.  Rosalind Miles tries to write the tale from a feminist's point of view, making Guenevere a woman with power in her own right and someone who tries to avoid the overtake of Christianity in Camelot.  But neither her story nor Arthur's is interesting to me.  Not even Merlin and Morgan are fascinating enough to keep me riveted.  I forced myself to read this book in an effort to justify spending fifteen dollars on it.  I won't be giving the other two parts of this trilogy a whirl.  Thank God I hadn't bought them!  I guess I'll have to look for a good King Arthur retelling elsewhere.  I've heard Queen of Camelot by Nancy Mckenzie is good.  I hope I'll have better luck with that one
Extremely disappointing. It is hard to express how disappointed I was with Divine Utterances.  To reiterate a previous review: lets hope that this is not the future of ethnography.  The personal slant to the writing, along with seemingly pointless flowering and embellishing was quite embarassing to read.  Hagedorn comes off as being very self-centered.  I read this is in a seminar, and unfortunately, all anyone wanted to speak on was the confusing writing style.  The content of the book was lost in the presentation.  I would not recommend this book to anyone wanting to learn about Santeria or Afro-Cuban culture.  I would perhaps recommend it if you are studying folkorization, or performance and wanted a supplementary reference
Do not recommend. This book is full of typos; what happened to proofreading...is that a lost art/job?This book is also a good example of what Andy Rooney spoke of; authors making thousands on the backs of others.  Nothing is original by the author in this book; it is merely a compliation of the works of others.  You would think at least, since the author did have to compose anything, she could have at least proofread it
Worst book I have read in a long time!. I have never read a Danielle Steel novel, but my friend bought it when we were inter-railing through Europe last week so I picked it up out of sheer boredom.The grammar is atrocious, and the repetitiveness highly irritating. How many times do Sasha and what's his name need to break up and get back together? How often does Sasha need to cry about this artsy guy?This book was so annoying that I had to literally put it down and stop reading it.I will never pick up another Danielle Steel book, and I am still appalled that the publishing world even let this one be published!
Information you can find surfing the net. Buy this if you want to purchase every book on this subject,or buy The Concierge Manual for $15 more and you won't need to look any further
An underachievement. Not very good scholarship. I settled down to read this book, hoping I would find a stimulating rejoinder to Richard Noll's work, and was disappointed. If this is the best critique of Noll that the Jungians can muster, then the Jungian community  is in deep, deep trouble. Shamdasani detests Noll -- and that is the only  fact one learns after reading this short book. I wasted my money buying it.  I would urge others to pass on this one and wait for more sophistated works  of Jung criticism to appear
Absolutely Nothing New. I too have the Photoshop 7 edition of this book and I could not be more disappointed. Same actions, same text, same pictures, same everything. This is close to criminal
Elizabeth MacPhearson. This is the weakest book of the series.  I have now read them all, through PMS Outlaws.  The book has the witty style of the other Elizabeth MacPhearson mysteries, but didn't hold my interest very well.  It is important to the series, though, because it tells us a lot about Milo, who is featured in two subsequent books, and it introduces Elizabeth to forensic anthropology.  The ending is a bit of a surprise, so I guess that's in the story's favor
good...but lacking. an incomplete edition. While this story is truly an essential writing of Dostoevsky, it lacks the appropriate context to be read as sold in this copy.  If you are interested in reading "The Grand Inquisitor" without reading the rest of The Brothers Karamazov, I would recommend the Guignon edition, sold for only a little more.  This work includes the two chapters preceeding "The Grand Inquisitor" as well as what Dostoevsky intended as the refutation for this tale, "The Russian Monk," which follows this legend.  Dostoevsky did not intend for this to be separated from the book as a whole, but I think it could be legitimately done when read with a little more context than is present in this copy.  Additionally, this alternate edition includes a very complete introduction by Charles Guignon, which is much more informative than the brief one by Anne Fremantle provided in this copy.It is important to remember that "The Grand Inquistor" was not Dostoevsky's final answer in The Brothers Karamazov.  Reading this edition alone provides a flawed view of both Dostoevsky's writing and philosophy and The Brothers Karamazov.I would recommend reading the book as a whole instead [and I particularly recommend the Pevear and Volokhonsky translation for that: it is much more accurate to the original Russian].  Or at a minimum, reading the other edition of this book.  Either way, you will get a more complete glimpse to the genius of Dostoevsky, which this fails to provide.The Grand Inquisitor is truly an essential read, but not in this presentation of it
Remote spewing. I first came across the subject of remote viewing one night as I was switching tv channels and found a show about "psychic spying".  Imagine my shock when they showed a picture of my own company, SRI International! I've always been interested in anything exploring psychic phenomena, but to learn that this type of research was started at my own company in the '80s was exciting stuff indeed.The next day at work I learned there were still people here who remembered this program and the scientist who started it, Hal Putoff (not sure of last name spelling).  Some of my coworkers said at the time (of the project's heyday) they experimented with lots of employees, sometimes they'd put a bunch of regular folk in a giant room and give them coordinates to see if anyone could "view" them. Needless to say, scientists are a hard crowd and many found it amusing if not silly.  Physicists I know who worked with Dr. Putoff said the army eventually took over the project. This is told in the documentary I mentioned above. Dr. Putoff was also interviewed in the tv show and so were many others including some of the remote viewers.So I was thrilled when this book, "Psychic Warrior" was published.  I had hoped it would have tons of more information about what the project was doing now. But then I read it, and was utterly disappointed.  Like "Linus" the reviewer above I think this book was poorly written and the author is completely full of himself.  His constant grandstanding and egomania makes this very hard to get though to the interesting parts about the actual remote viewing.Also I wonder about how someone can work on a top secret project and then write a tell-all book about it.  Perhaps the author made a deal to embellish certain parts of his story so it wouldn't be taken too seriously.  Either way, if you think you can wade through all the boring garbage about his home life and how great he is, you might possiblly learn a little.  But I can't recommend this book as a tool to help you get there
2 1/2 Stars: Gasping for Breath. Elizabeth Berg has written several humane, touching, so real they hurt novels about relationships: patient/nurse (the affecting "Never Change"), families ("Say When"): and she's  written them with uncommon grace, knowledge and understanding of what makes Us tick.The genesis of "We are All Welcome Here" was a letter from a fan, Marianne Raming asking Berg to write about her Mother who was stricken with Polio before Marianne was born. In the prologue to this novel, Berg at first recoils then warms to the idea, telling her fan: "(your) Mother's circumstances will serve only as inspiration for a different story that I will make up...if you want her real story to be told, contact a non-fiction writer."Unfortunately, Berg may have had better luck writing this book in the non-fiction form for as it is "WAAWH" is mostly flat and uninvolving except that the central story: a Mother trying everything that she can to raise her child despite being incapacitated by Polio and living in an Iron Lung, is without a doubt rife with drama and tension. Berg's novel isn't.  What it is, is flat and oddly enough very much like reportage.Berg, in her quest to avoid the trappings of non-fiction, falls victim to them nonetheless with the "just the facts" style of prose she adopts here.And then I read this gorgeous scene at the very end of the novel: "It's everywhere, she said and those were the last words I heard her speak. She meant redemptive beauty, I think. Despite her many obstacles, what my mother succeeded best in doing was appreciating the many forms of beauty in life...as well as its possibilities. And she relished perhaps more than any other mother could the growth of her daughter, seeing in me a part of herself set free."If only this novel as a whole could have been as elegant, as perceptive, as intelligent as these last few words on the last page of this book.
Good Information about the FBI but NOT A GUIDE TO EMPLOYMENT. This book serves a good purpose by giving the reader a general history of the FBI and some war stories of some agents.  But the title is MISLEADING.  Fully 2/3 of this book have nothing to do with a guide to employment with the FBI.  The 1/3 which does deal with this subject is almost taken verbatim from the FBI's employment website and consists of generalized statements.  Not too much help here
fitting finesse. for a novice sewer I found it to complicated to follow
Not what I expected at all after a long wait to be released. I've been waiting for this book to come out because I thought it would have information on a Chinese Wedding that I could share with my daughter. The books has very little information on Chinese Weddings other than why a bride wears red which is a lucky color and the traditional wedding outfit. I was hoping for more infomation like the tea ceremony and other things.This book is basically about a young girl that fears that her Uncle will no longer have a special place in her heart and life for her once he gets married. And the artwork is not what I'd call the best. For me this was a long wait for just a OK book. This book could have had great potiental and done so much more
Not much of a "game", mostly "travel log". I read some of the reviews about this book present on this site and was somewhat surprised to see mostly positive ones. Maybe it is just my perception or the expectation I had after reading these reviews but before buying the book that lead to my disappointment in the book. What were my expectations...? I did expect Galen to tell me what he thinks and feels before, during, and after taking those great pictures. I did NOT expect a HOW-TO book (which it is definitely not). I expected a book about artistic approach to the outdoor photography. What I found instead was mostly a travel log. The first 2 chapters were as close to my expectation as it ever got. The author talked some about his creative approach and very little about his technical one. The rest of the book doesn't even present his "photographic philosophy". He simply talks about his travels, places he visited, people he met. All that would be great for an illustrated travel book but not for a book that was supposed to tell me about how HE came to those pictures, what (in his opinion) made those pictures great or standing out (there is some of it but so little it almost doesn't exist). The book's title has "inner game" words in it. I wanted to know what that "inner" game was before, during, and after taking EACH picture (or at least most of them). Overall - disappointing and expensive for that
Overly heady writing style. I found VERY little useful information in this book...not because it isn't there but because the writing style is too "out there".  I'm sorry I bought it
Falling short of its goals. Ewing's book is about Nora Simms, the successful owner of Brickhouse, a workout center located in Harlem. The story revolves around her struggle to keep her workout center despite a local sleaze-ball Reverend's attempt to boot her. Revolving stories include her daughter's bulimia, her partner's drug abuse, her friend's marital problems and oh, a romance.To be honest, there is a lot of potential here. Ewing's idea is fresh, her prose has a nice voice, but the book either needed to be about... 300 pages longer, or take out half of her characters' issues. Ewing just takes too much on and still tries to keep things light. It makes her book feel very shallow. Ewing clearly isn't afraid to be real, but she spreads herself so thin, she doesn't do any of the topics justice--not the substance abuse (Nona's partner's or her daughter's), not the adultery, the corruption, the struggle of young women against stereotypes--it was so FRUSTRATING!!!Nevertheless, I did like Ewing's style, and it might be worth your time to grab from the library, but don't buy it.P.S. pet peeves:--repeated references to how Nona feels connected to Harlem. Has Ewing been to Harlem? I couldn't tell. Felt that was weak. Prove it!--sex scene was totally unnecessary and gross--why include it?--are those women supposed to be Nona's friends? they're not really admirable women
No redeeming features. This is a very bad book. It is poorly written, the characters are caricatures in misery, and it is almost impossible to develop any empathy for them except for the older daughter, who suffers in silence after the devastating, and, to her, mysterious, death of her mother. Her father fails in both his calling to ministry and his responsiblities to protect his daughter. He is so distant that he believes what teachers tells him about his child's behavior, which is a perfectly legitimate childhood grief response, rather than the bad behavior that others choose to label her with indifference to her deep pain and confusion. He fails in his responsibilities to his parishoners by not realizing that he himself is mired in grief and needs a break. I couldn't finish this. It is drivel
Expensive, complicated, too fancy for me; Too much fish. More fish recipes than your normal cook-in-advance books. I didn't want to buy the book, but my cat spilled iced tea on the borrowed copy (helpful kitty). There were a few interesting recipes, but everything was way too complicated and expensive. I have since given my copy to a thrift store. If you enjoy cooking and eating gourmet recipes, but don't have the time, this might be for you. If you can borrow it at the library (via interlibrary loan if your branch doesn't have it) you can better judge it. I can't recommend it, because I found almost nothing appealing. But tastes are personal, and YMMV.Just keep the book away from iced tea and cats
The relativity of choice. Mrs. Windle's book was very entertaining although not very original.   Mostly it consists of a laundry list of the alleged activities by the 'anti's' whom she blames for all her troubles, although others may say that her career 'choice' was the cause of her grief. She specifically blames Operation Rescue's IMPACT school graduates for her decline in health and finances, but brushes aside the stigma of an &quot;image of providers as less than noble&quot; (her own words) and the visual carnage that must be the daily reproductive health scene as contributing factors. Although the subtitle of this book is 'Antiabortion Terrorism' she details many antiabortion activites which are harmless and legal.   Could these actions have significantly lowered the daily &quot;take&quot; and thus be the real reason why Mrs. Windle cried Uncle
Oops...I Did It Again. A generation before there was a Left Behind, there was The Late Great Planet Earth by Hal Lindsey and C. C. Carlson. This is the book that broke the dispensationalist view of the end times into the consciousness of America. A phemomenal best seller, it was a watershed event in the growing Christian publishing industry. For many Christians, their first reading of this book was an energizing event that shaped their future. A generation later, many of its former supporters now see in its pages a complete misreading of Holy Scripture, sensationalistic attempts to correspond Biblical prophecies to current events, and an unhealthy enthusiasm for seeing the world obliterated.So why bother with what can easily be written off as paranoid millenarianism? Well, while many have outgrown its simplistic approach to world events, it still resounds for much of the Church and this is shown in the continued audience for books by Lindsey and other "prophecy pundits." While it is certainly true that Tim LaHaye has replaced Lindsey as the popular voice of dispensationalism, it cannot be denied that Left Behind was made possible by this book.Part of the commercial success of both authors has to do with their placing the dispensationalist view in a popular book form. For LaHaye and Jerry B. Jenkins, it was the pulp novel. Back in 1970, Lindsay and C. C. Carlson did the same with a popular genre of their day - the sensationalistic expose. Like most books of this type (e.g., The Bermuda Triangle, Chariots of the Gods?, The Philadelphia Experiment, The Population Bomb), it is written in a breezy soundbite style that is long on conjecture and short on facts. Like most of these books, it was a peculiar period piece of American life at a time when the fabric of the nation seemed to be coming apart at the seams. Like most of these books, it is laughable in retrospect.If the book were out of circulation and I were reviewing this for historical purposes, I would almost be tempted to give it a free pass as a kitschy period piece...sort of a fundamentalist lava lamp. The original was so over the top and written with such enthusiasm one could almost have forgiven the fact that the authors got everything wrong. After all, it was the 1970's when wild conspiracy theories, distrust of any traditional authority, and predictions of impending disaster were all the rage. When viewed within a time frame that produced predictions of a soon to be ice age, a UFO invasion, a famine around the corner, and California falling into the Pacific Ocean, the authors' claims of the coming Armageddon look downright trendy.However, in the intervening years, the revisions of this book just kept piling up. Make a bad prediction? No problem, edit the book with the old gaffes removed, add a few trendier predictions, and release it as a new book. Lindsey, now well into middle age and hurtling towards his golden years, still clings to the long discredited dispensationalist hypothesis (Carleton's contribution is more stylistic) despite his failed scenarios. Lindsey's original view was that the end times events would take place in the 1980s (he even wrote a book The 1980's: Countdown to Armageddon trumpeting this belief). Well that didn't pan out, so he then jumped on the Y2K bandwagon (another of his books was Planet Earth 2000 A.D.: Will Mankind Survive?). Oops, wrong again. First communism was the main source of evil in the world but more recently it is Islam (a more recent book is The Everlasting Hatred: The Roots of Jihad). When one bogeyman falls, he is quick to insert a new one in its place.Between the failed predictions, the hilarious misreadings of the original languages, the bizarre correlations between apocalyptic symbolism and modern military technology, and the hysterical pleading for contemporary events fulfilling the Biblical prophecies "right before our eyes", it is not surprising many of those energized by this book became convinced of the imminent end of all things. This trend continues to this day for the many followers of dispensationalist worldview as they are perpetuated in the many novels based on dispensationalist beliefs - notably the Left Behind series of novels.If you can find a copy of the original version from 1970, it can be interesting in much the same way as a Brady Bunch episode - not for its merit but as an example of a particular moment in the consciousness of the fundamentalist subculture at a particular time. Just as many Catholics have vivid memories of nuns and the Baltimore Catechism, fundamentalists of that era will never forget this book and the movie A Thief in the Night.However, for the reedited version here presented as a guide to interpreting biblical prophecy, it is best to pass. For all its success as a cultural marker, its usefulness in properly understanding Biblical prophecy is basically nil. For this, its original purpose, The Late Great Planet Earth is completely worthless.
More from Mem Fox. I'm a fan of Mem Fox. I use her books in my class. This one, Hunwick's Egg,is a little disappointing. The main character finds an egg and we all expect it to hatch. But it doesn't and I missed the point of the book.If you like Mem Fox's books, then give it a try
Hardly Extraordinary. Hoped for a higher level Da Vinci Code, but got a weak mishmash of stilted characters with banal dialogue.  A plodding plot accentuated by silliness and guided by tedium.Perhaps I'll try writing a novel someday.  It can't be as hard as it looks if this is a published specimen.Save your money.
Unfortunately boring. I'm a very spiritual person and I was expecting this CD to provide daily inspiration and help me to remember the very few things that are important in life.  Unfortunately, for me at least, the CD is rather boring and not very inspirational.  I'm about 30 minutes in to it and have decided to stop listening to it.  Fortunately I have a Christian radio station that does a lot more for me.
Woefully Lacking. By far the least informative book I've read on Fibromyalgia. It's far too simplfied and woefully incomplete. For instance, the most diffinitive diagnostic tool for Fibromyalgia, the 18 pressure points, is barely mentioned. Called &quot;tender points&quot; in this book, the location and description of these points, how this test is correctly administered, and the important of the test are missing. Without them, you do not have Fibromyalgia. Also, I realize this book is &quot;for Dummies&quot;, but give me a break, no one is this simple. More substance and a lot less fluff are needed. Even the writing is mediocre at best. Instead, I strongly suggest you read &quot;Inside Fibromyalgia&quot; by Mark J. Pellegrino, MD (who has the condition himself.) This is my number one reference, easy enough to understand, but solid medically with accurate and sensible diagnostic and treatment help. Also, &quot;Living Well with Chronic Fatigue Syndrome and Fibromyalgia&quot; by Mary J. Shomon (a patient herself) is much better researched and better written than &quot;Dummies.&quot; This is a serious subject and even a &quot;Dummies&quot; book should be more comprehensive than this!
Not at all what I was expecting. I am a professional pet stylist, and when I saw this book advertised in one of the Groomer magazines, I immediately went to Amazon to purchase it.  I was excited to see that someone had actually written a book addressing the issues of grooming "mixed" breeds, a.k.a. Mutts.Unfortunately, I was severely disappointed.  This book provides no real information.  The author uses drawings of dogs she has groomed in the past.  These drawings are only a 'side' view, and no drawing of the all important head is included.  I am giving this book 2 stars instead of 1 only because the author, at least, attempted to write a book about mutts.The author simply suggests that you, as a groomer, determine what pure breeds the mutt resembles, and then groom accordingly.  I can tell you that in my shop, I see many mutts that are impossible to determine their lineage.  I was hoping this book detailed the different requirements of grooming a mutt, such as providing details of creating a "Teddy Bear" head on a Shih Tzu, or how to set up a "mane" when doing a strip on an Alaskan Husky.The book is short on details, and actually gave me NO new information or tips that are not readily available in any one of dozens of pure bred grooming books.  I cannot recommend this book to professional groomers as there is no detail and the drawings are sadly lacking.  I certainly would not recommend this book to the grooming "do-it-yourselfer" as there is no information concerning the basics of grooming such as proper bathing and brushing, etc.Don't experience the buyers remorse I am experiencing.  I absolutely do NOT RECOMMEND buying this book
A disappointment . . . As a collector of the entire series, no one awaited this book more than I.  I feel let down.  Of the 13 stories, (and it's only 318 pages, not 352), seven are fiction.  These were not well chosen: selections from Treasure Island and Moby Dick are not even set at sea, but are the land-based openings of the books.  The non-fiction does not live up to the billing of the editorial reviews that preceded it on this page.  There is not much shipwreck or survivial: several are more like philosophical essays as opposed to stories with an edge.  The story on diving the Andrea Doria is perhaps the best in the book, but many of us will have seen it elsewhere, as it is recent.  Why a fictional account of the Titanic and not a true one?  For a book on treasure, why nothing of Mel Fisher and the Atocha?  If you want sea adventure, the earlier book in the series, Rough Water, delivers a bigger punch.  This volume, regratably, is one that you can put down between stories
McJihad vs. Reality. This book is inexplicably influential, probably due to its catchy but ultimately meaningless title. Barber fails to convincingly analyze an interesting thesis, instead delivering an exasperating 300 page-long list of every single thing on Earth that he disagrees with. Barber contends that natural human political behavior results in smaller and smaller ethnic enclaves trying to separate themselves from the larger world, while unchecked global capitalism is erasing ethnic flavor with bowdlerized mass-culture sameness. Interestingly, Barber contends that these two contrary movements are actually in an unholy alliance, using each other's excesses as excuses for their anti-democratic behavior. That is a fascinating thesis, which makes the weaknesses of this book all the more infuriating.The first part of the book is an interminable tirade of lists within lists, of cultural trends that Barber disdains, in an avalanche of complaints that is not analytical but merely selective and arbitrary. It's all tied together with attempts at "edgy" pop culture references, made-up terminology (like the annoying "infotainment telesector"), and pseudo-intellectual quotations and namedropping. All is lumped together unconvincingly under the anemic term "McWorld," which is so vague and all-inclusive as to become meaningless. In his never-ending examples of how recent cultural trends are damaging the freedom and intelligence of the masses, Barber merely comes across as a condescending snob who thinks his own interests are superior, or a curmudgeon who thinks everything was better back in the good old days, or both. In the second part of the book, Barber proceeds to throw obtuse political science theories at various world hotspots, in which tribalism and separatism are damaging the integrity of nation-states. His umbrella term for this phenomenon is the dangerously loaded term "Jihad." Note that this book was published back in 1995, so that word was not as prevalent in Western discourse as it is now, but Barber still uses the term as a loose descriptor which is likely to offend both devout Muslims and ardent anti-Islamists.When it comes to the specifics, many reviews here and elsewhere list out the numerous flaws in Barber's arguments, and there are so many of them that a lot of reviews are necessary for the task. You can agree or disagree with various critiques of Barber's contentions based on your own personal politics. But everyone will probably conclude that in this book's final section he does not deliver on the ironic implications of his initially intriguing thesis (embodied in the book's title), and simply forwards borrowed theories on civil society and the public sector. Overall, this book is mostly the longwinded grumblings of a nostalgic know-it-all who portentously predicts doom for every single cultural and political reality of the modern world. [~doomsdayer520~
Interesting theme, but no bridge is built. William Dembski is one of the great names in the Intelligent Design-movement.  He holds a Ph.D. in mathematics and philosophy, and have earned grades in theology an psychology. When such a man writes a book and call it "Intelligent Design - The bridge between science & theology" I had great expectations that he had succeeded in making this important bridge.I think  you can read this book in at least two ways.  One, as an introduction to how the leading people behind this movement think, and for such a presentation I give the book 4 stars.  Dembski is very good at using interesting parables to illustrate his arguments.But as a bridge between science and theology it is totally failing.  And that is sad because the probability for Intelligent Design is in fact high as Dembski shows us, but Dembski mess it up through most of his book.  As science I give this book 1 star and end up with a compromise at 2 stars.Dembski uses much space to general logic.  As to show that if you have two similar books containing the same Shakespeare-play, these two books doesn't have any more information together than one of the books alone.  OK. And so what?  After pages with such stuff you begin to be impatience and wonder how and when will all this logical stuff be used to prove Intelligent Design?  And then, as you have waited and waited, Dembski finally writes that it is not space in this chapter (and not in other chapters either)to explain the Big Bang by his Intelligent Design theories.  What a disappointment.  Couldn't he instead have skipped some of the logic?  But after a while you understand that Dembski actually lacks any intentions to reveal the most basic things that normally should have concerned Intelligent Design.  He claims that intelligence leaves behind a characteristic signature in nature, and that these signatures are observable.  Why can't he tell us what this observable signatures are? He writes that God's fingerprints in nature are imperically detectible. But how? Why wont he tell us?Dembski writes that something is made by intelligence when it can show both complexity and specification.  Ink spelt on a paper can show some complexity in pattern, but it is not specified before the ink spells letters and words with meaning.  He then uses this criteria for intelligent design in nature, and call it science and a proof of Intelligent Design when nature is both complex and specified. But can you prove God this way?  I think you only can believe in Intelligent Design, and that a strong probability for God never fully can prove Him anyway. Dembski does not try to prove God either, he just confirm that God exists because he have seen him in nature as the result of intelligent design.  No one can criticise you for believing in an intelligent designer, but if you want to make this belief into science, it is not enough just to call it science, as Dembski does.  You have to fullfill certain criteria and rules to call something science.  Dembski dosen't follow these rules at all.Dembski spend much of his time in this book to criticise others for not being scientific, often just because they don't accept Intelligent Design as science.  He says that naturalism is metaphysic, and not science based on evidence.  If he had used his own definitions he uses on others, the Intelligent Design he presents wouldn't either be scientific.He neither seems to remember what he wrote some pages earlier. After "proving" that Christ was the Logo by which the world was created, he later writes that Intelligent Design not necessarily must have originated from any specifically god at all. Are you confused like me?An interesting objection to the kind of Intelligent Design that Dembski presents, namely that God interacts and design the nature all the time, is why then He design crippled people, hiv-virus an so on all the time?  Dembski just brush those with such objections off by calling them unscientific. If Dembski instead had advocated that God started it all by "shooting a billiard ball" with a very precision, that interacted with other "balls" that fine-tuned the universe and started the evolution that eventually ended up with the complicated human being, Dembski could have accepted naturalism as well as Intelligent Design, and then nature could have been responsible, at least in some way, for it's mishaps instead of blaming God, as Dembskis theories leads towards, though he denies it.In this book Dembski claims to represent, among others, the 90 % of the people in the United States who believe that some kind of transcendent force created the world. I believe the same, but fear that books like this more destroy than helps to make a bridge between science and theology.
Not what I expected. The book might be ok for a very young reader.  However, from the summary and from the other review, I thought the book would be helpful to a young person with a telescope (to help them find what's out there).  I just received the book today and am returning it because it will certainly not be useful in this way
DANTE FOR BIGOTS?. Esolen is neither a Dante scholar nor an Italian language/literature specialist.  He is an English Teacher at Providence College, a Catholic institution.   His retelling of the Divine Comedy, which appears to be based on earlier translations, is reasonably accurate and readable.  The problem comes with his notes.  They range from the scandalously inadequate to the downright offensive.  Esolen has written a number of anti-gay articles for religious publications.  This is reflected in his notes where he refers to homosexuality as "that most heinous of sins".   And there are other similarly personal and inappropriate remarks. This is not only offensive in a contemporary publication, but is totally of tune with Dante, who took a much more sympathetic and nuanced approach c.1300 AD.There are many superior translations out there.  Mandelbaum's is excellent and has good notes.  Robert and Jean Hollander's is also very fine and the notes are the most extensive and informative of all.  What the Modern Library had in mind when commissioning this translation, which is neither scholarly nor distinguished as poetry, remains a mystery.
Not in my kitchen, not on my stove!. I fancy myself an expert reader, but confess to barely emerging from my novitiate as a chef. I'm busy compiling a library of cookbooks to garnish my newly reacquired bachelor status and freshly cultivated culinary courage. Alas, this particular tome is working its way to dust-gathering status. My most recent experience: I attempted the "Piquant Boneless Chicken Breast," the recipe for which spans pages 132-133. First of all, the split breast at a medium-high heat took far longer than the suggested 4-5 minutes to cook.  So perhaps, I thought, the stove was not hot enough. Nevertheless, I allowed some time for the pan to cool to "medium" before adding the garlic and cooking for 30 seconds, as indicated in the recipe. Although the chicken took longer to cook than suggested, allowing me to believe the temperature too low, the cooled pan burned the garlic (and optional added tarragon) almost instantly.  Adding the chicken stock and lemon juice produced a scorched brown paste in the pan. Now, I happen to love the taste of burnt garlic and tarragon, and I count lifeless brown among my favorite colors, so I quite enjoyed my dinner, but I'm glad the recipe produced but a single portion. I would never have served this mess to guests.I've now tried and taken notes on six of the recipes in this book, all with similar experiences. I'd think the problem was my equipment and my incipient dotage were I having similar problems with recipes from other cookbooks.  Alas, such is not the case. "The Joy of Cooking," Pepin's books and the stuff the Silver Palate people put out all yield reliably splendid repasts. I note the five star reviews that precede mine and marvel incredulously.
Thanks...but no thanks. First, Somewhere on Amazon.com I read that the pictures in this book are FULL COLOR.  They are NOT.  I did not find this book helpful at all as far as showing the pictures to my son while he sits on the toilet.  He has no  interest in looking at these cartoon people.  I've never seen a kid have  less of an interest in anything in my life
Much Ado About Not Much. Captain Alatriste is the first in a series and, like a lot of series, you're really rooting for it to be a barnburner so you can go right out and buy the next one and then wait breathlessly for the one after that.  Unfortunately, this is not the case with Captain Alatriste.  The problem is that there isn't enough of Captain Alatriste in Captain Alatriste.  It's told through his own Sancho Panza, Inigo, his steady sidekick, who has stories of his own to tell.  But those stories only distract from the main story, which is paper thin to begin with.  Throw in a lot of songs and poems and you've got a sleepy reader
Overly broad, too generic for me!. Mr. Edwards' book needs some updating.  Also, it's a very GENERAL look at the Real Estate field.  It's a little too broad.  Mr. Edwards does not go into great detail in any chapter and he basically just gives an overview of a career in real estate.  I would tag this book as more a 'choosing a career resource book'...something someone might read if they are THINKING about real estate and know absolutely nothing about it.  If you are DEFINATELY going into real estate, buy a different book.  This isn't for you.  Most of what is in the book is so basic, anyone who has ever bought a home, knows the material (ie: he explains what a 'closing' is, what a 'downpayment is', etc.)  Sorry, but most people already know what those terms mean.  The beginning of the book takes up so much time on choosing a broker, etc.  Again, more of a 'choosing a career handbook'.  I was expecting more of a 'how-to be a successful realtor' book.  I wanted ideas and suggestions on what to do AFTER getting my license, to attract clients, get listings, etc. You won't find any of that in this book.  Sorry
What a disappointment. I read the reviews here about this book and loves mysteries.This one is a total bore
A Little Dry. Good book if you're a Booze Fighter interested in the history of the club.  Really the stories aren't that Wild
Can't I do "no stars". This book is just awful. There are such biased misrepresentations of Christians and the Bible that it would be viewed as bigoted if it were aimed at any other group of people. The Bible is misquoted, taken out of context and generally misapplied. Anyone who chooses to use this as a classroom adjunct should first be mandated to study what the Scriptures really has to say
overblown connections to Soc. Socrates would cringe that his name is in the title, and that the author attempts to draw connections to his guru self help style, and the great Greek philosopher. Do not get me wrong, the book is cute and filled with some nice cotton candy insights, but there is no way any devotee of Socrates would recognize this thinkers' profound complexity and revolutionary approach to dialogue in this writer's one dimensional philosophy and intellectulizing
Should be a 20-page paper instead. As mentioned by many reviewers, this book has a lot of preaching about the invalidity of the concept of races.What interests me to the book was the title "Mapping Human History".  10% of this book content is in this area, and if those content are condensed into a short paper, it'd make really good reading.The whole book is a quick read. The key "mapping" can be summarized as follows:1. "Out of Africa" hypothesis (sole source of modern homo sapiens is from Africa) is affirmed by genetic research.2. First wave out of Africa (~65,000 years ago) is by sea along Arabian peninsula to Indian Ocean which has two streams afterwards, one earlier stream down Oceania and a later stream up East Asia.3. "Mongoloid" characteristics are formed relatively late (~20,000 years ago? I don't recall anymore)4. Second wave is through Sinai peninsula by land ~45,000 years ago and completely displaced Neaderthals in Middle East & Europe by around ~30,000 years ago5. First wave and second wave met in (north) Central Asia from different directions6. Primarily the East Asia stream entered the Americas ~15,000 years ago (but could be earlier), though some genes from the ME/Europe stream have also entered (because of 5.)7. All these really happenned before the invention of agriculture (and culture).  Agriculture (and potentially other key technologies such as use of iron) privileges the groups who are the first to under-go population explosion.  A lot of racial mixing especially on the fringes afterwards.  This is where Jared Diamond's "Guns, Germs and Steel" picked up.If you're just interested in the mapping, you don't need to buy the book-- save it for something else.
more a reference than a good read. this book is not easy to read. it reads like an encyclopedia, and a bad one at that. i could only bear a few hundred pages of it before i felt that i was wasting my time. only for the serious medical history student
Scary. The author/illustrator of this book has done quite a few other children's books, and my son of 3 years is actually afraid of the pictures in all of them. It teaches colors and recognition of different animals very well, and the colors used are very vibrant and catchy. I love that this book comes in boardbook form, but I am very dissapointed with the illustrations
Three Points About this Book. After reading this book, I would like to make three points about it:1.) First of all, DON'T MAKE THIS YOUR FIRST DEAN KOONTZ BOOK.  This is the second book of the so-called Christopher Snow trilogy.  Read the first book in the trilogy first -- FEAR NOTHING.  The first book introduces pretty much all the key characters that you find in this book.2.) Second, please be aware that Koontz has yet to write the third book in the Christopher Snow trilogy.  This is a real shame, because SEIZE THE NIGHT ends on a cliffhanger of sorts.  Koontz has claimed that he will write the third book someday, under the title RIDE THE STORM.  But since it's been over eight years since Koontz has written a Snow novel, I wouldn't expect this book anytime soon.3.) Third, I must admit I didn't really care for this book at all, and I say that as a Koontz fan.  Lots of padding -- the action doesn't really start until page 250.  Koontz wastes a LOT of space repeating things he originally wrote in FEAR NOTHING.   I found myself skipping through this book quite a bit to get to the good parts.The plot here is also too over the top -- plot elements include time travel, killer monkeys, alternate realities, serial killers conducting government experiments -- and that's just the tip of the iceberg!  Even the characters in the book don't seem to take any of it seriously.  All the dialogue in this book is whimsical and unrealistic.  I was therefore never able to suspend disbelief for this book.  It was just too silly for my tastes.Koontz is a great writer, but his best novels are the ones that have a more believable, fast-paced plot.  Instead of this book, I would therefore recommend WATCHERS, INTENSITY, ODD THOMAS or VELOCITY.
Tired. J. Lee Grady's "Ten Lies the Church Tells Women: How the Bible Has Been Used to Keep Women in Spiritual Bondage." is as the title says, VERY freeing.DeMoss on the other hand, left me tired of the same 'ol same 'ol about women. The premise that there are lies ALL people believe is true enough, but to focus on women being decieved specifically is, well, old, tried and boring; ie, all have fallen short of the glory of God, so what's the point who's first? Please!Women are not more easily decieved,Has anyone read about Jael?, Deborah?, Abigail?, and Paul's co-workers Euodia & Syntyche "in telling others the Good News" or Pricilla (her name comes first as the principle leader) and Aquilla?More recently, Amee Simple McPhereson, Anne Hutchinson, Gladys Alward and many other women brought forth teachings of Salvation by faith and bold new churches and ministries. Let me punctuate this by saying God chose to work huge miracles through those women and chooses to work miracles through women today.Not the least of miracles is that these women overcame the patriarchal weights and followed their God given passion, and today's women can also. DeMoss misses the point that women, too, are made in the image of God, not man's image. All are subject to Christ.Alternatively I recommend, if you dare for an educated, solidly biblical challenge, Loren Cunningham's book"WHY NOT WOMEN?". (I bought 10 copies)! Loren Cunningham is the founder/director of YWAM who has (I surmise) placed more women missionaries oversees than any other Christian organization, so he may be one to whom you may want to give at least a polite "listen" .  Scriptural exegisis is by the co-author DAvid Hamilton.Please dont construe this to be saying you have to agree with Cunningham/Hamilton, but any one who is honestly facing the challenge of examining women's roles, and open to examining how Greek and Roman mindsets tainted bible interpretation throughout the church age (duh) will come out with some real good tools to recognizing gnositic thinking and GREEK thinking that warp the scriptures and ARE THE REAL deception in the church age. When David Hamilton examines the ROOTS of the deceptions men (read patriarcy) have taught women, you can see clearly God's heart in the original texts, in both TEstaments, is for the equal use of the gifts and lives of women.If it is scriptural truth that is the question in your own heart, then, you owe it to yourself to check out this very well researched book. DeMoss has good points for both genders on disappointments and unrealized expectations, but a bible commentator she is not. Everyone should just calm down a bit and read a broader spectrum on this discussion before firing "biblical" pot-shots. Read from other respected Christian men and women, and we can reason together,indeed, how to interpret the scriptures correctly. Kuddos to Cunningham/Hamilton for a brillant and long OVERDUE work!I understand Loren Cunningham (who has been married to his wife Darlene 43 years )is writing his next book dealing directly with the issue of women in marriage and relationships; I can't wait, I'll be buying 10 copies. Then I'll send one to Nancy DeMoss . Maybe then she'll feel free to get married for the first time after being single for 50 years.
The LONGEST Test Prep for the AP EH. The review is too detailed to be a review.  If I wanted to retake the Euro course, I would suggest this book.  Moreover, the "practice tests" are extremely different than the actual AP test, making the "six practice exams" effectively useless
Not the real thing. This is just a watered down version, by replacing the colorful language they have also taken away part of the beauty of the story.  I wish I had not wasted my money on this version
Totalitarianism With A Smiling Face and Radio Show. The second that you hear someone denounce someone else's politics or beliefs as "an illness", you can be sure you're in the presence of a totalitarian thinker. Michael Weiner's (nee Savage), diagnosis of liberal politics (read: Democrats) as "an illness" summons up previous political movements that traded in such diagnoses and those movements' "cures" for their sick countrymen: Nazi concentration camps, Soviet psychiatric prisons, and Maoist re-education camps, where millions of decent citizens were treated for their political illnesses, with most patients never to be seen again. Like his Nazi, Soviet and Chinese mentors, Weiner is a provincial and intolerant political reductionist, xenophopic and fearful of change, yearning for a return to a mythical "better time," and relying on the rhetoric of stultifying simplicity: Those who agree with him are well, all others are sick.Hell hath no fury like a goosestepping Jew. God help us if some crafty politician ever rises to the presidency by standing on a stack of books such as this.
Very disappointed, lots of filler with little substance. From the reviews, I was expecting more.  The word "discipline" was used so often without giving a clear definition or clear steps of how to obtain it.  A lot of the meaning of this book was lost in ramblings about their authors own lives, families, and innate discipline.Mostly the emphasis was on maintaining a strict schedule and talking to yourself in your head to trick yourself into doing something.  Yes, positive affirmation can go a long way to training the mind to achieve your goals, but this approach was unscientific and childish.Save your money
Has no solutions. I expected something completely different when I read this book.  I was expecting that this book would tell about different ways that the future would get energy to the people.This book is nothing like that the first two thirds of this book is a diatribe on how everybody is using energy the wrong way.  It tells that innovation and micro power is the wave of the future and condemns all government subsidies for energy.  He does not explain why we will be going to micro power but says that's the way it is going to be.I have to say I started reading this book and put it down for a while for the racist remarks throughout the book.  It is told from an Indian viewpoint where he makes snide remarks about the British saying that the British East Indian Company was the ultimate in evil. He makes condescending remarks about the Americans not being smart enough to have back-up generator in Silicon Valley whereas in Bangalore India they have them.He is obviously against nuclear power by making outrageous remarks about nuclear wastes not being safe for 100,000 years.  I read nuclear renewal and the waste from the newer breeder reactors is a couple of 100 years and they will reduce that as time goes on.He is all for the fuel cell and the book is very well written.  He doesn't say how we are going to get the hydrogen that we will need and talks endlessly about the Kyoto Protocol like it was the only peace of legislation that mattered on global warming.I thought there would be new ideas and processes for the future like biomass or solar chimneys.  There is nothing new or insightful this book seems more like a list of grievances.
Drivel presented with enthusiasm and gusto. This is your typical self help, motivational book. "You can Do it!", "Think you can and you can" "its all up to you and in your power""All you need is an idea, stick to it, and be rich beyond your wildest dreams". Simple fixes for all of life's complex problems. Ya, rightSave your money. I'll cut to the chase for you. Drive and determination will be what you need to succeed in anything worthwhile in this world. Stick to it and have a positive outlook. Got it? Good. Now you can spend what you would have on this book on something more worthwhile.Don't get me wrong, there is some useful stuff to be gleaned here. Yes mental outlook is huge to success. But it's still not a guarantee as the book would have you believe. Too many illogical and unsubstantiated conclusions and just plain wrong inferences and explanations for my taste
A waste of time by a thoroughly discredited author!. . .If you could sue writers for false advertising regarding what they write on bookjackets, you'd have a great case against these two! This book rehashes old legends and stories but provides nothing new. In fact, it does not even provide a good synopsis of what allegedly occurred during the &quot;experiment&quot;, providing only bits and pieces along the way. It actually sounds like an addendum to some previous work that assumes you have heard all the cool details, and provides you with a few coincidences that the authors assume support their case. A don't know much about William L. Moore, but I used to read all Charles Berlitz's books when I was a kid, as I thought the Bermuda Triangle made for some great stories. But as I got older, I realized that that's all they were. Charles Berlitz never made any groundbreaking discoveries while &quot;researching&quot; his Bermuda Triangle books, just rehashed old sailor's tales. I recall him during a guest spot on the &quot;Larry King Live&quot; program, and when I Coast Guard officer called in and provided known, verifiable details on some of his &quot;without a trace&quot; cases, Berlitz looked like a monkey. As a former Coast Guard Rescue Pilot myself, stationed for 3 years in Borinquen, Puerto Rico (one of the apexes of the &quot;Triangle&quot;), I can also assure you that it is quite easy for an aircraft or moderately sized vessel to &quot;disappear without a trace&quot;, and that there is nothing mysterious about it. . .it's a big ocean! I witnessed the indistinct horizons and other phenomena, all of which had perfectly good explanations. Save yourself some money and avoid all books that have Charles Berlitz's name associated with them unless you're reading them for &quot;entertainment purposes only&quot;
Not enough. This is the required text for my course. I've read it thoroughly and it seems great, but it definitely is not getting me the grade I want.  I'm buying a different textbook to supplement
Good Info, But Trite and Patronising. The book is filled with good definitions about the winding road that is IVF-fertility treatment is packed with acronyms, abbreviations, and science, and the author does do a good job of explaining what all of the acronyms and abbreviations are.  The book flows well and has wit, but the constant underlying message is one of success!  IVF succeeds!  Just keep your legs in the air/take to bed rest/keep thinking smiley happy positive thoughts and it always works!  As someone who's been through a few rounds of IVF and ongoing still, it's not that easy for most people.  IVF is hard enough without infusing constant messages of false hope-I feel the author is irresponsible in suggesting that IVF can be otherwise
Worst E&E Book Out There. This is easily the worst book in the E&E series
Sometimes the classics can be boring. Oh well, sometimes you get the bear and sometimes the bear gets you. Reading the classics can be boring as this classic illustrates. Goldsmith should have kept to poetry and left the novel alone else he would not have produced this mess in the form of a philosophical romance, a loosely constructed story held together by ideas. Rasselas (Johnson) and Candide (Voltaire) are much better and worth a look. Meanwhile why bother with a story wherein the hero moves episodically from security through trials to the discovery that happiness and what truths we may grasp lie at home and in the human breast. The ideas are quaint and silly. The writing stylized and artificial. The characters impossible. The plot preposterous. You have better things to do with your time - like sleep
Why do we care?. Our hero,amoral in his love life, refusing to kick his unfaithful ex-wife to the curb, and making mystery solving boring, why continue? Parker can write like no one else, but his recent plots suggest the well may be dry
I am so sorry. I am so sorry I read this book under the illusion it was a mystery type of book. The author has been writing on the edge of fictional biography/mystery, and this time she crossed the line.  I got bewildered when the "plot" never turned up, the bad guys were just so unimportant that the twins linguistic skills just overrode their appearance on the scene and Peabody's maternal instincts just couldn't be bothered with evil doers.  The book is probably fine for those who bought the author's work for reading about the sentimental family interrelations but for those who expected something more exciting it is a dissapointment.  I feel as if I was sold this book on false pretenses.
Oh. My. God. This books starts with such promise but I find it hard to believe that the people who wrote the glowing reviews were actually able to slog through it! Minutiae-fest
Sick & Twisted. I wish I could give this Zero stars.  It is a very dark book and I can't imagine why anyone would write, publish, gift it, or read it.  There is so much good literature written why do we lower ourselves to this junk?  Garbage in garbage out!
A little to much hype on here about this book. It is a good book for reading but not as a refrence.  If you in the trade and want a book for the plane ride...ok.  But will you learn anything new...Maybe.  If you read JLC (Journal of Light Construction) and keep up with the trade you won't find anything new here.  If you a novice with basic knowledge and want an overview of building that is well written but poorly photographed  and lacking when it comes to illustrations...then buy the book.  For refrence and true learning for not just professionals but every day people I would recommend JLC Field Guides or Graphic Guide to Framing...either will suit you well no matter what your level of skill.
a waste of money. A waste of money and time.Information so general that only a abolute beginner can use it.So called expert tips are common knowledge...tips for a succesful email...1 be responsive to customers tip2 be honest all times,tip3test tip4 have a good mailinglist tip4 have a good offer or quality product....WELL WELL that's great news. This book is a recyling of the recycling of the recycling....You can easly see the book has been made in a few day
If you still think cholesterol causes heart disease, this book's for you. Have you taken meat & eggs out of your diet? Are you still trying to limit saturated fat to less than 10% of your total calories? Are you popping statins to keep that cholesterol level below the maximum de jure? How about some pills for that hypertension? Do you need more little brown bottles sitting on the bathroom vanity? Don't be fooled by the title of this book. Scott Deron takes the politically correct route through the "cholesterol & saturated fat" minefield, choosing dogma over science at every turn. Where's the new information about CRP in this book? Eighty percent of this book is a rehash of the same bromides we've been swallowing for 30 years. Cardiovascular disease, meanwhile, has continued to climb unabated. If you're looking for the root cause of cardiovascular disease, you won't find it in this book. If you're looking for interventions that split with the already-disproved AMA/AHA doctrine, you won't find that here either. Do yourself a favor. Use your  money to buy Colpo's "The Great Cholesterol Con", McCully's "The Heart Revolution" or Francis' "Never Be Sick Again". Your heart will love you for it
Sorta Boring. This being the first book I read by Danielle Steel I expected more than what I got since I love the moive verisons of her book. The start gives it hope but near the end you can sense the direction that the book is taking and I like alittle unpredicatable stuff
An Adequate First Draft. I was surprised to learn, after reading Bay of Souls, that this was Robert Stone's first in five years, because it seemed hastily thrown-together.  I thought the story of Kirsten and Michael Ahearn and their son was wonderful and then more or less dropped.  According to his blurb at the back, Stone had some interactions with Madison Smart Bell.  I wish he'd written about Haiti, instead, essays, and finished the tale he started, which was like Updike with a little more edge.  Maybe I'm just not a voodoo guy, but I was sorely disappointed with the promise of the beginning of this book set against its patched-together ending
Completely pointless. As a long time and avid knitter I'm thrilled with the upswing in the popularity of the craft. With that comes both the brilliant and the boring. This book falls under the latter category. It's a basic history of knitting with pop culture references thrown in. If you have access to the internet then you have most of the pop culture portion at your fingertips. If you are looking for a history of knitting I would stick with "No idle hands" by Anne Macdonald. If you want wit and humor save your $10.19 for one of Stephanie Pearl-McPhee's books
NOT a work of scholarship. I returned this book.  I was hoping for a work of scholarship in which the author would carefully argue for his views by presenting documented research.  This is not the case.  Instead, the author simply throws out conjectures about the Egyptian origins of the Hebrew scriptures.  There is absolutely no attempt to connect any of this with academic Egyptology or the mountains of Biblical scholarship.  Read Richard Friedman or Mark Smith or Finkelstein if you're interested in genuine scholarship from a liberal/skeptical point of view
Ponderous reading!. This  is one extremely ponderous book to read.  The author makes several well intentioned points, only to get bogged down in his own research and wordiness.  Read it if you must....be sure you have lots of time to decipher it once you have
Where did JA Jance go?. I own and have read all of JA Jance's JP Beaumont and Joanna Brady mysteries and eagerly look forward to the next episodes in these character's lives.  I picked this book up, thinking it would be on par with all the JA Jance books I've read previously.  What a crashing disappointment.  I can't care about stereotypical characters in unbelievable situations - truth be told, I kept looking at the cover to see if I'd picked up a Harlequin by mistake.  I'll probably read more Ali Reynolds books if this is indeed a new series, but I'd much rather see what happens with JP and Joanna - incidentally, I didn't think much of either of them, either, when their paths crossed some books ago.  This one gets a big "Aw, c'mon, JA, you can do much better than this!" from me.  For those who haven't read previous books and happened to have the bad luck to pick this one up as your first JAJ, get the JP Beaumonts and start at the beginning.  They are worth the time and effort
Journalistic Propaganda. This book was nothing short of journalistic propaganda. Indeed, Goebbels himself would be proud of Mr. Krakauer with this little number "Under the Banner of Heaven". To read through this was like suffering Chinese Water Torture. There are many gross misrepresentations that Mr. Krakauer puts into this biased and unscrupulous piece of propaganda and an equally greater number of flawed conclusions based on things taken grossly out of context. But before I go into those, I should mention that Mr. Krakauer is a self defined atheist who has had struggles in believing in God. And I should mention that, in case the reader did not already know, Mr. Krakauer himself admitted that he had an agenda in writing this. That is, to prove that the LDS church and it's founder Joseph Smith are sex crazed zealots who have murdered many people in the name of God. Now, lets see how Mr. Krakauer - to no surprise - fails to prove or even indicate this.1) In this book, Mr. Krakauer claims that the LDS church has always been violent because of the activities of the Danites and because of the Mountain Meadows Massacre. Well show me, Mr. Krakauer, a religion that has not had it's share of fundamentalists that have acted inhumanly in the name of God. Or, better yet, show me how science has never been used to justify the discrimination and murder of people. Have you ever heard of "Dr. Death" or Josef Mengele, who used science to justify his cruel human experiments on of Jews in Auschwitz? Have you heard of Hitler's euthanasia program, which killed thousands of mentally handicapped persons? Have you ever heard of the racial science used in the late 1890's and early 1900's to justify scientific racism? Thought so. Mr. Krakauer, you are throwing the baby out with the bath water. Just because a few men used their religion to justify their personal displacement and murder of others does not mean that the religion that they adhere to is evil. It simply means that those individuals misused and skewed an inherently good faith for evil purposes.2) You seem to be obsessed with damning Joseph Smith as a sex animal because he had multiple wives. This is very childish, and I would advise you to take a look at yourself in the mirror. Because only those with sex constantly on their own mind would do what you - and several others - are doing and accusing Joseph Smith of doing. Mormon plural marriage was not "just for sex". It was not because Joseph Smith "...remained perpetually and hopelessly smitten by the comeliest female members of the flock..." as you so deviously said. Plural marriage was a very personal matter that created many loving relationships and family bonds. You sir, are no better than the common slanderer who needs to throw a few slugs at a man who you are obviously intimidated by. Countless scholars and historians have all agreed that plural marriage was a religious and social concern, and not "just for sex".3) While we are on Joseph Smith, do you realize that the brand of magic he did indeed practice as a youth was called "folk magic" or "white magic"? It was not the satanic black magic that you claim Joseph Smith so passionately practiced. The folk magic that he practiced is no different than if today he were to have a rabbits-foot or a ying-yang medallion. It was the popular brand of folk tradition, that even respected ministers and pastors were reported to have practiced.4) Where you fail as a journalist, you fall flat as an historian. Better get your facts straight and make sure what you are talking about if you are going to write a "history" of a "violent faith". For example, there are four books of scripture, not three, that LDS church members consider cannon. And I hardly consider the Dogberry Papers a reliable source to quote from, which you seem to have no problem doing.In short, this book was nothing more than a piece of journalistic propaganda that would be welcomed with open arms in Nazi Germany. It is lopsided, skewed, biased, bigoted and severely flawed. And our atheist writer is in the same camp as those who think that all Germans are Nazis, all Russians are Communists, all Japanese are buck-toothed fanatics, all Arabs are terrorists and all Catholic Priests are child molesters. Go back to writing about nature, Mr. Krakauer, because history is far more complicated and does not need idiots such as yourself to muck it up more than it already has been.P.s. I hated "Into Thin Air" as well.
I Feel Cheated. I was anticipating a wonderful diary of an amazing journey by an Englishwoman of privilege over the Western Plains of the American West--what I got was a narrative history of the Mormon religion and its ups and downs.  Having read many diaries of Pioneer women, this one attracted me because Jean Rio started out in England with a small fortune at her disposal.  I was disappointed that so much of the book was wasted on Brigham Young and so little of it on Jean.
Fictional Thoughts of a lunatic. The book is poorly written, full of fictional rantings and generally liberal recapping of other historial history books. The author rants like a lunatic and how this book was ever published is a mystery to me.
Same old stuff. In a time of heady progress in biochemistry and pharmacology, along comes a clinician to tell us once again that addiction is a state of mind that can be cured by correcting skewed thought patterns. In fact, the neuroplasticity of the brain responds to addictive drugs by altering the function of existing neuropathways. Addicted people are different from normal people by virtue of dysfunctions along the serotonin, dopamine and norepinephrine &quot;pleasure pathways.&quot; The attitudes expressed in this book are at least 15 years out of date, and likely to be of limited use to anyone attempting to free themselves from addiction.
Dreadful. I believe this is the second worst book I've ever read, although having not bothered to finish it, it had potential to rank higher on the list.  The concept, the characters, the plot and the writing were so far fetched that it was too difficult to suspend my disbelief long enough tolerate reading it.I never give up on books; I read them to the end, no matter how much I dislike them.  Leaving a book unread haunts me; throwing out a book is a Cardinal Sin in my mind.  I made an exception in this case and tossed it in my garbage can and felt no guilt.The writing is poor; there is no eloquence, no wit, no attempt at a remotely believable plot.  The humor is not humorous; it's an attempt at slapstick comedy that falls short of its goal.  It is too obvious, too tiresome, and often just plain bizarre.The book was recommended by a close friend who enjoys award-winning books; I assumed she'd be on target with this one.  She obviously likes Hiaason's books and find them funny and involving, but simply put,they're not my taste or to my liking.Find something else to do with your time, something more satisfying and  mentally stimulating than reading this book.  I've never dared to try another of his books since being so annoyed by Lucky You, so I cannot speak for them.  This one might have been an anomaly in his body of work, although I honestly don't know.  But I feel like I wasted my time with this, and to be honest, if I were given a choice between reading this book and snorting dirt, I'd choose the latter.
I WAS DUPED!!!!!. OK, people, here's some advice before you think about buying this book. Don't just look at all the 4 and 5 star customer reviews - rank the customer review list from Lowest Rank First and read all the 1 star reviews as well. That way you can REALLY get a broader sense of what you might be getting yourself into. Sure, in both the high reviews and the low reviews there's just basic no-brainer reviews - "it's great!!" or "its sucks!!" But amongst all the one star reviews I discovered some smart punters whom i SHOULD have read before buying the damn book myself. Yup, i bought this monstrous piece of rubbish and after going back and reading all the low reviews I realise that some reviewers had duly warned me. This book is TERRIBLE. It gives only the scantiest of basics on body language, stereotypical stuff which any schmuck with less than half a brain could write. And the photos - MY GOD! Its Mr Steele with his wife and their friends, posing away in their garish shirts and shorts...these are some of the ugliest photos to be used for "flirting" and "body language" I've ever ever seen. And in his blurb photo at the front of the book he's standing there shirtless revealing his copiously hairy chest - there's something about seeing the author of a book posing like this that I find highly disturbing. Yucko. As others have said, if i could give this book a zero star rating, I would. Avoid, everyone, avoid like the plague.
Bad Parenting 101. Looking at the reviews here, it seems that a lot of people can relate to the author's experiences. Basically what that tells me is that there is a lot of bad parenting going on these days. For example, when I was growing up, I never talked back to my parents or slammed my bedroom door in protest to something they did or said. In fact, I never even THOUGHT about it. If I had ever done such a thing, I guarantee you it would've never happened more than once!! Mind you, my dad was not a cruel man and not really very strict, but being disrespectful (like the kids are in this book) was something that was simply not tolerated.  My mom recently told me a story - the first time my parents took me to a restaurant when I was little and I started screaming and carrying on like most kids do, my dad took me out to the parking lot and beat my a**. After that, they never had any problems with me in public again. I guess there's nothing like a belt to make a misbehaving kid see the error of their ways :)When I first started reading this book, I thought some of the stories were pretty funny, but in a sad sort of way. As I kept reading, I began to think that this guy was simply unfit to be a parent. Hint: If your kids act this way, you might try a little thing called discipline instead of letting your kids walk all over you
What the....!. I grew up with this story - what happened?!  Somewhere in this grossly underproduced version they forgot that even in a kids story you need talented actors.  Kids know when someone sounds wooden and unskilled - and you can't pawn something as poorly done as this off on them.  They're smarter than that!  I could've done a better job in my garage.  "Under the bridge lived a troll..."  Come on
Disappointing. Very disappointed in the book.  Too much drama & not enough history.  Felt like I was reading the script from a made for TV docudrama
Definitely not for beginners. Like another reviewer, I had a hard time following these recipes.  Many ingredients are given in Hindi -- for example, "brinjal" or "hing powder".  I know that it is possible to google these things, but it's still an unexpected nuisance.  Additionally, the chapters run right into each other without a break.  There is no index.  There are pictures of dishes, but you'd be hard pressed to find the actual dishes because... no index.I believe that many measurements are also off.  As an example, the rice pudding recipe calls for 12.5 cups milk(!!) and 2 tablespoons of rice. Many recipes call for 1/4 cup of vegetables.  Erm.  I have no doubt that the book was originally published with metric units and converted unsuccessfully to English units.Some day, there will be a nice book for non-Indians on South Indian food -- until then, I think I'll have better luck with recipes from the internet
Hack writing makes best seller. I read this book because it says it was a best seller, and the author is supposed to be one of the best at suspense.  With those expectations I was disappointed.  The author relies on gimmicks - like ultra short chapters to make it seem like you're reading faster.  Each chapter is 1 or 2 pages with at least one blank page between, so what looks like a 400 page books is really only a 250 page short novel.  One chapter is literally a cliff-hanger.The plot's sort of a rehash of H.G. Wells' Island Of Dr. Moreau, borrowing a bit from X-Men comic books.  The mutants are all children who can fly, and they're severely persecuted by their keepers, so perhaps what makes the book appealing to other readers is the suspense derived from the endangered children angle, another cheap gimmick.The villains are all one-dimensional stereotypes, blindly abandoning all their principles and humanity to profit off the children.  I could point out numerous flaws in style as well - but that's not the point; you could find flaws in better books too.  The point is the book is overrated for hack writing of less quality than many old pulp magazines I've read.  Even the love scenes are corny and seem like one of those cheap romance novels ("My arms were high and tight around his neck.  He pulled me against him and I felt him, all of him, against my thigh . . ."). The author also doesn't seem to understand the geography & terrain of the area he's writing about (for example, a small Sony TV won't receive Denver channels in Gunnison National Forrest, certainly not well enough to recognize faces in long shots as the author describes), and has some weird ideas of horror ("Chain link fence and concertina wire and guard dogs in the middle of the woods were scary enough, but to see the words "U.S. Government" attached to "Trespassers Will Be Shot" made me ill.").  Much more like this is topped off with a liberal dose of hypocrisy:  "The arrogance and amorality of the scientists working here affronted everything I believed in.  I wanted to find one of 'them' and strangle the person with my bare hands."This is the last time I'll buy a book because it says "best seller."  If you want to read a well-written sci-fi suspense novel in which the protagonist is a child prodigy, I recommend The Fourth R by George O. Smith (ISBN 1557429332 - Also known as The Brain Machine, ISBN 0824014308)
Too Drawn Out. Normally I don't take the time to write a review, but this book just bugged me.  When I finished I felt like I had run a marathon.  The book was just too drawn out and I felt the descriptions were long winded.  Faith was a little too unbelieveable even though she was abused and had little self esteem.  The plot was good, but moved slowly.  I am typically not drawn to Danielle Steel books and probably with good reason that I never seem to like them very much.  I am glad that this book was in a box of 30+ books that I paid $15 for at a used book store.  I would have felt like I wasted my money had I actually paid full price for it
Boring. Sorry, just plain old BORING! Don't get this book
all you need to know about this book. Finishing this book was a lesson in patience. Don't bother with this waste of paper, there are many other fine writers of christian leaning--g.k.chesterton and t.s.eliot come to mind--who can write without egregious fallacies.First, RavZac asserts that his book counters the 'steady barrage of scholarly attack' which 'has been foisted upon religion' in general, and on christianity in particular (p xiv). Paradoxically, he then goes on to quote Kant's assurance(as representative of modern antitheistic thought)(p9) that spirituality is not threatened by Kant's antitheistic philosophies, and also acknowledges that modern thought has been a natural evolution of human history (p6). Second, RavZac continually correlates societal ills with modern intellectualism (p xiv,xvii,8,12,et al), and actually asserts causality between the two (p xvii,8,22-33). Then, he states that 'every generation raises the issue of life's essence' and discusses the long history of humanity's existential angst. If dissatisfaction with life is universal in all times and places, and if the history of humanity is the history of pleasure as well as pain, then where does RavZac get off when he tries to pin it all on modern intellectualism and philosophy? Finally, he states 'that all philosophizing on life's purpose is ultimately two conclusions, Does God exist? and What is his character?'(p8) He may hold such a view, however he seems to be ignoring a vast record of philosophy that does not presuppose a theistic view, let alone the monotheistic variant. RavZac is atrociously unrigorous in his sophomoric attempt at conversing with the great philosophers.  The foregoing should show that one needn't get very far into his book before being stumbled at his profusion of ineptitude. The entire writing has so borrowed pseudo-biblical language as to be cloying, and RavZac thoroughly conveys his paranoid rhetoric by overutilizing key words such as 'warned, aberrant, terrifying, unbridled, unleashed, attacks, machinations, trickery', etc. ad nauseum.In short, this book is the religious version of political paranoia as discussed in Richard Hofstadter's THE PARANOID STYLE IN AMERICAN POLITICS, 11/64.  There are no redeeming features of this writing, save for giving the lucid reader abundant opportunities to identify logical fallacies and monitoring the addled ramblings of today's christian writers.
Disgusting. The only book I've ever read that I tore up and threw in the trash when I was finished. If this passes for an uplifting magical fable then there's something seriously wrong with the world.This is a tragic, sad, grotesque, disturbing tale of a child so traumatized that he has to make up an alternate reality just to cope with the horror of the world. When a child is damaged it is never uplifting, whimsical or funny and anyone who finds it so better take a deep look into themselves and make some changes. This book is sickening. Don't buy it!!! There are no animals only pain and death
Not even for the airplane. If you enjoy a good, tightly plotted thriller -- read something else. This flabby, clunky and completely unbelievable story labors to its silly ending wheezing and gasping like an overweight commuter trying to catch the 8:45.All of the characters are two dimensional and if you don't figure out the ending hundreds of pages before it arrives you are unconscious.
Condescending Racist Fantasy. This book is a perfect example of a reigning culture ( in this case Western Caucasian ) dressing up it's post-Slavery Era losses and expanding Colonialism as benevolent towards the "child-like" races that only need simple things to be happy in their subordination to the superior white people and their culture.It stunk of racism to me when I was a child in the 1960s. And stinks of racism now. In a post-Civil Rights era, where we should all know better than excuse this smiling little culturally "unconscience" evil, there is no excuse for this propaganda
Didn't make it past the first 10 pages. I generally make it a point to finish every book I start, no matter how awful, but this was just impossible to endure.  Inane, vapid and overly sensational, the book is lacking in almost every aspect.  The characters seem crafted for readers to hate, but they lack any degree of redeeming qualities as in similar books like Jilly Cooper's Riders.  The trashiness alone does not account for the poor quality, but the crude, insipid characters and the ridiculously stilted dialogue just make this an affront to any readers with a modicum of literary taste
There is academic work on this topic -- this is not it. Devon is right -- emotions are human adaptations. But this is not a new discovery he came up with. Cosmides and Tooby founded an entire new field called evolutionary psychology, based on the idea that psychological adaptations are formed the way physical adaptations are. They've written many scholarly articles, and many books are available on the topic. Many popular books on this subject contain silly errors or a bit of the author's ego, but this one it out there. Way out there. Here's the thing -- this is a scientific field, but Devon is utterly unpracticed in it. His conclusions are logically based on his premises, but his premises are utterly unfounded. Just because his overarching premise is true -- emotions are adaptations -- doesn't mean all his little pet ideas have any basis in reality at all. What is the proof, for example, that human beings start over with a new partner for each child? In fact, there is quite a bit of evidence to the contrary. Most men do not want to couple with a woman with children from another man -- the idea that at 33 months a child no longer needs resources from two parents is simply laughable. To suggest they need no parents at all and the mother can simply go on with a new man and produce a new child is in the realm of the absurd.
Form over Function. The language is beautiful in form. Inspirational is the best way to describe his ability to describe any one moment. The internal mechanisms that move a story from one moment to the next is what was painfully absent. The main driving force of plot was overt sexual tension. Once this aspect had reached its climax early in the novel there was little holding my attention. I put the book down not knowing what became of the Chink or any of the Cowgirls.Is literature supposed to have a point or not? There are works of art that are beauty in of themselves, and only for themselves, and represent a voice that was never heard of before. Then there are pieces of art and literature whose point is to edify through illustration, explanation or even catharis. This work was absent of any meaningful satire that I could discern. Robbin's strength here was in his unique way of illustrating with words.I believe an earlier reviewer used the words "literary masturbation." Perfect discription.Sadly, this was my first exposure to T. Robbins. Doubt if I will try again any time soon. I do get Cinemax afterall
The Truth Shall Prevail. I would like to thank Joan Peters for confirming that concocting a fraud is still an American tradition.  The fallacious arguments presented in Peters thesis are discredited by her active participation in commiting a fraud.  For anyone really interested in the facts about this book and the Israel-Palestine conflict I highly recommend Norman Finkelstein's book, Image and Reality of the Israel-Palestine Conflict.  Supporters of Joan Peters are simply supporting the disinformation that has lead to the unbalanced opinion of the US today.  The rest of the world recognizes this piece of literature as a fraud.  Please take the time to look at the evidence for yourself at www.normanfinkelstein.com
Very disappointing "sophisticated" knitting book. I had very high hopes for this book after reading all of the good reviews, so maybe that's why I was so very disappointed in the patterns.  It does have a couple of nice pillow designs.  But for a book that claims to be for 'sophisticated' tastes, the wine wraps and purses are downright tacky.  And the trivets, pot holders, welted baskets, and hanger cover are all straight from your grandma's knitting books. Then there's a host of projects that look good, but are really just very simple designs that use expensive yarns to make their statement.  Replacing the yarns with less expensive versions (as I usually am forced to do) that have different textures and shading patterns would effectively ruin the look of the pattern since that look is almost entirely supplied by the yarn itself.  Those patterns include most of the patterns for throws and adult's clothes.  Also, the slippers 'for anyone' look like baby booties.  If you're looking for a sophisticated slipper pattern, the argyle ones in Weekend Knitting are really great.I kept the book because I want to make the bath set.  Even that I don't think is really something special but I already bought bath salts & such for a gift basket so I'll toss in the knitted bath set as an accompaniment.
Review of &quot;Ten Days that Shook the World.&quot;. Although this book may be so brilliantly written by John Reed, I found it to be too laden with historical details, and even somewhat confusing for someone who is using this book to merely familiarize her (him)self with the makings of the Russian Revolution for the first time.  The book provides with a glossary of Russian terms, events and political parties necessary to understand it but even so I found myself hopelessly stumbling through the chapters trying to pick up information here and there.  However, due to my lack of knowledge of Russian history I was unable to piece together any of the information.  So, in frustration I gave up and relinquished the book to somebody who knows somebody who is a &quot;history buff&quot;.  From this experience I learned that if you want to familiarize yourself with a historical event about which you know truly nothing, it is always better to read a book which describes that event perhaps in a very broad outline form on the first page of the book.  The rest of the book should be written according to that outline. A glossary of main events would also be helpful.  On the other hand I do realize that most historical events are way too complicated to be approached in this manner.  Anyway, if you would like to expand your knowledge about the Russian Revolution, I highly recommend this book.  However, if like me you are looking to merely acquire a basic knowledge about this historical event you will get lost in its too many facts
Good for browsing. I've had this book for several years, but I found that it rarely had the formula I needed.   However, it is fun to read, so if you just want to get some inkling of typical problems and solutions in fields outside your own specialty, then this is a good book to have
Unscientific. Lots of pretty pictures, but there is no evidence that any of these creatures will exist in the future. The concepts of things like the Ocean Phantom have no relation to fact, it's just pure speculation on the part of these "biologists"; and they seem to have gone back in time with the Toraton. The animals today are far more interesting, and they're real
On Beauty. I was really disappointed in this book.  I had heard such rave reviews but it definitely was a book I struggled through and only finished since I bought it new and kept thinking I would find something redeeming in it
don't rush to do any of this. Ric still assumes you can get 10% on investments.  Right.  And your Enron retirement plan will keep you cozy until you're 99
Straight Line Depreciation, from Five Stars to Two. This book was probably five stars when it was published - in 1997.  However, too much has changed since then, obviously through no fault of the authors.  I knew I was in trouble when the authors raved about Motley Fool  and asked &quot;can online trading be far behind?&quot;  Save your money
Hannity and this book are an example of nonthinking. American lives.  Hannity receives his talking points every day from the RNC, and then repeats them like the Summoner from "Canterbury Tales," repeating his two or three Latin phrases.  Hannity's phrases:- Liberals are giving comfort to the enemy when questioning our president when our soldiers are in harm's way.- Liberals don't want to defend America and fought Homeland Security every step of the way (when it was Bush who fought it)- Howard Dean hates republicans, he is unhinged, so is Hillary, Al Gore, John Kerry, and every republican except for Ben Nelson and Joe Lieberman.- Osama bin laden was offered up to Clinton on a silver platter. (never happened)So, as Al Franken says, Hannity knows 11 facts, all of which are outright lies, or misrepresentations, so please don't try to confuse him with any nuance or qualifications to the 11 facts he knows.Don't waste your money on this book - it, and he, are the reason the right and the left can no longer talk to each other.  He is laughing all the way to the bank with his tax cut, begotten on his listeners' backs
Was she really that GOOD of a mother?. I don't feel that Miller made much of an attempt to prove that Anna was in fact a "good" mother. Like another reviewer said, I don't think she was a BAD mother, but the book really didn't go into much detail about Anna's relationship with Molly (especially up until Anna' ex-husband filed for custody) and instead focused on Anna's life experiences and psyche. After Brian said he wouldn't send Molly back, Anna didn't even seem that concerned about Molly's mental and emotional well-being. She just focused on her notion that Leo's actions were simply taken out of context, and while she wanted to see Molly again, I got the impression that it was based on a selfish concern for her "rights" as a mother, not out of a concern for her daughter.And what was so great about Leo anyway?? He wasn't exactly nice to Anna, often condescending to her, and from the beginning I felt that his affection for Molly was a farse, simply to stay on Anna's good side. He also seemed sexually possessive of Anna--like the scene when he kept having sex with her after Molly came into the bed because of a nightmare. I think Anna loved her daughter, but she made the error of confusing sexual attraction with true love, since she had never felt such an attraction before. As a result, her daughter became an afterthought to someone she had known for 2 months, with dire consequences. Although she did show some signs of remorse, she spent a large amount of time trying to justify her actions instead of showing a very deep concern for her daughter's welfare. If she had put her daughter first from the beginning, instead of being swept up into a sexual frenzy and creating illusions about the new "family" she and Leo were forming, then she probably never would have lost custody of her child.
Not my idea of a good time. I found Lewellen to be very wordy and dry.  I read the book for Contemporary Anthropological Theory at my university and had to write a 15 page paper on it.  I had to read the book twice in order to absorb any of it.  I have taken four years of anthropology classes and still find the book to be way above my head.  This is not a book to read for pleasure.  If not in the garbage, it belongs in the classroom with extreme outlining of it, for Lewellen tends to be jumpy and almost scattered.  I would not recommend this book to anyone
Very Poorly Written. This book is very poorly written.  There are a number of flash backs that if my teacher hadn't pointed out, no one would have that it was a flash back.  The ending is also terrible.  Only read this book if you have to much time on your hands
This IS a Rehash of the CMMI v 1.1 document. As the lead in implementing CMMI within my organization I was very disappointed in the contents of this book. It is simply a rehash of the information in the CMMI-SE/SW/IPPD/SS V1.1 that is available for FREE on the CMMI website.  I found no wisdom from the authors on how to actually implement the processes and be successful with an assessment. The included CD simply includes the incomplete tables and checklists that are included as appendices (and make up about half of the book by the way).  My recommendation is to save you money and read the CMMI documents
Thin and Padded Out. I've always enjoyed Sara Paretsky's novels, despite the left-wing preaching. In the past this has been subordinated to character & plot. But not here. There's not much plot -- a few elements here & there -- & it never really drives the story. Far too much space is given to the standard left-wing caricature of the rich & the repetitive, boring stereotyping of 'family values' as just so much plutocratic hypocrisy. Ms Paretsky, we _know_ you hate the American rich, & they're probably as hideous as you paint them to be. But here they're just cardboard cut-out characters. And of course the book is just a long, boring wait to see just how the filthy rich committed the crime & how they'll get away with it. Plus the satisfying way in which the horrible rich are (once again) forced to cough up the money they at first (of course) refused to give. This is getting tedious.
I hate this book. This is one of the worst books I have ever read. I understand that is fine writing, but the book is tasteless. I find Rodriguez arrogant and lonely. Is he trying to say that the turning point of his life was when the nun's came to his parents home. I hate this book it is one of my worst reads ever
Horrible mistake in regards to PERSIAN GOLF ****************. What the hell is going on... I wonder wich rich royal family in the mid-east has funded this unbeleivable mistake!!!For your info, The Persian golf has existed for thousands of years up until your 2004 Edition.What happened ???  Are you taking advantage of the last moments in mullah history before they are overthrown to clinch a deal with the Arabs ?????I am really disapointed, and did not think that a non-for profit organisation like yours would do such a mistake.RECALLL All Copies or Face Legal Actions.SamVancouver Canad
Delusional at best. Welcome to the SEALs where author James Watson could be expected to lie, cheat and steal to get the job done. PROVIDED THAT JOB WAS DRINKING! If this is the first book you read on Special Forces in Vietnam you might think its pretty good. You'd be so wrong! I've read over 20 Special Forces books and I've been amazed at how Snipers, Force Recon Marines, Rangers and SOG teams spent weeks in the harsh jungles gathering intel, planting booby traps and snatching prisoners. In one case SOG soldiers even delivered a baby for a widow of the enemy after destroying its convoy. Professional soldiers burdened with heavy equipment did all this and more not only while avoiding detection from the VC/NVA but tigers and leopards, too. On the other hand Shoot-first-Watson actually killed a young mother and her newborn baby nursing at her breast. Why did he do this? Because he was far too busy lying to superiors, cheating to increase his rate (rank) and stealing from his men to reconnoiter his targets. He simply blasted through the thatching of a hut with his shotgun. Watson's idea of a so-called mission in Vietnam was going out for 2 hours in Levi's blue jeans then getting back to camp before dark so he could get drunk. His biggest danger during daylight in Vietnam would have been sunburn! In one story a concerned officer suggested that he stay in to rest while his men continue with a scheduled patrol. Was James Watson actually overworked? Obviously not -- his men weren't -- they went out on patrol as usual. Watson was admittedly exhausted from drinking every night instead of sleeping. So when they came to inform him that his team in the field was under enemy fire guess where Watson was found? Not resting in bed but getting drunk at the club! Watson's tales simply profile how chronic alcoholism increases delusions of grandeur and the self-glorification of an undisciplined, unprofessional soldier. An otherwise proud Navy should be embarrassed
Horrid. This book is the biggest pile of excrement ever written. It is also full of cryptic run on sentences that waste paper and ink.  This book should not be allowed
If I could give a '0' I would do it!. I am a graduate student and a software developer with 5 years of experience in the industry. It may not sound like much but I believe I had experiences that allow me to form some semi-solid opinion about it.Normally, I would not bother leaving reviews but this product is out of bonds!Both the simulation and the book are very 'buggy'!The book is, in effect, a manual for the simulation. It has contradicting ideas and statements all over. I gave up reading the manual after 20 pages. It is not just my opinion. My professor said not once that the book is a disaster. Many of my class mates expressed the same idea.Simulation itself is something of the same sort. For example, the whole project is broken down into periods with specific tasks in each period. After decisions made by players/teams the software posts results of a project period simulation. The ultimate goal is to achieve the 'milestone' at the end of each period. Now, without much knowledge about the simulation (which, by the way, is very hard to come by in the ambiguous book and simulation itself, as you will see in a bit) the question is 'how on earth you are supposed to plan ahead and build your strategies if the software tells you that a project team member's efficiency is 95% for a particular task and the task is done within allowed time 100% and the milestone is not achieved?!Reasons for failures..., no, they don't bother to explain.If any of programmers or designers of the SimProject read this, I hope nobody will buy the product untill you fix your stuff! Nothing personal, but the quality of your product is bad
Entertaing, thought-provoking, but kind of silly. "The Future of War" predicts US dominance of warfare throughout the 21st Century, as a result of US advanced technology in general and precision weaponry in particular. Their train of thought has considerable merit, and deserves reading and thoughtful attention. However, the book suffers from the same two major flaws as most books by visionaries without enough practical experience: misunderstanding of specific happenings in the past, and unlikely projections into the far future. Having been involved with US defense for 50 years, as a member of the military, as a designer and developer and advisor on US weaponry, and as an advisor on strategic, operational and tactical issues, I read this book with considerable amusement, although I do take seriously much of what it says. I shall give specifics on two failures to understand the details of the past, and then offer criticism of two of the book's projections, as examples.Past episode #1: The 1991 precision strikes against Iraq. There is no doubt that our air strikes and land attacks in the 1991 campaign to liberate Kuwait were exceedingly effective, and there is no doubt that this effectiveness was largely due to our precision weaponry. However, to do precision strikes, whether with airborne munitions or ground forces, it's necessary to know what targets to attack, where they are, and what weapons are likely to be effective against a particular target. In the 1991 campaign, this effort was undertaken by the "Jeddi Knights", largely under the guidance of Col. John Warden. The key role of the "Jeddi Knights" was to establish priorities and mission profiles for which targets to strike when with what munitions, and they did this extraordinarily well. What the Friedmans obviously don't know is the amount of detailed information that was available to the "Jeddi Knights", carefully acquired over the 70 years preceding the campaign, first by the British until about 1950, and thereafter by the US military. The armed forces of major powers assume they may have to fight wars on short notice aganst opponents who have been designated shortly before by national authorities, so they invest a great deal in gathering information pertinent to how various campaigns might be conducted. In the case of Iraq, the British did very careful mapping from 1920 until about 1950, producing "ordnance" maps of higher detail and accuracy than exist even for some parts of the United States, and these were invaluable to planners. Then, starting in about 1950, when it began to seem possible that the US might someday have to fight somewhere in the Middle East, the US military carefully gathered information relevant to how a campaign might be fought, and which potential enemy targets should be candidates for destruction. These studies resided in US intelligence and military archives until the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait, and were then used as the basis for planning the campaign.Two examples of this. First, the destruction of certain bridges was given high priority not to impede vehicular movement, but to sever the communications cables running under the bridges; our planners knew which cables important to Iraqi Command and Control were buried too deeply to destroy easily except where they were routed under bridges, and therefore which bridges to take out to disrupt Iraqi military communications. Second, the swing by US, British and French forces far to the West, the "Hail Mary" gambit, would not have been possible in that harsh terrain unless viable routes for armor and supply vehicles were known, and the Iraqi Army either didn't know of such routes or didn't believe we could know of them. There are exactly two feasible routes, and both were used; they can both be determined in complete detail from careful study of the British Ordnance maps prepared in the 1930s, and (although I wasn't involved in the campaign planning) I had no difficulty in finding and plotting the only two feasible routes before the ground campaign began, from the good maps in my possession. I also understand why it was necessary to bring the two prototype JSTARS systems to the theatre, to detect and allow blocking of any Iraqi strike intended to sever the Tapline Road; this was also evident from the maps.By contrast, we had no success at all in locating and destroying mobile Scud missile launchers, because they moved around with great frequency. If you don't know where something is, no precision of your weaponry, and no amount of technical sophistication or military skill, will allow you to destroy it.Past example #2: The SAFEGUARD BMD system. The Friedmans say, on the basis of assertions by people who may or may not be experts, that SAFEGUARD was deactivated because it wouldn't work. In fact the situation was exactly the reverse, but one must know the purpose of SAFEGUARD and its mode of operation to understand what actually happened. The mission of SAFEGUARD was to prevent complete success of a Soviet counterforce first strike against our Minuteman ICBM fields, by opening a "launch window" for a retaliatory strike by the Minuteman missiles in the face of a full-scale Soviet strike. I helped to plan and design that system, and it would have done what it was intended to, although at a horrible increased toll of death and destruction, which I dreaded, but could see no alternative to in the face of rapidly increasing Soviet capability. Far more important than the fact that we knew SAFEGUARD would work was the fact that the Soviets concluded it would work; that realization brought them back to the bargainng table at the Helsinki talks, and led to the SALT I treaty, which I rejoiced about. Provisions of that treaty made SAFEGUARD unnecessary, and that's why the one completed SAFEGUARD site was deactivated and construction on the other sites was stopped.Also on the subject of balistic missile defense, the Friedmans assert that midcourse discrimination and destruction of incoming warheads is infeasible. This is simply not true, although there is an exceedingly serious problem associated with doing it. I know three quite different ways of doing midcourse discrimintion and destruction of enemy incoming warheads, and, given that I've been out of that business for more than 10 years, I expect that other ways are known by now. The problem is that, at least for the three ways I know, one is politically unacceptable to the US Congress and the US public, one is so expensive that it's unlikely Congress would ever fund it, and the third, if fully developed, would be usable for certain other military purposes that would probably lead to a renewed arms race as our potential major opponents sought to counter it. (I was one of a small group of scientists who successfully recommended to Congress that development of that third approach be stopped, to avoid the resulting foreseeable escalation; scientists and military professionals, despite various comments in the Friedmans' book, work closely together over years and decades, and come to have considerable knowledge of each other's fields.) Whether at some future time it may become desirable to develop and deploy a BMD system that does midcourse discrimination and destruction of warheads is a political and diplomatic question to be decided by the public and its elected leaders, on which I have no insight, but it is technically feasible.Now, turning to the future, what the Friedmans fail to understand in their glowing vision of US technology dominating future warfare, is that for every technical advance, opponents can devise at least partial countermeasures, and that therefore no amount of technology as such can determine the outcome of a campaign. The Coalition conquest of Iraq in 2003 provides an excellent example. Although large parts of the Iraqi army, and all of its top leadership, was utterly incompetent, other large parts of the Iraqi army were composed of thoroughly trained officers and enlisted men, who fully understood that if they confronted US forces nose to nose, they would be destroyed. Understanding this, very many of the best Iraqi units simply demobilized themsleves and disappeared into the civilian population as Coalition forces approached, in many cases taking their weaponry with them. One entire Iraqi division near the border with Iran totally vanished before we got to its bases; everyone from the division commander to the most junior private. Professional soldiers, even if motivated to fight, have no more desire than anyone else to be killed pointlessly in a situation where they are unable to resist effectively.A substantial fraction of these well-trained, motivated Iraqi forces subsequently emerged as part of the resistance movement that continues in Iraq. How many of the resistance fighters come from that crowd is obviously impossible to know for sure, but my personal estimate is that about 30,000 of Saddam Hussein's best and most loyal troops and officers became part of the resistance movement. And our overwhelming superiority in all aspects of conventional warfare have been far less effective against current Iraqi resistance methods; the resistance movement seems to be gradually weakening and fragmenting, but it's a long slow process, in which our precision weapons and our advanced communications and intelligence give us far less of an advantage than they do in conventional warfare.There are various other gaps in the Friedmans' assessment of the future. I'll mention only two of many. First, vircators, often touted as the most effective weapon of the 21st Century, have had only relatively diappointing results so far. Why? Partly because technical improvements to vircators are needed; those will surely come along in due course. Much more serious is the fact that battle damage asssessment after a vircator strike is at present almost impossible to do with any degree of accuracy, so after a target has been attacked with one or more vircators, there is no practical way to know whether the strike was successful or not.Presumably some day we will overcome this particular problem, but it illustrates that new and potentially formidable technology may find relatively little application because of purely tactical and operational problems that arise in using it.As my second example, I'll remark on the Friedmans' vision of US infantrymen as being in effect "cocooned" in future to protect them from the enemy's weapons. This vision ignores two serious problems. First, no "cocoon" imaginable can protect an infantryman against certain weapons such as a fuel-air bomb if the enemy knows approximately where the infantryman is. Second, and closely related, anyone with substantial experience in concealing himself in a hostile environment, including me, knows all too well that the more accoutrements one has, the harder it is to hide and not be observed. In light clothing and carrying only light personal weapons, I can disappear into the landscape almost anywhere, and move around unnoticed; burdened with excess equipment and elaborate protective clothing, only certain carefully selected spots can offer concealment. Everyone with experience in this matter knows as much as I do on this subject, so infantrymen whose lives depend on not being observed will move far more cautiously when heavily burdened than when lightly armed and lightly protected. That doesn't mean infantry should be sent into combat inadequately equipped, but it does mean that the increased effectiveness of some given number of trained infantry when provided with extra combat capability and protective equipment is far less than one might otherwise suppose.I could cite dozens of other matters, past and projected, which the Friedmans book misunderstands or overlook, but this is enough. I'll just say that the book is an excellent source of ideas, but should be viewed with practiced skepticism
Potentially good plot but sloppily written. This is a book by JA Jance?  This book took a potentially good storyline (plot) and made it seem stupid because it was so simplistic in its writing style, which is UNLIKE JA Jance.  This book seemed to be to be written for a young-adult reader audience.I had to force myself to read it all the way through because I must admit, I was curious as to the conclusion, but I did not derive any pleasure from reading this book.  A waste of time
Didn't do it for me. The author writes well, but the stories are just a little too absurd to be interesting.  The first story is quite good, but the rest become quite boring very quickly.  I think the writers talents would be better suited  for a much longer work where she can develop the stories a bit further
Biased and unbalanced. This book is badly written and not based on much logic. The arguments are entirely unconvincing
Choose another book. Me and my boyfriend found this book to be slanted toward the Jewish person who is having trouble with the mixed relationship.  I think this is a good book for a couple that will carry on a lot of Jewish customs and forgo the  Christian ones
easy money maker for author!!. since their are not many digital photography books for instructors,they pick what they think will fit the bill-it's irritating when they don't even look at the book before requiring it.  the book is o.k., butshould not be used for a textbook!  it's insulting.  to anyone interested inphotography  keep this in mind-photography books, especiallythe old and true, and info. on the internet  will teach you the basics.   because photography is  mainly  digital, it is very well suited for self-study.  don't waste your time buying required marginal books and paying for photography classes.  your money will be better spend on good glass(lenses) and a tripod, and of course learn photoshop--just my opinionon a friday night
Left me empty. My kids started reading the Left Behind Kids books, and because I was concerned about the message and theology of the books, I started reading them also.  Then I decided to check out the "adult" books from the library.I am a born-again, pentacostal believer in Jesus Christ, and parts of the theology are not what I read in the Bible.  OK.  I can stil enjoy a good book, one with interesting characters, realistic dialogue, and a good plot.  The issue of plot is difficult for the Left Behind books, I admit, because we know who wins if we've read the end of the New Testament.  As to the rest, it fell flat.  Most of the dialogue didn't ring true.  After a few of the books, I was interested in some of the characters, but by the end of the books, there were only a few of the original characters left, and they were some of the least interesting to begin with.  How many times do we have to read through the same sermons from the exact same scriptures in Revelation?  How many times do they have to tell us about the almost affair that someone had back in Book 1?  There is nothing new and interesting in this book. The last book is just boring.It would have been nice, at the end of the book, to wrap up everything.   Jesus comes back, and everyone should be reunited at the end after the battle is over, right?  Some of the characters that were important early in the books are either barely mentioned or not mentioned at all.  It was an incredible let down.  I felt like I had invested in these books only to see what life would be like for everyone after the battles are over.  Nothing.  We stick with that one main guy, and everyone else is left in the dust.  It should have had a really, really happy ending, but even that was boring.If I had my time back, I would stick to the kid versions, if only to discuss theological issues with my children.  At least in the kid books, the sermons are shorter.  And I will know not to get my hopes up for happy reunions at the end of the series
Rose REd. I have admittedly not read the book BUT the TV movie was a steal on The Haunting of Hill house
where's the action. If you are looking for a book with action, I wouldn't recommend this book.  Though some people under age 9 will like it, I must admit I did not. Ivy and Bean is about two completly different girls whom become best friends. The reason I didn't like this book is because it doesn't have the action I was expecting.  If you ignore my comment, read the book, and hate it, don't say no one warned you
Painful to read. I have enjoyed Baldacci's work before but this book was simply awful.  I couldn't believe any of the characters and the storyline was terrible.  I was very surprised to get such stilted writing from Baldacci.  You can miss this one in my opinion
Tedious Reading..... In the beginning this book seemed to have potential. It told of the direct Msonic influence present in the foundation of the Untied States. This was the preface. Afterwards the book endlessly drags on, with dates, times,  people, and places; everything except what I expected; a testimony of how  Freemasonry affected the establishment of the USA. If you are interested in  reading a book that reads like a high school text book, but really goes no  deeper, if you are interested in when but not why, maybe you will enjoy.  But I doubt it
Couldn't wait to put it down. All the ingerdients for a satisying space opera - put together, as dull, dull, dull
Porn movie?. Reading this book is like watching a porn movie: all sex and no plotline.Another thing I found unbelievable is that Helen took back her maiden name and became a "Miss" again. From what I know of the period, women loved to be a widow because that status granted them more freedom. Coulter could not come up with a good explanation why Helen would take back her maiden name after her first husband died
Pandering to the "greed" in all of us... Readers would be better served by reading &#34;The Intelligent Asset Allocator&#34;, which has the same core recommendations with regard to saving and investing, but much harder data on asset allocation (which provides &#62;85% of the explanatory variable in overall portfolio returns according to most academic studies), following those recommendations instead, and then going out and just living their lives instead of vainly seeking some &#34;new life around the corner, if only I had another $(fill in the blanks) million&#34; by spending their hard-earned money on these investment book du jours
Seconding the review by "Skisko". I agree 100% with this review. The premise behind the book has great promise; but is a very painful read and a great disappointment
Disappointing. I picked up this book hoping it would live up to its title, but what I found was that it was rather boring and lacking in character development. The ending seemed rushed and many of the issues raised were left unresolved. I was disappointed.
Almost one too many. The third book of the Bourne trilogy just does not stand up to "The Bourne Identity." He lost his character!  He never comes close to bringing Jason to life, and making him real,and yet,larger than life, like he was in "The Bourne Identity."   This book calls to my mind the question of who really wrote it.  I get the same feeling from Tom Clancy's later works; they do not ring of the author's metal  There are so many mistakes in this work,and it is so cluttered-up with half explanations, and under developed situations and characters,that it would hardly rate a C- in any college creative writing class.I was very hard-pressed to complete the read,very sorry to say. It is about twice the length it should be,given all the flaws,requiring the reader to really work hard to finish.
Survivor in Death. the beginning of this book was excellent, but dont be fooled, the first few chapters are the only decent part of this book.  the rest of the book is just filled with sex and the ultimate downfall is that there is no foreshadowing to the killers. what's the point of writing it if the reader cant try to figure out who the murderers were.  this was one of the worst books i have ever read, i'd call it a trashy romance novel with a hint of mystery. dont waste your time reading it
Just plain horrible. If you're looking for writing that is as clever or as witty as Dean Koontz's, take one pace back away from this book. If you're expecting storyytelling on par with John Grisham, take another step back. If you're hoping for a story loaded with interesting tidbits and facts on par with Dan Brown, take another step back.This book was unoriginal, boring, predictable, and very cliche. Don't waste your time or your money like I did.
Theocratic Trash!!!!!!!!!!. Leon R. Kass, M.D., P.h.D., is chairman of the 'President' George W. Bush's Council on Bioethics. This book was intelligently written without any reference to religion but the whole underlying message was "Do not touch Gods property even if it means healing the sick." These religious fundamentalists will do anything to STUNT us in our pursuits of happiness. This guy is for KEEPING PARALYZED PEOPLE PARALYZED. "Dr." Kass is for KEEPING AMPUTEES AMPUTATED. He's for KEEPING the depressed and suicidal DEPRESSED AND SUICIDAL. Ill spare you the bull and say what Dr. Kass really wants to say - "I want you to follow Jesus with all your heart no matter how much pain and suffering you are in. If God made you depressed than thats how you should be. If God made you paralyzed then thats how you should be. If you are miserable in your existance then thats obviously how God wants you to be and thats how you will be with our new conservative laws that will effectively ban progress to help people". For this is the ONLY real argument you can use to support the banning of progress designed to help humans. - He wants everyone to follow the 'divine' rule of sanctity of life, not quality of life - an ugly ethic for a very stupid man.
Don't waste your time. I very much looked forward to the ending of this book not to see what would happen but so that I could be done with it and move on to a different book! I found this book pointless. After reading 482 pages, I can't even think of two adjectives to describe Sally and Clare. Moody does such a poor job of character development that I don't feel like I know all that much about these two women. I did not like the main characters and I didn't feel as though they had much of a real friendship at all. The book is way too long, the plot is unbelievable, the characters are unlikable, and the writing style is annoying
The Victorians. A densely packed book with many bits of interesting information but terribly organized and loaded with names, places, institutions not properly identified that are complete blanks to a non-English historian.A great disappointment
Not what I expected.....Slow, boring.... After reading and liking the Analyst, I picked up the madman's tale.  I found it slow, boring, a little confusing....The 100 pages were good....
For Trophy Wife Want To Be's. I had completely forgotten about this book until a friend mentioned it the other day in her drunken St. Patties stupor.  This book is a great for read for normal people who want to laugh at really bad ideas to find a husband.  It's good advice if you want to be a trophy wife.  Don't return a guy's call?  Good way to date only losers who have no one else to call.  Wear your hair in a pony tail, learn to play tennis, die your hair black, get a nose job, these are all pieces of advice in this book.  The idea is hide who you really are until you get married and then be yourself.  That marriage will last forever... if forever is two days.  If you want to marry a rich guy who will ignore you and eventually trade you in for a younger version of yourself, read this book.  If you want a good laugh, read this book.  If you want real advice on men, understading them, finding Mr. Right, telling the good ones apart from the jerks, knowing what they're thinking, I recommend GOD IS A WOMAN: DATING DISASTERS.  It's by a guy, what's more he's a comedian, and it's really funny with great and real advice
Interesting but Lacking. This is a good book for someone who has never delved into the subject.  I find that it follows the same track as others in making the golden proportioning system fit about anything they want it to.  Probably the most disappointing thing is the book's assembly:  there are numerous overlays in the book that are not aligned with the images they are overlaying.  The deviations are from slight to almost 1/4&quot; - very bothersome to view. This is more of a problem with mediocre quality control and concern by Princeton Architectural Press.  It's good that the book is relatively inexpensive or I would have returned it
A worthless book. Home made and thoughtless. Interesting only for its defense of the slaughter in Tiananmen square.
Surely Not "Noir" -- Simply an Unanswerable Mystery. King certainly lends a high-profile to this collection of latter-day noir writing and tough-guy procedurals, but I believe he created something a little too far outside the readership's expected genre for this series. The setting and characters are recognizable (now trite?) staples of his beloved Maine coast, and he works at bringing their "down east" mannerisms to life with language that rings of "Bert & I" lobstermen. I wasn't particularly caught up in the aged newspapermen's tale of their quest to identify a mysterious dead man found on the local beach. And the ending ... well, um ... the ending is definitely an open-ender. King cleverly covers himself by adding a disclaimer of sorts that the story won't appeal to many readers. Yep. You got that right, Stephen. No gunplay, no boozers, no saucy dames, no double-crosses, no slangy patter, no real satisfaction for me. I suggest Hard Crime afficionados skip this entry and look to some of the heavy-hitters from the past
Simply awful!. Let me start by saying that many will think this review is "not helpful" and I don't care.Have I read this book?  No.Did I spend the worst year of my life with Deborah Hughes-Hallet's last calc book?  Yes.Do I feel the responsibility to tell people that that book sucked more than anything?  yes.Do I think this book could be much different?  Nope.Check her last book and seeing the reviews.  It is a 2 based on 46 reviews and counting.  The only reason it has a 2 star rating and that is because some people give it 5 stars,  most reviews are 1's.Avoid this author at all costs
Inevitable Surprises. Good current trend analysis. Personal political bias reflected. Technical errors: Thinks methane is a fuel - it is not, Thinks is clean - actually causes more pollution to make than gasoline causes when burned.  No conclusions on trends, only vague thoughts and recommends positive thinking
Painfully bad writing. I was assigned this book as preparation for an A.P. English class, and I was incredibly disappointed with it. Although it features some stirring stories of bravery and compassion (hence the two stars), every word of it is poured over with syrup and then carelessly vomited onto the page. Only about half of the words in this book are necessary at all to the context of the stories it tells; the rest are flag-waving literary masturbation. Consider sentences like these:"Millions of men and women were involved in this tumultous journey through adversity and achievement, despair and triumph. Certainly there were those who failed to measure up, but taken as a whole this generation did have a 'rendezvous with destiny' that went well beyond the outsized expectations of President Roosevelt when he first issued that call to duty in 1936."Yes, I get it, Grandma and Grandpa were great! Now please, sir, learn how to structure a sentence! Most of the rest of the book is mindlessly self-indulgent treacle in this repetitive vein. How this man got a book deal is comprehensible to me only because I know how famous Brokaw is, but how any sadly misinformed American bought this book is more than beyond me. Please, if you respect yourself as a human being, DO NOT BUY THIS BOOK
Not the book to buy. I cannot recommend this book.  Each chapter is written by a different author or authors.  Some of those chapters are extremely good.  Others are very poor.  In fact, portions of the book are the most difficult to read technical text I have ever seen.  In those areas, gleaning the information needed for the CISSP exam (or any other purpose) is difficult at best.  Also, there are some significant accuracy errors in some places.  I really believe your money is better spent on the Shon Harris CISSP All-in-One Exam Guide, Third Edition
Blue Light. Walter Mosley is normally a detective writer, known for his Easy Rawlins stories. Blue Light is a diversion into a genre that would fall somewhere between science fiction and new age. Various people in northern California are zapped with a blue light that makes them weird. According to the book's cover flap, the light brings out the potential of any person it strikes. However in the book it simply magnifies their existing personality. A smart girl becomes really smart, a young girl with quick reflexes becomes something of a ninja, and a promiscuous wife becomes a sex goddess. Mr Mosley is a talented writer. His prose and some of his action sequences makes this book readable. Unfortunately there's little balance between good and evil, which is problematic since the whole second half of the book is one long buildup of suspense towards a final apocalyptic encounter. Even more unfortunate is the fact the long awaited encounter is tedious and uninteresting. There's a few great and captivating scenes in this book, but otherwise extremely little to recommend itself
Trying to finish it. This book is very hard to read.  Excruciatingly painful in dull plot as well as the overly wordy text.  I am going to finish it as an exercise  in tenacity
Glad to be done with it. Predator is the worst book I have read in 2 months (I read a lot of books).  It is too dis-jointed and incongruous and lacks cohesiveness of plot and events.  The characters are poorly drawn (I hardly recognized the Scarpetta and Marino of earlier books).  The transition to reveal the perpetrator was abrupt and weak, leaving me feeling: "HUH??"This the fourth (and it will be the last) book by Cornwell that I have read.  It was totally disappointing and I spent extra time on it just so I could complete it and "Forget about it"
Horrible. This book is horrible.  It is not true to the original classic stories!  Most of the endings, of the stories I've read so far, are different. I don't care for the illustrations either.  I was very dissapointed.  I bought this for my neices, and didn't read the book until they came to visit me, and by then it was too late to return this book. It's basically going in the trash
Threw it Away. The good first. There is a lot of good. I enjoyed and agree with every chapter except the chapter about men keeping a visual rolodex of sexual images for their perusal.My husband and I have a great marriage. He knows I have the utmost respect for him and he has great love for me. He is certainly not ever wanting more sex, just complaining about how he feel like a piece of meat sometimes. (In jest I'm sure.)I say that to show, that not coming from a prude, the author puts for the idea that men just lust and fantasize about women nonstop and it's normal. I am quite sure she used the word normal at least twice. It was dealt with like, it's a fact so get used to it.  Your man might chase women around home depot to get a better look, or go out to dinner with you and remain preoccupied with the hostess all night. The men give accounts of this, like, oh well, doesn't mean I don't love my wife.  In my opinion, just b/c they aren't willing to risk actually acting on those thoughts, doesn't mean it's ok.I found the book to be very very discouraging. That a bunch of married Christian men would unapologetically (key word here)see a woman in a fitted worksuit no less (we're not talking lingerie here) and think about what she's like in bed or what her nipples look like. There's no mention that maybe this is lust or committing adultery in your heart. Or maybe they should not do this. It really threw me for a loop! I guess I didn't realize just how insecure or sex crazed men are. Not that I think they don't want a lot of it. But I found it discouraging for Christian wives to think that their husbands can't go to work without picturing everyone naked.  I found it disturbing that the book is purporting this is giving the idea to men a lisence to do this since it's "normal" and women just need to get used to the idea
Not far enough. The Wisdom of Menopause provides an accurate description of what happens to a woman's body during and after ovarian failure (menopause). This book describes in detail the negative effects of menopause (ovarian failure) while still describing it as a natural and normal process to embrace. I don't believe we should be so willing to allow our ovaries to fail, instead we should look for ways to help them work better and for longer.
Master of Mixed Metaphors. Don't believe the hype.  This book is not a masterpiece, but if you are able to stick through the piles of metaphorical images that are at moments beautiful but most often don't quite make sense together and make it to the end of this novel you'll be pleased to find some actual action and true emotion in Justine.  It took me a very long time to read through the first half of this book.  The narrator is irritatingly affected and the writing drags with a myriad of descriptions that are uneffective at creating a cohesive picture.  But what kept me going were Durrell's secondary characters.  He has a nack for capturing and creating quirkiness that borders on bizarre and his stories of the more minor men and women in Justine are striking, emotional, and entertaining.  I am glad that I was able to make it to the end of the novel (there is a hospital scene that made it all worth while), but I do regret that I recommended this novel to my bookgroup and I do not plan to complete the quartet
A Tale of One City Would Have Been Plenty. Dont buy this book!  Or buy it and tear it in two pieces because it is much to long.  Wow I mean talk about boreing.  Is it the best of times or is it the worst of times?  You cant make up you're mind on page one sentence one even!?!If I am this guys editer I would have told him to just write about the best of times.  Thats plenty and people dont need another depressing book in this day and age anyhow.Only ONE STAR for you but keep trying youll get there
Sex belongs in the bedroom NOT in the library!!!!!!!. This book is filthy.  I had to take a shower after I read it.  Why doesn't he get a job?  Why does he have to live in France? Why doesn't he save his money instead of investing it in alcohol and hookers?  So many questions.  People just think this book deserves a place on the same shelf as say James Michenier because it was banned.  It was banned because it's a bad book
Boring textbook. I had to buy this book for a class.  It is an extremely boring read and I struggle to keep myself awake while reading it (as does the rest of the class I am told).  It does tell you about Dreamweaver though and I suppose that is its purpose.  One thing that I do not like is the way the author is constantly bashing Internet Explorer and other isp's.  His personal opinions are a real turn-off and unnecessary
Not what I thought this would be. Like other reviewers listed here, I thought this book would focus on the trials and tribulations of cooking recipes that are half-a-century old (if not older)using pithy, witty humor and comparisons of the writer's life and Child's life.  To be fair, there is some of this sprinkled throughout the book, but as an avid cook and Child fan I wish there had been more.I think there is a market today for food writing; good food writing, like MFK Fisher and Elizabeth David, but I don't think Julie Powell even comes close.  The Julie/Julia Project is a front for this young novelist who see-saws between charming and extremely annoying in her attempts to describe how her life evolves over a one-year period in which she participated (to whatever extent) in some very profound experiences, like working for the government agency dealing with the World Trade Center memorials, a household move in NYC, dealing with a less than stellar marraige, and coping with very needy friends and family.Julie, get a get a grip on your neurosis and narcissism and just write!  Forget the food, it's just not you.  Stick to your hoo-hum job, your even more narcissistic friends, and your boring marraige and you could be the next Nora Ephron, or at the very least, Erma Bombeck.
An Unproven Thesis. The title appears to be a ripoff of Pete Hammil's book, "Why Sinatra Matters". A more accurate title to this book would be, "Why New Orleans Matters to Me". Almost all of the author's reasons are subjective. He likes the Mardi Gras Indians, the neighborhood restaurants and music clubs. So what? What is the objective significance of them? The author mentions but does not evaluate the objective effects of the high crime rate, welfare dependence and the political corruption. He also dodged the objective fact that before Hurricane Katrina 40% of city residents could not read and write and 50% refused to work. Does New Orleans matter to him because a majority of its residents are stupid and lazy? The truth is that New Orleans has mattered for one objective reason: its geographical location near the mouth of the Mississippi River. The U.S. cannot effectively compete in the global economy without a safe and secure New Orleans. If coastal erosion does not inundate the city, it will continue to matter. But this book will not
Errors, errors. This book allots much space to stuff you find everywhere - what is a pivot table, for example - and on matters of conjecture and taste -does a pie chart "accurately" portray the data, for example. This space could be put to better use.The section most interesting to me is Chapter 7 (30 pages) - Creating Interactive Charts. Unfortunately, there are errors. Some are only annoying, for example, on p. 213 telling us to enter Sheet1!Dates when the correct entry is =Sheet1!Date (plural is a typo, and no equals sign means no success). Simple errors, but I didn't like trial and error to discover the correct entry.Other errors are tougher to fix, as on p. 228 where we are told to enter =N(OFFSET(Dates,(ROW(OFFSET($A$1 ... etc)) (I haven't filled in all the line). This procedure doesn't work at all, and an explanation of how it is supposed to work is "beyond the scope of the book". In trying to fix it, I found my own interactive graph that plots every N'th point and automatically adjusts to fit the selected data. Is a thank you in order?What can you do? Walkenbach explains (p. 327) that changes to a pivot table chart that cause updating mean that all formatting is reverted to default. He also explains that pivot-table xy-charts are not possible, and that efforts to get around this basically are trouble. This may be the most useful part of this book: it tells you what can't be done.Bottom Line: This book is padded and contains errors that consume much time
Badly written. Badly written book
Why?. I've never understood DnD's reasoning (in any of its incarnations) for building the particular planar structure that it uses for all is worlds. if the Greeks and Babylonian and all those old civilizations made up their own cosmos, why did the creators of DnD think their world's needed to rip off those wonderful inventions instead of making up their own. Now, I realize they have tried from time to time, but no self-respecting DM will use all the junk in this book.The only useful part of this book is the planar characteristics. They should have spent 90% of the book on that, and 10% on examples. Then they would have gotten a 5 star vote from me.
nothing stirs up hate like calling people nazis. authors should find real jobs instead of creating witchhunt after witchhunt looking for those evil militia people who want to blow up the world.this stuff would be laughable if it wasn't so serious. The left cries about McCarthism but is doing the exact same thing here by creating villians and devils where there are none.Peddeling hate and fear even if based on loose facts or lies works for some
Cute pictures, but... I'm expecting my first child, and my mother gave me this book because she knows I like animals (especially the cute babies!)  After reading the book, though, I was downright depressed to the point of tears about becoming a mother.  It basically tells you your children will be horrible terrors and not ever appreciate a thing you do, and that your husband will be even worse!  The writing is bitter and twisted compared to the pictures.  I do give a couple stars, because the pictures are cute if you don't read the text
Ideological Claptrap. As a professional art historian who teaches twentieth century art at public university, I find this book to be virtually worthless. Not only do the authors leave out artists from their book because they don't adhere to their own rigid ideological orthodoxies, but the book is very badly written; they undermine their own arguments by constantly lapsing into semi-meaningless jargon. A good postmodernist/ Marxist perspective in a general introduction to twentieth century would be useful, but these authors are too inept and arrogant to bring it off
It's a Comic Strip!. Man, was I disappointed.  This book is a comic strip.  It may have had a lot of meaning, to those involved at the time it was written, with many government stings hidden in the strip, but for enjoyable reading, it stunk.  I got through it in half an hour, hardly my idea of buying good reading
Have not read the book, and no desire to. I just have something to say to those arguing on this review page --- Wicca is a peaceful religion.  However, just because someone is peaceful does not mean they are not allowed to protect themselves.  I am a person who actively studies all the religions I have come across; Wiccans believe religion is a very sacred and _personal_ thing - hence they do not actively pursue "conversion" of others, they mostly only speak of it to others who are generally interested in learning.While I understand that this author believes he is helping to keep children away from "a dangerous practice", may I remind everyone that this is only one man's opinion.  These Wiccans and Pagans are not (for the most part) flaming Christianity --- what they desire is for others to be tolerant of their Paths.The last thing that any parent wants is to be terrified of sending their child to school one day, and have the child come home after being physically or mentally attacked, or have the child come home so depressed they actually commit suicide (which has happened, Google the topic), or not have the child come home at all.  This happens in so many societies because of fear; Pagans want to be safe just like everyone else.  And no child is responsible for what their parent believes --- unless that child is old enough to make the decision to believe the same.Blessings.Lone Wol
Poor excuse for a thriller. Rising Sun was a terrible read.  Crichton uses one device throughout:  the old hand knows everything an hour before the young guy and slowly reveals it to him.  It's tiring and monotonous.  Never mind the even more monotonous lectures on the differences between American and Japanese business cultures.
title misleading. there was hardly any mention of Pixel the cat, it was alot of dialog, tried to resemble a fast paced action book, but I found myself skimming over alot of the text after a while.......for a female I like action and for the plot to move along........there was too much about dumb sexual innuendos about swinging, and multiple partner sex.I felt like the over tone to the book was "well ok we all have alot of sex with LOTS of different people in the future" it was too focused on that ...I liked "Stranger In a Strange Land" alot better. By the time I was through with this book I kind of felt almost like he was just slapping stuff on a page.
I expected more... Another book I read for class. I knew a little about Margery Kempe beforehand, like she had 14 children. I didn't know that the first autobiography ever written in English was so boring. I felt like Margery repeated herself, over and over. I wanted more details about her life- about her husband, her children, and her pilgrimages. I don't think I would pick this up unless you are specifically interested in early Christianity writings.
More harm than good. Although I appreciate that the author would share her story of moving from a scary M.S. diagnosis to a more positive health path, I found this particular book disturbing in its lack of empathy and credit to others. Instead, it reads like a long list of proud directives from a mother of five who "researched" this, works-out six days a week, has her own "elliptical trainer", goes skiing, does Pilates, has a black belt in karate, attends fund-raising galas, and counts Hollywood celebrities as "close, personal friends". The author is obviously rather fortunate: her disease does not appear to progress and she makes no reference to financial need (holding a job, raising children). Reality check: with M.S. there is often extreme fatigue, constant pain and great uncertainty. Whether we do everything this author suggests or nothing, the disease will progress rapidly in some, and remain almost completely inactive in others.Some of what is written is valid; we can do much to help ourselves. But I would hate to think that someone newly diagnosed (as I am) could feel like it was their own fault if their disease worsened, all because they didn't follow the many orders in this book. Ms. Davis shows no empathy for those who smoke or drink or eat poorly; these are real addictions and habits, which are surely not any easier to kick when also facing a life with M.S.? And will those who know nothing of M.S. now look at someone on crutches and assume they "just hadn't tried" like this author?Finally, credits please!? Bill Withers wrote, "Lean on Me" (full lyrics appear without his name). Dr. Roy Laver Swank was instrumental in developing an M.S. diet, which is largely what Davis describes
From 1963 - Info now on the Internet. The article that the author originally published appears as an appendix in this book reprinted in 1988.  Although the author is to be lauded for his breakthrough in the field, the book itself is mostly light fluff about the history of the area with the meat of the text in the appendices with the original articles.Most of what is in this book can be found on the Internet in about 10 seconds with a good search engine looking for stonehenge astronomical alignments
Not Catherine's best book. I love Catherine Coulter books but this one was disappointing at best. The formula for the book which involves female slavery has been used over and over in historical romances but this plot fails where many others succeed. Mainly because Magnus is such a [jerk] throughout the whole story, he never stops being cruel long enough to make this a good romance novel. If you want a good Coulter book read her bride triology but skip this book
Corrupted analysis. You'll never get the straight story about nationalism out of Eric Hobsbawm, who himself appears to try to reconcile his own ethnic identity with the topic.  David Pryce-Jones once noted that in Hobsbawm's own autobiography: "he [Hobsbawm] boasts of a visit to Bir Zeit University on the West Bank to display solidarity with the Palestinians.  Why Palestinian nationalism is valid, and Jewish nationalism invalid, is something else Hobsbawm fails to analyze and explain. Quite crudely, he approves of nationalism in countries which proclaim themselves Communist and anti-American, like Cuba or Vietnam, while rejecting nationalism in countries which are not Communist and are pro-American, like Israel" ([...], Jan. 3, 2003).Such twisted thinking is evident through "Nations and Nationalism," where Mr. Hobsbawm spares no effort, however subtle, to demean nationalism that doesn't conform to his pre-existing prejudices.  In short, when writing about nationalism, Mr. Hobsbawm allowed his considerable analytic and writing skills to become corrupted by his religion, communism.  Therefore, unless you are an acolyte of that religion, this book is not worth your time, money or effort to read, and if you *are* a member of that religion, I suggest you broaden your intellectual horizons a bit, perhaps by reading Liah Greenfield's "Nationalism: Five Roads to Modernity" or Benedict Anderson's "Imagined Communities.
no no no not this book. If you know x.p. pro in supporting enviroment then this book will be good for you.   but if you are new to the helpdesk field like i was when i took this test.  You will possibly due horribly like i did.   Do your self a favor and pick up the self paced training kits from 70-270 and 70-271 by walter glenn.  Much better books.   much more thorough practice tests.This cram book is for people that wanna waste money
patient of ellen cutler. We all know that close friends, relatives or colleagues who have something to gain write the 5 stars critics. They are really objective.This book is a 0 star and should be taken off the market. I can't believe it is still being sold. It is misleading.  It taps into the thousands of people vulnerability who are so desperate to find a cure for themselves or their young children they are ready to try anything.I was one of these people.I bought the book, read it, sounded promising so I made an appointment to see Dc Cutler.  I was her patient for some time but got no relief. I spend quite a bit of money on the products she wanted me to take but nothing changed!Ellen Cutler is  a charlatan in my opinion. She actually laid me to believe her treatment cured me from my egg white allergy. I believed her at first but the following week, I had a conversation with her assistant while getting another treatment  she said Mrs., "you were NEVER ALLERGIC to egg white. WOW! I could not believe it. I still gave a chance to Mrs. Cutler treatment for a few more weeks. But no results, no change. It was clear I was wasting my time and my money. So I stop seeing her.Now several years later although still allergic to egg yolk, cat and dog, I am feeling better as far as my asthma goes because I finally got out of a 30 years abusive marriage.
An odyssey into dodgy cultural analysis. This is simply one of the worst books on horror I've ever read.Before you purchase this book, know what you are getting: the first half of the book focuses on the horror films of the twenties and thirties, and is embroiled (as would be expected) with anecdotes, stories and information about people like James Whale, Tod Browning and Bela Lugosi. This is all highly interesting, but unfortunately the author makes some very far-reaching conclusions about the cultural place of horror films in the 1930s, and especially about Frankenstein and Dracula, the two subjects to which he devotes the most time. In the second half, the book starts collapsing under the weight of its own grand conclusions and impossible correlations. Gradually, almost unnoticeably, facts and figures are entirely replaced with dodgy social and cultural analysis.Mr. Skal completely fails to mention Jesus Franco, Ruggero Deodato, Lucio Fulci and other famous Italian horror directors. Hammer Horror has less than a page devoted to it. Roger Corman is mentioned in passing in a rambling two-page essay about "Masque of the Red Death". Even Dario Argento, who should be known to all but the least knowledgeable cinephiles, is not mentioned at all in this book. Instead, Skal spends 80 pages discussing AIDS, vampirism and Anne Rice. The author reaches conclusions that are drawn from a set of banal connections: for instance, in the chapter "Bad Blood", Michael Jackson is made out to be a modern-day Lon Chaney. The connection? That both practiced physical transformation (Jackson is a pop star with plastic surgery, Lon Chaney was a make-up pioneer film-star. The connection is superficial at best). Horror icons are constantly made out to be "christ figures".This book is full of holes when it comes to the subject it's supposed to be a "comprehensive" study of: Italian/Spanish horror, Indian horror and Asian horror are not mentioned at all, and neither is the VHS revolution in the 80s. To add to insult, the cultural analysis is weak and contrived, delivered in hyper-eloquent, grandiose prose and takes up about half of the book. Go with Steven J. Schneiders "The Horror Film and Psychoanalysis: Freud's Worst Nightmares" instead, which covers much of the same subjects in an infinitely better package
some useful information, but disappointing on the whole. I'm a big fan of Dan Poynter's book The Self-Publishing Manual, so I expected that this book would be of comparable quality.  Unfortunately, that just isn't the case.  There is some information relating to the "new book model" publication process that should be helpful, but what little information exists is difficult to extract from this book which has been very poorly designed and laid out.  The pages are constantly broken by quotes that loosely relate to the text, and this makes it difficult for the actual content to read smoothly.  The text itself seems disjointed as if Poynter has just copied and pasted passages of previous articles together, and little attention has been paid to making this a coherent and informative book.  The graphics used in the book are of poor quality- an obvious example of someone who doesn't know how to prepare graphics for print and an indication that this book was just slapped together.  I hope this isn't what Dan Poynter means by "The New Book Model", as this was an incredibly disappointing book both aesthetically and as a text.While I think electronic publishing is a medium that's here to stay and incredibly valuable, I do disagreee with Dan Poynter's assertion in this book that "the only ink-on-paper ('dead tree') books in the future will be coffee table books- books as an art form.  These books will be used to decorate homes and offices.  Other information will be disseminated electronically without sacrificing trees."  Certainly this will never happen as long as "new book model" publishers publish books of this quality.  Consumers will demand books of greater informational value that present the information in an easy-to-absorb and attractive manner, which, I'm disappointed to discover, Dan Poynter is willing to sacrifice.  In any case, the fact is there are actually more trees growing in the United States now as a result of our vast use of paper and lumber than there were 200 years ago.  The "save the trees" argument for e-publishing is just wrong.  There are a lot of good reasons to e-publish, but trees aren't among them.  It's worth noting that far fewer trees would have died in the printing of this book had the author left out the exessive quotes and textboxes that pad this book's page-count.All in all, I'm disappointed with Writing Nonfiction.  The information in this book that is of any value really belongs in Poynter's infinitely better and more comprehensive book, The Self-Publishing Manual.  One chapter would cover it.  I also recommend Avery Cardoza's The Complete Guide To Successful Publishing.
760 Pages of Torture. Would you stand in line at an Applebee's for three hours in order to eat a hamburger when you could get a hamburger just as good---maybe better---at a dozen other nearby places where the wait was only fifteen minutes?  Of course not!  Why, then, would you spend countless hours plowing through this 760 page monstrosity when you could spend the same amount of time reading two James Patterson books, or a Patterson and a Connelly, or two Thomas Harris books...my apologies, Greg Iles, but for a simple, formulaic serial killer book, Blood Memory was just WAY too long.  The book has two co-plots; one involves a serial killer who murders older men, the second involves the mysterious childhood abuse suffered by the female lead.  The serial killer plot is actually the more interesting, but at least two-thirds of the novel dwells on the abuse instead and unfortunately the "secret" is painfully obvious to any seasoned reader from the first few pages of the book.  All in all this would have been a halfway decent novel if Iles---or his editor---had chopped out about 300 pages of unneccesary text.  Iles just LOVES to have two characters sit and talk for 3o, 40 or even 50 pages, but since most of his dialogue is what I call "soap opera" speak, meaning you know what the characters will say before the words are even out of their mouths, these chapters dragged on and on and on.  Iles also wastes pages by writing lengthy descriptions of people eating ice cream, taking showers, and doing other mundane things that should have been glossed over or chopped out entirely.  Come on, Greg; why describe a character savoring the taste of vanilla ice cream as if it's some strange, exotic treat that no one's ever heard of before?  Just as some people love to hear themselves talk, I think Iles loves to see himself write...and although some of his books have been quite good, Blood Memory misses the mark by a long shot
The Economist?. I agree with much that has been said about PJ's pathetic attempt at explaining economics. PJ is a humorist and should stick with that. In fact, if PJ were true to Smith's idea of specialization in capitalism, he would stay clear away from a subject with which he has NO expertise. Case in point, PJ seems to believe that a trade deficit with China does not truly exist(?). PJ might be a keen observer of human behavior, but that may be all that he is.
"Fear the Offense". I really hoped this book would live up to its promising title.  Unfortunately it turned out to be not only "all over the place" in terms of its approach to the subject matter, but alternately banal and inexplicably eccentric in adducing historical example.The author jumps heedlessly back and forth between the strategic and tactical levels of war as he considers the history of warfare (in the West), along with mass armies, railroads, sea power, and other of the usual topics.  Regrettably his organization of the material never acknowledges the role of the operational level of war in bridging strategy and tactical battle through campaigns; this oversight produces insights that are, to the military mind, humorously banal, such as the following:"Offensive operations then get launched even where states had defensive intentions." (p.11)One is tempted to respond, "Duh, Shraggy."  (Quester attributes this phenomenon not to the considerations of geography, tactics, weapons capabilities, politics, and alliances that normally go into such operational choices, but to what he calls the "offensive" character of technology.  Reducing the conscious human choices of offense and defense to automatic consequences of the technology of weapons is only one of the disservices done by Quester's tendency to extrapolate backward from his organizing model:  the unique constraints imposed by global thermonuclear weaponry during the Cold War.)The questionable invocations of historical trends, causes, and effects are too numerous to catalogue.  Examples include the assertion that "the significance" of agriculture to warfare is the necessity it implies to defend territory; whereas it seems more significant to mankind's development that agriculture uniquely promotes creation of the wealth and societal stability that alone enable long-term conquest.  In another example, Quester overstates the influence of Clausewitz on Imperial Germany, suggesting that he "taught the Germans to be 'too total' " (in waging war) in the years prior to WWI.  This characterization of German strategic policy in the 19th century, a policy that exemplified "limited war" for subsequent generations of strategists, is oddly unwary, at the very least.The reader should be wary on encountering in the 2002 Introduction such passages as these:"Most of us, during the Cold War, would have given Marxist ideology credit for... teaching the peoples under Communist regimes to cease any hating of each other based on old ethnic differences." (p. xiii)Well, no, I don't think most of us would.  This statement is made in service of Quester's point that the technology of weapons is more "malleable" than human intentions have proven to be -- but again he misses the whole intermediate step of crafting the military execution of those intentions, presuming that directing a war is no more complicated an act than pulling a trigger, and that therefore the weapon is everything.This is indeed the bottom line of the book:  Quester has in mind the astrategic threat of nuclear weapons, and that colors all his conclusions.  In the Introduction to the 1988 edition he writes:"The highest goal of the weapons planner...should be to design weapons systems that consistently and reliably reward the defense, making it to everyone's advantage to do nothing in a crisis."Reading this on p. xxxi, one might be excused for seeing no great reason to continue further.  And with the exception of a few useful insights on the dynamics of balance of power politics and defensive alliances, one would be right.
bought it based on review in Saveur. I bought this book based on a review in Saveur.  It did not give me the information that I wanted and at $50+, I thought that it was very overpriced
Wish I could get my money back... As a strong proponent of attachment parenting and a rather radical unschooler, this book was a BIG disappointment!!! I bought this book after reading the reviews and wish I hadn't paid more than $1 for it. While the title "The Unprocessed Child" accurately describes Laurie's upbringing, this book shouldn't be grouped with other unschooling literature. The author, while cherishing the close bond she has with her daughter, reminds me of the mother in "Love You Forever" who sneaks across town and climbs into her grown son's room at night to spend time with him--sweet but a bit creepy. The fact that she admits that she even went to college at the same time as her daughter so she could spend more time with Laurie pretty much says it all. The mother clearly has her own issues that I hope she allows herself to work through and heal from now that she's not spending 24/7 with her only child. We have been unschooling each of our four children since birth --challenging temperments and all--and I feel very privileged to spend so much time with them as they discover how exciting it is to decode and discover the world around them. If you want to read a GOOD book about unschooling without unsupported platitudes and preaching in almost every chapter, I would recommend "Homeschooling our Children, Unschooling Ourselves". Those authors offer more balance and eloquence than Ms. Fitzenreiter.
Read the KJV please. This bible is not the true GOD'S Word. It has been changed too much. I believe that the KJV is the true Bible. God died for our sins. He shed his blood so that we might have everlasting life - but, ONLY if we belive. This bible is written to make you feel good about yourself. All we are sinners destined for hell and damnation. God was not brought into this world just to make us feel good about ourselves but to make us feel a need to repent from our sin. We cannot get to heaven in eternity unless we believe in the LORD JESUS CHRIST
This book should be classified under Historical Fiction. This book is one goofy rumor after another.  With hardly any verifiable sources, Epstein goes crazy throwing out every possible conspiracy idea around.  He actually states that Hammer financed Al Gore's college education, and that the whole Gore family were his servants.  If you love the &quot;X Files&quot; you will love this book
A New Low for B.S. (Brad Sugars). This shows all the hallmarks of another rigging of the review process by shameless spruiker Brad Sugars.Notice all 5 star reviewers have only ever reviewed books by B.S. and .... low and behold they all recieve 5 stars, and most are thinly disguised promotions complete with embellished statements of the undoubted and profound effects it's purchase will have on your business, imploring you to buy it, complete with exclamation marks!B.S. started Action International Business Coaching, with 700+ franchise holders, it seems to me a portion of those are working overtime through review writing to ingratiate themselves with "The Boss".I don't doubt Mr B.S. has probably done some admirable things, but the two books of his that I made the mistake of purchasing (Instant Cashflow and Real Estate Riches) were the text equivalent of "Vaporware" with little beneficial content and many tired cliches.So to summarise, boo to you Mr B.S., living proof that Snake Oil Salesmen never die, they just change industries, you've reached a new low..
Horrifying "hero"..!!!. I would have rated this book with no star if I could. Severin was such a horrific character. Forget about the rape scene, what about the one where Severin punished Hastings for being jealous of Lady Marjorie by tying her to the ground and made her eat on the floor with his dogs in front of everyone in the dining hall????!! Is that supposed to be romantic? This is suppposed to be a romance novel, not strictly historical fiction. As such, there has to be some romantic element to the story, but I found nothing romantic whatsoever between Hastings' and severin's relationship.This is definitely the worst book I've ever read bar none!
Research and Theory Construction. This book's title shows that "qualitative research" is its primary subject, and "developing grounded theory" is its secondary subject. The opposite is true in the case of the book coauthored earlier by Strauss: "The Discovery of Grounded Theory: Strategies for Qualitative Research." In the interval between the writing of the two books, Strauss may have realized that his thesis was about research work more than theory construction. But the text of this second book too presents research work as theory construction, as explained below. It could be thought that what is to be called a "theory" is a linguistic issue. But the definition of this term must not prevent the construction of real theories as distinct from empirical knowledge.In lieu of  the implicit definition of "theory" that appeared in the earlier book (p. 1), an explicit one is given in this second book: "A set of well developed concepts related through statements of relationship, which together constitute an integrated framework that can be used to explain or predict phenomena" (p. 15). The new and critical but obscure expressions in this definition are "well developed concepts" and "integrated framework," whereas the idea of explaining or predicting phenomena by using a theory appeared also in the earlier definition. As I mentioned in my review of the earlier book, explaining or predicting phenomena can be done by using empirical knowledge too and therefore cannot be considered a distinguishing characteristic of theories. For example, the empirical laws of electromagnetism known before Maxwell served to explain, predict, and control many electromagnetic phenomena but did not constitute a theory. The authors repeat the same mistake when they admit that "a theory is more than a set of [empirical] findings;" and continue by saying, "it offers an explanation of phenomena" (p.22). They also say, "generating theories about phenomena, rather than just generating a set of findings, is important to the development of a field of knowledge" (pp. 22-23). That is correct, but the problem is to know how theories are generated. Also, "findings" too serve to explain phenomena, as mentioned, although they have a narrower scope than theories."Statements of relationship [between phenomena] are commonly referred to as `hypotheses'" (p. 103). "Any hypotheses and propositions derived from data must be continuously `checked out' against incoming data and modified, extended, or deleted as necessary" (p. 22). The key concept here, which the authors do not clarify sufficiently, is the derivation of hypotheses from data. First, some relationships between phenomena can be deduced from the data. But what is thus produced constitutes not a hypothesis but empirical knowledge about those phenomena. It is when those relationships are "generalized through induction," in Newton's words, that they become general rules which are of hypothetical nature, or hypotheses, because induction yields only probabilities, not certainties, as Bertrand Russell emphasized. The authors seem to ignore this fact. Moreover, when the hypotheses thus derived from data are "continuously `checked out' against incoming data and modified, extended, or deleted as necessary" and those that are conserved are finally supported by all new information, they stop being hypotheses and become empirically known facts. And any set of such facts constitutes empirical knowledge, not a theory.The authors seem not to have a clear view of where induction and deduction are used. "Anytime a researcher derives hypotheses from data, because it involves interpretation, we consider that a deductive process" (p. 22). A relationship that is deduced from the data related to some singular phenomena constitutes empirical knowledge about those phenomena. A hypothesis is created out of that knowledge when it is "generalized through induction." The total process is not only deduction but involves also  induction. The authors express these facts in an obscure way thus: "At the heart of theorizing lies the interplay of making inductions (deriving concepts, their properties, and dimensions from data) and deductions (hypothesizing about the relationships between concepts, the relationships also are derived from data, but data that have been abstracted by the analyst from the raw data)" (p. 22). What the authors unclearly describe as "abstracted by the analyst from the raw data" is what Newton meant by the words "generalized through induction." And the generalization must cover phenomena that do not allow the deduction of the hypothesis from the data if the hypothesis is expected to be used to construct a theory. The authors conclude: "At the end, it is hoped, the researcher has systematically developed the products of analysis into a theory" (p. 22). The major mistake in this conception of theory construction is that it ignores the following fact: A hypothesis that is "checked out against incoming data," (i.e. fits the data, is deducible from the data) is no more a hypothesis but empirical knowledge and therefore a system of statements only such hypotheses constitutes not a theory but a group of empirical knowledge. The authors repeat the same mistake when they say that a theory "is validated during the actual research process" (213). What can be validated during the "actual" (original) research process is empirical knowledge. A second phase of research is concerned with the validation of the theory, i.e. with showing that the consequences of the theory fit the phenomena, or that they are deducible not only from the theory but also from the phenomena. Consequently, the theory becomes usable in explaining, predicting, and controlling the phenomena.Only when knowledge that is deduced, or readily obtained, from the raw data related to some singular phenomena is "generalized through induction" and assumed, or hypothesized, to be valid also in relation to phenomena that do not make possible the deduction of that hypothesis from the data that a hypothesis is created that can be used to construct a theory. This means that a theory contains at least one hypothesis that cannot be deduced from the empirical data related to all phenomena to which it is assumed to apply. The reason for this is that a law of nature may be deduced from the data related to some phenomena but not from the data related to other phenomena. Consequently, by transferring knowledge from one set of phenomena to another can provide hypothetical knowledge that is otherwise unavailable. A theory is a set of general statements, or laws, of which at least one is such a non-testable hypothesis at the time of the construction of the theory. After a theory is thus constructed, consequences are deduced from it that serve to explain, predict, and control the related phenomena. The usefulness of a theory in doing these things constitutes the proof of its usability and also the proofs of all of its contents, including the non-testable hypothesis, or hypotheses. When phenomena that do not fit a tested and accepted theory are encountered, a more general theory is constructed. The old theory is not discarded by being considered wrong but remains in use in the area where it is valid, because it is simpler than the more general theory.The above-presented knowledge about the content and the method of construction of theories is derived from the grand theories of physics. I have shown in my books how the same method can be used in psychology too. As an example, I constructed a theory of automatic responses such as the symptoms of non-organic mental disorders, dreams, cerebral lateralization as structural response, etc. This theory serves not only to explain and predict those phenomena but also to control them very effectively where this is possible. I had to mention these here because the best test of ideas is their usefulness in explaining, predicting, and controlling the phenomena.Although Strauss and Corbin advocate what they call "grounded theory," which is in reality nothing else than empirical knowledge, they expose their distrust of their work, which contains many unclear points, when they warn the reader by saying, "Remember that a theory is just that - a theory" (p. 213). Theories inspire more respect when their method of construction and their function are better understood.
The Chocolate War. The chocolate warThe chocolate war was one of the best books I have ever read...NOT! The chocolate war portrayed a very inappropriate scene. The boy jerry was supposed to sell chocolates but refused, but the book sidetracks and talks about naughty things and also swears a lot. I would not recommend this book because it seemed inappropriate. I don't think that this book should be available to children at a middle school level. This story might be better if the bad words and other bad things war taken out. I think that the story line seems great when jerry denies selling the chocolates because of Archie. Archie is a suspicious character that knows every one. I wish this book was more school appropriate, but it isn't and was a horrid book. Therefore, this book would be great if the author published a book with the Sam story but more school appropriate situations and words
GREAT MIND SERIES IS  ABRIDGED!?? (or at least incomplete). Another reviewer is correct in that there are SIGNIFICANT PORTIONS of the book missing in the Great Minds Series (green and black cover).  In one instance, I noted that 150 pages were converted into 14!  Also, Book IV Chapter VII is missing parts 2 and 3 (also quite lengthy portions of the piece).  Go with a complete version if you're going to bother to tackle this book, or especially if you are focussing on one particular idea (since that may be one that they cut out!)...Smith may be wordy, but to cut out such an enormous amount degrades the integrity of the work.  Shameful to nowhere state that LARGE chunks of this classic are absent...at least be forthcoming!If you choose a more complete version you'll get to read a classic from a better economist than a writer, but still a fantastic piece of work.  Smith does tend to try to overexplain things, but you get use to his style and can appreciate that he just wants to make sure that you get his point.AMMENDMENT:Upon discussion with my Economics professor, it is possible that this green book was one of the author's first versions (which he apparently edited and added to more than once).  I still say that the publisher should be more clear about the version, and that if you want his most recent updates and complete work, to look elsewhere
&quot;Wartime America&quot;. This book took me three months to read. It was so dry and boring it put me to sleep. The book contains no charts, no photos, nothing but text. It was part of an assignment for a college lesson. I'm embrassed  to admit I chose  this book because it was thin, yet the subject was over the topic I wanted.  After I read it, I didn't find the deepth it promised. Its view was off in  left field. If I was going to point out any one thing I learned for this  book I'd say, size doesn't always make a book easy.&quot;
Useless. This is a bizzar of prorietary code (TradeStation Language), and 20 yrs old fortran code at the Appendix. I am wondering who  will be using this code? Lot of spaghetti Mathematics which is neither simple focussing on concepts , nor deep enough to understant the mathematical details that's very poorly presented. In chapter 8 about uncovering cycles, after all the poorly written mathematical stuff, there is no mention on how to use the uncovered cycles in trading which is much more important than running after sines and cosines ...although I am a Computer Engineer with mathematical background , I got lost...I am forced to read this book as a reading material for CMT2 certificate , however I consider it a very badly written book with no real focus neither elegant mathematical details nor usable code nor Trading concepts
cliched, predictable. I haven't read any of the real Robert Ludlum before, but I don't think I will be starting if this is his style.The action scenes, with their falling chandeliers and mexican shootouts, are perhaps better suited to a 90 minute movie instead of a 400 page book. The weapons-catalogue padding is comical at first, later frustrating.The childishly cliched language is little help in distinguishing the myriad of characters and places. We know only the color of their hair before they are mercifully laid to rest.Perhaps most disturbing is the book's overall 1950's style racism  in which the Americans are dashing, multi-skilled warriors for good and the Russians, Ukrainians, even Germans are all ugly, inhuman or quickly dead.Whilst the premise for the story is promising and the plot is simple but water-tight, the reader is always a step-ahead of the characters. As other reviews have said, suspense and mystery are left absent
Hard to Read. Loved his other books but this was all over the place, hard to read, and to apply
Who is really writing these??. I'll be honest, the last three novels have me thinking that Patricia Cornwell has sold off the franchise of her name- the "voice" the writer uses bears no similarity to her other novels, and its very frustrating. Leaves a dedicated reader feeling like she'd been attacked by the pod people or something!I hold firm to the idea that she hasn't been writing these novels. There is just no way
Mark's Standard Handbook for Mechanical Engineers. I have a slightly older copy and I have found that for the PE exam this is a good reference however, if you are doing something in the real world, the Machinery's Handbook is FAR better.  This book gives good overviews of a huge variety of topics that any Mech Engr might need but not much depth.  It is about as much information as a manager might want to know
Factually inaccurate. If I were in Hoboken, having a Chicken Emergency, I wouldn't panic. It is hard to feel empathy for Arthur, the main character in this engaging but factually inaccurate Thanksgiving tale by Daniel Pinkwater, as he bumbles his way from one disaster to another. The premise that not a single shopkeeper in the whole of Hoboken has a turkey in their freezer is, at best, far-fetched. At worst, it is factually inaccurate and a damning incitement on Pinkwater's research whilst writing this book. This reviewer knows for a fact that Sandra D's Mini Mart, 453 5th St, had a freezer full of plump gobblers last Thanksgiving, and had Arthur visited King's Super market, 1212 Hudson St, he'd have found cranberry sauce as well. I'm all for warming, cheery tales of triumph over tragedy, but when they're this sloppy with the detail, they're hard to swallow. My nephew's first comment when he read this book was "I done a guff", and, quite frankly, I think that says it all. Disappointing
Really bad. Gee whiz, this is just a not so great book. The problems are much harder than the actual GRE and test abstruse stuff and your knowledge of specific equations. The review in the front I guess is sort of okay in that it lists a lot of differents equations that might be helpful. But the questions are terrible.
Poorly written self help garbage. Snakes on a plane: the book.If you've just read Dawkins' books such as The Selfish Gene or The Blind Watchmaker and think this might be a good follow up please think twice!This is not a science book and reads much more like a self help book. There is a very low content/noise ratio as it delivers very few ideas, and then expounds upon the same ideas over and over again using every new metaphor or anecdote the author can imagine. I couldn't even finish it as I was bored to tears and eventually just felt completely patronized and then annoyed by the author's sloppy understanding of the science involved.He repeatedly refers to natural selection as a "kludge" which shows a complete lack of understanding of Dawkins' material.If you want a good laugh at Brodie's incompetence with even basic statistics use Amazon's Inside This Book feature to read the paragraph on page 173 that begins "Now let's get a handle on what it really means..." (you can also search on the number 6500 to find this page). Either the author is clueless, or the people on this island have 1-year lifespans.How did this guy get published?
Another Tim O'Brien sham. Another book that is written like hearing a narrative. I would not recommend this bok for any reader
Not my first choice. I'm sorry to say, mr. Beitler appears to be a really nice guy, but the book is often basic, broad and opinions are not always well fundamented. It is a great source for a lot of researches others did on OC related subjects, however, this book is for a large part no more than a summary of research findings of  these others. This book, since it provides a lot of findings, can be helpful for writing a masters thesis. For people who never read about OC before; buying this book can at least give you some helpful insights and a lot of advises for concrete action. For others; maybe Kotter or Burke can be more useful to gain insight in and knowledge of the subject of OC
Not Exactly Faithful. During Season Three of the television series Buffy the Vampire Slayer, viewers were introduced to Faith, a bold Slayer who loved breaking the rules and testing the limits. A fan favorite, she appeared on the spin-off series Angel on multiple occasions, then came back to BtVS during its final season.Faith was one of my favorite characters. She was memorably portrayed by actress Eliza Dushku. Many fans wished she had her own spin-off. Those who were loyal readers of the official BtVS/Angel original books also wished for a book that focused solely on Faith.The book Go Ask Malice is supposed to be Faith's diary, chronicling the time of her callling, and found in the ruins of Sunnydale after the series finale. This means that, from the get-go, the reader is supposed to believe that Faith would 1) keep a diary; and 2) carry it around through multiple moves, from Boston to Sunnydale to Los Angeles, then prison, then out of prison, then back to Sunnydale.  I tried to suspend disbelief for the sake of the story, but I couldn't.I never stop reading a story once I've started it, but this was really hard to get through. Since it was a diary, it was written in first person, but it didn't sound like Faith's voice to me. I constantly wanted to correct it. It wasn't one hundred percent wrong. Little tidbits were thrown at readers here and there - things and people Faith had said on the show in passing were made into plots and crucial characters - but overall, it never felt right.For a better taste of Faith fiction, try the short story written by Christopher Golden and Thomas E. Sniegoski in Buffy the Vampire Slayer: Chaos Bleeds: Prima's Official Strategy Guide. It is brief but powerful, and you'll be wishing Golden and Sniegoski wrote a full Faith novel instead
Remote spewing. I first came across the subject of remote viewing one night as I was switching tv channels and found a show about "psychic spying".  Imagine my shock when they showed a picture of my own company, SRI International! I've always been interested in anything exploring psychic phenomena, but to learn that this type of research was started at my own company in the '80s was exciting stuff indeed.The next day at work I learned there were still people here who remembered this program and the scientist who started it, Hal Putoff (not sure of last name spelling).  Some of my coworkers said at the time (of the project's heyday) they experimented with lots of employees, sometimes they'd put a bunch of regular folk in a giant room and give them coordinates to see if anyone could "view" them. Needless to say, scientists are a hard crowd and many found it amusing if not silly.  Physicists I know who worked with Dr. Putoff said the army eventually took over the project. This is told in the documentary I mentioned above. Dr. Putoff was also interviewed in the tv show and so were many others including some of the remote viewers.So I was thrilled when this book, "Psychic Warrior" was published.  I had hoped it would have tons of more information about what the project was doing now. But then I read it, and was utterly disappointed.  Like "Linus" the reviewer above I think this book was poorly written and the author is completely full of himself.  His constant grandstanding and egomania makes this very hard to get though to the interesting parts about the actual remote viewing.Also I wonder about how someone can work on a top secret project and then write a tell-all book about it.  Perhaps the author made a deal to embellish certain parts of his story so it wouldn't be taken too seriously.  Either way, if you think you can wade through all the boring garbage about his home life and how great he is, you might possiblly learn a little.  But I can't recommend this book as a tool to help you get there
I should have watched the movie. I had to read this book for school. I thought I would love it, but it turns out I was WRONG. This book was mind numbing. It is drawn out and boring. I almost threw the book away and rented the movie. I should have. This books sucks. Don't waste your time reading it
Unlimited Power is so much better. I read this book several years ago.  Just recently, I read Anthony Robbin's Unlimited Power.  If you're choosing between Awaken the Giant Within and Unlimited Power, definitely go with Unlimited Power.  Don't bother with this book.
Interesting subject matter, bad book. The subject of the is book is very interesting, so I struggled through to the end (with plenty of skimming), but this guy can't tell a story.  Too dry, too long, no sense of style.Tayloe Nicke
Hillariously Nonsensical Plagiarism. The worst book ever written about the Middle East is probably Joan Peters' From Time Immemorial; in this book Alan Dershowitz not only attempts to usurp that dubious honor from Peters, he also heavily plagiarizes half her book in order to do so.The man who has made a career and a fortune as a lawyer mastering the art of defending and exonerating the guilty turns his gaze onto one of the international community's leading delinquents and most prolific violators of International Human Rights Law, International Humanitarian Law and UN Resolutions.  His defending of nation states, however, is as unconvincing as his knowledge of historical events is laughable.Joan Peters' book was completely demolished and shown to be a fraud by Norman Finkelstein, and even the most ardent of Zionists have openly admitted the book is worthless.  20 years after that book faded into oblivion, Alan Dershowitz plagiarized much of its nonsensical arguments to masquerade as a book of his own.  For a full documentation of this plagiarism, see Norman Finkelstein's personal website.By writing this book, Dershowitz has inflicted more damage on Israel than a thousand books criticizing it ever could.  Any neutral who would read this book would realize how shoddy The Case for Israel really is; both the book and the `case' that Dershowitz presents are nothing more than a pathetic assortment of lies, bigoted arguments, idiocies, misrepresentations and highly elaborate intellectual scams.
Don't judge a book by its cover. I bought this book for my Pre-K class, to go along with our weather unit on Rain. The cover looked so nice I thought it would be a great book. In fact, the illustrations are quite nice; the problem is there's really no story here. The language doesn't flow; its very choppy. The children didn't enjoy this book, and have not asked for it to be read again. Good children's literature should have a story to it: a setting, problem and solution; a definite beginning, middle and ending; and well-defined characters. This book has none of that
pass. The author's method of &quot;revealing...deeper organizational characteristics&quot; is to arbitrarily circle arbitrary sets of notes, assign them meaningless names like &quot;4-17&quot;, and make trivial assertions about the integers from zero to eleven
Nazi apologist. While not specifically apologizing for the nazis, what this author is essentially doing, is making the incredible argument that it is somehow wrong to make war on, or even interfere with rogue governments engaged in crimes against humanity or serious overt aggression toward your own country.  And the people he is doing this at the behest of are the inheritors and old allies of the nazis (communists/socialists, anarchists and islamofascists).  These people worked together with the nazis and engage in the same behavior as the nazis.  More importantly, part of their techniques involve a propaganda war that attempts to get people behind these sick behaviors and oppose anyone who, in any way, attempts to prevent such evil as genocide.  The terms that come to mind that describe this author include apologist, collaborator....traitor.  No matter how you slice it, people like this are on the side of EVIL.  It is EVIL to try to manipulate people into opposing the US and the rest of the civilized world when it tries to stop countries like Iraq, Iran, Syria, North Korea.  Bad people do things like that BECAUSE THEY WANT THESE COUNTRIES TO BE ALLOWED TO DO BAD THINGS.  Bad things like blowing up YOUR cities with nukes.  Bad things like overthrowing YOUR governments (like is damn close to happening in France, as I write this).  Bad things like starting another world war.This sort of thing is not new.  It happened just before world war I and later, just before world war II.  And it is happening now.  Both times, the major powers in the world had the opportunity to nip things in the bud.  Both times, they were tricked into not doing so.  The people in those democracies were tricked into worrying their governments had sinister ulterior motives for doing anything.  Tricked into doing nothing, while the world burned.  The result of that was millions of people dead and many millions more murdered by the fascist governments that rose to power.It's happening again.  Same pattern of behavior.  Ironically, many of the same players (communists/socialists, anarchists and islamofascists).  There is a difference, however, the major power in the world today is the US.  And we are a hell of alot tougher to fool than our european friends.  We simply will not allow this new form of nazism to rise to power...NO MATTER WHAT ANYONE SAYS.  As anyone who has bothered to become educated on what actually happened in Iraq (as opposed to listening to communist propaganda), OUR behavior is one of extreme restraint, but overwhelming might when it is needed.  Far from being "jingoistic " or "militaristic", the US focuses on the MINIMAL amount of force to get the job done, followed by extreme efforts to replace the twisted and evil regime of someone like Hussein with an enlightened democracy that serves its people....that gives THEM the ability to choose their own destiny.  In short, we freed them, with minimal causalties and DAMN few civilian deaths.  Our intervention in Iraq wiped out the funding for terrorist organizations (and Hussein WAS the PRIMARY funder of Al-Queda and very much behind the attacks on our country) and wiped a great many of these scum off the face the earth before they could harm any more people.  More importantly, it freed millions of people from the yoke of tyranny and has given hope to millions more in the rest of the middle east.  That is the truth of Iraq and the truth of the US.  We are good people who do good things in the world.  And we will NOT stand idle in the face of evil....especially if you are stupid enough to bring it to our shores.People like Lieven are something....else.  Something sinister.  Think twice before getting behind his lies.  Because the person he wants to hurt....is you
There are better books. Deepak is looking at God through India glasses, tinted differently than rose-colored perhaps, but definitely different than the God I know and love. There are better books on the market which explore and take God &quot;out of the box,&quot; such as Tiffany Snow's &quot;Psychic Gifts in the Christian Life - Tools to Connect.&quot; Through Tiffany's glasses (and I know we all wear some version of them) I saw many more facets, rainbow colors and true gems of the nature of God than I did through Chopra, whether you are a Christian or not. I did like Chopra's &quot;7 Laws&quot; though, and some of his other works
Unanswered Prayers. Having never read a book by Danielle Steel but seen and liked a few of the movies adapted from her novels, I was looking forward to reading Answered Prayers, since I usually always find the books more deep and interesting. Sadly, I couldn't have been more disappointed... The first thing that bothered me about this novel, was the amount of repetition it has. I was just through the first few pages of the first chapter, and I was already being told things (usually insignificant) which I had just read a few lines before.Secondly, the moment Brad is introduced into the plot, I could foresee with certainty, how it was going to unravel and how the book would eventually end. So as not to dampen my enthusiasm and continue reading, I reasoned that if the plot was going to be so predictable, the book couldn't possibly be Danielle Steel's "Number One Bestseller" as the cover proclaims...seems like I have a grave misconception regarding the criteria needed to make a book a "bestseller".The major flaw of this novel is that it desperately lacks imagination. Even the main characters themselves and their situations are mirror images of each other. Faith is sweet and caring, has two daughters who have grown up and left to live on their own, leaving her feeling lonely and sad. Her husband is cold, unreligious and gives her no attention.Brad is sweet and caring, has two sons who have grown up and left to live on their own, leaving him feeling lonely and sad. His wife is cold, unreligious and gives him no attention. Even Faith's "deep dark secret" is too unoriginal, and it is revealed to the reader at the very early stages of the book, leaving no room for curiosity and suspense.Halfway through the book, I was so bored that I considered giving up reading it altogether. However I kept pushing on, praying that some twist to the plot would miraculously materialize somewhere, to at least make reading Answered Prayers worthwhile... Unlike Faith however, my prayers remained unanswered... It's going to require a lot of will power to attempt reading a Danielle Steel novel again...
Agree with Scott Tessier. This book was assigned in a graduate level international relations class.  While the aim of the book is laudable - to give practical solutions to foreign policy problems - the execution leaves much to be desired.  The editors make each contributing author shoehorn their essays into a rather clumsy outline.  There are countless "no **** Sherlock" moments when reading this book.  Overall, it is not insightful and an utter waste of time.
Disappointed. I have read many of James Patterson's books and have never been disappointed.   This book however, was a big let down.  I almost didn't finish reading the first few chapters because I had difficulty following it, they were choppy and confusing.  After the shaky beginning, it was much better and I found myself enjoying the storyline until the end.  The end was 'stupid' for lack of a better word. Twist, yes, it was a twist, but in a direction that made NO  sense. WHY??  I thought he would give some insight into the purpose of the ending, but he didn't.
False facts, uninformed, waste o' dough. If you want to believe an illusion, go for it.  Some readers say he is well informed.  Whoa.  This guy talks about science without any credentials to do so.If it makes you feel good to believe that the US is bad, the environment is collapsing, and we need socialism to survive, then this is the book for you.If you are open minded but want truthful facts to make your own opinion, find another source.Waste of money
Boots. The original. He was kind of cool, but now he ain't; people using his backwardness against us. Forget this dude, or perish. 1896 speech was a total sell out to da man.Drop ya boots, dawg!!!I
A Not-So-Practical Guide to New Urbanism. The suburban landscape of the United States is the subject of this book, advertised as "the first practical guide to creating communities that truly are communities-not merely enclaves near off-ramps." Guided by the principles of the Congress for the New Urbanism (CNU), the book uses excerpts from that organization's Charter to illuminate its advocacy of more connected development patterns. The book's scope extends beyond the commercial strip to include the major building blocks of towns and suburbs, such as apartment complexes, schools, parks and office campuses.Hall and Porterfield includes passages of fist-thumping suburbia-bashing similar to James Howard Kunstler's Home From Nowhere (1998, Touchstone Books) or Jane Holtz Kay's Asphalt Nation (1997, Crown). They also include graphic material, much of it adapted their earlier book, A Concise Guide to Community Planning (1994, McGraw-Hill).Readers knowledgeable about New Urbanism will find few surprises here, other than a few glaring factual errors, like a reference to "Tyson's Corners, Virginia, one of the largest metropolitan areas in the United States" (p. 7) and a claim that Edge Cities and urban villages are "two names for essentially the same thing" (p. 210). Good points crop up here and there, but recommendations are so limited in scope that it can be difficult to discern whether the sample site designs are intended to be good or bad examples, which limits the book's usefulness pedagogically. The lack of dimensions on most of the drawings also severely limits the book's utility as a practical reference. Hall and Porterfield contrast "conventional suburban development" and "Traditional Neighborhood Development" options for site plans, but the comparisons sometimes seem forced and nearly always ignore the larger regional issues so critical to the debate.One ideal audience for this book might suburban planning commissioners, who need guidance from designers in order to understand the differences between conventional suburban development pods and walkable, human-scaled neighborhoods.
It's awful!. I read this book this last year in highschool for English class.  It was awful!  First of all it's really confusing and second of all it's just a stupid plot and ending.  It was so boring and so long.  Don't read it it's a waste of time
Not what I expected. After purchasing this book, I found that most of the TVP products needed to be purchased from an online store rather than making it yourself.  Unless you want to keep running to your local Health Food store or buying online, I would look elsewhere for TVP meat substitute cooking ideas.Personally, I would rather make my own Chiken (that's how they spell it) strips, nuggets, etc. or beef substitutes, as a right of passage rather than buying them.  That's what I thought I was getting when I bought this book, but no..
Ho hum. After a promising start the entire story moved along with such linear precision that it may have been written by a mathematician. Never did it deviate from a plotline that was anticipated after the second chapter. In the genre of heist stories we've come to expect twists and turns until the last minute. Here we had none. I was waiting for somebody to be something other than what they appeared to be, somebody to do something out of character. And the thorough implausibility of the climactic confrontation on stage in front of 5000 people had me shaking my head. Oh, and if somebody would be kind enough to post a follow up review explaining the significance of the hitch hiker, I'd appreciate it
Historically significant..but that's about it. I gave this book 2 stars because it is historically significant to understand the thinking of the gender feminists of the 1960s.I also found the discussion of the equality feminists from the 1800s to be interesting. The right to vote for women was of course important as were several other causes that the equality feminists fought for.I rated this book low because the author attempts to explain the housewife phenomenon but ends up overgeneralizing and trying to speak for all women. The author is very snobby and self-rightous, thinking she is able to determine which women are really fulfilled and living their life to it's fullest potential. The ideas in this book are what caused people like my mother to talk negatively about "dumb housewives," and to eat their words when their own children, such as myself, grew up and became...housewives (or what we now call "stay at home moms." Which, I might add was mostly fueled by watching my workaholic mother (who I do love very much) who didn't seem to enjoy anything in life...except work) Fortunately, we can teach our biased and prejudiced mothers that some women really do get fulfillment from raising their own children/homes.I am only going to touch on some of the ridiculous arguments in this book, because there are too many to list:Ms. Friedan gives "evidence" that children in other's care actually turn out better than those raised by their mothers. Great. So, she was teaching a generation of women that they are better off working than caring for their own children; that other people can do a better job than they can. What a vote of confidence.The author goes on and on about how mothers were smothering their children, and this is why many turned to a life of the "feminine mystique." Sorry, but a 1950s mom with 7 children and a lack of modern conveniences did not have time to smother her children. Basic care for as many children as women had in the 1950s would consume most of a mother's time. If you want to see parents who overwhelm their children with attention (and material goods) and live vicariously thru them, look around in 2006.According to the "research" (and I use this term lightly because someone as depressed as Ms Friedan must have had trouble seeing the happiness in others) in this book you are either: 1) WORKING MOTHER- mentally stable, able to do household tasks in lightning speed and raise completely competent children. 2)EDUCATED HOUSEWIFE- most likely on drugs and/or are alcoholic, are so depressed you contemplate suicide, have dysfunctional children and a husband who is trying to get away from your sexual advances. 3) UNEDUCATED HOUSEWIFE- content with life because you are a complete idiot.Ms. Friedan completely ignores that there were (and there still are...) a significant percentage of women who WANT to be at home caring for their families and homes. I'm sure there were millions of women who were benefitted by being emancipated from their homes. That is good that they were happier with more choices. However, Ms. Friedan should have encouraged them to do this without dragging millions of other women thru the mud.With her chapter on the "sexual sell:" I'm glad that she figured out people make money thru advertising by manipulating people. Advertisers manipulate everyone, not just women. And, I am sure the "thing-buying" housewife of the 1950s was nothing like the guilt-ridden working or stay at home mom today who's child has so many toys he/she doesn't know what to do except claim, "I'm bored" due to being so overwhelmed.p. 85: Ms. Friedan quotes someone who says, "To make one half the human race consume its energies in the functions of housekeeper, wife and mother is a monstrous waste of the most precious material God ever made." The fact that Ms. Friedan would even give credit to this comment by citing it in her book speaks volumes about her mentality.When I thought the ideas in this book couldn't get any more rediculous, Ms. Friedan started talking about homosexuality...The Feminine Mystique is driving men to be gay! Men are so repulsed by their over controlling wives and mothers that they are turning against women and "turning" homosexual! Also, Ms. Friedan thinks housewives are sex-crazed zombies in search of any man...and finally this comment: "I am convinced there is something about the housewife state itself that is dangerous. In a sense that is not as far-fetched as it sounds, the women who "adjust" as housewives, who grow up wanting to be "just a housewife" are in as much danger as the millions who walked to their own death in the concentration camp..." Is this woman serious? This stuff is so warped I can hardly put it into words!!It is my opinion that this author was 1) extremely depressed and/or had psychological problems 2) was insanely jealous of happy wives/mothers.
bias, baloney and balderdash. Astonishing to see Amazon promoting this anti-Israel, anti-semitic book, from an  organisation that prides itself on just those prejudices.    This book skews history, totally ignoring the 8, yes 8 times when the Arabs could have got themselves another Palestinian state, ignoring the fact that Jordan already occupies 2/3rds of the original area of Mandate Palestine allocated for a Jewish Homeland by the League of Nations in 1920.
Did not hold my attention. Three gal pals (bride-to-be Rachel, commitment-phobe supermodel Yaslyn, and newly divorced Carrie Ann) head to the sunny shores of a Turkish resort for a relaxing "hen" week. While there, they run into a motley crew of guests and resort employees, as they attempt to make Rachel's last week of singledom memorable. The resort is full of clichd characters - the tennis instructor/resort lothario, the clingy nerd, cheerleader tour guides, and of course lipstick lesbians that like to put on a show.The opening scene is hysterical - her friends have put something in her luggage which sets off the security. Unfortunately, that is really the only funny scene; the rest of the book just meanders along. While in Turkey, the girls seem to keep getting stuck with another Brit couple - Marcus and Sally, who are on the verge of divorce. Sally is such a pill, that I found it hard to understand why Marcus would want to stay with such a shrew.Each woman has a problem that needs resolution - Rachel hates confrontation, and the mother-in-law from hell runs all over her. Carrie Ann is trying to lie under the radar, but every inappropriate male seems to have latched onto her, while her only solace is playing chess with brainy Frenchman, Axel. It does not take a rocket scientist to figure out Yaslyn's problem, what with all the barfing - despite having a man pining for her back home and ready to make a commitment, she laps up all the male attention she receives, including the tennis instructor, Gilles.There really was not a lot offered in the book to hold my attention. Perhaps there were too many characters; perhaps none of the "problems" were serious enough to capture your attention... I was pretty disappointed with this after the great cover description. All in all - I think that this was a pretty forgettable novel
Overrated. This is by far the most known novel Bryce has written, and there isn't much to comment unfortunately. It's a classic in Peru as far as I read but, as Chinua Achebe's 'Things fall apart', this is one of those folklore books that won't appeal to my Fiction reading hunger. It seems shallow most of the times, the character POV of the kid Julius never works out what's going on around him; no true sequels; Julius' parents are made of one piece of cardboard; the setting is the only thing that might be of interest (very much like Achebe's novel); and Julius barely grows by the end of the novel (at page 350!). For that matter, go check Coetzee's 'Waiting for the barbarians' or Peruvian Vargas Llosa's 'The war of the end of the world', two contemporary masterpieces.
The Assassin "Trail" Stops At The Feet Of One Murderer -- Lee Harvey Oswald. The late Jim Garrison's book "On The Trail Of The Assassins" was in large part the basis for Oliver Stone's 1991 motion picture "JFK", which is a film containing so many lies, half-truths, and misrepresentations of the facts surrounding John F. Kennedy's 1963 assassination, it's literally difficult to keep up with all of them.I cannot watch one single scene of Oliver Stone's film without finding some distortion of the evidence in the real JFK or J.D. Tippit murder cases. Some are small things being distorted; and some are great big ones. One example (among dozens) being: Oliver Stone's version of shoe clerk Johnny Brewer's testimony re. Lee Harvey Oswald's manner of dress when Brewer encountered Oswald shortly after Oswald had shot and killed policeman Tippit.Stone, in his film, has Oswald (Gary Oldman) wearing a jacket as he enters the Texas Theater and is seen by Brewer....and in one of the movie's "Deleted Scenes" (on the DVD version of the film), Kevin Costner (playing Garrison) even does a voice-over (lie) re. Brewer's testimony, with Costner saying "Brewer said the man was wearing a jacket".Brewer, in reality, said exactly the opposite during his Warren Commission testimony:Mr. BELIN -- "Will you describe the man you saw?"Mr. BREWER -- "He was a little man, about 5'9", and weighed about 150 pounds is all. ... And had brown hair. He had a brown sports shirt on. His shirt tail was out."Mr. BELIN -- "Any jacket?"Mr. BREWER -- "No."Another interesting part of the Tippit portion of the movie "JFK" is Oliver Stone's Audio Commentary during this part of the film, which is riddled with inaccuracies. Stone has the audacity to spout the following lie re. the Tippit shooting on the DVD's Commentary soundtrack:"Not one credible witness has really identified Oswald as a single shooter {of Officer Tippit}. In fact, the only significant testimony applies two to three shooters." -- O. StoneTherefore, per Mr. Stone (and Garrison said pretty much the same thing years earlier), the "only credible" witness must have been Acquilla Clemmons, who, as far as I am aware, was THE ONLY witness who ever said there was more than one person involved in the Tippit slaying.Stone, like Jim Garrison before him, would simply rather believe his OWN version of events, rather than the multiple witnesses who never saw more than one shooter (with that one single shooter being positively identified as Oswald by said witnesses).It's interesting, indeed, that Stone thinks the "only significant testimony" re. the Tippit crime came from Clemmons. Whereas, people like Markham, Tatum, and Scoggins (who were all closer than Clemmons to the scene of the murder) are deemed less "significant", merely, no doubt, because they don't fit into Stone's (or Garrison's) "CT Landscape" surrounding the murder.I wonder if people realize just how many outright lies are contained in Oliver Stone's 3-hour, 15-minute motion picture? The number is simply staggering. And that number of distortions is increased considerably on the DVD version of the film, when the Audio Commentary Track by Mr. Stone and all of the "Deleted and Extended Scenes" are included as well.And a great deal of this deliberate misinformation put forth on the movie screen came directly out of this book authored by Jim Garrison.Another great place to see more of Mr. Garrison's skewed views of the JFK case is to read Garrison's 1967 "Playboy Magazine" interview. Like Stone's movie, that Playboy article will keep you busy as you try to keep up with the inaccurate things Garrison keeps saying in that lengthy piece. The whole interview can be read here:www.jfklancer.com/Garrison2.htmlSelected examples of Mr. Garrison's paranoia and loony-toon conspiracy talk, taken from that Playboy interview, are provided via the quotes below. My own rebuttal arguments follow each quote:"Though he {Oswald} may not have known why he was instructed to do so, this was undoubtedly why he got the job at the Texas School Book Depository Building. The conspirators knew this would place him on the scene and convince the world that a demented Marxist was the real assassin." -- Jim Garrison; 1967The above Garrison gem totally distorts (or just flat-out ignores) the true and documented facts about how Oswald got his job at the Depository in mid-October of '63. It was suburban Dallas housewives Linnie Mae Randle and Ruth Paine who were directly responsible for placing Lee Harvey Oswald in the TSBD, by way of ordinary garden-variety happenstance.Garrison must, therefore, believe that Mrs. Paine, who arranged Oswald's job interview with Depository boss Roy Truly, was one of the main "conspirators" who was setting up Oswald to take the fall for JFK's murder the following month (which would also have to mean that Paine had detailed knowledge of the President's motorcade route more than a month before November 22). Garrison must also think that Roy Truly was a big part of the patsy plot, because it was Mr. Truly who actually hired Oswald (even though nobody was holding a shotgun to Truly's head forcing him to hire Lee).The commonly-held belief that Lee Oswald was "placed" in the Texas School Book Depository by evil plotters prior to 11/22/63 is a desperate attempt by CTers like Mr. Garrison to attach unprovable and unsupportable conspiratorial "strings" to a random event that involved several individuals...individuals whose collective and synchronized actions could not possibly have been foreseen and controlled by a group of behind-the-scenes conspirators.---------------"Anyone who takes the time to read the Warren Report will find that of the witnesses in Dealey Plaza who were able to assess the origin of the shots, almost two-thirds said they came from the grassy-knoll area in front and to the right of the Presidential limousine and not from the Book Depository." -- Jim Garrison; 1967This is pure nonsense. There were, indeed, several witnesses who said they heard shots coming from in front of JFK's car, but Garrison has severely skewed the stats to support his claim of Knoll shooters. His "almost two-thirds" figure is not even close to being accurate when talking about the number of witnesses who said they heard frontal shots. And even amongst other CTers, virtually no other pro-conspiracy author has ever rigged those stats in such an out-of-whack manner.The fact is that more than half of all earwitnesses heard shots coming from the direction of the Book Depository, and not from the Knoll. And an even more illuminating statistic reveals that less than 5% of all earwitnesses heard shots from more than just a single general location (front vs. rear). That stat speaks volumes....because even CTers admit to SOME rear shots.An interesting tabulation of this data can be found below:http://mcadams.posc.mu.edu/images/shots4.jpghttp://mcadams.posc.mu.edu/earwitnesses.htm---------------"The second shot struck the President in the back; the location of this wound can be verified not by consulting the official autopsy report, but by perusing the reports filed by two FBI agents who were present at the President's autopsy. Both stated unequivocally that the bullet in question entered President Kennedy's back and did not continue through his body." -- Jim Garrison; 1967Therefore, Mr. Garrison is, in essence, saying that he is much more likely to trust the word of FBI agents (who, of course, were not doctors and were not conducting the President's autopsy) rather than take the word of the three physicians who each signed the official autopsy report. After all, why believe the autopsy doctors when you COULD just trust as Gospel the word of a bystander? ~sarcasm alert~Plus: Why didn't these two FBI agents get the conspirators' memo which, if CTers are right about the success of the Patsy Plot, must have been passed out to nearly everyone in Officialdom on 11/22, a memo that probably said: "Attn. All Agents -- We're framing Oswald tomorrow; so remember to falsify as much evidence as humanly possible to ensure conviction of patsy".Evidently some people who needed to see it never received that important document.---------------"We have also located another man who was not involved in the shooting but created a diversionary action in order to distract people's attention from the snipers. This individual screamed, fell to the ground, and simulated an epileptic fit, drawing people away from the vicinity of the knoll just before the President's motorcade reached the ambush point." -- Jim Garrison; 1967Yet another outright lie from the lips of District Attorney Garrison. The man who had the so-called "simulated epileptic fit" was fully identified by the FBI on May 26, 1964. His name was Jerry Belknap, a man who had a history of epilepsy since childhood. Belknap also proved to the FBI that he had paid the ambulance bill ($12.50) after he was taken to Parkland Hospital.---------------"President Kennedy was killed for one reason: because he was working for a reconciliation with the U.S.S.R. and Castro's Cuba. His assassins were a group of fanatic anti-Communists with a fusion of interests in preventing Kennedy from achieving peaceful relations with the Communist world." -- Jim Garrison; 1967Any solid, verifiable proof of such accusations, Mr. Garrison? Any physical evidence whatsoever that shows JFK was killed by more than one gun? .... The answers to those two questions are: No and No.But the lack of physical evidence never stopped a hard-boiled CTer....that's been proven over and over again by a vast assortment of conspiracists who have more theories up their sleeve than a dog has fleas.---------------"In summation, there were at least five or six shots fired at the President from front and rear by at least four gunmen, assisted by several accomplices. At this stage of events, Lee Harvey Oswald was no more than a spectator to the assassination -- perhaps in a very literal sense. James Altgens snapped a picture that shows a man with a remarkable resemblance to Oswald, standing in the doorway of the Depository. The Altgens photograph indicates the very real possibility that at the moment Oswald was supposed to have been shooting Kennedy, he may actually have been standing outside the front door watching the motorcade. .... I don't believe that Oswald shot anybody on November 22nd -- not the President and not Tippit." -- Jim Garrison; 1967It seems as though these devilishly-clever conspirators forgot one important thing when they were setting up LHO -- they forgot their brains. For, who WITH brains would allow their lone "Patsy" to casually drift outside and be photographed and seen by countless witnesses when the plotters need to have Lee Harvey on the 6th Floor at 12:30? Per Mr. Garrison's account of Oswald possibly being "Doorway Man", evidently the real assassins were indeed brainless and lacked the common sense to keep Oswald where he wouldn't be able to establish a credible alibi for his 12:30 whereabouts.Just think about these Garrison remarks for a moment longer too -- "At least five or six shots were fired at the President from front and rear ... by at least four gunmen".Doesn't a "4-Shooter, 6-Shot, 1-Patsy" assassination plot seem a bit unlikely to anyone else but this writer? Would any professional killers actually attempt to "frame" a lone fall guy in that type of overkill fashion? In my opinion, no pro hit men would go about the complicated task of setting up Oswald (or anybody else) in such a needlessly-reckless way.A single "pro" hit man could have easily killed JFK with one or two shots (probably just one) from Oswald's "nest", without the need to clog the works with needless back-up gunmen hiding all around Dealey Plaza.There is no possible way the conspirators could have ensured the success of a multi-shooter plot to frame JUST Oswald in the minutes during and after the shooting. No way. There are way too many uncontrollable factors that could block the success of that One-Patsy venture that Jim Garrison placed his faith in."Uncontrollable" items such as:1.) A frontal shooter might very well have been seen by witnesses (and to think that EVERY witness under the sun could be easily "bought", "taken care of", and/or coerced by these plotters is, again, just too much wishful thinking on the conspirators' part, IMO).2.) A frontal shooter might strike other occupants in the car, or strike somebody else in Dealey Plaza. But even if ONLY Kennedy is hit by a frontal gunman, there are massive problems to be "corrected" by the conspirators....bullets to be hidden and, of course, who knows how many obvious frontal wounds on the victim to be (somehow) eliminated -- and eliminated immediately before any non-conspirators can spill any beans. .... Only a person straight out of the booby hatch could believe that anyone, regardless of "power" or "pull", could get away with such a thing. It's just plain loony.3.) The one "Patsy" (Oswald) could have easily, by pure accident and happenstance, established a perfect alibi for himself at the time when he was supposed to be on the 6th Floor shooting the President (as Mr. Garrison apparently DID think occurred, with Oswald being seen in a photo taken as the bullets were flying; even though all reasonable researchers know full well that "Doorway Man" was actually Billy Lovelady, and not Oswald; Lovelady even testified to that effect in 1964). ....Plus -- If Oswald had really been in that doorway at 12:30, WHY ON EARTH DIDN'T HE SAY HE WAS THERE?! If he's got an ironclad alibi like that, why wouldn't he use it? Instead, he says not a word about being outside on the steps at 12:30, and even tells the police a provable lie re. his whereabouts (the lie about "having lunch with Junior {Jarman}" at the time of the shooting). How much sense does that make if Oswald had really been in the Depository doorway? ....And the very fact that Oswald did NOT have a usable, provable alibi for exactly 12:30 PM is absolutely remarkable IF he had really been wandering around on the lower floors of the Depository (or was outside the building), as many CTers firmly believe; and even the most rabid of conspiracy theorists have got to admit, that from the "CT/Patsy" POV, Oswald's not having a usable/believable/solid alibi is certainly, by far, the biggest piece of LUCK in the whole "Patsy Plot". ....These amazing Patsy Plotters just lucked out, evidently, in that Oswald was not seen by a single person inside or outside the TSBD at precisely the time of the assassination -- except by Howard Brennan, Ron Fischer, and Robert Edwards, of course, who saw Oswald or a nicely-arranged Oswald "imposter" in the Sniper's Nest at 12:30 or just seconds before 12:30.4.) And the likelihood that all of the non-TSBD bullets are going to somehow get swept under the rug is extremely remote, especially in a Bob Groden-like scenario. Mr. Groden (per his book "The Killing Of A President"), incredibly, has ZERO of the shots coming from the Oswald window, and a total of up to TEN shots being fired...and ALL OF THEM coming from rifles other than the one rifle these idiot plotters are going to attempt to frame Oswald with! Could Groden's scenario BE any more reckless and preposterous?! I doubt it.5.) And a biggie, that most CTers evidently don't think could have ever happened before 12:30 on November 22nd -- The one Patsy (Mr. LHO) could "get wise" to the plot that is brewing all around him and take measures to guarantee he could never be blamed for the actual assassination of John Kennedy.When thinking about any "Frame Lee Oswald As The One Patsy" plan, I just cannot visualize any professional assassins (even for a minute) contemplating the use of multiple shooters; let alone some gunmen firing from the Grassy Knoll, i.e., the exact opposite direction from where their single dupe is supposed to be located.---------------------As the previously-mentioned quotes from the mouth of Mr. Garrison amply demonstate, if anyone has a desire to set out "On The Trail Of A Lunatic Conspiracy Theorist" -- look no further than Earling Carothers (Jim) Garrison.
Filled with errors. This has been a great reference book for years, but hasn't been getting better, instead getting filled with more and more errors.  The new 'Fiesta, Harlequin, and Kitchen Kraft Dinnerwares: The Homer Laughlin China Collectors Association' book has more detailed and better pictures than any other book.  I'd buy them both, but use this one the least
Eh--- not so much. I am a doctoral candidate and basically this book is not telling me how to write my dissertation and complete it giving 15 minutes a day to the writing (let alone the research) but really how to overcome blocks and start writing. Haven't we all been there, done that already?  To me, this book didn't offer anything I hadn't already read, figured out or been taught. Perhaps it would be a good book for procrastinators, but not for me
Not a book I would recommend for tequila aficionados. In my opinion to flashy, they are only taking advantage of the popularity of tequila, you can not even find it in Mexico. I would recommend much more books like "The Book of Tequila" by Mr. Emmons with real facts and tequila  information
Interesting, but.... While this is a well researched and thought-provoking piece of literature, I do have some critical comments to make.Firstly, it is apparent that the author's own holocaust experiences (or more specifically, those of his family) have left him with a vested interest in how the material in this book is presented.Secondly, there is a LOT of content to trawl through to get, in my opinion, a few pieces of interesting material.Finally, the underlying theme or accusation that without IBM the holocaust may not have happened, or would not have been so sever, is (again in my opinion) flawed. As the book shows, IBM certainly made it much easier for the Nazis to locate and identify Jews, it would not have been impossible without IBM.Having said all this - it was an interesting read and although overly wordy is certainly worth reading
Pretty crappy in my opinion. Not only are the things listed in this book cheap trinkets but most everything in the book you have to pay $1.00 or $2.00 for. The stuff you do not have to pay shipping for are useless pamphlets and literature. There are a few things that are pretty cool and possibly some useful information for some folks but most everything is Junk. Plus a lot of the things listed are repeated through the book. Its like the author needed to add stuff and thought nobody would notice that several of the things were repeated. Overall this 31 page booklet was not worth the paper it was printed on. If you are interested in getting free things I would suggest finding "freebie" message boards on the internet
Not sure who the intended audience is. I have an extensive math background and found this book tough to read. Not because the math described is particularly complicated (it is most definitely not...high school algebra is sufficient), but because Ross' writing style is too verbose. 99% of readers should know the meaning of "average," yet Ross devotes a lot of text to explaining this concept. I'm not sure who his audience is. Math-savvy people may feel that concepts have been dumbed-down and over explained, but math-phobic people may be scared off by the use of formulas...and the majority of times they aren't really needed anway
Good book for a historian. I love camping and eating by the fire and was looking for a good book on dutch oven cooking.  This book is not it.The back cover states "Woodruff perfected these recipes ... for more than 60 years as a scoutmaster ..."That period is 1929 to 1989, the publishing date.By today's standards, these recipes are dated.  My son is a scout, and I have been on a number of scout camping trips - and believe me scouts mostly need simple meals to prepare.  But Woody is too much into canned veggies, soups, and packaged mixes.  You have to look long and hard to find a recipe in this book that uses fresh ingredients.I suspect that if Woody were alive today, given his obvious commitment to Scouting, he would update most of his recipes to reflect more of today's thinking about healthy eating and fresh food
Another Bogus Book from Coren. Do dogs understand language?  Do they have their own syntax and grammar?  Stanley Coren thinks so.  Or maybe, as with many of his other books, he's only pretending to believe what he says in order to pique people's interest and sell more copies...The words we use in dog training are actually irrelevant.  Since I train dogs in Manhattan, I often find myself on an elevator with one or more dogs.  When the door closes I'll say, "What do we do on an elevator?" and they'll all sit.  This often charms and surprises the other elevator occupants who may say something like, "Look!  They understand every word you say!"Not really.  I trained the dogs to do this by first saying "What do we do on an elevator?-we sit."  Once that pattern was established, the dogs were able to make the leap from "What do we do on an elevator?" to "Sit" quite easily.  In fact, I could have as easily trained them to do this by using nonsense words, gobbledygook, ridiculous sounds that have no meaning at all.  So it isn't my words or syntax the dogs are responding to, it's my intent, my body language, my tone of voice (all carrying emotional information), and a previously established pattern of behavior.Stanley Coren should know this better than anyone since one of his dogs is deaf, yet still obeys him.  Why?  Because of his body language and a previously established pattern of behavior, not because the dog "understands" his words.  Coren would say that the dog understands his hand signals the same way the hearing-impaired understand sign language.  But looked at objectively it's far more likely that the dog's response to hand signals is still just part of a previously established pattern of behavior, not a linguistic or cognitive process.Coren would still disagree.  He claims that certain vocalizations made by dogs can be grouped together, which he takes to mean that there's a kind of syntax or grammar at work.  I'm sorry, Stan, but real language doesn't operate on such a simplistic level.  And while it may seem brave and controversial of Coren (who has a degree in psychology, not linguisics or animal behavior) to disagree with Noam Chomsky about the nature of language, at this stage in the development of linguistic science that's a bit like a high school sophmore disagreeing with Sir Isaac Newton about gravity.Look, it's fairly obvious to anyone who really understands dogs that the reason certain yips, barks, growls, etc. are sometimes used together and others aren't (which isn't always true, by the way -- it depends on the dog), is that each vocalization comes from an emotional, not a cognitive state.  In other words, certain emotions -- like fear and aggression -- may be felt by the animal simultaneously, while others -- calmness and fear -- can't be.  It's not grammar or syntax, it's emotion, pure and simple.Even if Coren hadn't thought this through from an emotional point of view, if he'd spent any time at all studying comparative neuroanatomy he'd know that a dog's brain has no Broca's area, which makes linguistic ability totally impossible.  But as with other books he's written (his LEFT-HANDER SYNDROME was notorious for being based on false data), Coren doesn't seem to care much about the truth.Still, I have to admit that it's hard not to buy into this myth because as human beings we're constantly explaining our feelings and experiences to ourselves through our thoughts and inner monologues, or to others through conversations, letters, etc.  As a result we're almost forced, by the way our brains work, to supply a similar linguistic medium for a dog's feelings and behaviors when no such medium or ability exists.I trained my dog to respond in a certain way whenever I ask him a certain question.  And I have to admit, I like the way it feels when I say to him, "Do you love me?" and he wags his tail, comes over, puts his paws on my chest, and licks my nose.  Does he understand the meaning of that sentence when I say it to him?  Of course not.  But I know he understands the emotion.It's a shame that Coren doesn't get this fundamental difference between real linguistic understanding and pure emotion, particularly when the misinformation he disseminates in this book can be detrimental to the relationship between you and your dog, a relationship that SHOULD be based on real and, quite often, wonderful emotions, not on any imaginary ability to use and understand language.If I could I'd give this book no stars at all
Sean Hannity should be arrested. When the truth about 911 is known he must not escape justice. He is a criminal and must be treated like one. Christian Peper
Unable to deliver. Unable to deliver this calendar, Now I have been told that it will be until March 2006 until I might receive it. Imcompetant compan
If you need a book like this, you can do better. I have two books currently which are much better than this one.  I'm not really interested in spending the next hour of my life typing up a really exhaustive commentary on this book, as this is the first one I've ever done, but I'm just hoping to save you some time and money and I feel very strongly this is a bad book and a waste of your efforts.It was the required textbook for my Print Production class, and I could've gotten a better understanding of Print Production by sniffing the ink on my local newspaper.  The glossary is substandard, the chapters are, to say the least, hardly informative, and the author is often contradictive of his own statements.  It doesn't seem as though he has an understanding of Print Production at all.  I spent days staring at this book wondering why I didn't understand print, till I realized it wasn't my brain, I had bought a crappy book.I won't say some of the elements aren't useful, but you'd be better off shopping at the used bookstore by my school, for example, and picking up a used copy for ten bucks.  There will be plenty there.  You can get everything useful in this book from the Graphics Master (a much better book) or any other Print Production book.Try Kaj Johansen (spelling... sorry) or Adobe's Print Production Guide.  Also, International Paper occassionally prints a guide.  Don't buy this one.  Graphics Master Seven or Eight would be of MUCH more use to you
I'd laugh if it weren't so pathetic. Book starts of with "Is this a Con?" like it's a hint of what's to come.  Childish stories about how the doctrines of the Worldwide Church were allwrong and suddenly needed to be changed. Maybe the recruitment tactics were not working anymore; or the false prophecies, scandals and financial ruin of its members had taken their toll on the organization. It was time to turn this thing 180' around, but what they did sunk the ship, and maybe that was their intent! Sure sounds like a conspiracy theory, and sure enough it seemed that way as the news of coming changes leaked out, only to confuse the once faithful. Why would ministers preach what they didn't believe? Well the money and benefits were pretty good. Strange how the sabbath changed along with unclean meats, holydays, tithing, healing, etc. Looks like Tkatch found the stairway to heaven, and Armstrong was no longer the infallible pope. Even the holy spirit changed into a person. And what the pagan trinity and the symbol of the cross became Kosher?The book mentions Herbert W Armstrong being the master salesman, and likea bar a soap he had to make his church unique so his followers would use no other. He started positioning his product by identifying all others as inferior or even worthless, as misleading, as spurious and even hurtful. Of course, he will have to use basically the same ingredients for his soap that they do in theirs, but will change the name of those ingredients. We were told that we were the "only true" soap. So when Tkatch and Co. began admitting  we weren't the only real soap out there, it all started to look so bogus. In their disillusionment many members started spinning off to splinter groups. Quite a few abandoned religion altogether and tried to live a normal life again. That was the real transformation as nauseating and heart breaking as you would ever experience. How could we have believed such things? By the means of Fear Induction Psychology and Mind Control by its leaders, this cult and its many divisions have manipulated the lives of its members and destroyed their lives. The book ends up bashing old Armstrong pretty well, but contradictorily says they are not judging him. Makes it worth the $1.09 the printed version is going for, but do a search and save the postage, unless you need the kindling.For the survivors: "Does anyone remember laughter?"
Kessinger Publishing's Version is horrible print-wise!!. THIS REVIEW IS ABOUT THIS PUBLISHERS EDITION NOT ABOUT THE BOOKS CONTENT ITSELF.If you want to know about the content--- be aware that this book is copyright free and in the public domain and you can actually read the entire text free, online, if you are curious about the content of the book and what it is about. I am a person who prefers a real, bound book in the hand to reading on the computer screen or printing off a book onto computer paper.I learned about this book as it is popular with homeschoolers using the Charlotte Mason method.This book weaves science content into a story format (narrative format).About this edition of the book--buyer beware!I am very annoyed. I saw that Amazon sells three different publishers' versions of reprints of this very old book, before I purchased the book from Amazon.Of course I am mad at myself for making a mistake, but I am also not happy with the way Amazon markets this Kessinger Publishing's version of this book.I have had issues in the past with facsimile reprints of antique books sometimes being very hard to read. I took time to research this. I wanted whichever publisher's version has a readable font that is clearly printed.The way Amazon presently has this item (book reprinted by Kessinger Publishing) set up on their webpage, I thought I was looking inside this book. Imagine my surprise when the book arrived and the printing itself is horrible! I can't stand to read this! Upon double checking this now, I see I made a simple mistake--if you don't want to make the same mistake that I made please read on...It appears that this Kessinger Publishing version is a facsimile reproduction of the original. The old font type is hard to read. But the more problematic thing is that the ink is blobby and uneven. Specifically, I mean that some parts of the letters are missing (there is white space) while others are blobbed so that the letters don't look as they should, they are black blobs in some parts. I would prefer a book whose text is clearly visible. A modern font is also usually easier on the eyes.I am very annoyed as this is not even the cheapest price edition of this book which is currently in print! Come to find out there are cheaper versions with nicer and easier to read font!I am upset with Amazon additionally as the way they have this set up to "look inside this book" brings you to the edition published by the publisher "Yesterday's Classics" which has what looks to be a great font, a nice, clear, modern font and a good printing job. (Also today I received a different book purchased from Amazon by the publisher "Yesterday's Classics" and it is a wonderful printing job and a a nice binding to boot.I will be returning this book to Amazon. Too bad I have to pay the shipping to return it to them!
Head in the Clouds. This is a fantastic book for those people who are slowly losing their grip on reality. While some of the basic underlying concepts are good I don't find myself practically applying the concept of psychic prisons to my organisation, nor do I view my staff as ameobas that make up a large organism. I have to admit though that I know of others who found the paradyme of organisations as instruments of domination highly arousing
Love for a Lifetime: Building a Marriage That Will Go the Distance. I found this book to not only be shallow and poorly written, but also insidiously demeaning to women. Rather than focusing on the individual strengths and weaknesses men and women bring to relationships, the author focused on the weakness and instability of women. In addition, his examples and analogies were often misplaced and poorly devised... certainly not illustrative of his points or of a healthy marriage. I found the content much too general with overuse of stereotypes. My fiancee and I have read Chapman's Five Love Languages and got a great deal more out of that exercise
A story betrayed by it's author. Maybe at the time it was written I would have reviewed it more favorably. In light of the life Miller led I can't help but to be disappointed by the cheap commericialization of the socialist superiority over capitalist theme that permeates the play. Here Miller creates a character only to destroy that character to point out the ills of capitalism, then Miller spends the rest of his life living an indulgent capitalist life here in the good ole USA: the very capitalist society that was supposedly Willy's oppressor. I think the years have taken the shine off of Miller a bit. I'm sure the Liberal 101 literature professor will disagree
MEDIOCRE. I read this book, it was okay but the story flashed back to much, and I couldn't folow all of it but I read all of it anyway. I wouldn't recommend it. TOO SLOW MOVING, and BORING because of the flashbacks. The movie was the same way
Very Disappointing. We were recommended this book by our pastor as a part of our reading for premarital counseling. While it does contain good information on the basics of male & female anatomy, the helpful part stops there. The LaHayes perpetuate all sorts of gender stereotypes, one-sided arguments, and just plain odd understandings of Scripture. My husband and I were both offended by the way that this book characterizes women as "delicate creatures" who need to know nothing about sex save for the needs of their husbands. We were angered by the LaHayes argument -- supposedly based on scripture -- that all couples should want and attempt to have children. While children are indeed a blessing to many couples, it seems simplistic and unrealistic to assume that all couples should have upwards of five children. While we've both slogged through this book in hopes of learning as much as we can, it's been a disappointing process. While this book may be an interesting look at the conservative church's views on sex as of 1955, I certainly wouldn't recommend it to anyone looking for a helpful, encouraging introduction to married sex
Reverse Racism is not the answer. Referring to "nice white people" as demons who are just trying to hold the "black man" down is not an answer to racism. Akil is a hypocrite because he is just as racist as the people he is accusing of being racist. Stereotyping all white people as being oppressive to other races because white people don't want to see African Americans succeed is ludicrous. Akil writes with hatred towards white people and blames white people for all of his shortcomings. His message is a horrible one to expose to young, influential adolescents because he is passing on a message of hate. He gives the impression that a black person not accomplishing his/her goals occurs only because white people will not allow black people to succeed. Maybe he should try passing along the message that people need to be responsible for their actions, and any person that genuinely strives to accomplish a goal can accomplish it.Also, he writes on the back cover of his book that learning to read challenging material, such as work by Shakespeare, is a waste of time. This is the exact opposite of what he claims his goal is. Educating young people of all races is an equalizer. If Akil had studied more Shakespeare, then maybe his book wouldn't be riddled with grammatical errors.
Laughable cliches, horrible EGO... There are numerous, laughable cliches peppered throught this novel. One example that actually had me giggling out loud (in embarrassment for the writers) was where we find Dirk Jr and sister chained up in a cavern, with the water level slowly, very slowly, rising...Will they free themselves in time?Will Dirk make yet another cliched joke at the most "tension-filled" moment?Why are there no guards to make sure they can't escape?And finally,Where are the sharks with lazers?Seriously, the scene reminded me of the Austin Powers film.But, what really made me throw the book down in disgust was the introduction of a new character at page 389. Described as a man who's "blue-green eyes seemed to twinkle with mischief". This roguish character's name? Clive Cussler.Are you KIDDING ME?Is Cussler's ego so bloated that he has to force himself into the story at the expense of the reader's submersion?Skip this one folks, and let's pray that Cussler isn't becoming the M. Night Shyalaman of the literary world
Proofreader Needed !. The layout and content of this book is perfect for the individual who basically understands project management but wants to forego a more massive text to pass the IT Project+ exam. The frustrating thing is there are way too many errors in this guide.  I found a number of individual questions where the answer key was just plain wrong.  Not to mention that there are a few whole sections where every answer in the answer key is wrong.  I guess someone changed around the sections but forgot to change the answer key.  Since this is the main point of this concise guide, I cannot recommend it
More government propaganda. We can add this book to the numerous articles done by CNN,ABC and NBC and the many other government mouthpieces that have given us plenty of sensationalism and &quot;flexible facts&quot; and biased hype, but very little truth, hard core FACTS and the undeniable evidence that points to a larger conspiracy and a huge government cover up. Just like the networks, the authors of the book put forth only what the government wants the masses to see. You don't get the facts when you read this book, people you get fantasy/fiction. If you want FACTS I suggest you visit the Official Oklahoma City Bombing Investigation team's website. Oklahoma State representative Charles Key has done a wonderful job investigating the bombing and his Final Report provides us with the evidence that didn't make it to trial-the numerous eyewitnesses who were not called to testify despite the important events they witnessed on April 19,1995. McVeigh was NOT the lone bomber and anyone who thinks so just does NOT have the facts at hand. GET THEM. Put this work of fiction down and honor the victims of the OKC bombing by seeking the TRUTH
It was so-so. I found the book had some ideas that helped, but it was unrealistic in many ways.  I am spiritual, but I didn't appreciate the religious opinion it gave
Individualism without mercy and without pity. Ayn Rand's fictional story about "when the engine of the world stopped" is rather poorly written. The philosophical perspective presented in some of the speeches and some of the events in this overly long story is individualism that knows no restraint. I got the feeling while reading this book that there was no such thing as society, no such thing as kindness or compassion. In fact it seemed like compassion and kindness were moral faults to be sneered at. Anyway, the story was second rate at best and kind of horrifying at worst.Judging the literary quality of a book may be a matter of taste, however I am not alone in considering the book to be poorly written. The specific areas where it is wanting in quality are there:(1) The characters are poorly developed and seem to exist mainly to advance the philosophical agenda of the author.(2) the situations and conversations presented in the story lack credibility. What person have you ever met who launches into a 4 or 5 page philosophical presentation while courting or love making?(3) the 'bad' characters are 'bad' mostly because they think that social responsibility and compassion matter. Somehow compassion is a vice that the author distorts until it cannot be recognised. Such departures from real life experience that we all share really degrades the story line into parody - again this is done to advance the philosophical agenda of the author. The parody is not intentional it is merely the product of poor composition(4) the story is at time interminably verbose. What could be said in a few lines is stretched out into tedious pages by the author because she had an inadequate ability to write in the English language. Verbosity does not clarify and it does not improve a story line.I am sure that this book appeals mainly to people in their later teens - before they gained enough life experience and enough good sense to reject the stupidity that the author seems to think is a virtue
No help at all. This book did not teach me anything and was a waste of money. page 364:  Principles of Long term investing:  "Chapter 8 shows that among the S&P 500 Index returns, large value stocks have a small edge over large growth stocks."  Now look at Chapter 8.  "Of the 10 largest corporations, only 2  (Exxon Mobile and Citigroup) are value stocks."  duuhhh.  Now I know what to do.  I have a choice of two stocks.  If you already know all there is to know about the stockmarket, buy this book and pat yourself on the back for being so smart. If you know little, it won't add to your knowledge at all
Terrible. It's boring, slow and dull... and stupid. Turn of the Century is so boring and slow moving that it's not worth reading. In the first half of the book, literally close to nothing happens. Added to which, Anderson makes the book so convoluted it's like a badly executed Altman ensemble drama. It's impossible to keep track of all of these characters and formulate a good idea of what they're actually like. Added to which, the highly trumpeted 'Tom Wolfe' style satire in the book is so blunt and obvious that one wonders how many made the connection between Anderson and the esteemed writer of 'Bonfire of the Vanities'. Bottom line: boring, dull and pretty stupid really
Disturbing statements about homosexuality. For one thing Cantor claims the ancient Greeks were so gay. I dipute that. I think ancient Greeks were just living in a very temperature-wise hot, sunny climate and as a result were often semi-nude or even nude with people of the same sex. The affection the same sex showed each other was traditional and very most likely didn't usually include the act of doing it. Also, on other homosexual points it's somewhat wrong of Cantor to point out gay English kings. Even though a defense of this could be that Cantor was only pointing a fact in this instance I have studied medieval history for years and never before heard of this terrible fact of these particular English monarchs engaging in the Bibilically sinful act of homosexuality. A personal point on something different I also got of bored of hearing how English and Spanish people ate. Hey neither of these groups are noted for their great food (tacos are mexican food). Talk more about what italians ate in the middle ages please! Cantor has done better writing. I prefer his book on the plague to this one by far!
A Complete Time Waster. To appreciate Bill Porter's life and success it is far better to see him portrayed in the movie 'Door To Door' featuring William H. Macy. Shelly Brady's book completely misses the mark. I found it to be a little too self-serving, syrupy, and terribly redundant at times.  It read like the Bill Porter story starring Shelly Brady
His other books are better. Once Upon a Time is a lament of the loss of the old ways. While it does have Sloane's trademark illustrations and observations, it constantly compares the old to the inferior modern ways. Written in 1982, not all the complaints still apply, and they detract from his usual, loving description of early America.I grew up with A Reverance for Wood and A Museum of Early American Tools, which I always loved. This book is not up to the standard that Sloane set with his earlier work
149 VS 92. There are 149 5 star reviews and 92 one star reviews.  This is more representative than an analysis based only on the last 20 reviews. But what is more notable than that is the fact that  the five star reviews tend to recieve a resounding thumbs down from the people who have read them.Lone Nut Theorists can only bash and discredit their opposition since their story is false.Posner totally disregards the Parkland Hospital Doctors statements regarding the neck wound as a wound of entry or the massive rear exit wound in the back of the head. He would also have us believe a high powered rifle shot to the head would not cause movement in the direction of the shot. That somehow our body would jerk back in the opposite direction and cause a large entrance wound and a small exit wound contrary to the numerous eyewitness accounts.To expect us to believe this nonsense is insulting.
Trite tripe. This is a sad effort and sadder still that these ideas were published. The fact that any publisher believes that readers of social history would be interested in such a twisted analysis of the nature of man/woman and the development of societies is indeed sad. McElvaine is a longtime self promoting boor stuck in a jerkwater academic environment with way too much time for idle pondering. His imagination worked overdrive to produce this piece of fantasy. I guess if any of us had enough time on our hands we too could construct elaborate theories on the 'nature of things' and put enough of a self-loathing feminist slant on it to attract a fringe readership. That's what happened here. Don't waste your time. A disturbing aspect to this is that he's teaching the next generation of leaders
Racist, Misogynist, and Dated. These writings seem quaint and offensive by today's standards. These are wholly disappointing stories from a mediocre writer, like a second-rate Steinbeck. Cooper seems completely in love with his meal ticket, but I doubt this collection will draw any new admirers
Good Characters, Bad Mystery. I always like to give new authors a chance, so I read &quot;When Death Comes Stealing&quot; hoping for a good mystery.  What I got were 2 characters that I liked a lot, Tamara and Jamal, but very little actual  detection from a supposed private eye.  Try Marcia Muller or Sue Grafton if  you want good mystery and detection from a female writer. I will probably  not read another of Wesley's books.  I love mysteries, and mysteries  without plot are no good
Mixed bag---a few bombshells, but mostly hyperbole. This 1/4" thick, 4x6 index card of a book touts itself as a "take-no-prisoners" expos when it is, in fact, merely a collection of random "shocking" trivia. Sadly, the few real bombshells that the book DOES contain are overwhelmed by the hyperbolic tone of the rest.Here are the bombshells, facts that might make us seriously re-evaluate our relationship with those in power:- The US is Planning to Provoke Terrorist Attacks- Kent State Wasn't the Only---or Even the First---Massacre of College Students During the Vietnam Era- Juries are Allowed to Judge the Law, Not Just the Facts- The Government Can Take Your House and Land, Then Sell Them to Private Corporations- Prescription Drugs Kill Over 100,000 Annually- Work Kills More People Than WarThe quality of the other 44 topics ranges from moderately interesting yet trivial ("Adolf Hitler's Blood Relatives are Alive and Well in New York State" and "The Virginia Colonists Practiced Cannibalism") to no-brainers such as "Advertisers' Influence on the News Media is Widespread." There is no consistent theme linking the 50 disparate "things you're not supposed to know," other than the fact that they are "supposed" to be secrets, but that assertion is pure hyperbole. After all, all it takes to find out that  the Korean War never ended, that nuclear war almost broke out in 1995,  or that LSD was a used as a powerful adjunct to psychotherapy, is a glance at Wikipedia, hardly a repository of repressed esotericism.This is a pretty good place to start learning "secret" information if you're still embedded in the indoctrination factory we call junior high or high school, and it admittedly makes for decent bathroom reading, but those interested in real bombshells would do well to look elsewhere
Dreadful. Nathalie Dupree is an adoptive Southerner -- she was born in New Jersey. Now there's nothing wrong with that; we welcome everyone down here, but she is not Southern and she is decidedly not "country folk." Anyone with a certificate from Cordon Bleu who owned a restaurant in Social Circle, GA, is not Daisy Duke.I don't know how Ms. Dupree came by her vaunted reputation. When I watched her PBS series in 1986, I could not believe what a mess she made of her kitchen. Dirt and grit from leeks flew like gnats, landing on the countertops and the floor. The cake batter she accidentally poured through the handles of a Dutch oven spilled all over the counter. While making a half-hearted effort at cleaning it up, she said to the camera, "I'm sure you'll do better when you make it at home." Ya think?The grits roll which sounds so good, and which Ms. Dupree claims won somebody $6000 in a cooking contest, does not work. ALL chess pies are made with a little cornmeal -- she seems stunned that her friend's recipe calls for it. OK, so the ham biscuits work, and are tasty. The homemade applesauce is very good. But two decent recipes out of 200 is nothing to brag about.I was born and raised in North Carolina, and have lived here all my life. I thought it was just me, but over the past 20 years I've made a point of asking practically every Southerner I meet this question, and we all agree: NO ONE eats chicken gravy on cantaloupe. I have no idea where that came from.A bright, fledging cook of 12 or 13 can tell you that if you throw the butter, flour and milk in a saucepan all at the same time and start whisking, you are not going to get a cream sauce. Most good home cooks can tell you that you cannot freeze a chicken dish made with cucumbers.I could go on, except I haven't gotten to why I think Ms. Dupree is a snob. There are numerous recipes in this book which she prefaces by saying, "this recipe is from my dear friend/former student/cooking teacher... it's *wonderful,* but here's *my* version." There's even a recipe called "Puff Pastry MY WAY." P.S. It's no better than puff pastry made anybody else's way.I'm glad I didn't spend any money on my copy; it was a gift. I'll stick with my files of my grandmothers' recipes, Mrs. Dull's 1928 "Southern Cooking" and the 1950 "Southern Cookbook" from the UNC Press
Disappointing. Anyone who has read Cosmopolitan has read this book! It is little more descriptive than the popular mag and the photos look VERY STAGED (which they are).
over it. Okay so I thought this book was supposed to be really great, but when I read it, it seemed very outdated; almost as if it were written hundreds of years ago.  Also, I am so over Ben Franklin.  So, he invented the kite and the can opener. I think that we as a society would have figured those things out for ourselves after a while anyway.   I was looking for some good witty sayings to use when I picked up this book.  Until I turn 75 next year, I will not consider myself old and will not be using any of the outdated sayings or information in this book.  As far as an almanac goes, my arthritic joints do just fine in predicting the weather for me.  In terms of up to date information , I would like to recommend Player Haters by Carl Weber.
Talk is for sissies (CM will tell you why in 300 pages). Having read All the Pretty Horses, Blood Meridian, and now The Crossing, I feel a little compelled to comment.I got through 3 of McCarthy's books because the writing technique is very good. The imagery of the desert and of survival is well done and vivid, and makes the flaws in the narrative easier to take, but in retrospect, this book was awful.The book should have been titled The Crossings, because the protagonist puts himself through the hell of journeying into Mexico three times, each time for a less compelling reason. I almost expected he'd make a fourth trip because he forgot to turn off the stove. Each trip requires an extensive cataloging of the trials and tribulations of the journey, and while McCarthy's writing is good, it's not so good that tedium is avoided in the repeated trips.The 3 books I mentioned above all share a morbid fascination with Mexico. McCarthy is like one of those moralists who go on and on about the decadence of pop culture, until you start to wonder whether prurience is really the motive for their obsession. For McCarthy, Mexico is the land where the upright, brave and resourceful gringo confronts human weakness and cruelty, slumming among the brown people who either offer him tributes of food, or test his manly mettle with their perfidy. Referring to Mexico as a "negligible republic", and comments about being "nigger-rich" make McCarthy seem like the typically complacent and hypocritical citizen of a country that relies on the misery of others for its comforts and stability. A McCarthy novel would look right at home in the pocket of a Ralph Lauren model.Another tendency of McCarthy: extended pseudo-philosophical monologues by wizened codgers. The pathetic thing is that the protagonist's response to these windy metaphysics is usually, "Uh huh. Well, gotta move long now."If you have to read McCarthy, read Blood Meridian, and plan on skimming
Movie Guide. The book is comprehensive. Very seldom you try to look up a picture or video which is not in the book. The reviews are sometimes too short, however, the book would be too unhandy if every picture had a bigger review. Also the facts about the different movies are accurate and helpful
Buy something else. I've been doing the E&E books in preparation for law school, and they've all been accessible and comprehensible. This one, however, is the exception. Maybe it's the ethereal nature of the subject, but this book is killing me. I feel like I am wasting my time reading it, since I can't seem to make out the forest, nor the trees, through the fog. If you're just starting out, I can't recommend this book for preparation. Maybe in the future it will make more sense, but for this beginner, it's very confusing
History with a flare. I enjoyed this book because of the way she blended history with a good story that keep you readin
An interesting science book by a reporter. For the most part, the author seems to have pretty  good information for the time of the book's printing, but for anyone who wants to read this book on purely scientific terms, be warned; there are several places where the  book goes awry, for example: the author states that tracks of tyrranosaurus  indicate that it was a solitary animal, occasionally hunting in pairs.  Problem: no  tracks of a t. rex have been discovered to date, a decade and  a half after the writing. Aside from that and a few other points, though,  the book is good reading
Chomsky: the CIA's favourite dissident. Chomsky's pseudo-dissidence is revealed by, among many other lies found throughout his oeuvre, his repeated insistence upon the CIA's unwavering fidelity to successive Presidents. Where the evidence is contrary, he ignores it. Nowhere is the suppression more systematic than in Rethinking Camelot: JFK, the Vietnam War, and US Political Culture. Consider, in particular, his Stalinoid survey of the Vietnam coverage of the New York Times from October 3 to December 4, 1963 (in this paperback edition, pp.82-83). One omission, among many, will suffice.On October 3, 1963, the NYT carried a column entitled "The Intra-Administration War In Vietnam." It opened: "The Central Intelligence Agency is getting a very bad press in despatches from Vietnam..."Its author, Arthur Krock, proceeded to quote extensively from one such despatch, "Arrogant CIA Disobeys Orders in Vietnam", by Richard Starnes of the Scripps-Howard group. The quotes below are from Starnes's courageous and hauntingly prophetic original.According to Starnes's source, "Twice the CIA flatly refused to carry out instructions from Ambassador Henry Cabot Lodge", even though one set had been brought direct from Washington. Likening the CIA's growth to a "malignancy", which he was "not sure event the White House could control any longer", the source predicted: "If the United States ever experiences a Seven Days in May it will come from the CIA" (Washington Daily News, October 2).Chomsky was, and remains, the creation and creature of the Central Intelligence Agency. Rethinking Camelot represented the cashing of the CIA's most important dissident chip in its unending war against both genuine dissent, and JFK's memory. It is a measure of the fear, corruption and cowardice prevalent in mainstream Anglo-American academia and media that Chomsky's imposture has gone unchallenged for so long.
No Wit- No Sense-No Vote. This book was not enjoyed by either of my children.  It is so ridiculous that children in the age range for whom its written think its stupid, and the young ones who tolerate witless nonsense don't understand the meaning of the words.  I have an eleven year old and a four year old, both of which were bored by the second page.  The word search within words is a great concept, but I expected there to be some sense about it, so the kids could be entertained AND challenged by the text.  I am very disappointed
EXTREMELY DISAPPOINTED. I am sorry I bought this book.  Perhaps the author has an artistic vision which works for her, but these photos of her quilts look very amateurish.  The directions are poor.  She states she started this method because she had trouble getting her blocks/seams to match.  Her solution is to take a row of blocks, add random strips of fabric, then square it up after it is finished. One does not need to spend money on a book to learn how to do this.  Please find a book that has good patterns or can teach you something about quilting.
class mothers lacks class. This is a very superficial, shallow, juvenile novel seemingly written in haste to take advantage of the motherhood boomlet and the success of books like The Nannie Diaries.  I would not recommend it at all
Torrid and frustrating. I generally really like well-researched historical fiction, and have been a big fan of Dorothy Dunnett and Philippa Gregory (though the latter takes a lot of liberties with history).  I was quite drawn into this book from the first sentence, and found the description of life on the manor rich and convincing.But.began to switch off around the time we discover Jacob Cullen is possessed?  haunted?  by a "Voice" that encouraged him to brutally kill a young boy, and then rape his new bride.  Jacob ends up in the New Model Army where he forms an intense relationship with Ferris, who is a naturally good man.  The descriptions of the war and the brutality are vivid and detailed.After they get back to London, Ferris becomes obsessed with forming a common plot for "diggers," and he and Jacob form an intense homosexual romance.  At that point and for the rest of the book everything was rather overheated and lusty.  It seemed like every other page was a description of longing for the embrace or the sweetness between their legs etc.  I would have been equally bored if this had been a heterosexual couple, but I couldn't connect this simpering Ferris with the earlier Ferris, and Jacob's bouts of violence began to bore me.  The book ends when they've been kicked off the common brutally by the neighboring lord, with the implication that Jacob could have stopped it but just didn't, and Jacob is on a boat to America crying. The Voice is silent.I feel as though I didn't get it. A number of readers here assume the Voice is a symptom of Jacob's schizophrenia or madness, but it's presented in the book as though it really is the devil.  Well, which? Did Jacob rape his own brother when he was a teenager, as implied in one scene?  I kind of resented the way the author withheled information from us-- it's first-person narration, but the author only conveniently reveals/remembers these types of things, when for the first 70-80 pages of the book, Jacob is presented as well-liked and decent.  It just seemed flashy.The book's change in focus and tone felt somewhat ad hoc.Lots of loose threads with Jacob's family.  Ultimately, I was disappointed.  After zooming through the first half, I just naturally slowed down and took a week to read the rest.  By then I was cottoning on that the author was never going to reveal the mysteries, that no one plot was going to develop in a satisfying way, and that she enjoyed vivid descriptions of violence and sex but not deeper characterizations.  She can definitely bring a period to life, but the characters were ultimately shadowy and the storytelling was disjointed
does this book help you make money...no. i have read just about every popular book on horserace betting and the acid test is: does it help beat the races?the name of the game in betting thorougbreds is data mining and processing, which can only be done with software on a computer.i have software that allowed me to test some of the factors cited in this and other popular books. the bottom line... yes you get a high percentage of winners but unfortunately these horses are overbet, indicating that the info in this and other popular books is well known and used by the betting public. to beat the horses you have to think outside the box.so in conclusion don't waste your time reading this book.
Dislike. I did not like the book because it skip around too much between characters. I could not understand the characters. It wasn't really abour roller skating.  I just wanted to read about roller skating
Disappointing, to say the least. The Pursuit is a sequel to Johanna Lindsey's wonderful love story Love Me Forever.  In this book, Lachlan and Kimberly's daughter Melissa is 18 and has unknowingly fallen in love with an enemy of her clansmen, Lincoln Ross Burnett.  Due to a childhood misunderstanding, Melissa's 16 uncles are determined that she will not marry Linc.  They go to any extremes to keep them apart, including having him shanghaied on a ship bound for China.This is far and away one of the most annoying and useless Johanna Lindsey books I've ever read.  I normally love her books, and Love Me Forever was one of my favorites, which makes it even harder to put up with such a sad showing from one of my favorite authors.  The plot was hard to take throughout with the characters' fierce resistance to letting the past stay in the past.  Furthermore, it's a ridiculous and overblown idea to even suggest that two people could fall in love after a 15 minute conversation, and so deeply in fact that one was willing to defy her entire family for it.  If you read this novel, please don't believe that it is characteristic of Lindsey's writing style.  Pick up LOVE ME FOREVER or PRISONER OF MY DESIRE for a much better showing from this usually very talented author of romantic fiction
This book is very misleading!. &quot;A Medieval Feast&quot; is a children's book on a feast held during the Middle Ages.  Since I was looking for a book on Medieval Cookery, and this title came up, I purchased it.  I shouldn't have.  It's a picture book  for young children, and it has nothing whatsoever to do with Medieval  recipes or cookery.  If It wouldn't cost me the price of the book in  shipping, I'd send it back.  However, for children who would like a story  with a Medieval flare, this book is perfect for them, with lovely  illustrations by ALIKI
A Too Early McBain. The Gutter and the Grave is a re-issue of an early McBain who had not quite hit the stride that makes him an immortal of the genre. Clearly dated (even given the fact that it was written in 1958) the dialogue lacks authenticity (a hard boiled detective lieutenant dismissing an obviously phony alibi as horse "manure"), and the realism of the 87th Precinct novels is clearly lacking. The overnight decent of the hero from succesful private eye to Bowery bum because of his wife's infidelity is a bit over the top as is machinations of the other characters. The prime suspect is jailed in minutes of the first murder and sits there  througout the novel's other murders( all committed by the same gun)  without seeking legal counsel ,the alcoholic hero who is always in full control of his faculties and apprently has not lost any his athleticismnor his allure to every woman he meets in the novel taxes credulity. .If "Gutter" is to be the last McBain, it was not a grand exit. I hope there is an 87th Precinct lurking somewhere.
what's the real price to our society?. Lent to me 'cause I'm such a mystery fan.  But I couldn't get over the fact that Anne Perry is herself a convicted murderer and if I bought her books I'd be contributing to her profit off her murder.From Time: "When mystery writer Anne Perry was 15, she committed murder. She and her friend, Pauline, killed Pauline's mother. Perry served 5 1/2 years in an adult women's prison. After her release, she left New Zealand and has never returned. Now living in Scotland, Perry has fashioned a new life and a successful career. Although family and close friends knew about Perry's past, it was never known to the general public, including her agent and her U.S. publisher. The New Zealand film, Heavenly Creatures, deals with the 1954 case. A New Zealand reporter uncovered Perry's previous identity as Juliet Hulme. Perry insists she does not remember specifics of the actual crime."Watch the documentary "Heavenly Creatures" for the facts.  It's just gross that she got off so light for murder and is now rich because she writes about how to committ murders.  She's not wise, she's opportunistic
Disappointing. I have loved many of Jodi Picoult's other books, but this one seemed too far-fetched. I did not feel the evil depicted in the comic book drawings was necesary to the storyline and in-fact detracted from it.  Many of my friends who are Jodi fans were also disappointed in this newest release
Disappointed. By reading all of the other reviews I thought that this book would be right up my alley, and the actual story line was, but the execution of the story really lacks something.  I felt no real connection to the characters, and there was never any suspense to the writing that made me want to read further.  It's not that I disliked the book - it's that it didn't stirred my emotions at all.  I felt that it was a waste of time
Nothing particularly new here. This is just another themed deck that adds nothing special to the Rider Waite family of imagery. Yes the pictures have an Eastern flaire...the insights pretty much stop there
Tedious and Boring and self-centered. Oh my gosh.  This book starts out tedious and self-centered and just gets worse with each page.  When the guy describes how he throws a rock to kill a rabbit (just to see if he could), I stopped reading.
This is not the original story. This is a shorter, much simplified version of the original story that was published by Pantheon books in 1983.  I'm not sure what the point was in making a simplified version, since the complete story of Cornelius was my son's favorite when he was 3 years old.  I'd skip this version and go with the original
fun read, lots of hyperbole, quite biased, selectively documented. trying to make an exciting context, the author exaggerates and connects dots that are not ther
More legal charges / problems for Dr. Almy!. Here are some additional charges brought against Dr. Gary Almy (See Chicago Tribune 5 March 2005). Hardly the work of a Christian Counselor, maybe he should add an additional chapter to his book.Psychiatrist facing 3rd sex abuse chargeTribune staff reporterPublished March 5, 2005A psychiatrist accused of molesting two boys who attended a school run out of his Long Grove home was charged Friday with molesting a third student.Gary Almy, 61, of the 3100 block of Old McHenry Road was charged with a third count of aggravated sexual abuse, said Lake County Assistant State's Atty. Matt Chancey.Almy is being held in the Lake County Jail on $600,000 bail.Authorities learned about a possible third victim from a statement Almy made to police, Chancey said. The abuse allegedly occurred between October 2003 and April 2004 when the boy from Indiana, then 14, attended Almy's Truth in Action Academy.Almy, who calls himself a Christian counselor, was a staff psychiatrist at Lydia Home Association, a faith-based child-welfare agency in Chicago. He resigned when charged last month with fondling a 14-year-old in the summer of 2003 and a 10-year-old in October 2000.Other allegations of abuse date to at least the 1980s, but those won't result in additional charges because the statute of limitations has expired, Chancey said.One of those accusers filed a civil suit Thursday against Almy in Lake County Circuit Court, seeking more than $50,000. The 36-year-old Libertyville man repressed the memories of his sexual abuse until two years ago while undergoing treatment for alcohol and drug abuse, said his attorney, Robert Baizer of Highland Park.The man grew up near the Almy home, Baizer said. While visiting the home and on a trip to Iowa, Almy fondled the boy, then in his preteens, about 20 times over a two-year period, the attorney said.Baizer attributes his client's lifelong addiction to drugs and alcohol to the sexual abuse."[Almy] did destroy this kid's life. There's no question," Baizer said.Copyright  2005, Chicago Tribune
an innocent abroad jilts Clio. Christopher Catherwood, a professor affiliated with Cambridge University's Institute of Continuing Education, has written this book on the modern history of what has come to be called Iraq.  Putting Churchill's name into  the title makes the book so much easier to market to those Americans who react to Churchill's name with the same giddiness that any mention of the Beatles once elicited from teenage girls.To his credit, Catherwood has tried to cut through the fog of ideology and propaganda to get to the bottom of what happened.  Unfortunately, his undertaking wasn't even close to successful.  For example, Catherwood claims that the oil companies had no way of being sure that Iraq had oil deposits at the time that the Iraqi boundaries were drawn.  This despite the fact that crude oil had been seeping up to the surface in Iraq since biblical times, when, because it was deemed a medicine, had been brought by caravan to such distant places as China.  Natural gas also made its way to the surface, and would catch fire in eerie flames that the Iraqis attributed to ghosts.  These indisputable facts utterly refute the world according to Catherwood that this book has to offer..Catherwood implies that the British were only interested in Iraq's oil because of its military use - one almost hears undertones insisting that the British only wanted a platonic relationship - but neglects to mention the close ties between Shell Oil and the admiral who fanatically urged advocated that the Royal Navy transition to oil.  These ties were so close that some of his colleagues were convinced that he had some financial stake in the deal.  I could write further paragraphs in this vein.Were I ever to write a book on a subject so shrouded in disagreement as Iraq's history, I would make sure to first talk with knowledgeable people from the region, and then consult the writings of academics.  Unfortunately Catherwood seems to only have done the latter, to his colossal book's detriment.  Clio must feel slighted.  The only reason I don't give the book a single star, is that there are even worse books on the subject
fun read, lots of hyperbole, quite biased, selectively documented. trying to make an exciting context, the author exaggerates and connects dots that are not ther
what!. i don't why anybody liked this book. the story line wasn't bad it was just that is was way to vague and not enough interaction with the characters. i mean there is hardly any conversation at all
Waste of Time. If you do not have infinite patience DO NOT buy this book.  While it contains over 800 pages of nutritional information and is very comprehensive it has NO organization to it.  There is a very brief table of contents and no index at all.  The contents are arranged alphebetically but there is no color coding or shading on the edges of the pages to indicate where A stops and B begins and so on.  I HATED using it and only did so for about a week.  Then I went out and bought a new calorie counting book which also included fat and carb information, which is all I need and wanted.  My replacement book contains a Table of Contents, an index and is color coded and cost about 1/2 the price of this one.
This just sucked. I think I'm done with the Mrs. Murphy books.  This one was so bad I couldn't even finish it.  I actually threw it away.  It's time for the author to move on.  These characters have become downright boring
no!. Bill, when will you just die?if you read this feel free to email meevan.fett@gmail.co
A Perfect Letdown. I've read over 150 thrillers/mysteries during the past 5 years and this novel ranks as one of the five worst. The story is a complete bore and the killer is so perfectly obvious that it seems that the only way the author keeps the story moving is to include monotonous drama about a sexually abused teenager and an emotionally limited inspector. The title, the ending and the loose ends are all meaningless and disappointments. The moral of the story: don't pay attention to the rave reviews on the inside flaps
Warning!! Bobke Triple Regurgitation Fraud!!. I am a big fan of Bob Roll, ever since watching him face plant in a NORBA race at Big Bear. After enjoying his column in Velo News, I bought Bobke when it was published. Amusing read. When we got back from France in a TdF frenzy, I ordered his Tour primer, and thought my wife might enjoy more stories, so I ordered Bobke II.I didn't mind re-reading his columns in B-I, but to be sold the same stories twice, with minimal value add was insulting. The few new bits have such a 2004 speculative orientation, I am sure this book will become instantly dated.If you DO NOT own the original Bobke, and discovered Bob on OLN, perhaps Bobke II is of value. I just feel ripped off and ignorant for having been taken this way.I still love Bob, and hope he has continuing success. OLN's coverage would suffer without his knowledge and funk.
Couldn't have gotten any worse!. I couldn't put this book down, not because it was so good mind you, but because I wanted to see just how bad it was going to get. This was one truly awful book.  The premise of the book sounded intriguing and I was really looking forward to enjoying this book as much as I did the first in this series.  But, man this was bad.  First, 99% of the book doesn't even take place at Camp Crystal Lake, but some college campus.  The idea is simple, Jason goes to the lowest level of hell (a nice nod to Dante) and is "convinced" to kill his way up the levels of hell to make his way back to the surface world and kill some more.  Only his return is more like the 80's flick Shocker and much less like a Friday the 13th movie.  The author goes out of his to make Jason a lifeless moron who whimpers like a baby when he's injured.  I could go on, but please skip this book.  Read the previous book in the series and pretend this installment never happened.  God knows I'm trying to erase it from my mind as I write this.
Same as the blog... but fun if you haven't read it. Ditto another reader's observations on this.  If you've been reading along with the blog these past few years - the book is an unfortunate duplicate.  Or, I should say, 98% is duplicate, but unfortunately, that extra 2% is rather like the extra two minutes on some director's cut of a movie.  Doesn't change the story, doesn't change the book itself, and you really could have kept it out - but guess that's what I get for not looking closely before I bought it.Aside from that - if you haven't read the blog, the book is fun.  Nothing earthshattering, just leisurely and running occasionally to voyeuristic
Dissapointed. I watched this movie in Religion and was dissapointed that it didn't follow the book. I read the book as a child and saw almost every version of the movie available, but now seeing this one again (I'm pretty  sure I saw this before) I was annoyed at how much it changed the book. I think if your going to take a book and make it a movie you have no right to take such liberties. The way Mary discovers the garden and the key are absolutely rediculous. Also I don't like colin's strange fortune-teller like air. I had no emotional reaction to the ending where the children are all grown up because they just seemed like random actors and didn't even remotely resemble the children. Don't get this version if your a purist
Civilized Discourse Leaves Discontented Reader. There isn't much I can add to previous reviews of Civilziation and Its Discontents. My own reaction (after 2 cracks at it, one in college, and one post-) is one of bafflement and boredom. With academic, convoluted language, Freud discusses the role of the individual with his neuroses and his conflicts with socialization and civilization. Many of his jumbled sociological observations are better recorded by previous thinkers--Rousseau, for example. His psychological conclusions have more or less been explored at length in his previous works. Therefore, the redeeming value is found, perhaps, in Freud's closing passages, eery portends of Europe's ugly years
Disappointing. Monday morning, on release day of this book, I stopped by a B&N to pick up this book.  When they didn't have it, I drove an hour to try another store.  Finally I ordered it on Amazon and paid extra for second day delivery.Since I am relatively new to functional programming, I can't judge the technical content.  I can tell you that other beginners should stay away from this book.The writing style is surprisingly bad, considering the author has a degree in English and this book had a professional editor. Much of the book looks like a bad cut & paste job.  The author often describes a concept in very general terms, dumps a dozen lines of code and moves on without ever explaining what the code is doing (strange for a programming language book).There are free OCaml tutorials on the web which do a much better job of explaining the language.  The publisher did a good job with Practical Lisp, how come this book doesn't have the same quality?  At $50, this book will be going right back to Amazon
Not an impressive diet book. tells you nothing you don't already know and really didn't offer much advise
Junie B. Jones Cheater Pants. Junie B.Jones came back to school and she forgot to do her homework and the teacher called her up in front and told Junie B.what she did for the weekend. I like this book because Junie B.Jones gets a serprice coming for her. I like this book becauseit's funny
Come back later. Even though this is a "popular" version of the theory, with the considerable advantage of being by Einstein himself, it is not so easy as the presentation may imply. Einstein says in his introduction that his reasoning will demand no more than a high-school knowledge. It might be true in his time, but nowadays the book demands a longer study in Physics. I offer myself as an example: I'm a literature student in post-graduation level, and simply couldn't grasp the meaning of many mathematical demonstrations he uses to make his points. His reasoning is also obscure in many passages (what are really those 'galilean coordinates'?). Perhaps these details seem self-evident for professional readers, but they are not for the general public (the implied target of the book). In brief, Einstein didn't succeed completely in his attempt at popularization.
Sorry, Rey. Sorry, Rey.  I see you took the time to write a review. Next time I lend you abook I'll be sure to read it more closely first
Old book - Old Ideas. I bought and examined this book thoroughly. There are so many old concepts I wonder whether the author has ever re-read its current second edition. It is supposed to have been written for C++ programmers but of what generation? I understand that the current 2nd edition was written after the release of MS Visual C++ 4. So, the source code still assumes that C++ doesn't have the true and false Boolean constants since the author #defines them, which causes an error in both Visual C++ 6 and later. In fact, the use of #include &lt;iostream.h&gt; and void main()indicate that the book is not ANSI compliant. The web site that supports the book provides source code, for MSVC 4 (only after I bought the book, which is extremely expensive, did I find out on the 4th page that it was released in 1996; but the current C++ Standard is from 1998). I tried compiling them in MSVC6 and MSVC.NET. None of the programs compiled (none at all). Even after re-creating the programs by adding files manually, I received many many errors. I tried to fix them and also tried compiling from the Command Prompt, to no avail. It is true that we don't have that many books on compiler development but just as these books are rare, this particular one will be to no help. It is (very) old and its programs don't work. The only things you might get are the authors comments that may help you with some suggestions or guidance, which will be little
I hope I'll be able to find something better than this book. I have found this book very difficult to enjoy.  To begin with, the first chapter is spent telling me that I can do it!  The writing is condescending and achieves the opposite of the intended motivation.  The cartoons are stupid and not comical.While reading you'll quickly learn that the author offers a service to you, the aspiring inventor.  Reese, as your partner, will take your idea, help you develop it, package and pitch it, and negotiate the contract.  In exchange you split the royalties with him.  This sounded like a great idea to me: Your idea combined with his knowledge and skills could produce great results.  It's a win/win.So I looked into his website.  For him to consider your idea, you must pay a 175-dollar fee.  The concept is that this fee is nominal compared to typical lawyer fees.  Its object is to prove that you are serious and so that Reese is not swamped with ideas.   The real payday for Reese is when you get paid too with royalties for licensing your idea.I am a college student and cannot afford to swing 175-dollars so easily, so I requested that he waive the fee and hear my idea.  I assured him I was serious and that I believed my idea had great potential.  After all, the big money is in the royalties, not the 175-dollar initial fee.  Reese declined the offer.  He said that it would be poor business practice to offer different prices to different people.I am very objective, and I am not offended that Reese declined my offer.  But, to address Reese's inability to modify prices, consider that car dealers negotiate prices, department stores have sales, and of course, Amazon will sell you this book for less than your local bookstore.  I quote Reese from page 68, "While we're on the subject of fees, if the price quoted is more than you can afford, it's quite appropriate to ask if the attorney can come down a bit."Reese unintentionally enlightened me to the nature of his operation.  The 175 dollars is so important for a very good reason.  The 175-dollar fee may seem nominal compared to the fees of a lawyer, but Reese is dealing with many more clients than a lawyer.  One thousand ideas submitted is worth $175,000.I know that if you're reading this review you have an idea, you don't know what to do with it, and you can't afford to spend thousands of dollars on a lawyer to find out.  Reese knows this too.  This is perfect marketing.I'm not suggesting that Reese doesn't do what he claims.  I'm sure he takes ideas and markets them and makes money for himself and the inventors.  However, I question what percentage of submitted ideas he acts on.  If he was successful with a significant percentage, it may have been lucrative for him to at least hear my idea.  The message Reese sent is clear:  The 175-dollars is more relevant than the potential of the idea.I give this book two stars because I commend Reese for his clever approach at earning a buck.  I feel he is unethical, and he condemns most of his own practices in this book.  However, when it comes down to the bottom line, Reese isn't breaking any laws, and he's trying just like you and me for that million-dollar payday.
Good Plot---Poorly Written--Almost Annoying. While Black and Blue does bring to light and make the readers aware of the depths and secrets involved in spousal abuse, it is rather difficult to identify with, like, or even feel anything for the protagonist.Black and Blue explores the life of an abused woman who has attempted to disappear with her son in order to escape her abuser husband.  First of all, the book seems to me like a Lifetime Movie, almost cheesy if you will.  Half of the things the main character does, you are screaming at her in your head to not do them.  She is almost like the dumb girl in every horror movie, who runs up the stairs instead of out the door.I found all of the characters in the book seem to have much more depth than the protagonist.  While I was rooting for her, it was because she was the victim, not because I actually liked or understood her.  She seemed weak, in that she really didn't do much of anything to help herself or her situation, either everyone else did everything for her, or things just kind of happened. Yes, it took a lot of guts to make that first phone call that was necessary in order for her to leave her husband, however, that was the only thing she ever really did for herself (pick up the phone).  Everything else was done for her, mostly without her knowledge.  She was doing something that was so hard to do, she should have felt like a strong woman to me, but she didn't not in the least and I attribute my feelings to poor character development and the actions as well as the non-actions of the main character.One thing that annoyed me was the constant memory descriptions or flashbacks.  While they were integral to the story, they came at the oddest moments.  Sometimes it took you a few seconds to figure out if she was speaking her memory to someone else, if it was actually happening in real time, or it was all in her head.  In the middle of a conversation with someone she would suddenly reel into a 2 or more page memory in her head and then when the memory was over she would go right back into the conversation.  This left me having to go back a few pages to recall what the real-time conversation was even about.Overall, the basics of the plot were interesting, as were some of the characters in the book.  The book does make one aware of the dangers of often hidden spousal abuse; however, it was not captivating.  I will not buy, recommend or read this book again.
Hocus Pocus. Investing world we heard Warren Buffett(57-69 Dow 152% Buffett Partnership 2794.9%), Charles Munger(62-75 Dow 96.8% C.M. Partnership 1156.7%), Bill Ruane (S&P 14yr 70-84Q1 270% Sequoia Fund 775%, Walter Schloss(S&P 28.5 yrs 887.2% WJS Ltd Patners 6,678.8%) - The Superinvestors of Graham-and-Doddsvill - The Intelligent Investor Appendix D. So far I didn't see steve nison, candle stick and all TA stuff is like Reading tea leaves. Investing should be Value Investing, fullstop. For beginner I'll suggestThe Five Rules for Successful Stock Investing: Morningstar's Guide to Building Wealth and Winning in the Market  and then The Intelligent Investor Revised Edition.
know where your information is coming from... i have not read this book, i stumbled across the listing on amazon and looked at it, so i can't actually comment as to the comments. but i want people to realize that the publisher is listed as the john birch society, a very right-wing fringe group that among other things in its history, was against the civil rights movement. look them up on wikipedia or something if you want more information, i just wanted to let people who are not familiar with the jbs know who was responsible for publishing this
Incredibly Biased!. "The China Threat" references President Clinton, ALWAYS in a negative manner, almost as much as China - despite this edition having been written after President Bush took office and, in some instances, his ADDING to the issues that Gertz was upset with Clinton about.  Further, there was little/no negative reference to Presidents Nixon, Reagan, or Bush I, either - for similar actions (eg. building trade).  Thus, my conclusion that the book is incredibly biased.True, China has exercised INCREDIBLE brutality against its people in the past - Chairman Mao was responsible for the death of millions.  (See Jung Chang's 2005 book for details.)  However, the situation has since greatly improved and deserves rethinking.  (Gertz's recommendation that the U.S. increase pressure on China for democratization rings hollow, given the degree of gerrymandering and influence-buying in Congress, and deliberate law-breaking and lying by this Administration.)Gertz also brings up China's support for North Korea's missile manufacturing (forgetting U.S. support for India's ignoring nuclear non-proliferation pacts), Chinese monies given to the Democratic Party (ignoring U.S. funds given to various candidates in former Russian territories and other locations), and alleged Chinese spying on U.S. atomic secrets (ignoring U.S. spy-plane flights along China's border, U-2 flights over China, satellite photography across China, and efforts to obtain information on China's nuclear programs).And then there's China's "large" military outlays - one-eighteenth that of the U.S.!Gertz, however, missed the greatest threats from China - economic.  Our large and rapidly growing trade deficit (over $200 billion in 2005), manufacturing job losses, and major borrowings of U.S. debt (about $260 billion - second only to Japan) put the U.S. at serious economic risk.Not worth reading
Unendurable. This book was on somebody's Amazon.com LISTMANIA for Sea Turtles, so I hunted it down.  It is only vaguely about sea turtles, in that it is set on an island in Georgia where sea turtles nest.  There is a sea turtle biologist introduced at the very beginning of the book, and then he disappears, so it's obvious that he was involved in the crime.There are way too many characters in this book to keep track of and most of them are not believable or likable.  I wish this book had at least been fun to read but it was tedious and I ended up skimming the whole thing, looking for any sign of sea turtle interaction.  Skip this book and send your $6.99 to a sea turtle hospital instead.
After race. After reading this book I've decided to write a book called: No More Blackness "How the Hip-Hop Culture moved back to Africa.
Find better information online. I'm not even going to go into how basic and well... bad this book is. I recommend you go search some free websites on how to buy a business, you will learn everything that's in this book and more.
The unaware Zapruder filmed a closed-set staged-event. It was filmed before a live audience .When some of the "witnesses", didn't respond to the gunshots and the aftermath,it just adds credence to a vast conspiracy theory.Zapruder handed over the film.And had to legally fight to get it back.The filmed shooting clearly shows the upper-right side of JFK's head ,being removed.So,why were the released autopsy photos,showing an exit wound having grazed the very top right-side of JFK's head? Two top autopsy doctors reported that JFK's top right-side and brain were imploded and expeled onto the limo's trunk.Later,their stories were recanted and rectified to stating that Kennedy's brain was removed and stored for further examination.When RFK found out about this,he ordered it returned.Yet,the doctors then stated the JFK brain was now "lost and misplaced" . It appears that the CIA monkeyed with the Zapruder film, by removing some frames.The film clearly shows JFK being hit ,from the back ,reaching for his throat, bullit possibly going forward to hit Connelly's back scapula and raising wrist.All body-hits in a split second ,at close-range and at street level.The close-range shot did not impede the bullit's progress.This adds support to a police-escourt shooter ,being involved. Zapruder seemed shakened by the whole experience.I think some of audience,at the Ford's Theatre 1865,also knew the evening's comedy would unfold into live tragedy,before their very eyes
NAMBLA Members Line up For Blocks to Get This!. Now that Hannity has gone on the record as a pedofilia apologist and defender of child molestation."Thank God for Hannity!"-Lee Krock, founder of NAMBL
OK but need to know astral projection. This book is fair. It assumes you can astral project. Most of the advanced subjects are for use when you astral project. The author is vague about many subjects and doesn't go into a lot of detail. She tells you that you should read this book and that, if you want to know more about what she's talking about. I don't recommend this book because it doesn't seem advanced. It just gives general information and doesn't get into more detail. I was disappointed. However, it does have some info that is interesting
Horrible. After reading Inheritance of Loss, I immediately turn to read Salman Rusdie as a way of reminding myself what great Indain writing is.This novel is awful. It seems that Desai was trying to combine the writing styles of Rusdie, Arundhati Roy, and Rohinton Mistry into one; the result is an incoherent mess of snapshots of wooden characters. There is not a single character that is fully fleshed out; we only get snippets of some historical events that shaped who they are. Hence, it is impossible to empathize with any of them so that when the tragic event struck during the second half of the novel, I am left shrugging my shoulders.Contents aside, the writing style is equally strocious. Descriptions of atmospheres and events are broken up into multiple, broken-up paragraphs. It's almost like Desai is trying too hard to introduce the fantastical elements (as seen in Rushdie) through disjointed writing. Moreover, there is a heavy dosage of Indian idioms spattering throughout the novel but the author somehow neglected to expand the context these idioms are used. This makes understanding and empathizing Indian culture during the turbulent 1980s even more difficult.All in all, I think this novel should be taught in creative writing classes as an example of how NOT to write a novel
wannabe. Mr Davidar thought he was writing the great Indian novel. Unfortunately, what came out at the end was a schoolboy effort, characterized by Raj cliches, prose that sounds like it is translated, and occasional paragraphs containing personal views on India and Indians which dont mesh with the main text at all. I am glad I borrowed this free of cost from the library and did not waste my money - though I did waste my time reading it. All I can say is that it would make good reading on a long flight - at least the story has tempo and keeps you mildly entertained
The Listless Word-Finder. This was an extremely frustrating book to read.  There were many gaps in the word lists.  The two letter word list only contained 85 of the 96 acceptable two letter words.  It was missing ag, ex, hm, mm, mo, mu, ne,  uh, um, wo, and xu.  All of those words are contained in The Official  Scrabble Players Dictionary (1995) but not contained in this 1998 book  based on that dictionary.  The Three Letter Words from Two Letter Words  also had many gaps.  The very first two letter word (AA - cindery lava)only  listed BAA, and totally missed AAH, AAL, and AAS.  This is just one of  many, many, omissions through out the book.  The only benefit I found in  having the book was in finding some words which contain a particular letter  in the middle of the end of the word.  But even these lists were  incomplete.  This book is not worth the investment
Scattered, Repetitious, Vague. I've always admired Norman Cantor as a historian.  However, this book is terrible.  It is scattered--I could never tell what was coming next or how ideas fit together.  It is repetitious--giving the same general fact or opinion over and over again, as if the author couldn't remember what he'd already said or had no idea of organization.  It is vague--rarely does he get into the specific details we know of Gaunt's life that would give us a true flavor of the times.  The all too brief section on Gaunt's registers was one of the few interesting sections of the book.A waste of my time and money
This is the worst Cat Who... book yet!. This is the most boring book I've read in the series! I've read all her books and I couldn't wait to finish this one. I can't believe I finished it in the first place! It has no plot and you can tell who did it very early in the storyline (if you want to call it a storyline). I wouldn't waste money buying this one. Get it from your library! The rumors about this one being ghostwritten have got to be true. I can't imagine Braun writing like this!
oops!. I bought this book on a friend's recommendation.  If I had been in a book store and could have read a page or two I would have known immediately it was not the type of book I would read.  I'm sure it's wonderful for those who like it.  I passed it on to a friend
Airy-fairy stuff. I believe that life is too short and books that really deserve to be read too plentiful (not to mention movies worth watching, games worth playing, ...) for anyone to spend more than five minutes on this book. It's amazing how marketing can help sell such fluffy material. Any time, I recommend "If You Want to Write" by Brenda Ueland instead
1 star  and for good reason. Take advice from somebody who is able to easily win over others easily.  The advice and beliefs shown in this book are just wrong.If you want to do really well.  Do what others that are doing well are doing.  Adopt the beliefs, mannerisms, attitude,  techniques, ideas  of who you wish to be like  and you'll get the same results.in other words.  Don't copy John Gray.
bad language.. please away.. I've studied in IT major and my professor use this book as the main text for this subject. Even though I'm not English/USA but I read many text book before. unlike the other texts, this book is pure nightmare.. use very bad language and very hard to intrepret what the author try to communicate..Moreover, the picture in the text represent nothing. I get nothing from the figure and it's totally useless. I try to find a group of people and let all of them help to translate the books. Surprisly, most of them do not understand the text as well as I am and we cannot conclude what we can get from the book.I ask the senior student who already pass the class I'm studing, all of them said that this is the worst text book that we had seen in thier real life.- hard to read, (no common-fundamental word here.., author always use high level descriptive language )- expensive- dull- case study that hard to understand / useless / old / not update- lots of fussy comma.. will cause you headache.- etc.Finally, I advise that you do not purchase this title and all title compose by these author unless you already did read it first
The only dummy is the person who buys this book. Just read the 7th edition--it only took a couple of hours to go through it.  It is a schill for AOL and Geo-Cities.  It also pushes Netscape Composer which is probably an out of date web design package.  Briefly describes HTML in a very very basic manner.  You will not be able to get a web page up with what is published in this book.  The book convinced me to get a copy of Frontpage.
Misguided attack. Mr. Horowitz has a valid thesis -- that classical music in the United States was taken over by commercial interests -- but he subverts that thesis in an attack, misguided, misinformed, and mean-spirited, on a great conductor who tried to conduct music as it was written.  If it were not for the thesis, this would get no stars
Carr promises the earth, the moon and the stars (but of course he cannot deliver). Once again, Carr's central truth is: To know how the addiction works is to be free of it.Unfortunately this is simply a false dawn.  The greater the need for a solution, the more willingly we suspend disbelief and trust in a system that promises an end to our problem.  This is not to say the book contains nothing of worth. But Carr's demand for total deference and his insistence on offering a complete cure inevitably prepare us for eventual disappointment.We are all more intelligent than we are capable and awareness of the insanity of addiction never saved anyone from the disease.
Left Behind Series. The Left Behind series is the best reading I have ever read. I admit my reading is not all that much, but when I read the very first book I was hooked, I read all twelve books in about six weeks. They lead me to understand the Bible better. Thank you Tim and Jerry for such great books.Corrine Robinson
missing book. today i have not received this book yet.could you inform me when this book would be delivered, please
My first - and LAST - Kinsey Milhone debacle!. It's tempting to spoil the end of this novel in order to describe how BAD it truly is, but Ms. Grafton has somehow earned a following, and as I've said before, there is something for everyone out there. After all, some people (not a majority) actually voted for George W. Bush, on purpose! I think this level of mystery fluff is for them.Rather than spoil the nutty climax (I have worked in hospitals for years, so I ain't buying it) I will mention that the second paragraph of this schlock novel closes with the words: "...life is one big, savage joke; not funny ha-ha, but cruel like those gags sixth graders have been telling since the world began."I became so distracted thinking about people who were already in sixth grade when the world began (where did they go to kindergarten?) that I almost missed the rest of the chapter
Hopefully This Series Will Improve!. Unlike Cussler's other series, I found this first story of the "Oregon Files" slow going at first and rather confusing. There are just too many things going on (no problem, I suppose, for multi-taskers!) and way too many characters to keep track of. Also, there's little to no character development even of "Mr. Chairman", Juan Cabrillo. The fact that he and his companions are mercenaries (with a penchant for good deeds that pay well) doesn't compare favorably with the NUMA heroes. However, the plots were intriguing and getting the golden budda out of the country was exciting and more like the roller coaster rides I expect from Mr. Cussler and co-writers. I look forward to the subsequent Oregon Files with high hopes.
Not for the Vegan Baker. First, this looks to be an excellent book -- if -- you eat eggs and dairy.  If you follow a plant based diet, this is not the book for you.  There are handful - count maybe 5 - recipes that don't have eggs and dairy.  It is possible to substitute Earth Balance for butter and tinker with egg replacers for the eggs, if you want to bother.  For some reason I thought that because it has Buddhist roots it would lean more heavily on plant-based baking.
A big disappointment. After all the rave reviews, I thought this would be a great book on practice management.  What I got was a book by Deena Katz on Deena Katz.  For example, in discussing contact management systems, she glosses over Act! and Goldmine; barely mentions Text Library System and ProTracker, but spends considerable time talking about paying $50,000 to have a consultant design a system.  If you currently have a fee only practice that is grossing in the high 6-figures and want to develop it into a multi-million $ firm, like Deena Katz, then I suggest you read this book
Complete???. I was very disapointed that the cards were not the most current. With the publication date of October 2002, and this coinciding with the release of Onslaught, I thought it would be included. My disapointment increased 10 fold when I found out that Oddyssey, Judgment, and Torment were also missing from the book. I don't understand how one can say complete! and have the buyer expect anything less than the inclusion of the Oddyssey series
Follow up on Amit Gupta's review. I totally agree with Amit's review.  For a practitioner's perspective Bruce Tuckman's "Fixed Income Securities: Tools for Today's Markets" is a much better choice than Fabozzi
Special Topics in Calamity Physics. This seemed very pretentious, with an unnecessary amount of literary references.  It was convoluted and felt like wading through mud - difficult to get through
Propaganda and a lousy thesis. If my eleventh grade son had written this book, I would have given it a D-.When Rashid Khalidi write it, it gets a triple F.The logic is not there, the facts are wrong.Can't Palestinians do more than hate Israelis?
deceptive advertising. 101 Bulletin Board Ideas is the only item I have bought from Amazon that displeased me. It is religious in nature, yet there was no mention of that fact when I bought it. Ms. Lee's cutesy ideas are not academic in nature - there is absolutely not one academically based idea in the book - and I was not even able to give the book away, despite knowing a couple of Catholic school teachers. The book would only be helpful to those who teach pre kindergarten in a Christians only school. 1 star for the rating is still one too many
Inelegant, ill-written and unreliable. Having read Kerry Downes' standard monographs on Hawksmoor, Du Prey's &quot;Architecture and Theology&quot; is very disappointing. Du Prey does not, to begin, bring the book to its logical conclusion; despite commencing with a gushing account of Anglican Divines in Augustan England (Atterbury and Aldrich, though not, rather surprisingly, Sacheverall), the way in which contemporary religious thought might have conditioned the form of the churches built is inconclusive and not argued with the conviction that made an old article on the matter by Du Prey himself (ie., 'The Basilicas of the Primitive Christians') worthwhile. Furthermore, broad, out-of-context and misleading generalisations (such as a description of the Tory party of 1711 as 'right-wing') mixed with pockets of narrative make the book extremely irksome to read.  As if that were not bad enough, Du  Prey proves himself a brazen and misguided name-changer: St. George-in-the-East becomes 'St. George's-in-the-East', whilst St. Alfege, Greenwich, is nicely modernised as St. Alphege (which is, in fact, in dioscean records, a completely different church!).  These observations might seem pedantic, but such mistakes are quite surprising from a Professor of Architectural History.   Du Prey does not mention the churches of Gibbs (St. Mary-le-Strand, St. Martin-in-the-Fields), Archer (St. John Smith Square, Westminster, St. Paul, Deptford) or John James (St. George Hanover Sqaure), even though the latter collaborated on St. John Horselydown and St. Luke Old Street with Hawksmoor himself! Neither of the churches, not surprisingly, are studied at all.  This is a flaw which Kerry Downes highlighted in a review of the book; it ought to have elicited a little caution on my part, because &quot;Architecture and Theology&quot; is definately not worth the asking price
Wolf in Sheep Skin. If you are a Christian, this book isn't for you. It is full of blashphemy, concluding that we must "... forgive God" and that we must love God "... even if He isnt perfect". Kusher even has the will to say that "...God would not be God..." without our love for Him. At one point he reduces God to an aminal saying that in the garden of Eden, when God said "...let US make man in OUR image" he was speking to animals and creation. Kusher explains that God created the world, and in the next paragraph that we came by evolution.Since when was God in need of forgiveness? Isnt it that "... God so loved the world" and it wasnt us that loved God? I have no words in describing this book. It is full of error, because it does not base it self on the Gospel of Jesus Christ. All this book does is frees you from the thought that you are a sinner, and that it isnt your fault, and that actully you are a good person. Why do bad things happen to good people? Wrong question. There are no good people in the world in the first place. " for all have sinned and come short of the glory of God..." The world is in sin. The world DOES NOT HAVE GOOD PEOPLE!! Only by the grace of God, through faith in Jesus Christ you are made righteous. I beg you in the name of Jesus Christ to stay away from this book. It hasnt helped 4 million people, but it lied to them. Kusher, please turn from your ways and come to Jesus, then will you understand the life question "WHY"
Very disappointing. This is the story of Cassie, who is found wandering helplessly in a cemetery by a young Indian policeman who just arrived in LA. Cassie suffers from amnesia and we don't know what brought her there, until a hollywood megastar recognizes her as his wife.This is by far the most disappointing of Picoult's books, and I've read almost all of them and am a big fan of hers. Cassie is amnesic, yet she does remember stuff and it is not clear at all in the book how comes she recovers from her amnesia or actually how it happened. The story goes back and forth between the present, the past, the memories, and leaves readers lost in the middle.I was surprised by other reviewers who were surprised by the ending. Chapter one gives the ending away in my opinion. What is frustrating is that it takes Picoult 350 pages to make her character realise the obvious.I also found Cassie to be unreliable and unappealing, let alone her husband Alex, a massive egocentric. The story was very confused, mixing hollywood lifestyle with movie sets in Africa, with anthropology, Indian legends, domestic violence, alcoholism, amnesia - it was just too much for one book and the message was confused.If you want a superb story of domestic violence, read Black & Blue by Anna Quindlen. If you want a good Picoult book, read The Pact or My Sister's Keeper, but definitely not Picture Perfect
Somewhat........ terrible. To start with, I have seen pretty much all of the Wolf's Rain anime, (I may have missed a few episodes) and it wasen't all that great, anyway (THE ENDING, for great's sake!). The only thing outstanding in the anime was the music, logically nonexistent in the manga. Still, I bought the manga in hopes that it would differ from the anime in some respect, perhaps end better? Although the end is yet to come, I already dislike the manga mostly for the artwork, more precisely the wolves, whose legs resemble those of a girrafe's! And Kiba is supposed to be fluffy, but his fur looks much too stringy in the manga. Also, instead of selectively leaving out a few parts, they seem to have selectively chose a few parts to actually draw! It seems almost like a summary, they have so few scenes. What really ticks me is that my favorite part of the ENTIRE series, (which I didn't even like) the scene where Quent shoots UNDER Blue, smacking the crap out of Kiba, is left out. The entire charm of showing how in tune Blue and Quent are is left out. I just can't wait to see the second book, which I bet won't even show an ending. So much for this series- the only thing worth money are the two CD's.P.S.- one last thing that just struck me as odd and out of place, the text on the front of the book, "Wolf's Rain" is.... Pink. Not just a little. Bright..... PINK. Almost ANY other color would do for this depressing anime. Oh, and another thing, something GOOD- the bonus thing at the end of the book- I liked that. Very Nice
Superficial, irrelevant, and irritating. Let's see - I graduate from law school at age twenty, work as an attorney, a real estate developer, venture capitalist, and a banker over a span of about thirty years. Then I get sick and am out of work. When I am ready to return to work, I, through a large network of past contacts, just happen to get a job teaching college courses, which leads to writing books and appearing on national TV shows, and which, in turn, leads to forming consulting businesses including life coaching. And, of course, my advanced degreed wife takes a well-paying job at a magazine as a cushion. Then I hold myself up as an example of how the typical person can launch a second career and put it all in a book, SECOND ACTS. So the reader learns early on that the author cannot distinguish the irrelevant from the situation of most attempting to make a career change. Furthermore, it is an irony, which the author little sees, that he did not depend on the exercises that he recommends to others in finding a second career. He actually stumbled into most of what he calls a second career. Is that the real message: get lucky.Of course, what would a self-help book be if it didn't have any number of exercises that must be followed to find a second career. First of all, one is to write about their dream: passions, strengths and weaknesses, interests, needs, and the specific dream. And then there are the typical obstacles of which one must be cognizant: age, money, duration, consent, location, physical condition, education and training, timing, esteem, fear of failure, fear of success, and fatalism. There is a subtle message here that failure to launch a second career may be due to your failure to overcome these obstacles - like they are not really obstacles after all.This is the wrong genre to look for a realistic description and assessment of the world of work and training and education for it. If employees were actually empowered and if students could get educated and trained without tremendous amounts of extraneous hoop-jumping, perhaps all of these books about how to deal with work and workplace unhappiness would not be necessary. Issues such as obsolescence and downsizing could be dealt with realistically taking into account the interests of all parties. Changing the content of one's current job would be possible.Chances are those who are doing what they absolutely love: painters, writers, wood carvers, etc aren't reading this book. For those who have struggled in the world of work, the typical self-help platitudes are here. Their help is doubtful. The author can hardly change workplace realities. When careers or jobs are changed, there is a very real possibility of experiencing the same limitations as before, just in another guise.Adding to the irrelevancy of the book - the author insists on adding numerous mini-biographies of celebrities which have absolutely nothing to do with finding a second career as most would understand the concept. Furthermore, those writing a serious book on general employment need to keep their personal lives out of it. If one wanted to read memoirs, one can find plenty.
Disappointing. Katzenbach is a good writer. His "The Analyst" is one of the best thrillers I've read. And Hart's war and The Madmans Tale are well written gripping stories. However with State of Mind I found my own mind wandering as I read it. Somehow it is too long and not particularly compelling. The future America he devises where everyone is armed and guards escort office workers to their cars is not perhaps far fetched but felt superficial. It merely existed as a counterpoint for a new 51st State where everyone was safe.Don't bother with this book, especially when Katzenbach has written so much better
Not one of Irving's best. I am a big John Irving fan and have read almost all of his novels.  This book was a big disappointment for me, though.  Rather than deeply delve into the events and people who shaped his writing, Irving provides perfunctory descriptions of the major events in his life as a writer and wrestler.  He devotes much more attention to the scores of every wrestling match he ever took part in than to details regarding the process of crafting his novels.  For wrestling fans, this book might be just what you are looking for; for others, I would skip it and re-read Garp
The Low GI Diet Cookbook:  100 Simple,. I did not like most of the recepies that were in the book.  They were too exotic for me.  A couple of the desert recepies were ok and I did like the color pages that showed the food.
waste of time. I think when Silvia first started writing she was good but I'm sorry her last few books including this one are sarcastic and weak.  The depth is not there and the joke cracking is out of line.  I learned nothing here like I did in her earlier books  Waste of money
Do NOT Read This Book. Do not read this book. I attempted to read this book for a college class. This book should be cut down to the size of a magazine article and be published in a scientific journal. The public should not be misled into thinking that this book is readable. It is written at too high of a diction, and Griffin rambles on for 20 pages on one topic, which I won't spoil for those of you unfortunate to read this trash. The subject information is interesting, but this is written poorly, and will bore the reader to tears. Just thought I'd let you all know
Un-informative. The book is not good.  It claims to be about the &quot;Director's Vision&quot;, but each exposition is mostly made up the authors personal feelings about one film of each director.  Hardly any information is given  about the directors themselves, aside from one or two brief sentances at  the very end of the paragraph.  The movie stills, which are of extremely  poor quality, take up half the page.  In addition, no index had been made.   The directors are listed alphabetically but if you want to find a certain  movie or genre you have to skim each page individualy.  The book is a  failure and currently in my bathroom
A terrible text. This book is dreadful. My students hate it and I'm sorry I ever subjected them to it because it makes music and music education seem completely &quot;dead&quot;
MISSING THE BOOK. The problem with this book is that the author completely overlooks the culpability of the U.S. in the acts of genocide discussed.  The U.S.bombing of Cambodia although not in itself an act of genocide was the reason why peasants flocked to the Khmer Rouge who previously were a marginal group.  It was the U.S. who blocked any attempts of the UN to send more soldiers to Rawanda.  As well, it was the U.S. that armed Indonesia so that they could attack and occupy East Timor, a clear case of Genocide.  etc. etc. etc
Cult Propoganda. The truth is that a newly-sober alcoholic named William Griffith Wilson -- a down-on-his-luck former Wall Street hustler who put on airs of having once been a prosperous stock broker -- just sat down, in December of 1938, and wrote up twelve commandments for the new religious group that he and fellow alcoholic Doctor Robert Smith had started. Those commandments were simply a repackaged version of the practices of a cult religion that was popular at that time, something called "The Oxford Group", or "The Oxford Group Movement", and later, "Moral Re-Armament" -- a religious cult that was created by a deceitful fascist renegade Lutheran minister named Dr. Frank Nathan Daniel Buchman -- a nut-case who actually praised Adolf Hitler and Heinrich Himmler.Bill Wilson described the writing of the Twelve Steps this way:Well, we finally got to the point where we really had to say what this book was all about and how this deal works. As I told you this had been a six-step program then.The idea came to me, well, we need a definite statement of concrete principles that these drunks can't wiggle out of. There can't be any wiggling out of this deal at all and this six-step program had two big gaps which people wiggled out of.Notice how Bill Wilson considered his fellow alcoholics to be a bunch of cheaters who will "wiggle out of this deal" if they can get away with it -- which Bill won't allow.And note how Bill Wilson made himself the leader who was entitled to dictate the concrete terms of other people's recovery programs.Also notice how Bill Wilson considered 'spiritual development' to be a business deal, with a contract that you can't wiggle out of, something like selling your soul in trade for sobriety.Nowhere in the Twelve Steps does it say that you should quit drinking, or help anyone else to quit drinking, either. Nowhere do the words "sobriety", "recovery", "abstinence", "health", "happiness", "joy", "love", or "love", appear in the Twelve Steps. The word "alcohol" was only mentioned once, where it was patched into the first step as a substitute for the word "sin" -- Bill Wilson wrote,"we are powerless over alcohol and our lives have become unmanageable",instead of the Oxford Group slogan,"we are powerless over sin and have been defeated by it".And then the phrase "especially alcoholics" was patched into the 12th step as a suggested target for further recruiting efforts:"...we tried to carry this message to others, especially alcoholics"...(But regular non-alcoholic people were still fair game for recruiting into Bill's "spiritual fellowship"...)The Twelve Steps are not a formula for curing or treating alcoholism, and they never were.The Twelve Steps are not "spiritual principles" and they never were.The Twelve Steps are cult practices that work to convert people into confirmed true believers in a proselytizing cult religion, just like Frank Buchman's so-called "spiritual principles" did.1. The Twelve Steps do not work as a program of recovery from drug or alcohol problems.The A.A. failure rate ranges from 95% to 100%. Sometimes, the A.A. success rate is actually less than zero, which means that A.A. indoctrination is positively harmful to people, and prevents recovery. Some tests have shown that even receiving no treatment at all for alcoholism is much better than receiving A.A. treatment:One of the most enthusiastic boosters of Alcoholics Anonymous, Professor George Vaillant of Harvard University, who is also a member of the Board of Trustees of Alcoholics Anonymous World Services, Inc. (AAWS), showed by his own 8 years of testing of A.A. that A.A. was worse than useless -- that it didn't help the alcoholics any more than no treatment at all, and it had the highest death rate of any treatment program tested -- a death rate that Professor Vaillant himself described as "appalling". While trying to prove that A.A. treatment works, Professor Vaillant actually proved that A.A. kills. After 8 years of A.A. treatment, the score with Dr. Vaillant's first 100 alcoholic patients was: 5 sober, 29 dead, and 66 still drinking.(Nevertheless, Vaillant is still a Trustee of Alcoholics Anonymous, and he still wants to send all alcoholics to A.A. anyway, to "get an attitude change by confessing their sins to a high-status healer." That is cult religion, not a treatment program for alcoholism.)The A.A. dropout rate is terrible. Most people who come to A.A. looking for help in quitting drinking are appalled by the narrow-minded atmosphere of fundamentalist religion and faith-healing. The A.A. meeting room has a revolving door. The therapists, judges, and parole officers (many of whom are themselves hidden members of A.A. or N.A.) continually send new people to A.A., but those newcomers vote with their feet once they see what A.A. really is. Even A.A.'s own triennial surveys, conducted by the A.A. headquarters (the GSO), say that:81% of the newcomers are gone within 30 days,90% are gone in 3 months, and95% are gone at the end of a year.That automatically gives A.A. a failure rate of at least 95%. But the GSO does not count all of those people who only attend a few meetings before quitting -- they don't qualify as "members". (That amounts to "cherry-picking".) If we included them, then the numbers would be much worse.First there is the propaganda technique of "everybody's doing it": "AA or a similar Twelve-Step program is an integral part of almost all successful recoveries".That is a complete falsehood. The vast majority of the successful people recover without A.A. or any "support group". It's what "everybody" is doing.Then they use the propaganda techniques of use of the passive voice and vague suggestions: "It is widely believed that not including a Twelve-Step program in a treatment plan can put a recovering addict on the road to relapse."It is widely believed by whom? And what do those unnamed people know? What are their qualifications? Are they doctors? Medical school professors? Or salesmen for a 12-Step treatment center? Why should we care what some unnamed invisible fools allegedly believe, anyway?The authors also use the propaganda technique of fear-mongering: you will be "on the road to relapse" -- you will probably die -- unless you practice Bill Wilson's Twelve Step cult religion.And then the fluff-headed Pollyanna attitude is outrageous: Just going to the wonderful A.A. meetings is supposedly all that is needed to fix some alcoholics.But since A.A. has a zero-percent success rate above and beyond the normal rate of spontaneous remission, that cannot possibly be true.
Sloppy by and large. Some chapters (the basic Spring) are ok (even good.) Many advanced topics are covered in a sloppy manner. Further the editing is generally bad. I must say that I have read a finely edited book by Manning, namely Hibernate In Action
insidious. . . . and I use the word in its strictest sense:  "more harmful than is apparent."The only reason Esposito has been able to rise to the heights of his profession is basically because his audience consists either of Muslims who approve of all the congratulatory things he says about Islam, or Americans who simply don't know one way or the other -- and naturally would like to believe his drivel about "the peaceful religion."Notice that his audiences never consist of those (non-Muslims) who haved lived and traveled in the Middle East, who speak and read Arabic, who have read the Koran, or who have dealt with Muslims and Arabs for years.  Such people invariably revile Esposito and would promptly laugh him off stage.Still, it's interesting how someone can study a subject academically for all his life and never really see it . . .For a useful analysis of Islam without rose-colored glasses:  Robert Spencer, David Pryce-Jones, Thomas Friedman, Victor Davis Hanson, Serge Trifkovic, Bat Ye'or, Daniel Pipes -- even Bernard Lewis, if you must
Drivel. As a huge fan of "Chiefs", Stuart Woods first novel, I decided to give Dark Harbor a try.  What I found was a predictable plot, gratuitous sex, and all the marks of a "spit out thinly plotted books" machine.  Stone Barrington is informed that his distant cousin has allegedly ended his family's life and left Stone as the executor of his will.  When it is discovered that the cousin worked for the C.I.A., Stone and company begin to investigate his death to determine if it had anything to do with his clandestine work.  As they investigate and the suspects materialize, the plot grows more and more predictable.  Run from this one
A Good Compilation of early 20th century Physics. This is a good book, but most are under the impression that Einstein actually CREATED the content of the book.Einstein actually compiled the physics theories of the latest German and Italian physicists and wrote it as his entire theory.For instance, e=mc^2 was not created by Einstein, as so many people people. An Italian physicist came up with it. If you don't believe me check any encyclopedia.Einstein suceeded in taking everyone's work and compiling it. This was helpful to the world of physics.Unfortunately, this stuff is outdated, and Autodynamics has disproven many things that Einstein says in this book. When it came out it was already outdated. This was published in the 60s. Autodynamics disproved what is in this book in the 40s (45 I believe). If this was published in the 20s or even the 30s, it would have been a good book
Needs a more clear diet section, this was not worth buying. I have read on Hypothyroid and this is not the book I was looking for, as to help me to speed up my metabolism.  I would like to find a book that just is plain and gives examples of diets and foods to eat.  Disappointed...
Good concept, badly written. Like all James Patterson's books, this was a good story idea, but poorly executed. Patterson's characters are interesting and his plot lines are clever, but the dialog runs from awkward to silly, and his pacing is often confusing and forced. That's why his books do better as movies: a better writer gets to use Patterson's concepts with more realistic dialog and good pacing
All reading and unclear pictures. Usually when I buy an exercise book I expect clear concise directions and maybe a picture to illustrate what exactly the correct form would be. Well, if you are expecting this out of this book you my as well forget it. Although it was very informative, black and white pictures that aren't even shown for all exercises is not going to cut it. For example for a tricep kickback it doesn't really show you the ways that it would be wrong which can lead to an injury. If you are looking for information go for it; but if you want something that will show you the right way with pictures, skip it
Unbelievable.... Waller is usually awesome...but I think he missed it on Puerto Vallarta Squeeze.  Not that I wasn't entertained, because I was...in a mindless sort of way.  The book is a made-for-tv script just waiting to happen! But mediocre Waller is better than most at their best....so buy this book....used if possible
Heart Healthy. Excellent book.  Gives background information about a heart healthy diet and some excellent recipes.  I love it
Couldn't finish this one. It's rare that I don't finish a book.  I realized after getting 1/3 of the way through it that I just couldn't get interested in the characters. Took it back to the library.A friend of mine who also reads a lot had the same experience.Harris' other books were much better
Tamar Jacoby needs to come to her senses. The Melting Pot has worked for 200+ years.Just because an Invasion of Illegals has brokenour borders,our prisons,our hospitals,our schools,laughed at our laws and is now marching in our streets Tamar thinksthey should dictate our Immigration policy as well.History has labeled people like her "Usefull Fools".
non-delivery of order. i have not recieved this book.  i have had surgery and forgot about it.  can you please chec
Not one of Patterson's better novels. This novel highly disappointed me and I'm a big James Patterson fan. The usual short chapters don't bother me, but this novel was running over with characters...okay...so I don't like too many characters that I have to remember. But I stayed with the book and when it came to the ending, I kept telling myself...NO WAY. But, it ended the way it ended. I purchased this one, but I think maybe I'll get the next Patterson release from the library. I think the two star rating pretty well sums it up
It Bites the Big Croque!. Horrid. Just Horrid
The Labrador Shooting Dog. If you like stories then this is the book for you.  Gould does not discuss training until you are half way through the book. The training starts with introducing the dog to the field and the waist cord.  You will do better to look elsewhere for more in depth training information, especially if you need to start training at the basic level of come, sit and stay.  I would recomend "Game Dog" by Wolters.  He is precise and compasionate in his training techniques
Not as good as others here suggest. The Maverick guide to Bermuda didn't meet the high expectations set by other reviews here.There isn't a whole lot to the book, it isn't full of secret suggestions as others suggested.  Instead there is much on the obvious basics and little beyond.Our family did enjoy the chapter discussing some of the colorful history of Bermuda, but otherwise I regret the purchase.  I suspect one of the other guidebooks would have been a better choice.I do recommend Bermuda
200 Pages of Total Immersion Italian. The is by far the weakest Grisham novel I've ever read.  The first two hundred pages creep along at a glacial pace as the protagonist (Joel Backman; more about him later) wanders Italy for nearly 200 pages, learning to speak the language and spending way too much time sipping espresso in quaint trattorias with Italian carictatures that would make Chico Marx cringe.  When Grisham finally rachets up the action and suspense, it's all for naught, as the story eventually limps and staggers to a completely listless and anticlimactic ending.As for Joel Backman, I can't think of a more unlikeable and unsympathetic protagonist in recent memory.  A disgraced lawyer, lobbyist and traitor that plowed through life in a meaningless quest for wealth and power, all the while causing numerous deaths, and alienating numerous wives and children is supposed to be someone we care about?  Does this character redeem himself in any meaningful fashion?  You read the book and decide..
Not very helpful after the first chapter. Had I realized that this book was less about business and more about this man's faith I would not have bothered.  He seems to need constant reassurance that G_D is OK with us making money.  The theme becomes redundant and not terribly helpful.  I doubt that he will ever becoe a billionaire, but please let me know if he does
On Drugs. I give this book one star as there was nothing lower to choose from.  Save your money.  This book is not worth either your time or your money.  Was she on drugs during the writing of this piece of tripe?
NOT TO SURE~!. This book was a definite let down fo me.This book was good but not terrific. after reading best sellers like Why we want you to be rich by Donald TRump and God Doesn't run a $2 Shop by Sage Saint Francis i found that this book just was not in the same leauge.i mean those two books changed my life, and actually got me the result and financial freedom i was after but they are not for everyone.When Deepak started to explain the law of Karma it just struck me 'what [lant is he from!' we would all like to believe, and many do, just as i did, that the world has a 'scoring system', that it keeps count, and it rewards those and comes around to those accordingly...yeah right!Let me tell you if me and the Pope both stand outside in the rain we both get rained on! the world does not play favorites, and it does not discriminate. I am talking about that 'something' and the world does not discriminate people do!basically since i woke up from this idealistic rubbish, took off my rose coloured glasses, i began to actaully get the results i want.Just look at Princess Di, Steve Irwin and Martin Luthur King...what happened to Karma there!?This is badcially what the book is about, as if there are '7' laws...yeah right...Wayne Dyer says 10, the bible says 10...whats next?This just isn;t reality, it is subjective idealism...I do not feel this is the authors best work, however i still believe it is a good investment and a descent place to start
Low-end. I study leadership, politics in business organisations and emotional transactions. I bought this book thinking it would be factual, conclusive and real. On the other hand I found it's written with a mocking tone, has no relation to real cases and is as shallow as it gets.It could be good for some peasant who believes he can get ahead at work easily. But in reality, there's far more than this book wastes time about
Fast start to boring predictability. I was very excited to read this book. And I was immediately enticed right into the story. I loved the color of the story, the characters, as well as the compelling flow of the beginning of this story. It starts off being a magical page-turner that seemingly is moving into an even more exciting story.  But from that great start the story, in my opinion, goes no where.Other reviewers of this book have just cause to write that there are perhaps too many characters. That might in deed be true.  The problem with the book for me is that it becomes incredibly predictable "been there done that". I would have preferred the fantasy elements of this book to have stuck with the Native American aspects, as well as other unique entwinements, instead of delving into the same old Fantasy elements with Merlin "Myrrdin", "Taliesin", and the same old stories intertwined. I thought by using well known Celtic and Druidic mages of old reduced the book, and story.  I was dissapointed when Taliesin officially entered the multitude of Central Characters.The book plays out more of a day dream or "lucid dream" of someone would want to have happened in thier life, rather then a truly good story.  The story gets to a point where it absolutely ceases to surprise. I found myself skipping through pages to get to the end. I knew that I wasn't missing anything. And that is such a contrast to how the book starts off.The book plays out like a below average Horror-Mystery story (with a very weak Horror aspect).There are very clever, and magically woven points laced into the book, especially the beginning, but the story runs into so many problems, and ultimately just loses its momentum. It's too bad because it had great potential.  But one can see from this book, the First by De Lint that he had great potential. Potential that many would argue was surely fulfilled with his later books, which still continue to come out today.If you are looking for the best of De Lint, or simply a good Fantasy read I would definitely not start here. I give it 2 Stars only because of its great beginning. But the rest of the book is just flat out dissapointing
Buyer beware. This is the only book I have ever given a bad rating.  This book not only has useless information on the occult but has a negative and unappealing tone throughout the reading.  Although I can agree to disagree with some of the thing he states about the Charasmatic movement, this book is poorly organized and is a hard real.  Buyer beware
Un-inspired attempt. This is an un-successful follow-up to "Culture matters". Cases are generally boring, and attempt to answer the "how culture matters" failed. We will have to wait for a better try..
Ridiculous waste of time. I had high hopes for this book. I was sorely disappointed. The author kept going on and on with his theories about why the Roman Empire collapsed. Every time I thought he was about to get around to some IRISH history, he went back to Rome, or some other culture. I can understand setting the stage, but this was ridiculous. Halfway through, I gave up, skimmed the rest of the book, and decided it wasn't worth the time
agree with father - a giant step backwards. This wonderful insighfull Dad mentioned women in Afghanastanprogressing,well actually in the future they will probablyprogress way beyond American women since they aren't held downwith the all too common American strerotypes of girls beingmathematically and mechanically inept.Gurian's restraint ofwomen goes far beyond burkas and delves into the dangerousarea of a limited intellect.The girls in this country will grow up with burkas on the brain,which will destroy their spirit toachieve and fully grow as beings.After reading this horriblebook I can only think Gurian has fear of women getting anywherein society beyond a second class citizen.Gurian has obviouslynone his damage already since so many people already believeevery word he writes as though it came down from the skyengraved in a gold tablet.I found myself furious with him after I read the book.I only hope people wake up to see what amanipulative sexist monster he is
Boycott Robert G. Allen!!!. Robert G. Allen is a notorious and relentless internet spammer.  If you should happen to somehow end up on one of his email lists like I did, he will send you several junk emails a day.  Unsubscribing doesn't work, and trying to block the sender's domain is useless because the emails are sent from a different domain every time.  The funny part is that the emails aren't even coded properly.  They always show up as just a bunch of html code.  Would you really take internet money-making advice from a guy who can't even code html properly?  Anyway, his spamming practices are completely illegal and it's only a matter of time before the law catches up with him.  But that shouldn't come as any surprise considering that mister Allen has been in trouble with the law before.  He's had several run-ins with the IRS, lawsuits against him, and a chapter 7 bankruptcy.  I would also stay away from his Nothing Down real estate methods.  Many of those practices are illegal, and the president of the Nothing Down club in Atlanta wound up in federal prison because of it.  For more info on Allen, visit johntreed dottcomm, click on Real Estate Investing, then click Real Estate Guru Ratings.  Bottom line, don't trust this guy and don't buy his books. And if you're reading this Mr. Allen, take me off your @%#&*$ mailing list!!
Stereotypical adventure genre. This was my first Wilbur Smith book.  I thought it was all right for an adventure genre.  There is enough historical research to add color.  And it certainly moves along well.  Many of the events are not believable, but you can say the same for James Bond.  The book jumps between history and legend easily and superficially.  Boys grow into manhood overnight.  Women fall deeply in love by seeing someone from afar.  Crocodiles are much more aggressive than in real life.  But it is easy reading for passing a few hours
If you like hopeless.. This book is for you if you enjoy hopeless and depressing. Also, if you have the ability to enjoy the twist of words without being wrapped in the subject matter. However, if you believe life has a purpose you'll find yourself wondering why you read it. I do believe a talented Preacher could take these stories and say "This, my beloved, is why you need God" :)I know the stereotype currently is that educated people love Proulx. It's only the uneducated buffoons that can't "get" her that don't like her.I guess I'll sit over in the uneducated section. ;-) At least we have better books on the shelves
Mainstream. This book was a disapointment for me. I am going to vacation on the northern California coast this Fall and was hoping to learn something from this book, but it is mostly just the well worn mainstream information that doesn't need retelling. It completely omits the area I'll be and the areas it does cover are handled more effectivly in other books. The pictures are great, though
Good on process, low on recipe's. The book covers the process of smoking well. Good information on brining, sausage making, and processing smoked foods is provided. It lacks fundamental data such as internal temperatures of smoke cook meats. A few  recipes are presented, but this is not a cookbook
Required Reading. Full of holes and alot of overbearing personal philosophy.  I found myself crossing out lines of this text, as so much of this is conjecture and hyperbole.  The chapter on Violence is worth the cost of the book, however, I would recommend going to the library and saving your money.  Some directors swear by this text, thusly it is a potent force in the contemporary theatre.  However, many of these ideas have been chewed up and misused by so many inexperienced Bogart groupies that it has little more validity than, say, a Richard Foreman text in its extremely self-referential nature.
Like Jon Stewart, but awful book. Have you ever gotten that embarrassed feeling for someone?  Y'know, you just want to cringe and make it stop.  Well, that's the way I felt about this book.  Jon Stewart, who is funny on T.V., is painfully unfunny in print.  This book was a chore to read.  I felt so bad for Mr. Stewart because he so clearly embarrasses himself with this book.  I wish his editor would've stepped in and protected him from doing this.  Stick to T.V., Mr. Stewart, you're no Mark Twain.  Yikes
This Rorschach. When a book that is so provably fictional as CROW KILLER is praised repeatedly for being "true" and "accurate," the review says more about the values and fantasies of the reader than about the book.CROW KILLER is a vicious racist diatribe that perpetuates a comic book view of the fur trade. Johnson wasn't a "mountain man," he was one of the jackals who drifted in a generation later to pick the bones--a buffalo slaughterer and a wolf killer. And a racist among men who understood the Indians better than most.Vardis Fisher's MOUNTAIN MAN has a good deal of racism in it, but Fisher manages to maintain a distance between his own values and those of the mountain men. He gives the Indians a chance to tell their own story, and he tempers the cultural racism of the mountain men with their firsthand knowledge of the people around them. JEREMIAH JOHNSON goes even further in that direction, and that, for one thing, is why I consider the Redford/Pollack film the best of the three works.The Indians in Fisher and Redford's stories are real people with intelligence, courage, and a way of looking at the world that is different from ours but not inferior. In CROW KILLER, Indians are stupid, vicious (and look who's talking), subhuman. Poisoning forty Blackfeet warriors is, you see, a joke. Any REAL (that is to say, "white") man can kill them in handfuls.Get over it. The mountain men were no more glamorous that Hell's Angels or that vicious little twerp Billy the Kid (Michael Pollard, folks, not Val Kilmer, Kris Kristoferson, or Paul Newman). They went west to get rich, just like the grubby gold-mad prospectors we don't idolize at annual "re-enactments."They went west because they were too sociopathic to survive in civilized society, and they admired the Indians because they appeared, to the outlaw white, to be a lawless ("adulterous", as Chris Lapp says) people. And libertarians, like Fisher, worship them because they are so utterly self-absorbed, self-important, and "free" of society. And romantic city boys, their drawers damp with admiration, called their manifestation of sociopathy "freedom." Right, like the "freedom" of meth-lab enterpreneurs on their Harley vibrators.So if you enjoy racist humor and violence, and you love perpetuating stereotypes about Indians, and you want to admire somebody who, if he really were who you think he is, would beat you to a pulp just for fun, go for it. But don't call it history, Ok? It's no more history than HUSTLER is gynecology
Sooo Lifetime!. If you like this book you will probably like "Bless the Child" by Cathy Cash Spellman.  They are very similar.  This book can be summed up in one word, simple: simple-minded, simple characters, simple plot (applied loosely), and simple premise.  What a contrived piece of garbage!I can't describe everything wrong with this book because there's not enough time.  If it's meant to be a mystery it sucks because you figure out who did it about halfway through.  If it's meant to empower women it sucks because the women are either victims, in denial, weak, worried about what everyone thinks, or oblivious.  If it's meant to promote animal adoptions it sucks because the author's plea for that is irritating.  That's how bad this book is! It can make an animal lover say that its plea for more animal adoptions was annoying.This author has no style.  The book reads like an episode of inside edition.  There is no immersion into the story.  The total lack of character development leaves you with no compassion for them.  As a reader I felt completely outside the story; an uncaring observer of a poorly described scenario.  The attempts to tug at my heartstrings were laughable.  I've been more moved by the appearance of colorful weeds on my lawn.  The only reason I read the whole thing was that my neighbor recommended it and loaned it to me.  Do not waste your time.I must say though that this novel was inspirational.  If this crap can make the best seller list, it gives me hope that my original fiction might get published
Disappointing. I thought this would have more actual crafts inside. I expected the projects to be dated (obviously, hence the kitsch factor), but they were plain tacky and a few required tough-to find and/or expensive supplies (resin grapes, anyone?). The illustrations are colorful and entertaining, but it looks like the author just ripped off a bunch of old ads from the fifties and added a sparse amount of lame craft patterns (like a really complicated lace doily as well as a difficult embroidery pattern with little or no help in the way of learning the stitches!) here and there for posterity. It's better for someone who already has a strong background in crafting, and doesn't mind filling in the considerable gaps in the instructions with their imagination. Don't waste your money
Too difficult to obtain these superfoods. I find that it wil not only be a big hassle, which is to be expected, but also expensive and too difficult to find these superfood
I Threw This Book Away. I seem to be in a minority here, but I disliked this book so much I didn't even finish it. It now resides at the bottom of my trash can.Don't get me wrong, I'm somewhat of a "born-again Taoist." The Lao-Tzu saved my life, and between that and Thomas Merton's "The Way of Chuang-Tzu," my entire life philosophy and outlook has shifted radically.The hard part is conveying the reasons for my distaste of this book. It may be because the only real redeeming parts are those directly copied from the Lao and Chuang Tzu. It may be because, after reading Merton's explaination of the "three in the morning" analogy, I cannot agree with A.C. Graham's translation, both in feeling and in words. Far, far too literal and intellectual. Taoism is, for me, about not trying to understand things, but rather letting them be.If you are a scholar and writing papers or such, it might be good for you. For the spiritual seeker, if you need more Taoist thought, I would recommened reading different translations of the Lao-Tzu or Chuang-Tzu. It's really all you need
Sorry, it annoyed me. Not that she writes poorly, but Julia Glass completely failed to captivate me with this book.  It took me three months to finish it (reluctantly), and I didn't understand nor did I like the "design" of this novel...three separate stories, the last of which didn't connect to the first (I was expecting it to all along). To each her own, but I found this book boring and annoying
Little on Detail, Big on Boring. I love true crime and that's probably the only thing that kept me reading this book.  This book provides very little detail on the actual crimes and concentrates more on how Ng was a sadistic, manipulating know-it-all that liked to play games, but didn't like the consequences of such.I generally can read a good true crime book in 48 hours or less, but this one took me almost a week.  Instead of forsaking everything else to read; this time I read when there was nothing else to do.
Boo-hiss  :(. This book was disappointing.  It's title lead me to believe that it would be an extensive and thorough compilation of most, if not all of the bikes Schwinn produced;  not so!I own a 1970 Schwinn Twinn Tandem bike, and was hoping I would read and see information on tandems.  They picture one tandem, and have very little information about it.   They also fail to depict several other models.  If you look at an orignal Schwinn catalog,  you'll find that they built dozens of models each year!   Do a google search and you'll find it.One of Schwinn's more popular models was the "Typhoon", and I don't even see a mention of it!   What a crock!I have a Standard Catalog of Corvette, and it's is much more thorough than this one for the bike.
A Scientist's Faith in Naturalsim Run Amuk. There is no question that this book is the product of an unbounded thinker of possibilities. Lee Smolin's opening description of the history and current state of theoretical physics is highly understandable and makes a  more compelling (albeit unconscious) argument for Intelligent Design theory  rather than his one of "Cosmic Natural Selection." What is interesting is  professor Smolin's rejection a priori of any answer lying outside the realm  of human observation.  He then summarily proposes to describe our universe  as "naturally selected" to maximize the quantity of black holes; they of  course being the "wombs" of new universes with their own black holes, etc.   I have to ask, &quot;Why must they create universes; why not leprechauns or  fairies, for both of which we have minimally far more observational  testimony&quot;?  To quote Davies &amp; Brown from their "Ghost in the  Atom", the many-worlds interpretation "introduces a preposterous amount of  `excess metaphysical baggage' into our description of the physical world."   Rudolph Peierls, formerly at Oxford, dismisses such a theory with a simple  question: "Since we have no means of seeing or ever communication with the  other universes, why invent them?" It is easily more probable to believe  that 10 space/time dimensions really do coexist than to buy into a theory  composed of: an infinite number of ever expanding (non-colliding?)  universes, created by some unknown mechanism, in some unknown space, for  some unknown reason. Who says faith is outside the realm of science? If a  new theory is truly needed now, this seems an unlikely candidate
Im in agreement with Dr Stinkface. im moving over from vb to c#, so naturally I would like to see examples written in c# so I can get the semantics down.This book does not do that.  Half in c#, half in vb, fully useless.Next time release 2 versions of the book.  Or better yet, write some of it in vb, some in c#, some in python, some in perl...
Convoluted and lame plot, definitely not his best. I have been reading the Navajo mysteries for the first time, in chronological order. I was sad when each ended, and could barely wait to get the next one from the library...until this one. The plot is convoluted and far fetched with a LOT of holes, and I found the setting ugly and depressing, especially the character of the hit man. (This is the second hit man Hillerman's given us who owes it all to his unhealthy attachment to a disfunctional mama.  Hmmmm...)  I skimmed the last 4 chapters because I was tired of both the book and the setting...I just wanted it to see how it ended and be done with it because I was not enjoying the experience as I usually do.So as other reviewers have advised: don't start here
Just very odd...... This story should have and COULD HAVE been really good. It presents a great concept, but the story is just so poorly crafted. It is VERY sexist, the prose is stiff, and the plot is dull. I will concede that it was interesting at times; it kept me reading, but I really didn't get much out of it. I can only praise Heinlein for including the "intelligent conversation" which takes place after the press conference, where there is a great explantion on why the English language is so difficult to learn. The whole story is just very odd. Do read it though. It's a title to read if you wish to be considered "well read." Despite its faults, Valentine Michael Smith will be a character in literature that will never be forgotten, just as we will never forget Atticus from "To Kill A Mockingbird."
Does D.S. know any other law schools besides, Harvard and Yale...I am so tired of her books...this is it. Does D.S. know any other law schools besides, Harvard and Yale for her characters to have attended. I am so tired of her books...this is it for me.  Its the usual suspects for her...rich and white....quite boring.  I used to love her and would read anything from her, but those days are over.....Maybe she should retire
Boring Boring Boring!. How could anyone sit and read this boring work of fiction.  I am actually listening to the audio version and I am almost falling asleep and cannot remember a word the reader has said.I am going to stick to the movie versions of Anne of Green Gables instead of reading the rest of the books.  At least the movies keep your interest
A bit of a disappointment. I have read all of the books in this series prior to reading Sold Out. I enjoyed the series immensely and would have recommended the books to any teenager; however, after reading Sold Out, my opinion has changed. Chloe's initial character was appealing because of her harder edge and atypical image. Unfornunately, as I read the book, I felt as though I was not reading the words of a teenager. The slang was dated, including words such as "groovy" and "pretty tough chick" as if these are typical of today's teenagers. Casual conversation throughout the story was far too structured to be that of teenage lunchtime banter, making the story seem spurious. Also, the issues in this book were either exaggerated or trivial. Few issues that Chloe faced were relatable to teenagers today. The book was trite, dated, melodramatic, and mawkishly sentimental
Interesting story, but the writing is awful. Did this woman really receieve a degree in communication? Well, I'm not sure what sort of communication it was, but as a fiction writer, she needs help. There are more blatant amateurish errors here than in any book I have ever seen published, anywhere.Just a few examples:Page 113: "she... wraps a cloth around my head, obscuring my sight. Limon raises a wan eyebrow."  (This is a viewpoint violation which would be recognized as such by any beginning writer of fiction; in a first-person story, you can't describe something you can't have seen.)Page 9: "retorted my father, who walked in with the doctor." Page 10: (same scene, 6 paragraphs later) "Hello, John Briggs, said the doctor, shaking my father's hand." This sentence contains two errors. First, why would the doctor need to greet the man he walked in the door with? It's also highly unlikely that he would address him by both his first and last name; if he knows him well, he might call him by his first name, and if not, he'd call him Mr. Briggs.Page 26: "At June's ranch in Mississippi, after... the house was sold to new owners, I ..." Page 27, 8 paragraphs later, next scene: "I considered returning to my aunt's Mississippi ranch to look more closely through the piles of June's papers..." (These sentences contain both a redundancy -- Why would you say a house was sold "to new owners"? When it's sold, they are always new owners -- and a logic error: You can't generally go back to a place you have sold and look through the effects of the person who used to own it, because when you sell a house, you generally don't leave personal crap there, do you?Page 6 and page 48: both contain a definition of "jinetera" -- a redundancy -- but the definitions do not quite match. page six says it means "a jockey" and page 48 says "a female jockey."and these are only the ones that have jumped out at me so far; I am only up to page 118. if it was my job to look for them, I'd bet my last orgasm that I'd find dozens more. I would probably want to avoid Harper Collins if I was an author.I think you could make the case that the editors at Harper Collins really are the ones to blame, and of course, they are ultimately; if this was edited, it was not by anyone who was awake. But those who call this "well written" are pretty deluded; the writer made these errors and while some of the inconsistencies were probably created in changing the storyline during rewrites, it's still pretty lousy writing, and it creates a reasonable doubt as to the intelligence of the author --- and hence the reliability of the observations in the story
so disappointing... I am glad I read this book before I saw Johnny Damon in a Yankee uniform, because the book is boring and could have been written by a tenth grader. Damon is in love with himself, talks trash about his ex-wife and the whole book sounds like a bad tv interview. I can happily look at Johnny Damon in Yankee gear and know it's no loss to the Red Sox
boring tale about flakey mean people. I had to quit reading this book approximately half way through because I had no interest whatsoever in continuing to read about these snobby, conceited and dull women.  Don't waste your time
Where did JA Jance go?. I own and have read all of JA Jance's JP Beaumont and Joanna Brady mysteries and eagerly look forward to the next episodes in these character's lives.  I picked this book up, thinking it would be on par with all the JA Jance books I've read previously.  What a crashing disappointment.  I can't care about stereotypical characters in unbelievable situations - truth be told, I kept looking at the cover to see if I'd picked up a Harlequin by mistake.  I'll probably read more Ali Reynolds books if this is indeed a new series, but I'd much rather see what happens with JP and Joanna - incidentally, I didn't think much of either of them, either, when their paths crossed some books ago.  This one gets a big "Aw, c'mon, JA, you can do much better than this!" from me.  For those who haven't read previous books and happened to have the bad luck to pick this one up as your first JAJ, get the JP Beaumonts and start at the beginning.  They are worth the time and effort
If you want to win in Vegas don't buy this book. I started playing craps this past year and really enjoy playing the game.  Naturally, I wanted to develop my skills and use my new fascination to make a little money, opposed to placing wild bets that seldomly paid out.  I purchased this book to attempt to beat the system with mathematical odds.  While this book does touch on the mathetical odds of the game the strategy recommended by the author appears to be based on superstition, rather than mathematics.  As such, I believe the Supersystem to be inherently flawed.  I would not recommend employing this system in the Casino if you want to make money.  Good luck and happy gambling
Overdone. This book is unfortunately as tedious as the last book in this series.  The plot and cast of characters are a bit more real than last go round - the only reason for the two stars in my opinion.  There are way too many tedious details, repeated and gone over way too many times.  Did I mention that it was tedious??  Again the final moments are quickly rushed through.  And please - we would like to know what happens when the last "bad" vampire is gone!  We spend way too much time with our hero and heroine and then the scene just peters out and makes us wonder what happened next?  Although quite frankly I really don't care that much about them - I just invested my time and would like some closure.  I keep hoping that Ms. Drake will improve but I'm not holding my breath waiting until the next release
The People, Yes. Sadly, Chicago Poems (1916), the author's first published work, is the book for which self-styled folk poet Carl Sandburg is best remembered today. The collection takes a hard and unswerving look at the grim realities of urban life for the common man, funneled through the flume of the author's committed socialist ideological perspective. Such an approach to poetry may have been somewhat novel in the America of the time, and both history and critics have been kind to Sandburg's sympathetic portraits of human suffering.But whether he is addressing "a dago shovelman," an immigrant who has forgotten the dignified being his ancestors in Europe or who can no longer recognize "the new-mown hay smell calling on the wind," a street walker with "haggard poems and desperate eyes," or a young woman burned to death in a factory fire, Sandburg continually adopts the simplistic notion that the lower economic strata of society is always victimized but virtuous, while governmental institutions, bosses of all stripes, the professional classes, and the wealthy are uniformly cruel, oppressive, exploitive, and, at best, indifferent.Thus, Chicago Poems reads like a 132-page polemic with a very narrow political point of view. While many of the author's observations are poignantly insightful (such as the poverty-stricken family of a dead boy in 'The Right To Grief,' who are "glad it is gone, for the rest of the family will now have more to eat and wear"), the poems, when read together, take on an oppressively unbalanced character of their own.In 'A Fence,' for example, "the rabble and all vagabonds and hungry men and wandering children looking for a place to play" stand outside the gates of a newly constructed "stone house on the lake front" built by a wealthy man, who, the poet infers, can be nothing but immoral, amoral, or corrupt. In the author's Usher-esque vision, nothing will be able to pass through the gates to the property except "Death and the Rain and Tomorrow." And tomorrow, for such a corrupt individual or family, will inevitably bring nothing but waves of bad conscience and fevered isolation. 'Soiled Dove' examines the life of a woman who "was not a harlot until she married a corporation lawyer," but who automatically becomes one by acquiescing to such a marriage, and who soon discovers her husband also loves "six other women," as if marital infidelity was limited exclusively to the upper economic classes. In contrast, 'Happiness' is confidently represented as "a crowd of Hungarians under the trees with their women and children and a keg of beer and an accordion," an image which may seem simultaneously nave, patronizing, and condescending to many readers.Occasionally, Sandburg wisely acknowledges that some portion of the tragedies of man's existence are simply inherent in the natural human life cycle. "The hand of God" also comes in for blame in several poems.Chicago Poems is most effective when Sandburg bypasses social divisionalism--as he often did in his later volumes of poetry--and simply addresses the everyman in the individual. While these poems are often infused with a lyrical and tender sentimentality slightly reminiscent of James Whitcomb Riley, they also locate and acknowledge the beautiful within the tragedies that perpetually arise from human frailty, vulnerability, and mortality. In 'Dream In The Dusk,' the author warns that "tears and loss and broken dreams may find your heart at dusk," while 'Under The Harvest Moon' identifies "Death" as "the gray mocker, [who] comes to you as a beautiful friend who remembers." 'I Sang' describes a lover who has given up his heart to "you and the moon," but "only the moon remembers, and is kind to me."Other poems have the more pronounced folk character of Sandburg's later volumes. The speaker in 'Theme In Yellow' is the pumpkin, who celebrates the paganistic dance of children around him "on the last day of October...singing ghost songs and love to the harvest moon...I am the jack-o-lantern with terrible teeth and the children know I am fooling."The most recent edition of The Complete Poems of Carl Sandburg (2003), which contains Chicago Poems in its entirety, is 832 pages long, and provides its readership with the full range of Sandburg's original and often gloriously rich and sensual vision of life. It also contains works like 'At The Gates of Tombs,' from Slabs of the Sunburnt West (1922), in which Sandburg, "the crazy wild dreamer," more fully and maturely developed his political vision. Comparatively, the reductive, often despairing Chicago Poems reads like the immaturely polarized work that it is.
Not serious, poorly edited, error-filled, but amusing. If you are deeply concerned with what various second or third rate actors and television personalities  of 5 to 10 years ago did during the WWII, this is the book for you. Otherwise, this is a throw away.The most startling new information provided in this book are that Prescott Bush was a Senator from Maine and that Winston Churchill was prime minister of the United Kingdom during the 1939 German invasion of Poland.  Of course, Prescott Bush was a senator from Connecticut, and Churchill became prime minister in the Spring of 1940 after the Anglo-French invasion of Norway was defeated by the simultaneous German invasion.France and England did not really come to the "rescue" of Norway from a German invasion. They had planned  their own invasion of Norway at the same time as the German invasion.  They were delayed by several hours due to weather and claimed to be helping Norway against Germany. Paradoxically, Chamberlain fell because of the fiasco in Norway, and Churchill who was the architect of this disaster became prime minister! Of course, this is the kind of fact you are never told about the war, that someone like Wright could never tell you.  I expected to find such things in this book.Mike Wright's ignorance and  the absence of any apparent fact checking by the publisher indicate that both are worthless as sources of serious information.With no special knowledge or interest in World War II, Wright compiles a bunch of humorous or trivia-related vignettes about the war as he appears to do about as many subjects as he can publish books.However,I feel sorry for someone like the author who believes people need to know how Swooze Kurtz--whatever she does???--got her name. I feel sorrier for someone who is bamboozled into thinking this is a book with new information about the greatest tragedy in human history.  A war in which scores of millions of people died and many countries laid waste deserves more than drivel like that!With the opening of the archives of the old USSR and the GDR, all sorts of information that was not known before is available for a serious author who really wants to tell us things that we weren't told about WWII. I expected this kind of information when I purchased this book. Yet, Wright is oblivious to the fact the major segment of WWII in Europe was fought between the USSR and Germany and its allies.His goal is to provide quick, entertaining, light reading on a subject that is neither quick, entertaining, nor light.The copy editing and fact checking in this book is simply not professional.  While a bibliography which is useful is provided, there is absolutely no regular sourcing in this book, which may, in fact, be a tribute to adequacy of his sources, compared to the inadequacy of his history.  As somone who teaches college students to discern which books to use for research papers and which to avoid, I would advise people to avoid any book brought out by this publisher for serious research or reliable knowledge.This book does have its moments. He gives an interesting blow by blow picture of the draft process when it was launched in 1941.  He also provides interesting information about the deportation of Japanese Americans and Canadians, and about German prisoners of war in the US.However, though he condemns Japanese brutality to Allied prisoners, Wright is completely silent the attrocities the US and UK  perpetrated against Japanese soldiers who wished to surrender.  Allied policy was usally not to take Japanese prisoners, but to massacre them.  A grisly trade in Japanese sculls and gold teeth  sent back to the USA grew up during the War. This is the kind of fact about World War II that "They Didn't Teach You" that is light years away from anything Mike Wright knows.For a better look check out "Why the Allies Won." For an even better set of information about the Pacific war that is NEVER TOLD consult War Without Mercy by John W. Dower which will tell you about Allied abuse of Japanese prisoners as well as Japanese crimes against other Asian peoples.I found this book OK to read while I was sick in bed. I did not want anything demanding, although I must say that one driving factor in getting me to finish it was to see how many ignorances and errors the book contained. Like the one Harliquin romance I read under similar circumstances, I thought it was appropriate to throw the book away when I finished it.It is unfortunate Amazon does not permit one to have 0 stars or negative quantites of stars.
Substandard reading- Not worth your money. This book sounds like a sales person yelling in your ear. The author is NOT an experienced photographer, nor does the author offer any resonable, useful tips. Very outdated material also, from 1995-1999! Its not helpful for the serious digital or medium format photographer or even for an amateur. Its simply a waste of money. Amazon has better books for serious photographers for sure
They Shaved an Ape and Called Him Sean. Sean Hannity's rise to fame proves that an ignorant illiterate can rise well beyond the level of incompetence in this country, especially when their audience consists of like-minded organ banks.  Hannity is stupid, hypocritical and loud.  His sole redeeming quality is as a mechanism for carbon-oxygen exchange.Hannity is well-coiffed, well dressed  and well short of thorazine on his overhyped comedy duo called the Hannity and Combs report.  This bozo is so uptight he must wear a chastity belt 2 sizes too small.  Get a real job, you poser
You will finish the book. I had to finish it- even though I knew exactly what would happen.  He grabbed me at the beginning and I looked forward to reading my book every night.  Then, he just lost me and I found Acts of Faith to be predictable  and at times, boring.  The religious aspect, traditions, rituals... were  all interesting, however, the storyline became long and drawn out.  I could  see why some might like it but personally, I need a few more twists and a  bit more excitement.  It's another book to put on the shelf that may or may  not be a conversation piece one day
Big disapointment. I was very disapointed in the book.Basicly the writer took bits and pieces from books written by others,twisted their words and put his own spin on it.It repeats itself over and over being so repetative I had to put it down.There are good books out there written by people who were there.I suggest you take a look at those.I read many good one's but this book wasnt in that catagory
Lots of footnotes--but not enough. Cutsey and annoying writing wrapped around appealing, but ultimately empty ideas. Nimmons made comparisons when it supported his opinion, but when it wouldn't, he didn't. The world probably doesn't need another brutal critique of gay men: most of what Larry Kramer said long ago still holds. But this attempt to prove him wrong (without deigning to plainly state that intent) completely backfires
No, no, no!. Oh dear. This is a really poor book, and I'd advise you to save your money and buy something else.Bourg's first book on game development (on Phyiscs) suffered poor reviews for being shallow, not presenting real-world techniques, and glossing over huge gaping problems in his approach. This book has all the same problems, and even more strongly in places.Firstly he makes a big point of saying that the book is aimed at novice developers and he will cover only a few techniques designed to get you up and running. In his list, however, he has genetic algorithms, neural networks and production systems, all of which large AI teams for major developers find it very hard to get working usefully (e.g. finding an application suited for a GA in a game is just about impossible). His approaches are in places laughable.Secondly he then lauds completely inappropriate algorithms. His steering system is based on potential functions, for example, and he proposes this because he says it allows you to mix several different movement concerns. This is completely disingenuous to his readers. The technique is very simple and useful only when several concerns are NOT blended together. When you mix things you ALWAYS get wells-of-attraction and your characters get stuck hopelessly. Just about ANY other technique would improve on this (and there's no use just saying 'do pathfinding' either: there's much more mileage in steering algorithms).And the final thing that annoyed me was his approach all the way along of saying 'I'm only going to show you a few techniques'. Trying to make the selling point of the book that it doesn't cover anywhere near enough ground to get your AI up and running!Just about every chapter had significant problems in it. His knowledge of the subject wouldn't pass a sophomore AI exam (I've taught AI courses at University: I'm not exaggerating). It is full of innaccuracies (e.g. he says 'new AI' is non-deterministic, while 'old AI' is deterministic - a moronic comment).If you are a novice trying to get going in AI, this book will seriously harm you development. Try John Funge's new book, or the new Morgan Kauffman book (you'll have to wait a few months). Even reaching through the two AI Programming Wisdom will see you far better prepared for real development, despite the odd lemon of an article in them
Absence of Content. It is rare to see an author tackle such a rich and interesting subject, and write a book so vapid and lacking in content.  The material is &quot;explained&quot; in terms of inept metaphors and vague hand-waving assertions. After devoting several hours to studying the book, the reader has the feeling that he's &quot;been had&quot;, since he has acquired nothing in return for his effort.  In fact, the author appears to have no more than the faintest grasp of the subject he is writing about
"Pin the Tale on Brigham": Smoke and Mirrors to Slander Brigham Young. So lets see if this makes sense:-Mormons are forcibly expelled by Missouri Militia (Gov. Boggs infamous "Extermination Order") in 1838;-They are again expelled by Illinois Militia in 1846 after Joseph Smith is murdered in State custody;-They flee to the desert wastes of the Great Basin where no one else wants to settle--they struggle against starvation to survive;-Republican John C. Fremont (notable for killing Indian women/children with his sabre to save gunpowder) runs for President in 1856 on a platform to abolish "the twin relics of barbarism", namely slavery and polygamy;-Southern Democrat James Buchanan is elected President in 1856--he won't do anything about slavery;-But Buchanan pre-empts the Republican's religious bigotry platform by acting on bogus reports of a "Mormon Rebellion" to send the "Utah Expedition" to "quell" the insurrection;-Utah Territorial Governor Brigham Young--fearing (with just cause) the worst--orders what turns out to be a bloodless defense by Mormon Raiders, who force Johnston's Army to winter in Ft. Bridger, Wyoming;-This delay permits cooler heads in Washington/Salt Lake City to avoid open war in 1858;-This in the context that newspapers in California and elsewhere had long advocated a "final solution" to the "Mormon Problem"; better to kill them than to tolerate them;-Since the Mormons had been driven from state to state because of religious intolerance, why would they have reason to trust the good graces of Pres. Buchanan and a beligerent/hostile Federal Army marching on Utah?Author Will Bagley briefly mentions most of the above historical facts and acknowledges that Gov. Young had "virtually no military or political weapons to resist federal authority...".  But his entire book is spent minimalizing the ordeals of the Mormons--even insinuating they deserved to be driven--in order to slander Gov. Young with a supposed "crime of power".  In a nutshell, Bagley picks up the prosecutor's mantle of Cradlebaugh, Carlton and Baskin in their rigorous but dead-end attempts to "Pin the Tale on Brigham".  Those bigots couldn't produce evidence to indict Brigham Young then despite the full power and funding of the U.S. Government/Army behind them, and Bagley certainly fails to produce evidence to indict Brigham Young now.For example, Bagley's "smoking gun"--the journal of Dimick Huntington--speaks vaguely of Gov. Young's "giving" the cattle of emigrants on the road south to the Piutes, but fails to mention that none of the Indians present at that event were anywhere near Mountain Meadows until after the atrocity was consumated.  The Piutes who did participate knew nothing of this purported deal.  You'd expect such sham evidence from the likes of Barney Fife, not a serious or unbiased historian.Further, Bagley presumes to channel Gov. Young's thoughts regarding the Mormon's September, 1857 "war strategy" against the hostile U.S. Government/Army.  Bagley speculates that Gov. Young ordered the massacre of the Fancher train to in some way intimidate the U.S. Government by closing the overland trails and "violating" his oath of office.  This is utterly preposterous--especially in the context of a hostile Army marching on Utah.  Obviously, Bagley believes Gov. Young to be either exceptionally stupid/obtuse or perhaps "Jim Jones" suicidal to deliberately give Pres. Buchanan and the Army the very pretext/incident they needed to justify the elimination of the "Mormon Problem" once and for all.  Bagley acknowledges that Gov. Young was a "fox"--a very shrewd operator--another Bagley contradiction.  If Bagley is so biased to believe such tortured logic, perhaps he also can conjure the tunnel-vision necessary to believe in the tooth fairy.Bagley's research for the most part is detailed--if not tedious--though he should better acknowledge the tabloid nature of most of his sources.  He often quotes tabloid rather than primary sources.  His prose is pointedly inflamatory against Brigham Young and the Mormons; they are "fanatics" who are "oblivious" to the rancor the practice of their religion has on non-Mormons--as if this is license/justification to send mobs/militias/Armies to persecute, prosecute, and drive an entire religious movement.  Hasn't Bagley heard of the First Amendment?  Pres. Buchanan sure acted like he didn't...  Bagley's conclusions and analysis are preposterous--particularly the tortured parsing of Gov. Young's straight-forward order to Haight/Iron County to leave the wagon train alone.  ("Depends on what the meaning of 'is' is", right, Mr. Bagley?)Bagley's caricature of Mormon society as not being capable of doing anything with or without direction from Brigham Young is also groteque, insulting and utterly false.  I defy anyone anywhere to show where in the Book of Mormon the Indians are referred to  as the "Battle-axe Of The Lord".  Bagley works all the tired Mormon sterotypes possible to rationalize his bias.Bagley insists he uses logic to put together the puzzle of Mountain Meadows.  He sez Gov. Young/Apostle Smith contributed to the tinderbox creating the conditions for the Massacre.  In the context of looming war, I agree because Young/Smith had every reason to believe they were about to be attacked/driven/exterminated by the US Army.  While trying to pin contextual blame on Young/Smith, Bagley brazenly fails to acknowledge the "elephant in the tent": Pres. Buchanan and the US Army.  This Massacre would absolutely not have happened had it not been for the bigoted and reckless warmongering by Pres. Buchanan to send the Army to Utah, regardless of the murder of Parley P. Pratt.  If Bagley wants to apportion blame on Young/Smith and is so insistant on an apology/repentance of the contemporary LDS Church, why doesn't he also demand the same of Pres. Buchanan's successors, the U.S. Army, and the descendents of the corrupt Federal appointees who clearly harrassed the Saints?  If he is so convinced of the benign behavior of the Fancher party who stampeded Utah with their very large (and presumably hungry) cattle herd (remember Utah is a desert with little grass, unlike Arkansas), why can't he give a scintilla of benefit-of-the-doubt to Gov. Young and the Mormons?  Clearly, Bagley is pandering to those Mormon haters whose mind is already made up and can't be confused with fact.The bottom line is this: Southern Utah Mormons got caught up in the war hysteria caused by the outrageously unwarranted march of the US Army, feared that once again they as a people would be driven, over-reacted to an emigrant party that was at the wrong place at the wrong time, and commited a horrible atrocity.  Much to the chagrin of the Mormon haters, the act was local.  Perhaps for Bagley's sake, Mark Hoffman can "discover" a document that could really indict Gov. Young...As the great-nephew of Juanita Brooks, Bagley's presuming to carry on the truthful inquiry she initiated is a farce.  Brooks did not have an axe to grind, as Bagley obviously does.  Perhaps Bagley would do better to try his hand at writing comic books.
Not worth the $.01 ..... Pure rubbish !!. This book is one of Dean Koontz's worst.  Not as bad as THE TAKING, but right in there.  OK, here is the plot ... really, really bad guy kills girl and parents.  A girlfriend witnesses and escapes only to find herself in the hunt for really, really bad guy.  Girlfriend chases really, really bad guy and craters the guy, but that's not all.  During this (yawn!) high drama, the heroine finds a little girl that really, really bad guy has (yawwwwwn!!) captured.  After knocking off the really, really (yawwwwnnnnnn!!!) bad guy, heroine rescues little girl and adopts her. ZZZZZZZZZZZZ!!!!! Oops, sorry, I nodded off.Please Dean, can you recall this book?  I mean we aren't asking for an apology here -- just take this piece of junk off the market.I did see where "new and used" has it for as little as 1 cent.  Uhhhhhh!  DON'T SPEND IT !!! It is not worth it !!!!And Dean, when you are going to give your email address out to the fans?  Most authors do this.....but, you seem to be reluctant.  Could it be literary cowardice?  Inquiring minds want to know.Much of Dean's work is excellent ..... this book isn't.Densel MyersYukon, Oklahom
It seems so boring to me... to see science used as poetry. As a sequel to Math Curse, you'd probably think Science Verse would be equally as good. Actually it's a disgrace! Firstly, "the poetry of science"! COME ON! Science and poetry have NOTHING in common. Secondly, stupid ryhmes such as "Jack jump over the CO2 + hydrogen et cetra et cetra" and "the dinosaurs were destroyed by teachers" is neither scientific nor interesting. Thirdly, there are no brainteasers like in Math Curse. Just dull ryhmes that have no beat or tune- just rhyming! If you're looking for real sequal to Math Curse, this is nowhere close
Weak effort. We recently heard Laurie David speak and purchased this book later.  I can't say we got much out of it.  First, I guess you can say it is compact, but that is because there are only 54 pages of content.  Second, if you've not lived in a cave for the last year, you have to be somewhat familiar with the basic issue of global warming.  I recognize that is largely due to Laurie's role in An Inconvenient Truth, a defining event in raising public conciousness.Short advice, spend you money on a donation to NRDC or buy World Changing and skip this book
Gregory has done better. I couldn't tell you who this book was about, but it certainly wasn't Elizabeth I.  Portrayed by Gregory as a dependent almost stupid neurotic, this estimation of her character flies in the face of all accepted scholarship.  And the writing isn't so hot, either.  If I had to read one more time that Elizabeth was picking her cuticles, I would have gone mad.  The Other Boleyn Girl is a much better effort
Nothing but a promo for X2 the movie. It reads in the cover that it is the updated edition but it actually cut bios about other mutants that came in the previous edition (the non updated) to include a &quot;behind the scenes of the movie&quot;. I think the publishers should realize by now that the comic made the movie and not the other way, it's sad that they sacrifice valuable information to turn it into a promo
Needed a hero. Well, considering all the exciting things that have been happening in my life, I was surprised that reading about the life of the universe was so dull.  I can watch a sunset or listen to the sound of a bird singing and that can be wonderful.  But I suspect that if the authors were to have written about a bird singing or the sunset, I wouldn't have recognized it let alone enjoyed it much.  If this book was an attempt to synthesize science with the wisdom of all cultures then give me a genealogy from the Old Testament any ol' day.    I could tell that the authors knew a lot, but unfortunately they didn't know enough about how to capture my attention.  Now I'm no stranger to heavy reading so it can't be the density of information concealed in semi-poetic language that made the story unexciting.  I think it was the tell-me-don't-show-me style of overlong explanations of the beauty and wonder of the universe that might have been significant in this regard.  Unfortunately academicians haven't quite got the hang of how to make countless acts of procreation throughout the history of life sexy nor have they been able to capture the mystery of the ever-shy rainbow.  It didn't help that it had a &quot;we need to do better, us humans&quot; ending.  One might have made that criticism of the authors for their worthwhile undertaking fallen short
Poor Text, Poor Reference. The only thing that comes through cleary in this book is the author's arrogance.  The reader will get a very good sense that Lang understands the material, but the reader will also get the sense that there must be a better book out there.  Even as a reference, this book is lacking.  The index is incomplete, and many important concepts are either poorly defined or the relevant equivalent definitions are not given.  Finally, the order in which the material is presented is haphazard at best.  This is truly a text only for those with a Ph.D. who work primarily in the field of Algebra
Please Stop. If you had a son or daughter take their own life, would you try to profit from it?  This is a sad sad story of a sad young man who took his own life to become closer to his delusional mother.  Wake up, Anne.  You talked all this physic nonsense and new age mumbo jumbo to your vulnerable and hurting son.  And you have the audacity to write a book in his name after he is gone?  This is not his story.  It is your sick, twisted story, told in your words.  Not his.  You are evil
Only For Children. I'm not impressed with this book.  It was written quite a while ago.  It's not as true to life as most of Heinlein's work... this is just low-brow work for him...Don't read it.  It's not worth your time
Taunts, not facts. Any resemblence between what is stated in this book and what's actually going on in the Middle East is purely coincidental.  What the reader gets instead is some amazing fascist propaganda that won't truly serve anyone.Hirst writes for the Guardian, a rather famous British newspaper that took decades to establish a fine reputation for its journalism.  It is staggering to realize just how much damage the Guardian has done to this reputation in just a short while by permitting such nonsense to invade its pages.  And I think we need to ask ourselves how and why this has happened.The staff of the Guardian has to be professional.  One would think that they would hesitate to destroy their paper in such a manner.  After all, it would cost the paper money.  It might ruin the paper entirely, and put them out of jobs.  One might suppose it unlikely that they would want to violate any semblence of good journalistic practice just to hurt a few Jews or Israelis.However, the experience of reading this book and seeing some of the reviews has led me to a hypothesis of what has happened.  The destruction of the Guardian's reputation as a conduit of good journalism has not put it out of business at all.  Just as this book has brought money to its author, the ghastly articles in the Guardian bring money to the newspaper, if only by appearing sensational and controversial.I think we readers have a duty to try to reverse this trend.  Just as dedicated people have made great progress in the campaign against cigarette smoking, the same can be done in the campaign against bad journalism.  We can warn our friends about books such as this one.  And we ought to do just that
Alrighty then... I've read through Rolling Stone's "500 Greatest Albums" guide and it has some real problems, all of which add up to it being extremely unhelpful for someone honestly looking for great albums.  I considered giving this guide a higher rating simply because I agree that many of the albums included really are great, but the writing (or really, the lack thereof) is so bad that this book couldn't possibly be helpful to anyone who was not already familiar with the albums.  This book gets off to a preposterous start when the editor claims that the Beatles' first album should be the number one album because it is the first one that HE bought, and getting all nostalgic about it makes him feel all warm and fuzzy inside.  Wha?!  And this guy is the editor?!  That's not a basis for an argument for an album's position on a list ranking greatest albums!  That should have told me what I was getting myself into by continuing to read.  If you were to ask yourself whether or not you know anything new about the music after reading the article for any given album in this book, most likely the answer will be no (especially for 11-500).  You may know that the drummer spilled beer on his drum kit while recording the big hit single, or some other piece of at best marginally useful information, but that's about it.  And they don't even put much effort into providing much in the way of that level of information beyond the first 10 albums, the rest only get a paragraph of completely obvious and/or useless information.  For a while I was under the impression that "Rolling Stone" was a music magazine that was knowledgeable about and understood and appreciated music (well, rock music at least, in the most narrow definition of the term, and perhaps blues, the father of rock).  This book and other publications such as their brazenly mindless album guide, truly show what little respect and appreciation that they have for music.  I almost get the impression that they want to show that they are too cool to take music seriously enough to put any thought or effort into what they write.  They rarely even attempt to make a convincing argument as to why the albums hold the positions that they do in this book.  It's clear after reading this guide AND their magazine review section for a while that the critics at Rolling Stone do not thoroughly listen to albums, and that they rate music based on things that have nothing to do with the merits of the material.  They rate music based on type and image more than anything else, being much more concerned with shaping and pushing their idea of "cool" than with the actual merits of the music.  It's obvious that they don't even understand jazz (which I guess goes hand in hand with not understanding even the fundamentals of music theory), but there are many areas of music that they don't seem to understand or appreciate.  I don't see how it is at all helpful to judge music by how closely it adheres to aesthetic characteristics that are generally specific to the type that you like.  Those that fit the mold will likely be overrated and those that don't will likely be underrated.  Rolling Stone takes this unbelievably self-indulgent approach throughout this book.  So this guide ends up being really unhelpful.  But hey, where else are you going to find a book with so many pretty and glossy artist and album cover photos :-)?  Unless that's what you're looking for though, you're better off saving your money.  The ONLY consistently helpful and reliable expert critical review source that I'm aware of is "Wilson & Alroy's Record Reviews", so you should go over there and check out their site and their "5 Star Records" page in particular if you want a truly helpful guide to some great albums.
Too much vernacular. It might have been a good book but I got tired of reading the "dis", "dat", "dem" vernacular and finally just gave the book to the local thrift shop
The grunting pig. Having read much of Ann Coulter's book "Godless," I was impressed with her energy, but dismayed by her hyperbole.  Her basic themes about the Godlessness of American liberals are right on target, but she unfortunately goes way over the top in some of her examples and analogies.Therefore, I thought it would be interesting to check out one or more of the response books engendered by her bombshell.  Being in a bookstore I picked up "Brainless" to see if the liberals had any good response to Coulter's assertions.Sadly, the author of this book named it after himself, as he is clueless about how to go about writing an effective rebuttal.  The entire book is one long series of ranting ad-hominem attacks that resemble the gruntings of a pig.Maguire starts out by indicating that if "you are part of less that 20% of the American population who is white, male, conservative, and therefore bigoted, you probably wont want to read his book."  It goes downhill from there.Maguire's unwitting accomplishment is that he has proved Coulter right - in his case, liberals are completely clueless
A Tale.... The novel, A Tale of Two Cities, by Charles Dickens, is a story of love and compassion, which takes place during the beginnings of the French Revolution. Despite the fact that many aspects of the revolution are portrayed well in the novel, the book is still a tiring read and requires a strong liking for Dickens' writing style.Throughout the novel, Dickens bogs the story down with excessive descriptions and meaningless scenes. The language is relatively simple and easy to comprehend, but the extra descriptions make the novel difficult to fully understand. Most of the characters in the novel are completely unrealistic, which makes it difficult for the reader to relate to what is going on. The character of Lucie Manette, is portrayed as the perfect women with absolutely no flaws. Her character is the supposed epitome for women, but in truth, is highly improbable. Throughout the novel, Dickens' does a great job at keeping the story dry and unentertaining, giving little to no excitement to cause the reader to want to continue. Despite these countless imperfections, Dickens' does manage to be partially successful in his quest to portray the revolution.The book, with all its shortcomings, did reveal to the reader, the atrocities that occurred during the French Revolution, and the events that led to it. The abuse of the nobles, and the radical ideas of the revolutionists are all shown in many parts of the novel. The one other aspect that Dickens got right in his novel was the character of Sydney Carton. Sydney Carton is the only character in the story that many readers can relate too and understand a variation of what Carton feels. Carton is a lawyer who feels that everything he has done in his life has been wrong and believes that he can do no good in life. This characteristic is common among people, and Dickens manages to capture that aspect of humanity precisely.The novel, A Tale of Two Cities, is a slow moving book with numerous flaws that cause the reader to lose interest fairly often. Dickens' overuse of description and unrealistic characters add to the book's dryness. However, Dickens does capture a time in history with great accuracy. This is a book for a reader who likes Dickens' overzealous descriptions and enjoys slow moving stories.
Mom of 3. After reading this book, I can now see why Washington State's OSPI is in such a terrible state.  Could someone please set Washington's educational system free from its New Age Mentality?
Misleading. I have been a huge fan of Michael Crichton for about 25 years.  However, this book is misleading and dangerous.  Almost every respectable scientist in the world now agrees that global warming is real and that we are greatly accelerating this problem (except some scientists affiliated with the petroleum and automobile industries).Writing a book that disputes global warming would be like writing a book that disputes the holocaust - Mr. Crichton could just as easily have written a book about how the holocaust did not really happen, and provide plenty of "references" to support this premise.  Tragically, in the long term, global warming could be far more destructive than even the holocaust.I hope that someday Mr. Crichton recognizes that, in addition to his enormous talent for entertaining, he has enormous influence on people's thoughts and actions through his books.  There is a quote: "With great power comes great responsibility."  But in this case it would seem: "With great power comes great profit at the expense of the planet.
Jane Fonda. Anybody who would name Jane Fonda as one of the most important women of the century under any catagory except traitor I would not buy or read any book or article that person wrote
The good soldier. I know that I will outrage alot of people with this review but here goes... This is one of only 2 books that I have ever read that I truly REGRET devoting the time to , but once I start a book I always finish.I don't know what else to say except that it was painful for me to finish this.  I just don't get it.  The main character was quite annoying to me and the story was SO SLOW and predictable I really just wanted it to end. I would not recommend this book for fun and if it is required reading for you I am sorry.
buy it used, or not at all. I'll start out by saying that this book had a co-writer. That's not usually the end of the world, but in this case, it seemed to make everything sort of wooden and unfeeling. Not that I expected much more from an investing book (it was a triumph..I laughed, I cried!), but this was really at the edge of readability, in my book.Which leads me to two huge pet peeves, which were violated in this tome.First, penultimate means NEXT TO last. Some people, even to those that "ultimate" means last, think penultimate means "very last, or "really the conclusion last," but it doesn't. It means NEXT TO last. I learned this in school, in 7th or 8th grade, when we read some knights of the round table stuff (le morte d'arthur, the green knight (I think), and others). Uther Pendragon was King Arthur's predecessor, and he was, in shallowly veiled allusion, the "pen dragon," meaning the one before the dragon, who was Arthur. So remember- penultimate is not last.The other complaint, which is somewhat esoteric, is on the definition of "inflection point." Inflection points are not places where the graph or plot peaks at highs or lows. Inflection points are specifically where the rate of change shifts from positive to negative. For example, if the market grew at 5% in year 1, then grew 10% in year 2, then grew 15% in year 3, then grew 10% in year 4, then grew 5% in year 5, then lost 5% in year 6, then lost 10% in year 7, the inflection point would NOT be sometime between year 5 and 6. The inflection point would actually be between year 3 and 4, when the rate of change of value stopped increasing and started decreasing. Another way to rememeber it is when the graph shifts from concave up to concave down. If your graph can hold water, like a cup, it's concave up, and the other part is concave down. I'm not explaining it too well, but if you really care, check out an algebra textbook or google it. I checked other investing sources about this, to see what they say, and most have confusing definitions, like "A point on a chart that marks the beginning of a significant move, either up or down." That's sort of true, but it seems to reinforce the Neff-like definition of an inflection point, which is "when the market stops going up and starts going down."OK, done with that rant. Believe it or not, I actually thought this book was pretty good. The first part is a sort of autobiographical piece about how he found himself as a fund manager. The rest of the book is about what his fund did through every major market event, from the beginning until the 90's. A side effect of his Windsor fund summary is that it's essentially a summary of every major market event for the last 50 years. I admit, I started skimming in the late 70s, only because I've read other market histories lately. It was good- if that's what you're looking for.Being a person that felt the pain of a huge stock market correction in 2001-2 (remember, I was the guy that thought I was diversified because I held most of my money in Fidelity Select Technology), I enjoy reading histories of other huge market. People that say everything has changed since things like "The Intelligent Investor" was written are up there with people that say value investing is dead. Neither is right, long term.So, despite being annoyed at the little things, this was an interesting read. This is another book that I wouldn't recommend until you've read some of the classics first, though. I give it a weak buy
The most horrible book. This is the worst book that you can have at home. It has a lot of negativism and not good things. For school I have to do it a report, but for me I wouldn't buy it.I put 1 start because I can't put 0
Buyer Beware!. If you suffer from physical problems similar to Ms Selak's, you will find this book useful. If you do not, you will have wasted your money buying it. I expected more than a recitation of Ms Selak's journey through her own chronic disease. There are many other chronic diseases whose progression of symptoms is quite different. This confusion could have been easily overcome by giving the book a title that indicated exactly what chronic diseases were discussed within it.As a person with a chronic disease of an entirely different type, I am familiar with the emotional roller coaster one must travel, but my reactions were quite different from hers. No right; no wrong. What is wrong is for her to set forth her own reactions as some sort of standard for the rest of us. How sympathetic can one be toward a woman who disregards her own well being as well as the efforts put in by her fellow cast members just to fulfill an immature fantasy of being a star? Suppose she hadn't been able to control the pain with medication. Wjat would have happened to the rest of the cast who had worked so hard to put on this production? If she had the stamina to complete the grueling three-week run of the show, no wonder the insurance company had doubts about the extent of her disability.
geez luis. this book wasnt as fantastical as i thought it was going to be. I had heard puzo was a good writer so picked it up and got bored about three quaters the way through the first page. Im not saying not to read this "novel" but it might work better as a coffe table..
Overlong and Overwritten.  The message is good. While I strongly agree with the message of this book, I cannot recommend it.  The theme of the book is that you need to save part of your income and invest it to create wealth for your old age.  This agrees with the research in the book "The Millionaire Next Door," cited by Mr. Hanson. That book, through personal interviews, shows that most self-made multimillionaires lived on part of their income and invested the rest for high return.The main weaknesses of "Good Debt, Bad Debt" are repetitiveness and overwriting.  The author Jon Hanson says he wanted to be an author for many years.  When he told this to an English teacher, he says she laughed uproariously.  He would have done well to have called her in to help with the volume.  The book could be, in my judgment, about one-third as long with judicious editing and still convey most of the information contained.  I found it hard to read the last one-third.  Also, the author self-consciously and seemingly proudly coins new words and phrase, as well as "10 second lessons."The writing itself is clear and there are very few typos.The message is fine: reduce your consuming-being in the "consumerati"-and then invest, with real estate being favored.  The author also shares some of his personal history, including his own weakness in following this advice.  There are some brief descriptions of people who have good and poor savings patterns.  I'd like to see more-detailed case histories of people who changed from poor to good financial management and the results.  Because of the repetitions, some readers might find some ways of saying things a little clearer than others.Overall, while I like the message, I don't recommend reading this book to get it.Oh, why does my review different from earlier ones?  I feel this author got shills to give him excellent reviews which, in my view, are not deserved.  Only one of the four other reviewers have reviewed other books than this one.  And two of the three apparently shill reviewers are in the same state as the author, suggesting people who know him.  So, I recommend you ignore earlier reviews.
Overpriced and of little value. As a former Novell MCNE I was expecting the same excellent coverage Novell provided in their CNE and MCNE certification books, but I was shockingly disappointed.  For example - look up the route command - configuring routes on page 372 - there are two short paragraphs of introduction on the first page and two screen shots on the second page, one of the output from typing route and one of the man page for route - I turned the page and... what a shock!... we're onto the next objective.  Nothing about relating entries in a route table to the route commands required to get them into the table. No explanation of what a route means, just the man page, which is the motivation for most people to buy a Linux book - but not this one.  The rest of the book offers scant coverage of topics that cry out for attention.  Of all the Linux books on the market, this is one of the last ones I would turn to for help. This book has served to deter me from buying other Novell books, although the course 307 and course 308 books for SLES9 appear to be much more what I was expecting - in depth coverage, and cheaper too if you get them used
Not a happy book. If you really love cats and hate to hear about them being in pain then dying..DONT READ THIS BOOK.Camuti is very preachy sounding and makes regular cat owners seem like idiots.he  seems like he couldnt care less about a cat dying in pain.an example of this is when in his book he tells loving owners who have to leave their cat in camuti's care over christmas not to leave a little christmas tree in the cats cage(they just felt bad about leaving their baby over christmas)because it could possibly be bad for him they ignore him and put it in anyways(bad choice but they didnt know any better)...Camuti is a cruel,cruel man!!
self-knowledge??. The only paragraphs worth reading are the once Heller got from other books, I'd suggest you'd read those if you want to know about the Tsangpo's history.Otherwise this book is a story written by a man who has little to no self-knowledge, but seems to know what Lindgren (the expedition leader) thinks and feels. Heller criticizes others but doesn't have the gut to look at his own actions.
Jackie's Wild Seattle  By Danielle. Have you ever read a book that has a wildlife shelter, a boy obsessed with natural disasters, a girl that carried a 40-pound seal on her back while rock-climbing, a lost racoon and an arrogant bear? I didn't think so. Well, now here's your chance, with Jackie's Wild Seattle. While Shannon and Cody'd parents are busy in Afganistan working with Docters Without Borders for the whole summer, they have stay with their uncle Neal in Seattle. During their visit, because Uncle Neal volunteers at Jackie's Wild Seattle, a wildlife rescue organization, the two kids get to explore wildlife in a new and closer way, while they help their uncle save animals.Will Hobbs writes this book in the perspective of Shannon, a 14-year old girl who loves adventures and is a bit more practical then her younger brother, Cody. Cody is 7 years old and loves animals and natural disasters. Uncle Neal is very passionate for animals, and is nice and welcoming to his niece and nephew, but Shannon has some suspicions about him. She will not stop trying to figure out why he is not being open with them.I really liked this book and I would recommend it to someone who liked animal and adventure novels. Since I am not much of an animal book lover, i didn't like this book as much as some of my friends did, but i enjoyed reading it
Just bad. This book just drowns in the satire it tries to create.  It takes extremely long just to get to the real plot of the story and throughout that setup it's just the same thing over and over again: Meet a drunk, stupid noble; Befriend him; and buy his dead souls.If you can get past that, the book becomes a downward spiral of unspired "wit," as people like to call poor commentary on a society
Thanks to this I've memorized every truthful word that's come from your mouth. How can one man be endowed with such knowledge, how to cure every single disease known!!! How do you do it? What is the secret to your genius!?!Please, the world is dying to know---Wait, I think there's a cure for that on page 87...
Pornography! And I normally love Sabrina Jeffries. I won't go into the plot synopsis here, since it's been pretty well outlined by the other reviews. But all I have to say is that this book is fueled by nothing but lust.I want love in the books I read. Romance in my romance novel, not porn. I've enjoyed books by Sabrina Jeffries in the past (THE FORBIDDEN LORD, AFTER THE ABDUCTION), but NEVER SEDUCE A SCOUNDREL was disgusting. When the characters are giving each other orgasms through petting at page 100, something's wrong. I mean, these two people didn't even know each other, each distrusts the other (for good reasons), and yet they have their hands in each other's clothes and are playing sex games (the pirate and the captive) on the second day that they know each other? How sick is this?I'm not a prude, but this was just too much. How many people in modern times behave like this, let alone English girls in 1818? I hardly think a virgin on the marriage mart would have jumped the bones of a man she barely knew like this. Not realistic. And even if it were, I don't want to read about it! Physical attraction should be an added bonus to growing feelings of love and affection, not the sole reason a couple is together. I want to read about people falling in love with a person, not just that person's body. As if sex alone is enough to sustain a meaningful relationship.This is the second time I haven't finished a novel by Sabrina Jeffries because it was so overloaded with sex and devoid of romance. The first time was with ONE NIGHT WITH A PRINCE. Now NEVER SEDUCE A SCOUNDREL had let me down. I'll give her one more try to redeem herself, but I'm about ready to give up on Sabrina Jeffries' work
Full of Loose ends. Things that didn't go anywhere:The figThe burned notebookthe pile of e*crement next to the bodythe cloak in the tree (how and why did it end up there?)The syphillisthe photographer/photographyThe thumbOtto's story (why was he in the tuberculosis ward if he wasn't originally sick?
Ho Hum. Sorry...it's not what I expected. I kept thinking, "where is this going???" It just wasn't funny. It reminded me of something written 100 years ago. But that's not to say someone familiar with Portuguese linguistics (maybe a German academist or an up-in-coming Dr. Dr. Longname, etc. etc. hrumph, cough), could not read between the lines and find this humorous...it was just a little dry and boring to me. After the first couple jabs at these pompous doctors, it got tiring. I read every single book in the Ladies Detective series and couldn't wait to sink my teeth into the next Precious Ramotswe story. This, however, was a disappointment. I'm only sorry I bought all 3 in the series, sight unseen, based on the other books I'd read by Alexander McCall Smith
one long ad for Nike and Brand Jordan. There is no one in sports that I love more than MJ, being a Bulls fan since the 1960s.  I still love Michael, but this book was a supreme disappointment.  By and large, it is an all too detailed history of the design and sales success of his shoes and newer clothing line, peppered with Michael's passages about being determined and "driven", which all ring true, but have been stated many times before and in better form.  If you really want to learn about MJ, I would suggest Playing for Keeps by David Halberstam or The Golden Boys by Cameron Stauth, which profiles the members of the 1992 Olympic Dream Team.  The profiles on MJ and the other team members are probably the best I have read on elite professional athletes.  If you want some great photos and a book written by MJ, Rare Air is much better than this one.
Has been. Found recipes dated, layout makes it difficult to use and although some of the how-to is useful, its generally from another era. Bought Gourmet cook book instead
Poor Execution. National Geographic Magazine is famous for their excellent photography; it is the very reason I picked up this volume. However, Wide Angle: National Geographic Greatest Places failed to live up to my expectations. I was underwhelmed not only by a large portion of the images, but mostly by the poorly executed concept. In a title that clearly implies these are the greatest places featured, I felt the chosen photographs illustrated some lackluster locales. Furthermore, the organization was too loose. The book could have benefited from better formating not only of its categories, but of the photos themselves, which are often stretched in an unflattering matter.
It shows its age. I have serious misgivings about the facts presented in this book.  The original French text was written in the 20's.  I was given this book as I am working on a masterwork on the cultural history of Olives and Olive oil.  In this respect she often jumps to the wrong conculsion, and makes broad judgements that have been discounted by anthropology since the 1960's. For instance she lists oil stores in ancient Babylonia as being olive oil.  We know from further scholership that this would have been sesame oil, and that olive oil was a fuel and not a consumptive in that culture at the time.  This causes me to question the entire book.  This may be an interesting read, but at least with respect to Olives and Olive oil, there is much better out there
Don't buy!!. Don't buy this book.  The book simply teaches you some basic thoery
not worth the time. The writing is pedestrian and the plot makes no sense.  I thought something might change, that it might become an interesting ghost story, or there might be moral issues, or maybe even a character would grow or change.  The heavy-handed ending is, perhaps, intended to demonstrate how the intense oppression and suppression of women in Amish culture forces them to violence against their loved ones...but that's a pretty heavy message for a book that seems full of meaninglessness.  Are we supposed to take everything that Ellie says about the Amish in court (peaceful, gentle, incapable of murder, loving, child-centric, willing to accept an out-of-wedlock child into the community) as lies?  The ending belongs to a much darker book.  My biggest complaint though is the bad writing and editing, I kept stumbling over inconsistencies and that always inhibits my enjoyment of a story.
Awesomely bad. I have never been a fan of Danielle Steel's books and have only read a couple in my lifetime, and those many years ago.  I'm not sure what motivated me to pick up Toxic Bachelors -- extreme boredom? insanity? -- but I slogged through it last night and have to say that it confirmed all my bad impressions of this writer's work.  Actually, I think I was a little surprised by how awesomely bad it was.  The writing was completely repetitive and superficial, and I rather felt that I was reading a treatment for a novel rather than the novel itself.  It read like a poor book report:  "...and then he did this, and then he did this, and after that he did this, and then he laughed."  We are TOLD that the bachelors -- who struck me as commitment-phobic, a little neurotic, and fairly immature despite their (middle) age, but not necessarily toxic -- are decent, likable guys, but we never really see too much proof of that.  When the "proof" does come, it's so ham-handed as to be laughable:  Charlie's eyes well up with tears when he meets a young girl who was abused by her mother, and so we know that he truly does have a loving and compassionate soul and untold complexities to his character.  Yeahsurerightwhatever.  Most of the story is told through narration, with little bits and pieces of ho-hum dialogue.  The author adopted a third-person point of view, but there's certainly nothing omniscient about it, and the reader is never sucked into the head of one of these characters.  Throughout the book they remain about as interesting and dimensional as paper dolls, and their interactions with one another always struck me as being fairly unbelievable.  THIS is how men behave and relate to one another?  I find that hard to believe, considering that none of the men I know run around telling each other how much they love one another and how important they are to each other.I liked the female characters of the book initially.  They all seemed to be strong, capable, independent and emotionally healthy women.  But my opinion of each diminished greatly toward the end of the book, as each woman seemed all too willing to disregard her personal boundaries and put up with extreme schmuckiness from her man.  And the conflicts Steel generated amongst the couples seemed ridiculous:  mountains out of molehills.  For instance, Gray, the 50-year-old artist who has always been phobic about family, refuses to meet the ADULT children of the woman he's been with for several months and whom he claims to love.  Nevermind the fact that he's known about the ADULT children since the very beginning.  Nevermind the fact that the ADULT children live in England and Italy, while Gray and Sylvia are New Yorkers.  Nevermind the fact that they have their own lives and are independent, self-sufficient ADULTS who maintain their relationship with their mother through frequent phone calls and less frequent face-to-face visits.  Evidently Gray can't see beyond the fact that they are "kids" and therefore "family" and therefore not to be tolerated.  Sorry, but whatever sympathy I'd developed for Gray by this point disappeared altogether when confronted by this monstrous display of immaturity.  Dump the weenie, Sylvia.  You can do better.  The other two guys had similar displays of gross ridiculousness, and of course everything was wrapped up magically, with sudden capitulation, as if the men had just suddenly come to their senses.Considering what little time and effort was spent on these characters, their conflicts and resolution, I have to wonder why Steel even bothered writing this book.  And why I bothered reading i
If not for Voltaire, THIS book gets burned. Alas, there are not few enough stars to rate this book fairly.  It is a vacuous, bad joke.  Who picked this small-minded and petty professor to write about a 'great one' in the history of human world changers?  Gray sounds like one of those 'shallow, artificial and superficial 'professors' of knowledge who, 'like the gnats who ride in the race, only barely hanging on to the neck of the thoroughbred - and then criticize the way the the race was won'.  Everyone involved in this sham-of-a-book should be ashamed - the author is clue-less as to the greatness and genius of Voltaire, and takes cheap and uninformed pot-shots at Voltaire.  He pecks away from his little, isolated Ivory Tower - at one of the great thinkers/liberators in Western Civilization, at Voltaire, no less, who writes from the Bastille, and uses his wits to enlighten Europe and escape the Inquisition and the corrupt aristocarcracies who hounded him throughout his 70+ years of heoric satire.  As they say...&quot;When a pickpocket sees a saint - all he sees are the pockets&quot;  Don't waste your time or money, and please, do not support this publication.  It's a disgrace and a diservice to a great soul who made it possible for trash like this to be published
Make it stop. Trying to break the cycle of reading a book until the bitter end whether I like it or not (and if I like it, there most certainly is not a 'bitter' end), I gave up on this one literally halfway through.  Part of me wanted to finish it because I had gotten so far into it, but I gave up and said 'enough.'  This book has so many elements repeating from many other Koontz books, thus it felt like a retread.  I did not care if the protagonist won the battle over his doppleganger.  I wasn't impressed by his perfect, adorable wife and children, or his career as an author of horror fiction.  And the afterword by the author seemed smug.  I'm sorry I read so much of it before I stopped, but better late than never
Uneven narrative, couldn't get into it... I thought I was getting a treat with Mortal Love.  After all, this interwoven story that starts during Victorian England and ends in modern times seemed interesting and just my cup of tea at first.  However, I was deeply disappointed with such an over the top, uneven, and pretentious offering.  The story begins with the backdrop of pre-Raphaelite art and how the visit of a man to one of the models, Evienne Upstone, drives his grandson insane years later.  And then Daniel Rowlands, an American writer, travels to London to research the legend of Tristan and Iseult.  In that journey he meets Larkin Meade, a strange and mystifying fey whose dark, strange powers bring Daniel to the brink of insanity.  It is only when he does further research that he realizes his life is connected to Larkin in more ways than one.  There are various twists throughout the novel.There is no easy way to write a plausible synopsis for this novel because the story is so disjointed at times that I was confused all the while I read this thing.  I'll start with the good points. I liked the historical references and the gothic feel of the novel.  The fantasy aspect is rather interesting as well.  The characters aren't very likeable though, flawed to the max.  But that is not what frustrated me about this novel.  After all, I have read my fair share of books in which the characters aren't meant to be sympathetic or relatable in any way.  What frustrated me was the writing.  As said earlier, I was confused the whole time and had to go back to previous pages to remember who was whom and what was what.  The style of writing is too prosaic as well -- descriptive to the point of being redundant.  As for the erotic aspect of the book, as an avid erotica reader, I must say that the sex scenes are well done, but said elements don't make this an enjoyable read.  I had to force myself to finish this, and any book that is a chore for me does not deserve more than two stars.  All in all, Mortal Love had an interesting premise, but the author failed to deliver it
not worth the paper that it is printed on... What trash and aimless drivel.  You'll find more truth at a liars anonymous gathering.  This book is not worthy of a long retort so I will simply say that it is TRASH!  There, I've done it now.  I've insulted trash.  I didn't think that was possible..
Plot? What Plot? Characters? Don't Me Laugh. I am a big fan of Dick's. His short stories are his strength, his imagination is superb, but this novel is peculiar to say the very least. I am well aware that a major criticism of his body of work is the uneven writing. Sometimes he soars, but at other times it feels as though he wrote a book in a week and stuffed it in an envelope and mailed it off to the publisher without giving it another thought. This is just such a book. How it won the John W. Campbell Memorial award for the best novel of 1974 is beyond me. It would never get published today.The beginning is classic Dick: a famous man wakes up in  a flophouse after a murder attempt on his life and finds that he doesn't exist. No records, no biography, fame all gone, a pocket full of money, that's it. But from that point on the story lumbers from one encounter with a ditzy woman to another. It's all rambling filler that has nothing to do with the story. The policeman in the title doesn't show up until halfway through. Granted, the story picks up a bit at that point, but then it loses its focus again and the ending is a rush job if ever there was one. The whole thing turns out to be a drug induced figment of his imagination. How disappointing is that? That's as bad as  those Star Trek time travel episodes where everyone goes through absolute hell, they should all be traumatized for life and suffer from terminal PTSD, but then the loop is completed and it's as though none of it ever happened. Arghhh!If you think Dick was one of the great Sci-Fi masters of all time, read this book, but keep it in context with his corpus of work (i.e. somewhere in the bottom half). If you are just starting to read Dick, skip this one for a while. But by all means read his short stories. Some of them are keepers for all time.
awful textbook. Obviously I am a disgruntled chemistry student. I will be graduating Cum Laude this spring, and I just suffered through Quantitative Analysis using this book. The problems do not match the examples, there is little background given to the concepts described, and there is no study guide that shows the methods needed to solve problems. My Thermal Physics instructor finally gave up using another Saunders book for the same reasons. Saunders books are more devoted to working problems than describing or teaching the processes that occur. I urge any instructors considering this book to look for a different text!
A book for women who need God in their lives. Joanna Weaver, the author of "Having a Mary Spirit", also wrote "Having a Mary Heart in a Martha World."  She has a unique way of reaching out to women with total clarity.  She reveals her own struggles and we all can identify with what she has experienced. There is also a touch of humor throughout.We all want to improve our lives, to grow closer to God.  This book is a great little manual for doing so.  I highly recommend it, as it will surely change your life.
It just didn't grab me the way I expected. I actually read this novel about four years ago and didn't really like it, but after reading all the rave reviews on this site I decided to give it another try.  I came away feeling exactly the same way as before, let down.  The plot never really grabbed me like I thought it would.  Also, I never really cared for the character of Joe.  Emotionally and physically scared by an abusive father, Joe grows attached to his foster family, and even becomes his adopted father Will's personal driver.  When Will is murdered Joe decides to uncover the mystery behind his death on his own.  Sounds like it could be interesting huh?  Well, seems like most of you have but I just coulded get into this one.  When it was over I was relieved, and that's not a good feeling.  Sorry, maybe the third time will be a charm, but I don't see myself reading this again just to come away with the same opinion
lazy and lame book. i ordered this, based largely on the concept, which seemed like a book on gay history that was much needed to fill in the gaps. instead, the book comes off as if Kaiser got a nice advance and then needed to submit *some* kind of manuscript, but he had lots of other things to do, so he did the absolute minimal amount of new research. instead, he relies heavily on taped interviews with 6 or 7 gay men to fill out the pages. The chapter on the '70s, one of the most important decades in gay history, has nothing more than former bartenders saying that "the Mineshaft was wild, man" and a politico friend of his talking about how he semi-came out of the closet. No sense of the "gay metropolis" here, just a random series of unconnected anecdotes. I hope he got a nice advance, but this book isn't really worth actually BUYING - just check it out at the library, in all its dismalness, and see for yourself.
As I read, I was filled with hope. In the end I was disappointed.  Throughout the book two separate stories take place. One is a record of Bob Dubois, whose life is ruled by circumstances and bad life management skills. The other tells of Vanise Dorsinville, a young Haitian woman, who struggles to survive as she makes her way to America. Neither is a pretty story, and when the two characters finally meet it gets even worse. When I finished reading this book I was angry at myself for muddling through all the italicized Haitian accent dialogue and French Creole voodoo terminology.  Yah mon, true
Not what I had hoped for... I had heard of the importance, and significance of "The Education of Henry Adams" for a long time. I finally determined I needed to read it.I acutally read it twice, and found less in it the second time than the first.I am sorry  I missed the greatness of this book. I am sure there was something wrong with me, but I found it to be incredibly unimpressive.Perhaps this came from the fact that Henry Adams was not a likeable man. He was famous for holding court in his home near the White House, and making caustic and negative comments about every President who lived there.Granted, he lived in Washington at a time when there were plenty of second-rate occupants of the White House. But the thought of people wasting their time trying to please  a blue-blooded snob like Adams depresses me. Why did anyone bother? He lived in an atmosphere of snobbery, sharp-tongues, clever remarks, and brilliant conversation. The world went on without him, truth be told, and he contributed less than the people who walked by his house each day.He was a very good historian in his time. But who reads his books now? Not very many. In short, his own work was not as long-lasting as he would have wanted it to be. Maybe the influence of some of the Presidents he mocked lasted longer than the published and purchased work of Henry Adams."The Education of Henry Adams" does not have much real information. He got education in one place, none in others. Surely, the suicide of his wife provided some very painful education for Henry--but he wrote nothing about it in his book.When Eric Sevareid wrote "Not So Wild a Dream," it was compared to "The Education of Henry Adams." That was meant as a compliment. Oddly, I think Sevareid's book is much, much better. Sevareid wrote of America, the common man, the war, and what it all meant to him. Adams needed to get out more. He did not see America--not the America built by the common citizen who put it all together, and defended it.  I gained a trememdous amount from Sevareid. I cannot say the same for the work of Henry Adams.Again, a lot of this might be me. Perhaps I read the book at a bad time. Maybe I needed to read it a third time. I do not know. I do know I do not think this is a great American classic. Forgive, please, my ignorance.
Well.... The writing is very good, but the true and simple test of a novel is to ask oneself these questions:  Do I care about the characters?  Can I stop reading this book right now and never wonder about how it ends?  If you answer no to the first question and yes to the second, it is not a good work of literature.  The Line of Beauty is, unfortunately, one of these novels.  Tedious, overly mannered and stifling
vaudeville. She seems to have been heavily influenced by both azuza street crowd i.e. much of today's pentecostalism/charasmatics i.e. the toronto/brownsville blessing (a history which is fraught with charlatans and very biblically problemic) and hollywood.In studying many of her sermons what is readily apparent is the lack of any solid biblical understanding or doctrine. It was just get saved and jesus loves you. A cozy accomodation to the masses who can pretty much define that jesus they want to believe in and then follow.
Not much of a plot. Oh, dear.I must be missing something here, given the superlative reviews others have written. Where's the plot? Where's the character development? Where's the narrative arc? Where's the dramatic tension? I'm not quite done, but I have found this book almost impossible to follow. I can't get a handle on what's real in the story versus what is a dream or a fantasy. The story switches back between the past and the present, and the narrator's childlike voice leaves me confused as to what is actually happening. Not my cup of tea, though I recognize I'm in the minority here.
worst book i've ever read. This book was required reading for my advanced placement english class. I consider myself a lover of the written word. I dream of someday becoming a novelist, or at least an english teacher. It usually takes me 3-5 days to finish a book, especially a good book. It has taken me 2 months to read this book. It is not only boring, but often times repetetive. Barbara Kingsolver relates everything to September 11th. Granted, this was a tragic day for our country and should always be remembered. But I dont see why Ms. Kingsolver found it necessary to write a whole novel about it. I find even less necessary for this to be required reading. Every once in a while Ms. Kingsolver finds the need to express herself with words that are a little more complicated than need be. It was a less than pleasent read and I wouldnt recommend it to my worst enemy
A Dismal Effort by Dinosaur-of-a-Philosopher. Derrida, the renowned French postmodernist and author of, among other things, "Writing and Difference", is at it again in his latest effort, "Adieu to Emmanuel Levinas." His work is designed to cast great doubt on  the classical notions of truth, reality, meaning, and knowledge. The goal  is reprehensible, but Derrida can usually pull it off. "Adieu to Emmanuel  Levinas" is thus a major disappointment to all those fans of outmoded  deconstructionist French philosophers.  The book suffers from being far too  personal, and lacks detail. Anecdotes abound, but they are, in toto, not  particularly interesting or helpful ones, mostly along the lines of  childhood vacations to the beach and the like. As for the few attempts  Derrida makes to actually deal with PHILOSOPHY, detail is sorely lacking.  When a reader comes upon phrases like "the hermeneutics of orangutans,"  he/she really deserves to have some idea what the author is talking about.  Sometimes you just want to read about eschatalogical polemics or  signifier/signified interrelations, but you won't find that here. Seen in  this, or any other light, "Adieu to Emmanuel Levinas" falls pancake-flat.  Spend your money on something that makes sense to somebody other than the  author. I am sad now and it is Jaques Derrida's fault
Everyman's Library edition is also ABRIDGED!!!!. Beware of the Everyman's Library edition of this book (green hardcover, ribbon marker, isbn # 0-679-40564-X). Book V dealing with the revenue of the sovereign has been completely ommitted. According to the introduction, this was to limit the book to one volume and keep the price low. I wish I had known this BEFORE I ordered the book since now I have to buy a different edition in order to read Book V. What a ripoff
Not Impressed by Cabot. I expected great things from Cabot's books. I was let down. I did not care for her writing style, nor did I find her information moving or educational. I am genuinely surprised that so many people find Cabot to be a literary value. I just don't see it. I would not recommend Cabot's works to anyone interested in paganism or witchcraft
A map that shows you half the city. It just seems that they forgot one half of the map...????????
Underwater close encounter of the boring kind. This 1987 thriller focuses on Norman Johnson, a psychologist who specializes in large disasters like plane crashes.  As the novel opens he is being taken to an undisclosed site by the US Navy.  Johnson learns that the crash site is located 1000 feet under the South Pacific and the craft is some sort of a space craft.  He was been included because of work he did sometime before organizing a first contact team for a previous administration, an assignment that Johnson would just as soon forget.Once the team is taken to the Navy deep sea facility and begins to study the craft Johnson begins to find disturbing circumstances - that the Navy commander has been less than honest with both the team and his superiors and that the craft itself bears a remarkable similiarity to current human technology, labels and directions are even written in English, leading the team to question just how alien this technology really is.  The suspense continues to build as the undersea facility loses their support ships above due to inclement weather and then conditions in the facility itself begins to turn hostile.This novel is quite predictable, just a few pages into the story it is obvious to anyone who has ever seen a disaster movie that there will be no comforting support ships nearby, that the undersea environment will become threatening, there will be many deaths, there will be sexual tension between the hero and someone else and so on.  While there is some slight redemption in the last few pages this book is a big disappointment, Crichton is capable of so much more.  If you are a fan read it but be forewarned, if you are unfamiliar with his work begin with anything but this.
O.k. Interesting to see about the actual people who were involved in the Harlem Renaissance, but the author uses so many names that it gets confusing
Should have never been written. This book should never have been written as the ending to Hyperion was perfect in my opinion.  This story feels rushed and Simmons completely changed the writing style of Hyperion to force this book out.  One piece of advice, read this really fast so you won't notice all the plot loopholes.  The only reason that it is not a one star book is that the setting of Hyperion is impressive
Very disappointing. This is the story of Cassie, who is found wandering helplessly in a cemetery by a young Indian policeman who just arrived in LA. Cassie suffers from amnesia and we don't know what brought her there, until a hollywood megastar recognizes her as his wife.This is by far the most disappointing of Picoult's books, and I've read almost all of them and am a big fan of hers. Cassie is amnesic, yet she does remember stuff and it is not clear at all in the book how comes she recovers from her amnesia or actually how it happened. The story goes back and forth between the present, the past, the memories, and leaves readers lost in the middle.I was surprised by other reviewers who were surprised by the ending. Chapter one gives the ending away in my opinion. What is frustrating is that it takes Picoult 350 pages to make her character realise the obvious.I also found Cassie to be unreliable and unappealing, let alone her husband Alex, a massive egocentric. The story was very confused, mixing hollywood lifestyle with movie sets in Africa, with anthropology, Indian legends, domestic violence, alcoholism, amnesia - it was just too much for one book and the message was confused.If you want a superb story of domestic violence, read Black & Blue by Anna Quindlen. If you want a good Picoult book, read The Pact or My Sister's Keeper, but definitely not Picture Perfect
Roughly written. Morris Lamb dies suddenly of what appears to be plant poisoning: his plants.  When his house is sold to an Episcopalian priest and her deaf dog companion starts to have seizures, Holly Winter, dog writer and lover, starts to investigate.I have enjoyed this series that takes place in Cambridge, Ma.I'm definitely a dog person and these are definitely dog lovers books, filled with all kinds of tips and tidbits on dog companions.I was extremely disappointed in this one, however.  The writing is choppy.  The characters that haven't already been introduced in previous books are underdeveloped.  Conant often seems to babble. I didn't really understand how her opening statements about aliens and ufo's had anything to do with dogs.The Dog Lover's Mysteries have been a favorite of mine so I'm going to give it another chance and read the next one, but I wish someone had told me earlier not to waste my time on this one.
Witty yet ultimately shallow. I have to study this play for my 'A'-levels, and would like to inform readers that this play is NOT worth reading. It is filled to bursting with sexual innuendo and crude, cheap jokes. There are main issues that could be  brought out, such as deception, relationships and the function of society,  but Wycherley fails to ever reach any firm moral standing on any of these  points. The play is ultimately hollow of its concepts and is certainly not  worth the effort
Same old Robicheaux. Despite the beautiful poetic descriptions of nature which are peppered throughout his books, James Lee Burke falls short as a mystery writer. An author shouldn't concentrate more on describing the environment than developing the plot, which is exactly what he does. And after you've read a number of his novels about the jaded ex-cop Dave Robicheaux, you start to realize that they all follow a very strict, formulaic pattern, so formulaic that I think I can summarize the generic plot of every one of Burke's novels. They all go pretty much as follows:First, Dave Robicheaux unwittingly becomes involved in some sordid affairs, so he decides to start poking his nose around. He is threatened by criminals to stay out of their affairs, but instead of complying he beats them up and continues investigating. Despite the warnings, he is utterly shocked when the villains retaliate by harming someone close to him. The case having become more personal, Robicheaux begins running from place to place, making obtuse accusations and threats to various people until he earns the animosity of almost every character in the book. He eventually stumbles upon the solution to the mystery, and he never manages to punish those responsible because his hands are tied legally. Ultimately, it turns out that things would have worked out better for everyone had he simply not stuck his nose where it didn't belong, and there is nothing quite as disappointing as finishing a book and finding out that nothing worthwhile was accomplished by the protagonist.Aside from this, Robicheaux becomes tiresome quickly. Though he is a decent enough guy, it is very difficult to have sympathy for a man who brings all his troubles on himself with his stupidity and unwillingness to stop poking his nose into other people's affairs.If you feel that you absolutely have to read one of these books, my advice is to pick one at random, read it, and then don't read any of the others. Believe me, they are all the same.
Disappointed. I was hoping for a book that had actual plans and dimensional drawings of various coops.  Instead, this book is more of an "ideas" book or a grand tour of various coops that people have built.  Definitely a disappointment
Trashy Life Styles of the Rich and Famous. This book relates incidents from the lives of 4 famous women during the 1920s: Edna St. Vincent Millay, Dorothy Parker, Edna Ferber, and Zelda Fitzgerald. However, that is strictly what it does: relates incidents. It does not attempt to share any insight, make any connections between their behavior and their writings, nor between the writers. There is no theme. &quot;eat, drink and be merry&quot; .. without the conclusion &quot;for tomorrow we ...&quot;Even the subtitle is misleading: &quot;writers running wild ...&quot;is not accurate in terms of &quot;writers&quot; nor in terms of &quot;running wild&quot;. While Zelda Fitzgerald did indeed have a natural talent, and did indeed later publish a novel, during the 1920s she did not consider herself a professional writer. As to &quot;running wild&quot;, one incident in the life of Edna Ferber does not meet most people's definition of &quot;running wild&quot;, especially when every other description indicates a disciplined workaholic.Those looking for some insight into literary lives, hoping that will transfer to greater understanding of their works, will be disappointed. Those familiar with the lives of these authors will not find anything new. Those wishing to be titillated may enjoy it
Lecture Bomb(ed). Generally I wouldn't review a book I didn't finish.  I only got about halfway through this snoozer.  Still I tasted the food and it was bland.Please skip this stinker.  There are no new ideas or theories in this book, not to mention the theories espoused are wrong.  Lack of food is not caused by the Catholic church and "family planning" - it's caused by political systems and lack of freedom.  Period.  And although I totally support helping the malnourished, I do not support making room in our own budget to support other countries.  We already give enough welfare to many countries who don't need it or who just hoard it for themselves and freeze out the truly needy.The author basically lectures and gives the reader what he feels is the truth, and avoids presenting the facts and letter someone make their own mind up.  My favorite quote is from page 29 (of my text).  "Virtually all populations contain very many different genetic types (for reasons that need not concern us), and some are always outreproducing others."Pass this book on
a bestseller??. bestseller-Stupid plot-horrible plot-dumb charactersI have one conculsion Matthew reilly was trying to buy up all the copies of this book to save himself from embrassmen
Pointless. As someone who has read several books on Watergate, I have to ask: why was this published? It contains no new research, no new interviews, no revelations. The entire book is cobbled together from other books, which means that far too many important points and details are glossed over or ignored. What's worse is Olson's prose, so flat and lackluster that it reads like a description of a Senate Appropriations Bill, rather than as the story of the greatest constitutional crisis of the 20th century. Don't be fooled by the inexplicable raves on the cover-this is barely adequate at best. For a thorough and compelling read on Nixon's downfall, read Fred Emery's Watergate instead
Well thought, poorly written. The quest for the limits of deduction is a well-precedented and exciting topic, and is worth of deep study.  If this is your opinion, then this book is worth glancing at.  Certainly Chaitin's unique approach to tackling the notion of incompleteness cuts to the core of the matter, and is free from the beautiful self-referential chains that bind the reader from a clear understanding of Godel's first and second incompleteness theorems.Even so, Chaitin's opinions of science, his iconic worship of Leibniz (and consequent condemnation of Newton), his accusative implication that Godel's contributions to deductive logic are overblown and confusing, make this book difficult to read.  On the one hand, Chaitin appears to be a haughty mathematician reaching to mask his low self esteem.  He constantly references his 'teenage' work, and the technical reading that he was able to accomplish at the age of 12.  These comments are ostentatiously interweaved into a forest of exclamation points, and the thesis that he alone understood and extrapollated on Leibniz's understanding of algorithmic complexity.  I believe that this book is very much about an author desperately trying to establish his legacy as a great mathematician, and not just a simple read about the limits of knowledge.  If you can stomach pages of writing from a self-aggrandizing braggart (establishing himself as Leibniz's natural successor in the understanding of information), and have a deep need to understand the notion of incompleteness in a new and innovative light, then I recommend this book only to you.
Not Good. I'm new to the Shannon Drake Vampire series. The first 4 books - 1. Beneath a Blood Red Moon, 2. When Darkness Falls, 3. Deep Midnight and 4. Realm of Shadows are excellent books! They are well written and interesting, expecially when the author recesses into the past explain how certain main characters became who and "what" they are. Having said that; I must say that The Awakening is awful! Yes, I said AWFUL! I haven't yet finished the book, at this point I am almost 3/4 of the way through it and I keep skipping pages to get through it faster! I have found the two main characters "Finn and Megan" to be redundant and just plain annoying! I want to say "GET OVER IT ALREADY"! I will read the next book - which is the last in the series (Dead By Dusk) only because I have already purchased the book, but if the series continues on this downward spiral, I will not purchase any more.
Dangerous book for orthodox Christianity. The above book was truly one of the first "big people" books I read about 2 years ago. This may surprise a few people, but I always hated reading. Religion inspired me to read and read and read. When I first picked up Rescuing the Bible from Fundamentalism by Bishop Spong (Episcopal), I thought this was going to be an interesting book. Indeed it was. In the early days of my "re-search" for my faith, I was moving out of a secularized and atheistic mindset, so understandably I had a distaste for the "rules and regulations" of  a Church system like I grew up in, that is the Catholic Church. One of my best friends was or I should say, still is a lesbian. So how could I have reconciled the basic tenets of the Christian faith with the lifestyle of my friend? Well, as I read this book, Bishop Spong actually gave the answer: St. Paul, writer of many of the New Testament books, was a homosexual, albeit a celibate homosexual. This seemed quite revolutionary to me, indeed it still is, but I later found out that many scholars have been using this as way to justify homosexuality. After reading that book, I honestly felt like it was the Gospel truth. I didn't stop to think about how much of the book really used very little Scripture to justify his claims. Looking back on it, "Father Spong's" argumentation was more like a Psychoanalytic dissection of Paul's behaviors which may or may not have signified what Spong claimed. For example, does Paul's admission of a sin which he is struggling with mean that he is homosexual? Perhaps... But, there is absolutely no basis for his assertions either from a proper exegesis of the text or the Tradition of centuries of Church history. It's almost as absurd as the "revelations" of the Da Vinci Code.I would not recommend this book, but I think a solidly formed Christian can read it for a good laugh. Bishop Spong has been a very controversial teacher and speaker for the last few decades. He is certainly a contribution to the potential of an Episcopal Schism in America. Indeed, in recent year, over a hundred Eposcopal Priests have converted to Roman Catholicism and have take many of their flock with them. Let us stand proudly with the Catholic Church to say that there exists only one Church, as Dr. Peter Kreeft has said on many occasions, which does not take it upon herself to edit God's Word.God Bless,Laurence Gonzaga
Tedious. This has to be the most boring book I have ever read. Well, I haven't quite finished it yet as it's taking forever to push my way through it. And I'm sure that more boring books exist, I just haven't read them.I wanted to learn about KKR and LBOs - particularly as a division of KKR recently bought one of the vendors supplying my own employer. I was hoping for the big picture of what took place as well as some entertaining anecdotes. But this book consists largely of page after page of uninteresting minutiae of conversations between the various parties involved. There really is no need for such detail and a little bit of editing could have halved the size of the book without losing any essential information. And a bit of theoretical discussion would have been far more valuable than some of the biographical material. It felt a bit like watching someone else's home video. It probably means a lot to the people involved, especially as they'll get the in jokes and quirks of the participants, but it's painfully boring for strangers forced to watch it out of politeness.I'm sure that much of the conversation is fiction anyway. People don't reliably remember this level of detail of converstaions over a period of years. What are remembered are broad brushstrokes - and this is what the author should have written.There are occasional moments of entertainment - like Ted Forstmann obsessing about the evils of junk bonds. But most of the characters seem quite flat and uninteresting.The fact is: I wanted some of this information in this book. As it provided some of this, albeit with a lot of suffering on my part, I'll give it two stars.Update: Well I did finish this book eventually. My final opinion is much the same
Will Someone Get This Man an Editor?!?. The Cobra Event is a jarring book, not because of theplausibility of the plot nor because it goes intoexcruciating pains to describe dead boies and theirsubsequent autopsies, but because there are so manyerrors on its pages. Worse, there are whole chaptersdevoted to nothing that advances the plot or helps meundersatand the story better; pages and pages offiller - it was like reading a doughnut.Among the worst are:--Changing verb tenses in the middle of a paragraph. Ihave no idea why a paragraph that starts with the pastperfect tense suddenly switches to the present tensein the second sentence. And it didn't happen justonce.--Using "you" all the time. The book has this verycondescending, accusatory tone when it directlyaddresses me, as though it knows what I know and don'tknow.--Maxing out the filler potential. I know that detailhelps to make stories seem authentic, but really,taking a paragraph to explain the history of Katz'sDelicatessan is superfluous.Argh
Illegal surgery and the medical community. The daughter of a prominent Boston doctor is dead, apparently from a botched abortion (which was illegal in the late 60's).  Dr. John Berry's friend, Art Lee, is in jail for the crime, which he says he didn't commit.  So, Dr. Berry sets out to prove his friend's innocence, and runs into cover-ups and lots of secrets.  But there are many doubts, such as was the girl really pregnant, and did Dr. Lee actually perform the surgery, and why is Dr. Berry so interested in finding the culprit?For Michael Crichton's first novel, it's not bad, but nowhere near as good as some later ones.  The plot is marginally interesting, but it was hard to keep characters straight and the dialog didn't sound very natural.  Dr. Berry (who just takes the whole work week off to investigate) talks more like a cheesy "private eye" than a doctor.  Also annoying was the use of footnotes and endnotes to explain various medical terms and concepts - nice to know but annoying to look up
Don't Even Bother With This One!. For all those people out there that are required to purchase this book for a class in undergraduate level psychology, you had better get ready for a rough ride. This book is an extremely difficult one to read. It is very complex with deep concentrated reading necessary in order to comprehend half of what is being presented. The flow of the book is extremely poor, constatnly jumping around from one topic to another without any decent segues. The case studies presented are extremely outdated and do not help much in understanding the topics being discussed. They are not explained well enough to show the relevance of the case study, and they are not tied into the discussion and used effectively at all. This is a poorly constructed book that will frustrate more readers than it will help
Big Disappointment!. The storyline and the characters were intriquing enough to keep me reading all the way to the end. However, they were never fully developed and nothing was explained or resolved. I found myself wondering why certain characters and suppositions were thrown in since the author never went anywhere with them. Ms. Fowler should have taken time to at least connect some of the dots. She's too good an author to have presented this as a finished book! There are too many good books out there and too little time to read them.  Don't waste you time on this one
Tough read for those new to the subject. This book was first published at the beginning of the century, and the expected audience was educated Englishman.  This means that Trevelyan assumes the reader is already very familiar with not only the general outline of the history but also of the individuals and the roles they play.For example, to criticize James I he says he "deliberately chose Carr and Villiers."  If you nodded knowingly, then you'll probably enjoy the book.  But most Americans, unless they have a strong interest in the Stuart monarchy, probably say "Carr?  Villiers?  Who the heck are they?"  Be prepared to say that frequently, and to read at least 20 pages (often more) before the casually thrown out reference is finally explained.  If you remember it by the time you get there.In addition, his writing style nears the heights (or depths) of Victorian impenetrability.  Be prepared to reread a sentence a couple of times just to figure out what the subject and verb are, and what phrase modifies which noun.  I'm not usually put off by difficult language, but this book went a little too far in that direction even for an individual who reads Dickens and Donne for fun.Finally, the author's prejudices and opinions are in full display.  This book was written before the expectation that an author should remain neutral, or at least not overtly biased, was firmly entrenched.  In my opinion, this actually adds to the interest of the book rather than detracts from it, but the reader should keep in mind that the opinions expressed are strictly those of the author and not the unanimous verdict of history.If you extremely interested in the time of the Stuarts, then you will probably find this book fascinating in its presentation of the historical judgement of 100 years ago.  If you are not already well informed on the subject and not a fan of complex language where plain would do, then you'll be better off looking elsewhere
Not what I expected. I was looking for a book that showed how to make a cake to look like a character, not how to make a character for the top of a cake.  I was disappointed
An Aggressive Attack on Research and Scholarship. Media Violence and Its Effect on Aggression is a very peculiar book.  It is written in the style of H.L. Mencken--but without the scholarship and care.  The book is a biased attack on the science of psychology, the profession of communications, and the common sense of any educated reader
Tasteless. Wholly unappetizing, to put it in cookbook terms.  Thematically ripped off from Dobie Gillis, but without a whiff of the charm and interest of the original.  You really don't care about any of the "characters" introduced in this book.  Stale ingredients make for a bland dish.
Convoluted but almost generic. Clive Cussler made his reputation writing books with plots that are barely believable using characters that are totally unbelievable saving the world over and over again from his perch in an unknown but extremely powerful U.S. government agency. After many successful books, Clive perfected the formula and is now sharing it with Paul Kemprecos who co-writes an analogous series which uses the same agency, plots, and characters. Oh, this series does change some things, the main character is Kurt not Dirk and his sidekick is Mexican and not Italian. Also, there is a second pack of characters (Paul and Gamay Trout) who allow the plot to develop through a second set of eyes.None of which takes away from the formulaic tone of this series and this book in particular. In typical fashion, the first chapter is a historical look that "sets the stage." In this case it is an aerial combat over the Alps in 1914 between an industrialist and six (6!!) combat pilots. Needless to say, the industrialist holds his own and manages to down four of his foes before he himself is shot down and killed. The next chapter comes to the present time and takes off a second thread - this time it is a "survivor"-type of reality show which is interrupted by an attack of some mutated beings. The third chapter starts pulling all these disparate threads together and off we go.Unfortunately, this book is too formulaic. It does not take the reader long to realize who the threat is, nor does it take us long to see the connections between the various threads. The only real complication is a completely preposterous connection between the bad guy's attempt to take over the world and an infestation of some new kind of sea weed that tries to take over the oceans.As is usual in these novels, there are high speed car chases, underwater action, aerial acrobatics (in world war 1 vintage planes no less!), underwater escapades and explosion galore. throughout them all, the hero gets a bit bruised but the thugs all manage to get killed (Even though they are supposedly highly trained special forces types) and the world is rescued by the effort of one man - Kurt Austin. There is a love interest (why a different one in each book? Doesn't he ever get to enjoy some time with his rescued conquest?) who is French, and side visits to Scotland and Massachusetts.The only unique thing about this book was that it was the first time that I was exposed to the "Premium" format which is a slightly longer/taller book with more space between the lines. The book cover states that this format is "Specially designed for comfortable reading" but I cannot say that it improved things for me that much.To summarize, as a Clive Cussler fan, I had to read this book to make sure I keep up with the adventures, but this one is not in the top two-thirds of his efforts. I am sure that Kurt Austin will reappear soon and hope that the next one will be more interesting and fun to read
This one's no good.  Where's the flash book we all need?. I have to add my vote to the reviewers who consider the book pretty awful.  The pictures are indeed uniformly terrible, and the content is a disorganized hodge-podge, barely succeeding in sticking to the subject of flash photography.  It also seems true that there aren't many books on the subject.  Attention photography writers!  Here's a big opportunity for an imaginative and authoritative writer on this subject.  Where are you?  This is such an important and confusing topic, and of course amateur photography is burgeoning now.  Surely you can outdo Ms. McCartney and rake in the dough
Where's the GAUGE???. Ever other knitting book/magazine/pattern etc. has stressed the importance of knitting gauge. Unfortunately, the patterns in this book don't even offer a gauge! I knit the baby booties...they came out absolutely adorable but were better suited for a Barbie than a baby...they were sooo tiny! I changed to needles two sizes larger and still ended up with bitty baby booties.Without a knitting gauge, it is really hard to tell if you should change yarn, needles, or if you are knitting too tight or loose.I also agree with the other readers who commented on the lack of photos. Why would I spend hours and hours on a project with no idea of what it should even look like (imagine spending two months on a sweater that you absolutely hate!).There are sooo many other knitting books out there for beginners...skip this one and get Stitch n Bitch or Debbie Bliss "How to Knit"
Fast Fun Read. Not  a profound book. Lots of story-telling to make a few good points. A fast and fun read.
wishful thinking disguised as history of science. This book should be titled something like, " the decline of the gene, and good riddance too". It's really just a potted and rather one-sided historical sketch of some events in the development of genetics. The author figures these stories will help her case against the idea that that there are genes for traits which act independent of the role of the environment and in just about any environment. Since this is something no one really believes, its hard to understand what her beef with the gene really is
Scruton the Apologist. Roger Scruton is a polemical kind of philosopher, in many ways similar in style to John Searle. When Scruton does philosophy, it's a joy to read.But as others have complained, the philosophy in this book is a frame for Scruton to do Christian apologetics. If that's what one wants, it's not a bad book. Personally, Scruton's Christianity doesn't have much appeal for me. And the philosophical issues can get sidelined.If you're really interested in philosophy, Scruton's "Modern Philosophy" is a better place to look. No Christian apologetics, just philosophy. It's both an introduction and survey with Scruton's usual acerbic comments. Personally, the work is directed more toward intermediate philosophy readers than naive ones. But as a general introduction and survey, Scruton does himself very well.For a basic and broader introduction to philosophy, Robert Solomon's "Introducing Philosophy" with original texts and commentary is certainly to be preferred, but the price is outrageous
Quasi-science at best. This book is awful.  It is full of speculations and just bad science.  I am going to quote one egregious example.  The comments in brackets [ ] are mine:"Like the brain, the human eye also evolved opposite [really!] but complementary functions.  Each human eye is a perfect mirror image of the other; yet within the each retina there resides two functionally different types of cells.  With elegant symmetry, the contrasting functions of the rods and cones correspond to the division of tasks between the right and left brain [that is quite a comparison]."Rods named for their cylindrical shape, are extremely light sensitive.Distributed evenly throught the periphery of each retina, they see in dim light and appreciate [the rods have feelings??] the totality of the visual field, seeing images as gestalts.  Rods share with the right brain the ability to perceive [the rods can think??] reality all-at-once [as opposed to what, a little bit at a time?].Cones, in contrast congregate densely in a small spot in the central part of the retina...Cones have two attributes.  They appreciate [there he goes again] color and intensify clarity [whatever that means]. Concentrating on one aspect of reality at a time, [huh?] cones view the visual field as if through a tunnel. [Actually cones and rods sense light together, at the same time, and your brain integrates and intreprets all that information into a perceived image.  But the most fantastic statement is the last sentance of this quote:]  Like rods, cones report to both hemispheres, but the left is metaphorically best suited to process their input.  [That is such an absurd statement that Shlain gives a footnote, right on the same page, contradicting his non sequitor.]"And so it goes on for page after page of drivel, I finally gave up after 6 chapters.  A lot of reviewers find this book to be thought provoking.  I think it is a sad state that our appreciation of science is so dim that people can actually find this nonsense to be of interest
this book is out of date. The book is 17 years out of date.Donald writes, ""Broca's region" and "Wernicke's region" are convenient fictions, the truth being that aphasia can be caused by wide variety of legions that spare these areas, while occasionally the complete loss of these areas will spare language function altogether, provided the adjacent white matter and basal ganglia are not damaged.  The implication is that higher-level integration appears to be fluid and plastic in its underlying anatomy, and the anatomy looks modular through out."The current consensus refutes this position.
Writer's political view is in the book. I am extremely disappointed in "The Inside Ring" by Mike Lawson.  Injecting his personal political views into the book as a way of adding current events into a fiction book has made this unreadable.  I did not select his book to read his political views.Here are some references that I believe are linked to current administration.Page 21 - Reference to Dixie ChicksPage 28 - Reference to the "invisible weapons of mass destruction
BREAKING NEWS!! SUPERPOWERS ARE NOT REAL!!!. I haven't done this in awhile, but I don't think I could review this piece any better than the other reviews I've read about it. It's pretty average, however filled with nice bits of knowledge. They didn't seem well-researched in some areas. Here are the interesting parts of reviews from the other "critics" that I agree with..."they go into lengthy history lessons about the origins of the characters when two sentences...would be enough." - John Gallant"Biased against superheros(sic)" - Christopher Ritter"I found this book to be tedious, lacking in charm, badly researched and wildy inaccurate in some areas." - C.P. Halliday"I picked up this book." - Lawrance M. Bernabo"Their belief seems to be that Donald Duck was the best comic book ever..." - M.G. Bloedorn"Pretty boring." - BernardZ"...a black hole is hypothesized, lending a faint respectability to the premise behind Green Lantern's abilities." - Peter Vinton Jr."...this book will not satisfy full on fans..." - James N. Simpson &lt;---gave it five stars."a chance to laugh about the heroes I still love and that mean so much to me." - Reviewer"Man, there's a whole 200 pages of this pooh-poohing, cranky-old-maid kind of stuff!" - Mark Alfred"They were even putting words into C. Darwin's mouth." - Aaron Spriggs"Mildly entertaining but not great" - Reviewer"When the man (Dean Koontz in this case) writing the introduction says he doesn't read comics, I began to get worried." - Ivan A. Wolfe"I agree with an earlier poster." - Reviewer"Almost every chapter tells you why the superhero is impossible." Plastic Larry"the authors give us a more plausible (given what we know now) origin for the Hulk, involving steroids and fluorescent gene modification." - J. Draper Carlson"this book is not mean spirited or nasty." Reviewer"Superman's powers break the laws of science. Ooh. Stop the presses." - [...]"interesting." - Rick Hunter"The Science of Superheroes," - Reviewer
I keep trying, but can't.... Despite all the negative publicity, and my insistence that I wouldn't buy anymore of these books, I did.  My new rule ended up being that I would wait for the paperbacks.So with Book 11 due in PB this fall, I decided to give this book another try.You see, a couple years ago when it came out in paperback, I tried to read it.  I couldn't.  My friends told me just to read the last chapter and skip the rest.  I started reading anyway.  I put it down.  It is so boring; filled with so many people who I've never heard of, and lacking the best elements of the series (Rand v. Forsaken), that I couldn't do it.Well, here I am again.  And I still can't read it.  And now I hear that Book 12 will end the entire series?  So we have a great first 5-6 books where tons of cool thing occur, a terrible next 4-5 books where nothing occurs, and then an ending where everything stops?  Just like that?I now recommend that people read the first three books in the series and no more.  TDR is a good stopping place, although there's good stuff in books 4-5, they require a reader to want more.  Book 3 wraps it nicely.  Just pretend Ishamael was the Dark One, and you're all done.What a tragedy to have created something so great and ruined it so thoroughly
Reads like a Junior High History Assignment. I am an avid Michael Crichton fan and have read pretty much everything he has written aside from his nonfiction books.  Crichton's writings are often full of action, complexity, character development, as well as a deeper underlying theme or message about society, technology, and human nature.  The Great Train Robbery was either lacking or painfully deficient of every one of these elements.  As I expressed in the title, it is written more as a historical documentation of an event rather than a traditional novel and is frequently interrupted by lengthy explanations of historical perspective.  The Victorian criminal slang used (although brilliantly) to tell the story makes it a slow, and at times, unintelligible read.  I give it two stars because it is obvious that Crichton has written a well thought out, well researched book; I only wish it didn't feel like I was reading his history report
No surprises here. After reading an overview regarding the plot of this book, I decided to give Ed McBain's latest novel a whirl.  After 20 minutes into the book, I had the mystery figured out.  Okay, I was a little off on one of the characters (I surmised it was a girl in the Caribbean and actually it was a black girl who worked at the local ice cream depot, but still...).  I read the entire book in one day and while enjoyable, it is predictable even to the politically correct Bush bashing (bad economy and he stole the election from Gore, dag-nabbit) which has nothing whatsoever to do with the plot.  If you want a mindless, easy-to-put-down and finish quickly book, "Alice in Jeopardy" is for you.  If you want a novel full of surprises and twists, amazing characters and an author who leaves his personal politics out of the story, pick up a Harlan Coben novel
Insulting to mentally-healthy boys and men. This book starts out with the affectation of being somehow applicable to "modern man." The author assumes modern men are "broken" and therefore must somehow be "fixed," and he offers his advice on how to go about being "A Real Man." Therefore this book will appeal chiefly to boys and men who feel inadequate as males and men; the same men who buy Hummers and/or guns and/or beat women and abuse children to compensate for their wan manhood (real or perceived).The author portrays modern man as the victim to changing male roles. While this is true for some boys and men, it is by no means a universal trait. Any man who follows the dictates of his conscience and sense of honor and valor will know intrinsically what his role in life is; he will also find this book insulting and absurd.Mentoring a boy and young man is a good thing; however, a young man must know when to slay his father and become a man himself. The danger of mentoring is that of the "alpha male" mentality taking over and running a boy's or young man's life to his detriment: when that occurs, cultist mentality takes over. (A good, and frightening, example of this is Robert Bly himself.) Taken too far, this mentality leads to horrors such as the People's Temple (Jim Jones and his mass murder-suicide), Heaven's Gate, Scientology, and a numberless other dangerous Follow-The-Leader mind-sets.For those boys and men who feel they need such advice, a far superior book is "Fire in the Belly" by Sam Keen. It does not have the foreboding sense of victimization that "Iron John" does and it is far better thought-out as well as written
Take a pass. I tend to like books like this. Sadly, not this one. As a 30 year Chicago Police veteran, with my last assignment in the Detective Division I picked this up to read when I noticed that it took place in a district I had worked at one time. The main character is somewhat real, kind of hard-edged, like an officer with a few years on the job.I was ready to forgive the author stretching the boundries of the 23rd District way up to the 24th, past the 20th. I could also forgive, for the sake of the story, that her 'boss', a sergeant,(not a lieutenant, or captain as in real life) would call her in on her day off. Not likely, certainly given that she would have to be paid at a great overtime rate. I could even forgive that she would walk into the men's locker room to ask who she was working with. (not likely in any district, and certainly not 23). I might even forgive that her boss, or any of the officers would make her work with her 'ex' for a tour.BUT, when she gets into a shooting where her partner is shot, and she doesn't (or he as it first starts when he is still alive) call in 'shots fired' a 10-1, or as the title suggests "officer down" then things begin to go south real fast. To begin with, they had requested back-up at this location before going in. For the deparment to suspect that this was a bad incident and not to take her word from the start and begin to look for the named suspect is dumb.  In any shooting such as this, on-duty, the benefit of the doubt would go to officer, and all effort would be made to find the offender. Certainly the word of another of the beat cops that he couldn't find any sign of someone being there would not be given any value. And, if this were indeed an empty building in that area, it would be loaded with signs of occupants, previous or squaters.  IF it was to be determined after investigation that he had been shot by her rather than the bad guy, only then would steps be taken to suspend her.  Sadly, most of the police story doesn't ring true at all.Lastly, while the author seems to know locations, it's too bad that for all her knowledge of the city, she didn't know that we don't have "DAs" in Chicago, or Illinois. It is an "SA" or States Attorney. And the police deal with "ASAs" for investigations.As another reviewer mentioned, this is just the same old story about the female officer blamed for something that she hadn't done by the bad old police deparment forced to prove herself. Skip the effort for this one and read a better one.
Not What I Expected. I was disappointed with this novel and expected something completely different.  I found it to be a little too "out there" and had to force myself to finish the book.
One small man, one giant book about him... If the demon is in the details, then James R. Hanson's "First Man" has slain every demon in sight.  The real tragedy is that after 648 pages, we're left with a comprehensive timeline of Neil Armstrong's life, but with little insight as to the inner workings of the man himself.Indeed, as the commander of the Apollo 11 moon landing mission, crewed by the "amiable strangers" of Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin, and Michael Collins, it was ironic that the closemouthed, enigmatic Armstrong was chosen to make he first step onto another planet.  Of the three, he proves to be the least interesting.  The ambitious Aldrin schemes and works the backchannels of NASA management, trying to be the first down the ladder, while the cheerful, irreverent Collins methodically goes about his business of flying the Command Module while his crewmates make the landing.  (Collins is also an author, and his "Carrying the Fire" is a much better account of the mission than Hanson provides here.)Despite reams of information and hundreds of interviews, Hanson chooses to let Armstrong provide much of the commentary, which proves to be a mistake.  To the end, Armstrong remains the quintessential engineer, letting the data speak for itself, and offering only the most guarded of opinions.  It's clear that his fellow astronauts have opinions of their own, and when Hanson allows them to dish, the picture of Armstrong becomes more complex.  Indeed, the book would have been far more interesting with more colleague sound-bites and less Armstrong.Throughout Armstrong's NASA career, his managers and finally Hanson himself use him as a movie screen to project their own visions of Mom, apple pie, and the dream of beating those lousy Commies to the moon.  They hold him up as the symbol of America they want him to be, rather than the engineering near-savant he seems to become, all but cut off from any emotions of his own. Armstrong's divorce from his wife of 35 years is brushed aside in three pages.  The fact that he supposedly didn't carry anything to the moon and back for his wife and kids is passed off in a remark.One could be forgiven after reading this book for believing that there was no room in the space progam for colorful astronauts.  However, the careers of the late extroverted, noisy Pete Conrad (Two Gemini missions, Apollo 12 landing, and Skylab), or motormouthed "Captain America" Gene Cernan (Gemini, Apollo 17 commander) would indicate otherwise.After the moon mission, it was Aldrin and Collins who took interesting steps of their own.  Collins wrote, worked in the State Department and later managed the opening of the wonderful Smithsonian Air and Space Museum.  Aldrin, crushed by his "second guy on the moon" status, battled depression and alcoholism before emerging healthy and sober as a vocal advocate of our continued presence in space.And Armstrong?  He became a near-recluse, but not before briefly becoming a professor of engineering at the University of Cincinnati, roughly the equivalent of Tiger Woods taking a job as the resident pro at a public golf course in Fargo.  Rather than boost the space program which afforded him a place in history (an achievement paid for by you and me), he refused to "pimp", opting instead to delve further into himself.Through sheer volume of details, Hanson masks the fact that this hagiography is neither an enlightening nor satisfying look at the man who forever changed interplanetary travel.  Those old enough will always remember where they were the moment Armstrong set foot on the moon (and blew his line - it was supposed to be "one small step for A man..."), but you'll never discover the human being within the moonsuit from this weighty tome.
Go see Austin Powers instead. OK, this is NOT a recommended title, but I couldn't resistsaying a few words about it here because of its high entertainmentvalue. For 15 years now I have consulted for US companies entering the Japanese market. So naturally I paid close attention to the chapters on Japan.  They were very entertaining.  They read like the script from a Mr Bad Guy in a 007 movie...  Check out the prose, too: &quot;A Japanese samurai worker produces in one day what it takes an American worker two days to produce.  To the western world the Japanese stress the importance of free trade because they know that the western worker is no match for the Japanese samurai worker&quot; (p. 125). .. The final section contains precious specific advice such as &quot;respect local culture&quot; and &quot;develop long term objectives&quot;.  One of the deepest pieces of timeless advise is that &quot;if you drop your chopstick in Asia it means good luck&quot;.  I guarantee you won't know a thing about doing business in Japan after reading this book, but you may be amused reading it. ... it seems that a ticket to Austin Powers may represent better value.  EN
Not Good Introductory Textbook Material. This is a required book for an introductory lighting class I'm taking.  Since we are solely relying on this book and it isn't supplemented with lecture material, I find that, without familiarity with lighting terminology and concepts, it is very difficult to understand -- very cryptic with the seemingly overused language of the field.  While the author may be very knowledgeable, I feel the book is not very well written and the target audience is, perhaps, not intended to be, essentially, the layman.  I don't find the organization of ideas and concepts to be clearly laid out or communicated well and, as they unfold, and I come to understand what the author is trying to say,  wonder why it was made so difficult -- is that all he means, geesh and why didn't he tell me that earlier.  It would be easier to understand the general concept of things first, even in plain English perhaps, and then go on to a more technical description to learn the language of the field and get the details.  Just seems to make simple things very complicated, especially with the language, flow of ideas, and phrasing.I also find a lot of the graphic figures and photo examples need some clarification or more details.  A picture's supposed to be worth a thousand words, not be cryptic and time-consuming to understand.Sorry, I would not recommend this for students who are not primed first.  Especially the younger ones.
Ho Hum. Sorry...it's not what I expected. I kept thinking, "where is this going???" It just wasn't funny. It reminded me of something written 100 years ago. But that's not to say someone familiar with Portuguese linguistics (maybe a German academist or an up-in-coming Dr. Dr. Longname, etc. etc. hrumph, cough), could not read between the lines and find this humorous...it was just a little dry and boring to me. After the first couple jabs at these pompous doctors, it got tiring. I read every single book in the Ladies Detective series and couldn't wait to sink my teeth into the next Precious Ramotswe story. This, however, was a disappointment. I'm only sorry I bought all 3 in the series, sight unseen, based on the other books I'd read by Alexander McCall Smith
Chanukah IS NOT the Jewish Christmas. With such wonderful illustrations, and a mostly enjoyable text, it's too bad that this book gets its inspiration from "Twas The Night Before Christmas". Jewish parents work hard teaching their children that Chanukah IS NOT the Jewish Christmas. This book doesn't help. There are much better choices out there
The Problem with Lust (In Particular to the Sexual topic). Author Joshua Harris, who have scored (no pun intended, mind you) a great hit with his first book on the subject of dating called I KISSED DATING GOODBYE, spawned a sequel documenting his courtshipping days with his now found wife called BOY MEETS GIRL. This time Harris had come up with a third installment on the subject of Lust, particularly on the aspect of human sexuality.Eventually the book just went on as being more of a stuff to only propagate organized churches' ideals rather than to convey to its readers what its premise supposedly have guaranteed: a book to help Christians overcome their problems with sexual temptations - presenting a certain idea of dependence to the common church communities' norms (chapters 8: "Lone Rangers are Dead Rangers") although it did affirmed that the key to total deliverance from sinful problems IS a sturdy connection with God (chapter 3: "You Can't Save Yourself"), which at the same time apparently only show the inconsistencies of what are the currently and commonly accepted prevailing concepts amidst the church circles of our day; along with their popular explanation regarding God's salvation - that runs like a confusing pretzel logic, which only go around in tangled circles, proclaiming that being Salvation is only attainable by Grace, one has no real need to obey God, and yet they would strain a gnat to follow into their church's system, or otherwise condemnation is not too far around to be driveled out into the particular if one wouldn't submit into the dictates of their church's ideals.Thus, unfortunately this book never delivered; and in the long run, Harris stated it so in the book that he has no solution and there is no secret method at all in overcoming the lust problem.Harris' book NOT EVEN A HINT live up to its title under the constriction of being a completely impotent material to help anyone who has a great problem with sexual temptations.And not as to dismiss or belittle every person's own strengths and capacities regarding an individual's own area of weaknesses - I find it crazy on the author's part to have strong sexual problems when it comes to seeing a copy of lingerie catalogues. I mean being that he is a Christian, and married to his wife, which would mean that he loves his wife synonymous to his devotion and commitment with his wife in that respect, presumably - and in being thus out of his respect for his wife - sure enough although its automatic within a male's psyche to have that sexual suggestion in the mind whenever the sight of an `insufficiently' clad woman comes along - he would've not have a problem at all with that and be tempted to indulge in it; or otherwise there is something wrong with his own perspective as a Christian, and for that matter: about his love for his wife and how she really meant to him. 'Cause if one is really in love and needless to say devoted out of that condition to his wife - he wouldn't have the knack to look lustfully at nor desire any other women at all but his very own wife (believe you that!).Thus at this point, it only gives the idea that Harris should've taken more time in analyzing his own personal condition, and learn more about the topic at hand before coming out with this book on the subject.The aspect of a person's sexuality is the most private and personal thing that each person possessed. As occultist and book writer Donald Michael Kraig wrote on his book MODERN MAGICK, "Therefore, sex is totally involved in our psyches. Control a person's sex life and ... you control the person." Kraig cites that the matter regarding sexuality is the very aspect wherein those who'd like to manipulate and control its subjects within a group, sect or cult is the very effective means to do so and is indeed used for "brainwashing" methods. It's crazy that in most church communities these days, they even control matters of courtship within their members.Not for the purpose of trying to peeve away many "christians" that perhaps this little review have done enough already for those who are so Up with Joshua Harris (as he's someone who's in the camp of their church's idealisms) - I think so-called Church of Satan founder Anton LaVae presented a more better idea regarding the method to solve the problem of sexual urges (although I bet that his motives could be moot as far as his sincerity goes, under the context that he's on for the faade of trying to assert an appearance of some idyllic pretense against the Christians, and that it's not for the sake of plain earnestness in itself) - that one could have the means for sexual release or relief, through indulging in sexual fantasies without committing to involve anyone upon it. Such as in example - one would masturbate without fantasizing to involve any real person within those fantasies, but are such that are consisting only of self-created images (kinda like in the movie COOL WORLD) or of a fictionary person visualized for those sex-fantasies.Therefore under that context, not only would the individual be free from the act of fornication but is also not guilty of committing any mental adultery towards another person .Deliverance from sexual struggles involves one's own personal acceptance, understanding and knowledge about his or her own sexuality.There are other books and resource materials that are much more helpful than this one by Joshua Harris that are available out there. Hence regarding the topic, NOT EVEN A HINT scores not an inch of any helpful doze for its readers.Rather, Smooch unnecessary church demands goodbye.
Atrocious. "It is a truth universally acknowledged, that a married man in possession of a good fortune must be in want of a son and heir."  And that is how Pemberley, Emma Tennant's sequel to Jane Austen's Pride and Prejudice, begins.  The opening sentence drew me to the novel.  I liked the throwback of Austen's opening sentence of P&P and thought it was quite clever... that is until I noticed that Tennant does this throughout the whole novel.  I became annoyed with that, but that wasn't the worst part of this novel.  More on that later.  This sequel centers on family and friends gathering at Pemberley for Christmas.  There are the worries centered on Mrs. Bennett and how she and her silly younger daughters would behave during their stay.  Mr. Darcy and Elizabeth also have to worry about Lydia and Mr. Wickham and Lady Catherine de Bourgh.  And there are, of course, the (very predictable) conflicts centered on Mr. Darcy and Elizabeth's inability to have a child.  And to make things worse for them, Mr. Darcy may be -- gasp! -- the father of an illegitimate child!I know this has very likely been brought up in other reviews, but I feel I have to vent.  First of all, Jane and Elizabeth got married on the same day.  There is a one-year time lapse in this installment.  Why is it that Jane has a one-year-old little girl (when in fact this child should have been a newborn if it had been conceived during their honeymoon) and is about to give birth to another child?  All in one year?!  Then there is Lydia.  She married Wickham a few months before Jane and Lizzy got married.  And she has four children of various ages.  Am I missing something here?  Newsflash for Ms. Tennant: only animals could have multiple pregnancies in one year.  Then there is the complete destruction of our beloved characters.  Lizzy is an emotional disaster and a pushover here, throwing tantrums and crying at everything.  There isn't the slightest trace of the intelligent, spirited and witty Lizzy that we all know and love.  And Mr. Darcy?  Tennant turns him into a pompous, brooding jerk.  He may have been arrogant in P&P, but we all know that he gains some humility by the end and we also learn that underneath that arrogant exterior lies an honorable gentleman.  But here we're back to square one and then some.  And -- oh! -- Georgiana hates Lizzy?  She teams up with Miss Bingley to speak ill of Lizzy behind her back and make her life miserable?  What the hell?  In Pride and Prejudice, Georgiana is a shy, proper young woman who likes Lizzy the moment she meets her.  Tennant has reduced this character to a villainess in a bad soap opera.  Ick!  Mr. Bingley is once again trashed and turned into a rake of sorts (I say once again because this was done to him in another P&P sequel I recently read).  He is the father of an illegitimate child in this one (remember the out-of-wedlock child that is believed to be Mr. Darcy's I mentioned in my previous paragraph?).  I also hate the fact that the author kills off one of my favorite characters: Mr. Bennett.  Why, oh why did the author get rid of such a wonderful and hilarious character?  His bantering with Mrs. Bennett were my favorite parts of Pride and Prejudice. Anyway, I could go on forever with the inconsistencies and lack of continuity in this novel (and believe me, there's more!), so I'll move on to anachronisms.  Regency women did not talk about douche among themselves during tea time, much less in front of men.  And even though Mrs. Bennett could be quite vulgar and blunt, not even she would give advice on how to conceive a son in the company of men.  And how would she know about conceiving a son?  She has five daughters and no sons!  Furthermore, this novel did not have a feel of Regency England at all.  And all of this, dear readers, in just 184 pages!  I'd hate to think what other errors this author would have concocted had she made this novel longer.  I could only reach the conclusion that Ms. Tennant has never read Pride and Prejudice.  As for using similar quotes from P&P... well, maybe she found them in Cliffs Notes or something.  Pemberley wouldn't have been so bad if she had intended to rewrite the original novel and not do a continuation of it (that still wouldn't explain the multiple births in one year though).  This novel is just plain bad.  Don't waste your time with it. *End of venting.*  Phew!  I feel better now
mr. poynter, this is unfortunate. I am a fan of Dan Poyter's, and I have learned a lot from this author's monumental work, "The Self-Publishing Manual". I thought this title, "Writing Nonfiction : Turning Thoughts into Books", is another one of such great works.I was so disappointed while reading this book when I realized that it was nothing but a rehash of the original book. I just could not understand how a professional author could have the audacity to publish the same book under two different titles and sell both to the same audience. I don't know if you get, I just don't.To make matters worse, this title is not as detailed as the original work. So, if you are interested in learning from this man, I suggest that you get a copy of "The Self-Publishing Manual", rather than this one.I gave this book 1 star, not because it does not contain useful information, but because it contains nothing new from the author's previous publication. It is really unfortunate. I felt cheated.
Too many errors in array design (tchevysheff). I teach antenna course and have found that students get confused when problems are incorrect.  At least 2 problems (6.40, 6.46) design Tchevy array with specifications that are impossible to meet. The solutionary is wrong too!  The required SSL of 30dB is never attained 'cause when you verify the visible region of T(z)doesn't reach sidelobes (z&lt;1) so don't meet for given d and N.  Need to increase spacing or N. This is serious bad training for students.  In addition, the author use of beta for phase-shift instead of alpha is missleading and confused with nomenclature for k = 2 pi/lambda.  Other aspects are very good, but needs color and photos
First in a Series...?. Has anyone recently pointed out...that Teddy Kennedy's dog is named SPLASH???Maybe they should make this a series of books.  Bill Clinton can be featured in the next edition with his dog named I RAPE WOMEN.  Just an idea.And who's the artist?  Was he working with photos of Ted from 1969?  Ted hasn't looked that svelte since the sixties.  Where's the neckbrace
Less than enthralling. I was dismayed to find that this audio book is simply a laundry listing (in an &quot;advice o'the day&quot; format) of tidbits of wisdom. The wisdom offered is good, mind you, but if you are looking for something to stimulate and entertain you (eg on a long car ride) you will likely be disappointed. I can only listen to about 4 or 5 tidbits before I lose interest
No more than a start. Joseph Ellis is a learned, competent Revolutionary era historian. While this book is a fine introduction to Washington's role in the Revolutionary War era and beyond, it doesn't approach the caliber of David McCullough's John Adams or Edmund Morris' The Rise of Theodore Roosevelt. Ellis seems to lack the sympathy and insight necessary for a good biography. He doesn't seem to understand Washington - he doesn't get us into his head, relying instead on historical narrative. Ellis also misses opportunities to bring out more of Washington's character. Admittedly, part of the problem of interpreting Washington is that Washington manipulated his public image, acutely aware that it would endure to all generations. The Great W. was scrupulous about his private life. But rather than admitting this paucity of information and pointing to the gaps in our understanding, Ellis attempts to paper it over. His prose style, attempting conversation, yet creaks with scholarly habit.I bought this book, relying on the stellar recommendations here on Amazon, but it seems I must wait for a great tour of the mind of this great leader
Gender of History. This book fails to present any new argument for the treatment of women historically.  It does point out that women have been ignored over the centuries but most of us already knew that.  The use of technical language, assumed foreknowledge of historical figures and an overestimated understanding of historical process make this book inappropriate for most undrgraduates.  Graduate students should be able to muddle their way through most of the book and it is also a book for academic collections
Gregory Disappoints Once Again. What I find so troubling about many of Gregory's books is her failure to present a heroine who isn't insipidly weak.  This book, "The Favored Child," and "The Virgin's Lover" both spring to mind.  "The Favored Child" had great potential in terms of Gregory's beautiful writing, but Julia's consistent inability to stand up to Richard ruined the book for me.  I found the characters neither realistic nor sympathetic.  After 400 pages of drama, I quickly flipped to the last page and read Julia's letter to James.  I immediately threw the book down because I was so disgusted.  I would ask Gregory to write a book where the heroine actually has a backbone.I understand that the modern mindset greatly colors my thinking when it comes to a woman's role in society, but no one expects that degree of historical accuracy from 'pleasure' reading such as this.I'll throw one bone to Gregory - her descriptions of Bath were marvelous.
To Much Detail;. Temperance Brennan is an American forensic anthropologist .The author is a anthropologist in real life and I feel she gave to much detail as to body parts & conditions ,& locations in the book , and in about the 3rd chapter to much time and space is wasted talking about "Gabby " including in detail where gabby lives and details that surround the outside of Gabbys place & How Gabby and Tempe were friends from GRad to man parts in life . Book was not for me I dropped it at the 3rd chapter .
The Origins of Totalitarianism?. This book nicely discloses the ghost of Heidegger in much of Arendt's writing. In short: forget your 'banal' bourgeois 'jobholder' worries about material things! leave issues of redistribution or poverty to the animals! instead, stick your toga on, leave the slaves and wives indoors and ... let's do manly politics! Arendt should have ditched this hyper-masculinist, romantic Grecophilia after it got us to Auschwitz. Go read Hobbes or Montaigne if you seek a far more humane perspective on life after human carnage (in their 'bourgeois' determination to keep romantic-mystical yearnings out of the public sphere). Physically, this book just about slips inside Arendt's larger monograph on the origins of totalitarianism. I fear it is ultimately where it belongs
SO so. I read all 12 of these things. Armageddon has it's moments but as with most of this series is sorely lacking. Nicolae and Leon are pretty lame as the incarnation of evil.. Nicolae acts more like a spoiled 11 yr old with the world's arsenal then the antichrist.And Leon (was a buffoon and lacky) rather then "the False Prophet")People either love or hate this series.. I for one do buy into the Dogma the series teaches. It is much different then the theology and spiritual beliefs I hold dear.
A character driven novel where the characters don't deliver. I picked this up because it's considered a classic and I knew it had been made into a movie.  I tend to think that if a book is made into a movie, then the book must be pretty good.  Not so with Howard's End.  The plot in Howard's End doesn't progress much outside of an early death and later marraige.  You have to have some interest in the characters, but they just weren't very believeable.  None of characters convinced me that they could be people from the real world.  I kept waiting for someone to say anything that might border on being interesting, but everyone babbles on and on about nothing of any substance.  The story is clearly dated and doesn't hold up well so many years later.  Living in today's world, it's hard to understand what attracted Margaret to Henry.  There definately is an audience for this book.  I'm just not a part of it
What A Joke!!. What's wrong with all you Amamzon reviewers?I actually quite liked Shutter Island but this was total garbage. The morose tone is totally overdone throughout, and the end is pathetic. The interesting situtation setup in the first chapter is never satisfyingly integrated with the rest of the story.Avoid
Would prefer to rate this as 2.5. "Biloxi Blues" is nothing like "Brighton Beach Memoirs," so if you're hoping for more of the same, don't bother.  Eugene is very different; more mature (still obsessed with sex, nonetheless.).  The humor is much more crude than the first play, and much darker.  Eugene is not in this play a lot, which may explain my lack of laughing.  I couldn't warm up to any of the characters like I did in "Brighton Beach Memoirs."  Even though I was disappointed with this play, I'll still read the third play of this trilogy. I do not recommend
Neither "organizing" nor "simplicity". I was disappointed with this book.  There were a few worthwile tips (such as going to bed early to take advantage of the more productive morning hours) but mostly the author solved her problems by throwing money at them.  If I could pick anywhere in the country I wanted to live, buy $700 coats and hire people to run all my errands, hey, I'd be organized too!  As for "simplicity"....there is nothing here that anyone with even a passing familiarity with the simplicity movement would recognize
The only thing hidden is why people like this book. Read no further if you don't want some spoilers. I don't recommend the book, though, and the whole thing is pretty much revealed in the first few pages so, I wouldn't worry about it. It's about a woman who is beaten nearly to death. She thinks the perpetrator is her husband, and her husband is sent to jail. Then her husband is released and someone else confesses to the crime. All signs point to the fact that the new guy is actually the perpetrator, and the book looks at our damaged protagonista's reaction to all this.I had so many problems with this book that I must number them:1. Our heroine barely has a personality before she is savagely beaten, and she certainly doesn't afterward. It's hard to have a ton of sympathy for someone with no goals or hopes. What does she want? Who the hell knows. Is this how the author sees women? As having no goals or direction?2. The fact that the guy who actually did it was a stranger. This is unlikely, especially when all signs point to the husband, AND the husband has a history of hitting his wife. So what is the message here? Women think that their husbands are the culprits but they are not? Women lie? It is a woman psychiatrist who helps our heroine "remember" that it was her husband who did it.3. All the men in the book are controlling jerks, even the ones who are supposed to be sympathetic and working for her own good. All the women are attached to men, and that's pretty much all that defines them.4. This book is supposed to be so amazing because it's a man writing from a woman's point of view, but it sounds like he used the method that Jack Nicholson's character does for writing women in As Good As It Gets: "I think of a man, and then I take away reason and accountablility.
Another Me, Me, Me book by Yancey!. Mr. Yancey better clean up his act.  This is another me, me, me book by Mr. Yancey.  He has no respect for Jesus Christ and the honor of the Name of Christ.  What book of substance has he written besides all the pop-psycho-theology junk.  Has Mr. Yancey written one book to protect the integrity of the church against those who try to destroy it.  For instance, has he written one book against homosexuality?  This is the most important issue today in America's Christianity and the greatest insult to God.  Hasn't he heard of Sodom and Gomorrah?  What does he think will happen to America?  Does he think that God will pleasantly turn aside as America's Christian churches ordain homosexuals?  What does Mr. Yancey think about spiritual battle.  Obviously he is blind as a bat when it comes to spiritual war.  Even when homosexuality is the most important issue facing the church, he refuses to stand up for Christ and His honor and protect the Body of Christ.  What a man writes shows a lot about his character and goals.  Certainly, Mr. Yancey cares only about making money and not about defending the Christian Church against those who attack it
Outdated information. I did not check the copyright date (2000) before purchasing the book, which I hoped to use as a resource in a seniors internet class that I teach. Unfortunately, this means that this information is 5 years old. On the first two pages alone, only 2 out of 10 web addresses are still valid. Not worth the price. The links that DO still work are helpful, that is the only reason for the one star
BOOOO....... RIIIIING!!!!!  Not only boring, but poorly organized, executed and written (and, did I mention, boring??)  After struggling through a few chapters, I tried skimming ahead just to see what was going to happen.  Unfortunately, I couldn't even do that because not much actually happens in the first 150 pages, and that which does is so convoluted and unclear, and written in such awful prose, that it is hard to follow.  Additionally, although the world is about to come to an end in the story (maybe), I did not really care about the characters, who are more wooden than Billy Baldwin's acting.Can I be any more clear?   This book is terrible.As far as the writing goes, I'll give you a few choice gems to whet your appetite in case you still want to give this mess a shot:"Some of the outfits attracted her.   Others were positively puritanical--- in a slinky sort of way."    (Hmmm... those slinky, puritanical outfits.  Can't you just imagine them?!?)"Men's clothing was no less flamboyant, or somber..." (Looks like men's clothing is also flamboyantly somber.  Wish Versace could take a hint from those futuristic, flamboyantly somber humans!)"Many of the spellings had been simplified or-paradoxically--made more complex." (Gosh!  Both simplified AND more complex?  How paradoxical!  Guess we've covered all the bases there!)So, if you'd like to read a spectacularly bad, though paradoxically un-good, science fiction disaster, with unexpectedly trite, though inconceivably wooden, prose about astoundingly boring, though unexpectedly laconic, characters, I would highly recommend this disturbingly terrible, though hopelessly awful, book
Two stars because of its legacy... ...I mean, after all, this is the Ironman series we're talking about...but for content, avoid this.  Rather, do yourself a favor and pick up Franco Columbo's book.  It is far, far superior and will give you much better results, and much superior advice.However, all the other Ironman books, with the exception of the "natural bodybuilding" book, should be picked up
Paranoid and unhelpful. Should you be afraid of your microwave oven? This book discusses that non-issue for several paragraphs, before concluding that no, you probably shouldn't be afraid of your microwave. That embodies what's wrong with this book. It pretends to be reassuring while actually planting a bunch of paranoid ideas. It also assumes that you, the reader, are the mother-to-be, while having very little to say to your partner, in a way that I find subtly sexist. Overall, it has plenty to make you extra-worried. For instance, it advises posting pictures of healthy babies all around your house (on the door, in the kitchen, on the bathroom mirror, really, all around your house), in order to continually remind yourself to eat a very rigid diet -- as if the bump in your belly wasn't already making you worry quite enough. If you think that it would be helpful to post a nagging sign on your front-door to ask you daily, "Have you fed your baby breakfast today?" then you may like this book.Personally, I found that _What to Expext_ left me alarmed about microwaves & air pollution & ambient noise & even exercise in ways that were not helpful. For a book so full of information, it also, curiously, failed to address any of my specific questions. How soon should I begin taking folic acid or other prenatal vitamins: as soon as I start trying to get pregnant, or only after the pregnancy-test comes back positive? Is there anything I can do to increase my odds of getting pregnant? What are those odds, anyway, for a woman my age? These seemed like reasonable questions to me, but to find answers, I had to look in the far-more-helpful book by Ann Douglas, _The Mother of All Pregnancy Books_ -- which also features a nifty week-by-week what's-happening-inside-your-body chart that I love. The other book I highly recommend is Armin Brott's _The Expectant Father_, which has terrific & reasonable advice you won't find elsewhere. By those two, not this one.
Get the whole picture elsewhere. It certainly is no surprise with the development of technology and expansion of capitalism that knowledge-based workers are the future in American Society. It seems to me that Drucker spent too much time attempting to criticize Marx, which was a complete failure. Drucker didn't even fully analyze Globalization in its entirety.The only credit that should be given to this book is his analyzation of the American worker. Nonetheless, he offers a limited viewpoint on all aspects of society. Look elsewhere if you want to get a better understanding of where our world is headed and what state we are in. Drucker neglects the whole and simply accepts what backs his own perspective
Very Disappointing. Today I looked at the genuine leather edition of the ESV single column. I love the translation, and the format. But the paper is so thin there is ridiculous bleedthrough. Since the print is only 10 pt, a crisp and clean page is critical for readability. Because the paper is so thin, it is easy to read the opposite side of the page!Additionally, the leather and the binding seem less than ideal.I have waited a long time for a side-column edition of the ESV, and it looks like I will have to wait even long for another publisher to produce one. Why Crossway would go to all the trouble of producing a new edition only to use such an inferior paper is beyond me
Do you real science?. Read some Cavalli-Sforza. This is pseudo-science on its worst, with fake, manipulated results from a "scientist" that has no commitment with coherent data-analysing in order to attest its discoveries. When Nature and Science magazines publish cover stories on the fallacy of human biological races, you just *can't* keep on thinking about if the results of this uber-nationalist, biased "researcher" are really as true as he affirms. Sad
Poverty : My Opinion. The key to getting out of poverty, is NOT to get into poverty to begin with. Examples include having children, but not having the financial stability to raise them. As well as the irresponsible usage of credit cards, which can amount to serious debt, getting married/divorced, taking out a second mortage on your home, after you have already paid your home off. etc, etc, etc,Adam J. MoraineDes Moines, Iowa
Blood-Soaked Fantasies. I'll start with the positive:  The main character is a classic hero in every sense of the word - tall, good-looking, smart, humble, etc.  The story was engaging and made for a quick read because it was easy to follow, carried the reader along and crafted as to have no wasted words.  In short, it was a competent work of fiction.That's where my praise ends, because this is the type of work that contributes to our national problems by feeding false stereotypes and radical agendas.  Sure, it's a work of fiction, no one is going to take it seriously, yada yada yada.  But that's not true, is it?  So many people in this country believe that this the plot of this book is plausible and even to be encouraged - - just look at the reviews to find the believers.Alright, here are my problems with it:First, politicians are corrupt and will sell-out anyone to maintain power, but that's not true if you're a conservative farm-boy elected despite your honesty from a midwestern state.  In Term Limits, Vince Flynn just beats you over the head with the "power corrupts" mantra - he doesn't show it in the actions so much as just repeats it like the chorus of a bad rap song, yet from the lips of the Marine Combat Veteran Congressman who is our protagonist.  You know what, though?  There are people in politics on BOTH SIDES OF THE AISLE who really want to do what's right, who really are trying to make a difference for the positive, for this nation and the citizens.  In this book, however, the public is a tool to be used and treated as if they aren't smart enough to make good decisions.Second, murder is a viable answer.  This repeats another mantra that conservatives repeat often - that they do the hard fighting and living to protect this nation and its freedoms so that the liberals can live in their fantasy-land.  Come on, get real.  This book touts a Special Forces Unit as being so committed to the Constitution that they are willing to murder high-level politicians and threaten the president with assassination if he doesn't balance the budget.  And, they get away with it because it's really the right side to be on.  Murdering our leaders is the answer according to Vince Flynn.  Murder solves the obvious weakness that we have as a nation, that being elections.  Elections apparently just get in the way.Third, the balanced budget.  For years and years - until the time this book was written - conservatives cried about the budget.  The book makes it the central theme.  Balance the budget and make us fiscally responsible.  It's important enough for a military coup supported by the protagonist of this novel.  A Coup!!!  Yet, when the conservatives did take power, despite Vince Flynn's prescient forecasting ability, they ran the deficit into uncharted territory and didn't flinch.  Even when confronted by this atrocity of fiscal irresponsibility, they claim that NOW!!!!! the deficit isn't a big deal, that it's really just a function of the percentage of GDP and we ought to all forget about it.  This book starkly reveals the disconnect between conservative priorities of the 90's and the realized result nearly two presidential terms later.  It's like looking back in time to a parade of nit-wits.Fourth, the good guys don't do bad things.  The Special Ops team kills only who they want and never any innocents - just the politicians.  The bad guys leave a wake of messy slaughter and civilians whenever they use murder as a tool.  Flynn spends way too much time making this point and beating the reader over the head with it . . . killing is good when only your target dies . . . but whatever happened to that oh so famous, though shalt not?- CV Ric
It was more about Christine than Erik!. The story was disjointed and lacked the title character. He introduced so many characters that he did not have time to bring Erik to life. I was very disappointed, but it was mercifully short
Crusader (The Wayfarer Redemption, Book 6). I found this book to be of little enjoyment, I feel it strays to far from the rest of the series and leaves the reader with a dull and vague finality to the series
Did they leave the main city ever?. I read this book on my way to Mumbai and when I arrived I thought the plane landed in another country or city. The book was great for Mumbai proper, but once you get out to the suburbs, where people actually live, the book was useless
Mel Levine is an idiot. I found this book to be insulting to children and to educators.  This man obviously has no idea what he is talking about, his ideas are strictly from the deficiency model of student underachievement which has been shown to be a faulty method of explanantion.  Any educator who reads this book and takes it seriously should be relieved of their jobs ASAP.In addition, his physical descriptions of his patients are bordering on perverted
This book is a shameful attempt to ignore the real causes of election fraud. This book is nothing but a shameful and disguised attempt (notwithstanding his denials) to discredit Democratic voters and to advocate the enactment of "election reform" laws that will disenfranchise voters, while at the same time ignore and dismiss the greatest threat to our democracy today - the privatization of our elections with corporate owned electronic voting machines that count our votes using secret software and leave no paper trail for auditing them.  To be more specific:The book is filled with purported examples of illegal voters, ignoring the fact that this problem accounts for a small minority of election fraud in our country today.  To remedy this problem, Fund advocates several measures that will do little to remedy the problem, while disenfranchising millions of voters, mostly those who are poor or non-white and most likely to vote Democratic.  Here are just three examples, among the many cited in Funds book: 1) Disallowing homeless people to vote because they don't have a proper address; 2) Requiring a picture ID to vote - which 10% of the population lack, and which amounts to a poll tax for the poor; 3) Abolishing the extending of voting hours in situations where insufficient allocation of voting machines results in as long as 10 hour waits to vote (again, this is a problem faced mainly in poor and minority neighborhoods).But whereas Fund is so concerned that an occasional illegal voter may slip through the cracks in our system, when it comes to electronic voting machines that count our votes using secret software, although admitting that mistakes are sometimes made, he claims that these machines cannot be used to steal elections.  To prove this point he does nothing more than quote a man who works as a PR consultant for Diebold - although Fund is Careful not to mention this fact.
lacking in details and intimancies. i'll be the first to admit that i'm biased based on my expectations from shaara's father's great book, the killer angels.  it is not fair to compare the two, but because reading the father's book lead me to buy this one, i thought i should mention it.  this book does not contain nearly the details and intimancies of the father's book.  it is not surprising since this one covers a much longer time frame than the battle of gettysburg, so shaara has less pages to devote to each person and battle.  but the result is a less satisfying book.  it skims rather than digs deep
You Can Do It. Jonathan Pond doesn't provide a financial game plan.  He rehashs the obvious information readily available.  The disappointment, in the end, is that his advertised website becomes another pay for service
Pray You Don't Need this Book. This book is an extremely difficult read.  Paragraphs repeat often on section headers.  So often in fact, it's apparent that no one including the editor has read the whole thing.  Coherent outlines are fairly nonexistent.  Review sections do nothing to prepare you for the ridiculous test bank questions included in the teacher's edition.  Contradiction between text, workbook, and test bank are common.  If your instructors haven't the nerve to do some critical analysis of these questions, your nursing career will start out in an extremely painful manner
Duveen. This book was horrible! There was no logical order to the book because it is just a bunch of stories put together about Duveen. It is so boring, all the book does is talk about how dumb millionares were and how they were stupid enough to buy from Duveen and his crazy ways. This book was so bad, please save yourself the time and money and not buy this book
Oh Snap. What is with this trend of good kid's books being followed up by seemingly rapidly produced, poorly thought out sequels?  As bad as sequel's are in American cinema, I think sequels in children's books are even worse.We loved Five Little Monkeys Jumping on a Bed.  Cute pictures, the fun bouncy lines of the old kid's song, plus an opportunity to practice counting.  And there is a lesson there.  Kids:  Don't jump on the bed.  The book legitimizes the temptation, especially at the end when we see the mother taking her turn to jump on the bed.  But the monkeys fall off one by one, Momma calls the doctors, and we see the monkeys lines up with there ice bags on their heads in their post-concussive stupors.But we recently got "Five Little Monkeys Sitting in a Tree."  The helpful everyday lesson for kids in this book is don't taunt a crocodile.  Okay, perhaps one could generalize this and interpret it as a useful aphorism for navigating hierarchies, but doesn't quite live up to the standard of the nice, concrete "no more monkeys jumping on the bed."  But beyond the pointlessness of this book, it's terrifying.  Although, in the end it is revealed that the monkeys do not get eaten by the crocodile (and on subsequent readings one spots them hiding in the tree, which is slightly clever), we spend 16 of the 28 pages thinking that some or all of the mischievous monkeys have been eaten by Mr. Crocodile.  We see nice colorful illustrations of distressed relatives including the frantic mother sobbing inconsolably.I know, I've been told I take these books too seriously.  Maybe your children won't be as traumatized as I was, I don't know.  Maybe it's a good way to teach math.  And, I suppose, also an opportunity to teach about the cruel, pitiless realities of the animal kingdom.  And to teach that the inherent nature of life is suffering.  Ultimately these are important lessons for the toddlers.  Just a bit heartless and harrowing for my taste.
Flawed Alternate History. To qualify as an alternate history, there must be a critical point which results in a completely different future.  The problem that I had with this book is that the point chosen to diverge from actual historical events is so inconsequential that, other than a few battles which only a historian would be acquainted with, the reader is hard pressed to know or care about the alternate outcome.In addition, this book lacks the scope or vision which one usually expects from this type of work.  It reads like a college  history book peopled with a few characterizations of the people of  the time.  From a historical perspective, the only really interesting character is a minor player compared to the other historical personalities which are mentioned.Finally, this work appears to be only the first of several, designed to drag the reader through a tedious serialization which only  a scholar, intimate with the minute details of Native American history could appreciate
Better to watch the films instead. This is not a biography but rather a discussion of each of Hitchcock's films. For each film there is:- Detailed synopsis- Cast and Crew details- Analysis of the filmThese first two of these items can be obtained from the Internet for free and who really wants to know the details of the story anyway?The analysis of each film is largely a waste of time as Spoto tends to over-analyse each film to the point of distraction while offering no real insights.If you want to find out more about Hitchcock's films I would recommend McGilligan's excellent biography. This discusses each film in the context of Hitchcock's life and career and is far more illuminating
Funny, but often misses the point. Rock Til You Drop is the quintessential screed every &quot;hip&quot;music journalist has against &quot;Dinosaur Rock&quot;. Trouble is, he doesn't even examine his own facts.  He admits early on that &quot;blame has to be laid at the feet of the boomers who continually support these over-the-hill acts&quot; and then goes on to spend the rest of the book taking on Jagger and Townsend. But that statement begs the question: if people are willing to spend their money that way, Jagger and Townsend have a right to keep delivering don't they? We KNOW cigarettes are bad, but if no one bought them, Phillip Morris would be out of business. Also, Strausbaugh takes on-exclusively- the behemoths of 70s-FM radio.  OK, so REO Speedwagon sucks.  But what about Tina Turner? If he had had the guts to take on the &quot;queen of rock an roll&quot;'s crappy Euro-pop which makes up 90% of her concerts before tossing out &quot;Proud Mary&quot; I would be more inclined to give him some props.  Or how about the Temptations, touring with only one original member left? (Ok he gets points for taking on icon Patti Smith) Also, I find that people who hate  70s rock acts are really just reacting to the unbelievable overplayed-ness of &quot;Classic Rock&quot; Stations.  Imagine, just imagine, Zep, Floyd, or the Stones had never sold more than a couple 100,000 copies. (Hard I know, but just try).  They'd be worshipped like the Velvet Underground and Big Star. Still, the book is quite good for a laugh, but best taken with the proverbial grain of salt
Might be good if written by a high school student. I would really like to know the average age of the reviewers who rated this book favorably.I read 210 pages and finally had to quit. I just couldn't keep reading. The writing is very unimaginative. The authors have a very limited use of vocabulary - the sentences are short and stilted and they often use the same adjectctive or other words repeatedly to describe a scene  or other point of the book.  Once you pick up on this you can't help but notice it over and over throughout the book.The resemblance to Lord of the Rings is almost laughable. At one point the 'kender' character (which would be the hobbit) says something like "I used to own a magic ring once - have I told you about it?"  Duh!!!Another thing that is really annoying is the authors constant use of exclamation points. Instead of using clever and sophisticated writing to make a point - the use short sentences punctuated throughout with exclamation points. Again- once you notice it, there is no ignoring it and it becomes more and more irritating. Where were the editors???Young adults may find this book interesting - which is scary - as for me this shows what poor writing it takes to get someone to claim a book is one of the best they've read.  It will be a long time before I give another Weis/Hickman book a chance. My time is too valuable to waste it on such poor writing
Negative stars. Contains every trendy lefty misconception there ever was about the war.  Totally and hopelessly untrue
meandering and plotless. i was disappointed after this book was suggested to me. nothing ever happens. there are a lot of long winded descriptions and background and very little story
Wrong content for young children. First, I hardly ever write reviews...but after this story, I needed to state something.  Second, I am not considered a conservative and relatively open minded. Third, I always appreciate history and culture...and understand this story was handed down through generations.However, never reading this story myself and reading it to my three and a half year old for the first time - I had to stop half way through the book after realizing the heart of the story surrounds a monkey killing a baby owl and the jungle searches for the killer while the mother owl grieves.  To complement the story, there is an illustration of the monkey (snarl showing sharp teeth) hitting the baby owl over the head with a branch...not a bedtime story for this family.It was given as a gift, and will be returned shortly..
Not Worth the Money. As is sometimes the case, the title of this book is somewhat misleading.  Having read several books which were generally favorable to Greenspan I thought this one might give a balance counter view.  Overall, it turned out to quite a disappointment.In the first few pages Professor Batra made it clear that he thinks he is probably more qualified to be the Fed Chairman than Greenspan.  On page 1 he says "He had not done any path-breaking work in economics, at least not that was commonly cited."  On page 3 he says "It could explain how he had advanced so far without sufficient credentials; how his extraordinary career appeared to derive crucially not from merit but from favoritism and connections".  Also on page 3 -"Greenspan did not even have a Ph.D. at the time; nor had he penned anything pioneering to earn the recognition of his peers".On page 7 I again knew the book was in trouble when Batra stated "...because in my view intelligence and integrity go together".  Does anyone actually believe that all dishonest people are dumb?  On page 9 Batra made it clear that the book was as much, or more, about his economic philosophy than it was about Greenspan when he wrote "In fact, I will offer a new economic paradigm to cure the global stagnation that has resulted from tax trade, and monetary policies inspired by Greenspan".  He does offer a paradigm; unfortunately, real world experience shows that the paradigm does not to work as he postulates.  Clearly, the book is attempting to put forth his agenda.As the rest of the book demonstrates, Professor Batra is a fairly strong liberal in whose world the working poor will spend all additional income and the idle rich will simply put extra income under their mattress.  He regularly harps on reducing income taxes on the "poor" and increasing them on the "rich" and "big businesses".  As recently as 2003, the Congressional Budget Office documented that the bottom 40% to 50% of the population pay little or no taxes while the upper income individuals and businesses pay the vast majority.  How the government could reduce the taxes on people who do not pay taxes is never addressed.  Professor Batra does correctly point out that the Social Security tax is quite regressive.In order to discredit Greenspan, Batra gives Greenspan gives Greenspan far more power than is warranted.  Throughout the book, Batra tries to convince us that the President and Congress did whatever Greenspan might suggest or support.  As written, the book makes one believe that Batra never watched Greenspan testify before Congress where the congressmen tried to get Greenspan to support their way of thinking.  Basically, Batra tries to blame Greenspan for all of the acts of Congress.Batra's new paradigm he calls Economic Democracy.  In this Economic Democracy the Federal Government would buy most of the stock of the large companies and then give it, or sell it at a big discount, to the employees of the companies.  That way the employees would be in control rather than the CEOs and boards of directors.  Clearly, Professor Batra is not living in the real world.  In the real world most of the employees who were given the stock would simply sell it in fairly quick order and that, of course, would return things to where they originally were.  For many years I was an "employee owner" of the nations largest totally employee owned company and I can attest that they do not operate in any way close to what Professor Batra assumes.  The good professor needs to get out his ivory tower and get a job in the real world.If you want to learn about Greenspan, this is NOT the book to read.  Save your money.
cliched, predictable. I haven't read any of the real Robert Ludlum before, but I don't think I will be starting if this is his style.The action scenes, with their falling chandeliers and mexican shootouts, are perhaps better suited to a 90 minute movie instead of a 400 page book. The weapons-catalogue padding is comical at first, later frustrating.The childishly cliched language is little help in distinguishing the myriad of characters and places. We know only the color of their hair before they are mercifully laid to rest.Perhaps most disturbing is the book's overall 1950's style racism  in which the Americans are dashing, multi-skilled warriors for good and the Russians, Ukrainians, even Germans are all ugly, inhuman or quickly dead.Whilst the premise for the story is promising and the plot is simple but water-tight, the reader is always a step-ahead of the characters. As other reviews have said, suspense and mystery are left absent
Just OK. I gave this 2 stars b/c I liked the author, but the story itself did not appeal to me.  I found I couldn't identify with Ali at all.  I thought her decisions and her actions were horrible.  This is just my opinion obviously, and again I liked the writing style of Carol Matthews but I was glad to be done with the story when I got to the last page
Voodoo Physics. Gary Zukav states in his introduction "I had never studied physics. In fact I didn't like science and I had no mathematical aptitude.On Opra (TV) he admitted that he does not have a TV which may explain his lack of contemporary physics let alone any depth.I noticed that some reviewers refer to the "New Physics" is that like "New Age" or voodoo physics?90% of the matter must be missing from this book. Or else how can he take physics out of context and make such fantastic leaps to religions parallels that he knows little of. He even twists the religion around to serve some unknown purpose.Many people say they did not understand physics until this book; Surprises, you still do not. You now know what Zukav wished physics was. Take anti-mater for instants that does not mean the opposite of mater. And the relationship between particles has no correlation with the relationship of dogs and cats.At least get it straight before mixing it up. Try reading some of these:"The Ascent of Man by Jacob Bronowski". The book available everywhere the DVD's available from the UK."The Upanishads" by Eknath Easwaran (Editor), Michael N. Nagler (Photographer)Or just about any mainstream material on physics and religion.Then if you still want to mix worlds into one read someone saner:"The Tao of Physics: An Exploration of the Parallels between Modern Physics and Eastern Mysticism" by Fritjof Capra.Also on the fringe but not as radical as Zukav is a series called "What the Bleep." (both in books and on video)
Why is there no ZERO star option??. I remember reading this book when I was a teen, at a time when the church I was attending was very much into end-time prophecies. Embarrassing as it is to admit it, I fell for it hook, line, and sinker. (*blush*) Yet, 1988 came and went, nothing horrible happened, and I forgot about this steaming pile of dog manure. It didn't matter, though, because there were, and still are, plenty of other "prophetic" books to fill the gap and keep Christians pants-wetting scared. I am no longer a Christian, and in retrospect, I wonder why we were all so scared by Hal Lindsey's nonsense. After all, the end times meant that Sweet Jesus was coming and we'd all be raptured away into the clouds to avoid all the tribulation and terror! I think there was the secret fear that we wouldn't be good enough and our allegedly loving savior would leave us behind on a whim.At any rate, I wouldn't recommend Hal's book for any purpose other than fireplace kindling, or maybe as a good laugh at the gullibility of desperate and easily frightened people. He is no different than any other self-proclaimed prophet of God, picking whatever scriptures he can to back up his crazy ideas and attempting to use math to count the number of days, weeks, and generations since this or that event. If you must buy it, look for it at thrift stores, where you can pick it up for 50 cents; save your ten bucks for something more worthwhile, like a couple of Spider-Man comics or something
Open house. This is another of those books for me that was very "middle of the road".  It was not terrible and it was not great.  It was a bit slow for my tastes and the characters were very ordinary.
Stay Back. Reading this book was exhausting, confusing, and extremely unsatisfying. Sentences and parqagraphs ramble arround with confusing descriptions and conflicting information. Some major elements that are introduced are left hanging; never brought up again. Others are revisited ad nauseum. Barr's quirky way of describing people and places with bizarre comparisons slows down the plot and is just missleading. Although I did stay with it until the contrived end, this is the first book I ever attacked with a red pen and edited a I went along. I estimate it could have been 50 pages shorter, and have carried far more impact, without the extraneous language. I am shocked she sells well enough to have published so many books. I'd stay far away from her in the future and purify yourself by reading a clasic P.D. James or a pure and simple Sue Grafton
Smile and have happy thoughts. I expected a lot more profundity about this topic.  There are much better works out there than this. The book is evidence that one cannot assume that because a writer has many books published that hey keep getting better, ofthen the revers as here where the audience in mind is simple people who find worn out bromides helpful.  Try angel dust insted
Interesting But Flawed. This is a messy book that succeeds (to the degree that it does so) despite its flaws.  Some of the subjects are covered well, some covered poorly, and even where there is coverage, the discussions are maddeningly inconsistent.First, the good: author Otto Friedrich was energetic in finding many former residents of Berlin as sources for this work, and some of the best parts of the book are their colorful reminiscences of their lost and ruined city.  Friedrich also included interesting chapters about the social milieu of the time, particularly the cultural scene: classical music, drama and the nascent motion picture industry.  And there are some nice character sketches of some of the leading artists of the era: Lotte Lenya, Bertolt Brecht and various musicians.  In general, despite the crazy-quilt nature of the coverage, Friedrich is best on the social history aspects of Berlin.Now, the bad:  The book is very scattershot, a mile wide, but mostly an inch deep.  For example, in the discussion of the German movie industry of the time, although Marlene Dietrich and Emil Jannings are discussed, Peter Lorre, Ernst Lubistch and F.W. Murnau are discussed only in passing.Among the pictorial artists, George Grosz is covered and discussed, but Becker, Nolde and scores of other artists get superficial or non-existent coverage.And maybe it is inevitable to try to discuss the tangled political history of the Weimar era and the rise of the Nazis in a history of Berlin, but Friedrich is not a professional historian, and his weaknesses in this area are glaring.  Any reader with even a passing interest in the Weimar era will find far better accounts of the politics of the period than Friedrich's book. And even if you grant that he needed to discuss the political events of the day in  his work, there's a lamentable lack of focus to his political coverage, which mirrors the overall unevenness of this work.  For example, his descriptions of the combat in the streets between the Freikorps and the Communists in the immediate post-war period have the freshness and vitality that come from the testimony of eyewitnesses, and they give the reader a sense for the chaos that became horrifyingly prevalent in Berlin.  But his discussion of Germany's policies toward the payment of reparations (the Dawes plan and the Young plan, etc.) is, at best, superficial and misleading.If you read this book, you might consider reading the sections that deal with the social history of the period and just skipping (or finding better sources for) the political history.
The Power of Your Subconscious Mind - Abridged CD. The book is AMAZING!  The CD is HORRIBLE!  Stick to reading the book yourself.  I have over 45 audio books...and this was like listen to a bad commercial.  I had to turn it off. There is no connection between the narrator and the words he is reading.  They don't even state who the narrator is!I recommend the book to anyone.  The content is life changing
Way overrated!!!. When I bought the book I did not know that they already made a movie out of it but I learned about it later on. So I was really excited when I started to read it - also because other comments were really good.Unfortunately the book could not live up to my expectations at all.First the story development is really slow- it takes an awful lot of pages before the actual crime happens.Second, several passages in the book do not contribute anything vital at all to the story but only slow down the pace significantly.The worst part of the book though is its style: It does not matter if a person really contributes anything at all to the story or the crime - he/she gets an extensive characterization. Most of them are several pages long and bore the hell out of the reader. Without this absolutely unnecessary amount of information this book easily could be about 200 pages shorter.But even if the pace is slow and the book should be shorter, couldn't it still be an interesting book? Unfortunately those of you who hope to find a decent crime story will be disappointed big time as well. The detective aspect is so simple it could be told in less than 100 pages. On top of that the solution to the crime is so simple that after the first clue you know who the murderer is - and wonder why you need to go through over 200 pages to find out officially.Conclusion:If you are a psychologist and/or like in-depth character studies this is exactly the right book for you.BUT for those of you who like fast-paced stories, ample twist and turns, surprises, action, thrilling developments and/or elaborate detective stories this book will be an absolute waste of your time. Please do not come anyway near it. Watch the movie instead - this way you will see some really great actors and are over with it in 2 hours
A Waste of Time. I don't believe I've ever read such an unhelpful organizing book.  Much of the book is spent on describing the assumed state of the problem, rather than on offering solutions to the problem.  (Do I really need half a chapter to tell me that my kitchen is disorganized?  If I didn't already know that, why was I reading the kitchen chapter?)  The remainder of the "stuff" organization chapters (as opposed to the time management chapters in the first section of the book) consists of lists of tips.  Unfortunately, the vast majority of these tips are things that most of us could have figured out on our own.  "Write down what you're running out of BEFORE you run out of it." We don't necessarily all DO this, but I don't think we needed help coming up with the concept.  Moreover, most of the methods the author recommends will only work well for a small segment of the population - that is, those who don't actually struggle with disorganization but who have simply not gotten around to getting organized before.  For example, the method given for organizing a room is to dump EVERYTHING into the middle of the room, from all of the drawers, shelves, etc., and start from there.  For some people, this may work great.  For many of us, it would result in being immediately overwhelmed, crashing and burning when barely into the project, ending up with a much larger mess than what we started with, and, possibly, giving up on any further attempts to get organized.Besides the lack of helpful instruction offered, I did not care for the author's tone/attitude.  The entire thing - especially the first section - made me feel as though I was constantly being beaten over the head.  The author continually railed against the "excuses" I was supposedly making for not getting organized and why I needed to just suck it up and do it.  Well, contrary to the author's perception, I had every intent of "sucking it up" and doing the job - that's why I bought the book and was reading it.  She also operates on the assumption that everyone has loads of disposable cash lying around and that everyone's lifestyle is - or should be - like hers.  ("When have you ever used more than one paper bag in a month?"  How about when we had the newspaper delivered every day and we used paper bags for holding the newspapers and taking them to the recycling point?  Does the author truly believe that NOBODY, ANYWHERE has a use for more than one paper bag per month?)  She recommends paying someone else to do nearly every imaginable task, and her not-so-creative solutions to most organizing problems are to just "buy such-and-such a gizmo."  If I HAD plenty of money to buy every organizing gizmo on the market, I WOULD NOT BE DISORGANIZED in the first place.Finally, she routinely discourages respect for the other people in our lives.  If someone is late for dinner, she says don't heat up his dinner, because his own poor time management is not your problem.  So if my hard-working husband is late for dinner because a job took longer than anticipated I should leave him to fend for himself because it's technically "not my problem"?I would skip this book, in favor of others whose authors are a little more knowledgeable AND gracious.
A monstrous and hilarious botch. This stands as a testament to the mediocrity and imbecility of Lenin as a philosopher. It is a overtly lengthy, dull and plodding work. Lenin demonstrates that he has little of the flair of a born philosopher but the  heavyhandedness and arbitrariness of a politician. This book, which is so  antiquated that it now seems unworthy of even academic interest, is nothing  but a compilation of quatations from previous Marxists, glossed and  re-worked to back up official party policy. Also includes a typically  stupid and blustering polemic against the majority of positivists and  idealists who are all deemed as &quot;blockheads&quot;; only the  revelations of Marx and Engels, as Lenin seems to think, contain the  monopoly of infallible truth. A laughable example of the dogmatism and  intolerance of an ideology upon which was founded a totalitarian darkness  that could not maintain itself without resorting to terror, persecution,  assassination, sabotage and institutionalised ignorance
The book description says it all. "As an African American gay man, Gomes is interested in re-viewing the biblical passages on sexuality and race" Without even picking up this book, you can see where it is going. The Bible clearly speaks out against the homosexual lifestyle? Strike those passages. The Bible is God's word and ought to read as such, not reinterpreted to make us feel better about our sin. By the way, being named one of the best seven preachers by TIME magazine is like being named one of the best seven Republicans by MoveOn.org, it doesn't hold much authority. Read a decent translation of the Bible for yourself and see what God has to say to you
Dumpster-diving at the Nivens's. How can you know that you are really, really famous? One strong hint would be that people are willing--even happy--to pay good money for a reprint of your old emails. On that criterion, and based on the cheerful other reviews, Larry Niven is really, really famous.Don't get me wrong; on my shelves are 22 books with Niven's name on the spine. But this one is a shoddy collection of castoffs, cobbled together not (I hope) by Niven himself, but by some marketing droid desperate to have some more Niven "product" to sell. It contains four actual stories totalling 100pp; the rest is trivial filler, including the above-mentioned printout of emails.Those might be of interest to a PhD candidate in English writing a thesis on"Collaborative Methods In Science Fiction of the 1990s" -- but they are really for the wanna-be SF writer who wants to fantasize that he or she is among the lucky handful who actually get to collaborate with Larry Niven. In fact the emails are no more interesting than email between you and your co-workers. There's no writerly advice from Larry to his pals, no "here's the golden secret of good plotting." You could read a megabyte of such email and be not one adverb closer to publication of your work.The rest of the trivia includes brief, uninteresting excerpts from novels; old, short, and dated essays; a report on a trip to an SF Con; a brief intro to someone else's book; and fragments of the "canon" (i.e. notes) on the milieu of the Man-Kzin Wars.This stuff is just sweepings from the writer's office floor. They show you nothing of Niven's imagination or plotting skills. Their content would have near-zero interest but for the fact that they were not swept up from your office floor, but from Larry Niven's.The editing is shoddy as well. There's no publication information at all (no citations for published items, no dates for unpublished ones). There's just no way to tell what has been published before, nor where. For example, half of the 100pp of actual fiction is a story, "Procrustes," but there's no hint that it was previously published as part of Crashlander (Ballantine, 1994). The lack of this data makes the book irritating to read (ok, when WAS this Intercon he reports on?), and useless as scholarly source material.This book is for the library of an obsessive Niven completist collector. Ordinary readers will do well to save their $7
The Wind in the Willows. This was probably one of my most favorite books when I was young.  I remember my mother reading it to me and how wonderfully Mr. Grahame captured the countryside and the wonderful characters.  All memorable!But now we come to this one.  A totally beautifully illustrated rendition it is (though it really is hard in my mind to beat Ernest H. Shepard's wonderful Rat, Badger, Toad and all!).  The reason for the 1 star is two fold.  One, it's an abridged version.  Yes, I know it's for consumption by younger folk.  I was, however,  maybe 4 or 5 when it was first read to me.  Why do we continue to sell our children short?  The biggest reason though for the poor rating is that several chapters have been left out.  The one I have always loved the best is "The Piper at the Gates of Dawn."  A beautiful tale of heroism, compassion, and love.  It's not in this edition.  An outrage!  I will NOT buy this book and I will certainly NOT recommend it to others
Queen Alex. We get that she is very connected and all that jazz, but the writing is exactly like she is writing this as a term paper.  Would it have killed her to have a little personality?This sentence was too weird for me, "I come from a famiy of writers, professors, doctors, people who focus on the world of ideas, on the world of thinking, rather than on the world of looks" (p.273).  Um, yeah, as opposed to the rest of us losers whose families focus only on looks??  What the hell is she talking about???
Poorly written and poorly understood twaddle. I have nothing but respect for someone who learns enough art and enough physics to write a proper book on the topic.  Unfortunately, this author has not done so.Put simply, this text contain information that is downright misleading.  Physics can be quite difficult, especially if one is trying to understand the esoteric worlds of relativity and modern (quantum) physics.  That said, there is no excuse for misleading a reader, when an educated layman's understanding of physics would reveal correct and useful information.Dr Shlain states several things that would mislead a lay reader.  For example, his understanding of the way lights add is just plain wrong.  This might not harm a painter, but would harm a digital artist or someone building light sculptures.  Were said painter to think that their flawed understanding was supported by relativity, they would resist learning how lights differ from pigments, making it very hard to move to interior design or other light-based domains.This complete failure to get the physics even close to correct makes me worry about the art history.  Again, he does not have to be an expert, but proper due diligence would suggest sending the drafts to a working art historian and a working physicist to get their feedback before inficting it on the general public.Again, I am not claiming that one needs graduate level work to write such a book.  I do claim that one should have at least an educated layman's exposure to the feilds before taking pen in hand
Where is the Glory?!. I dragged myself through every novel in this series with soap-opera like compulsion, always looking forward to the climatic appearance of our Lord.  Therefore, I anticipated this final novel to be glorious, as the title indicates, but I was woefully wrong.  Are my expectations too lofty for the day of our coming King and His Kingdom?  Certainly not!I support Christian fiction with many 5 star reviews,--just look at my other reviews--but I can not recommend this series
Confusing. Ann, an aspiring writer, knew of Lucy, an aspiring poet, when the two of them were students at the same college.  Actually, everyone knew of Lucy.  She was the one who'd had cancer as a child and whose chemotherapy treatments had left her with a severely disfigured face that continued to need surgery after surgery until the end of her life.Lucy was mistreated by her peers when she was a child, but it seemed that for the rest of her life everyone was trying to make up for that cruelty.  She was cheered for and spoken to warmly wherever she went, despite the fact that she seemed to have few redeeming qualities that would make her so popular.  Even Ann admits that she followed the gossip about Lucy's medical condition and she felt close to her even when Lucy had no idea who Ann was.Ann couldn't be more delighted when Lucy decides to move in with her after college.  She continues to be thrilled and grateful for the rest of Lucy's life, as Lucy drifts through existence, needing constant reassurance that people loved her, that she was beautiful and talented.  She also needs money, and someone to clean her apartment, and someone to do her bidding after her surgeries.  That person is always Ann, who seems to simply accept that this is the way their relationship should be.I was confused.  How could an intelligent, educated person allow herself to be treated so poorly?  What was Ann getting out of this relationship that I couldn't see?  Or was it simply that she befriended someone prone to depression and suicide attempts, so she felt she couldn't drop Lucy without putting her life in danger?  Ann is a much better friend than I could ever imagine being; I would have stopped speaking to Lucy after about the fiftieth page
Drama and Negativity. I was hoping for a really good guide to the business side of Interior Design from an expert.  This book was reccomended to me by another professional in the business as the "bible" of the business.  I was hoping for insights for a well-run, prosperous, effecient and positive business.  I was sorely disappointed.  This book is negative, preachy, outdated, and angry.  Written in a most uninspired manner and goes so far as to say things like, if you want your own business you better be prepared to give up bridge, tennis, dinner with your family... blah, blah, blah, or quite frankly your contract is to protect you, NOT your client.  Hmmm, really, last I checked it is supposed to do both.  Maybe it just does not represent the spirit in which I choose to do business.  I was hoping for advise from someone who is better at this than I am, someone who may have streamlined the process and knows good time management.  All the drama and negativity pulls your energy from whatever good information is present.  I can see the wagging index finger of the writer as I read, no thank you.Stell
Priests and Padres:  A Very Narrow View of Reality. As an active duty chaplain in the military I had a significant interest in chapter 9, Priests and Padres.  First, I was amazed at the number of references and her ability to read, organize, and synthesize them into a narrative.  These references, however, are derived from a significant number of ministers writings or sermons, which became the framework for her conclusions.  Furthermore, multiple references, representing several wars, are devoid of their cultural-historical context and woven into one sentence or paragraph leaving the reader to think the behavior, concept, or issue is timeless and characteristic of clergy.  I don't consider the chapter a valid historical analysis because of the limitations of the source material.  What the chapter does provide is a summary of her sources convictions and behaviors-which is not the whole story.  Since I considered her conclusions in chapter 9 highly subjective I did not read the rest of the book
An honest opinion. After reading this book and reading most of the posts, I can say that the ones who disagree with S. Hannity stole my thoughts. S. Hannity is good at yelling at guests on his tv show but nothing else. He never offers a thoughtful opinion and he argues with the stomach and never uses his brain. If you like controversy then buy Bill O'reilly and Michelle Malkin's books at least those two try their best to get their points across. Hannity's book is a waste of many even though it's only 5 dollars (you can buy two Mcdonald chicken sandwiches for that price).
Pagan yes, wiccan no. Wiccans find another book. There are SOOOO many GREAT books about wicca out there I certainly wouldn't waste my money again on this book, and I suggest others don't either. It is a lot of pop propaganda made to make wicca and witchcraft look like something out of the movies. It is full of false information made just to look cute so it will sell, sell, sell. This book is not for anyone who is seriously interested in learning Wicca or witchcraft in general.This supposedly "advanced" book doesnt go into details on how to make your spells better, how to connect with nature, how to beome stornger. It doesnt encourage deep thinking and lots of factual information. It DOES however make the reader feel like they can just read a spell out loud from the book and it will all work in a puff of blue smoke.This book is not about a different of opinions or different practices, it is about portraying a real, serious, religion as a fun and games, do whatever you want choice as she mixes in things in tradtional witchcraft that has been shown to have the oppsite and/or nagative effects, as well as doing spells which do not follow the Wiccan rede.Even though I am not in a coven I understand wicca is a religious choice and like any religion there are beliefs and redes which are followed. It is not 'do whatever you want to do and call yourself wiccan'. Yes some things in religion are personal choices but the building blocks of the religion are totally lost on her. Freedom of choice in religion is wonderful and its everyones right but if your choice is to make up your own religion you should not go around saying your wiccan when you do not follow the wiccan ways, Unfortunatly that is EXACTLY what ravenwolf does. She doesn't differentiate between the Wiccan and Paganism, in fact she barely cover the topics at all giving vague rehashed information from her other books. This book seems a nice commercial, cutesy items to make everything pretty and oh so shiny. This book is teaching hype not truths.This book is demeaning and disrespectful to anyone into witchcraft and wicca alike. There are many good books which put things in simple, pleasant terms without all the false, goofy information spread thoughout this book.Go pick up another book on whatever your interst (wicca, witchcraft, or paganism) and you will undoubtably end up more informed, this book will just leave you feeling broke.
Not worth the money. This book seems hopelessly out of touch with Black culture and US culture in general.  It also seems to be pandering to people who want to believe the Nation of Islam is not different than Hitler and the Nazis! How simplistic!  If you really want to understand race and how to do away with racism give this book a pass
hugely disappointing but essential for d&d 3.5. I was hugely disappointed with this book. While some of the new 3.5 rules features are nice, those familiar with its 2nd edition predecessor, the Monstrous Manual, will find the more aesthetic aspects of this book lacking.Firstly, the quality of the illustrations in this book doesn't even come close to that of the 2e Monstrous Manual (the same could be said for most of WOTC's illustrations). Some creatures don't even get an illustration.Secondly, the book is poorly laid-out. This has already been discussed, and WOTC rectified it in subsequent MM publications -- but they should seriously consider re-revising this book.Thirdly, the editing is almost nonexistent. Barely a page goes by without some sort of typographical error (ie. cleric spelled 'clertic' or 'x monster is about is about y feet high'). Hell, the sub-editors didn't even notice that their entry in the credits is written as "Editorial Assitance". There is a proofreader named in the credits, but it's painfully obvious she didn't actually do any proofreading before the book went to print.In conclusion, while the 2e Monstrous Manual might be obselete in terms of rules, it was a much better product. It had more monsters, better illustrations, a better layout, and better editing. It was better value for money than this rubbish. Sadly, though, if you want to run a game using the d&d 3.5 rules, you're going to need to get a copy of this book. See if you can get one second-hand, though, as it's really not worth the price new
Not Worth the Read (or  the Money). This is really an unfortunate book.  It reminds one of those "town hall" events that the White House orchestrated  for the foolish "60 stops in 60 days" tour during which President Bush tried to sell his Social Security reform plan to the American public.  Like those events, this book is shallow and polemical.  Altman divides the history of Social Security policy makers into the good (those who would never think to question or challenge any aspect of the program) and the bad (those who either oppose the program or so much as question any aspect of it).  She devotes not a single chapter -- no, not even so much as a page or a sentence -- to a cricital examination of her own preconceptions or to any attempt to understand in a thoughtful manner the positions of those who have critically examined various aspects of the program over the years.  This book is a catechism for Altman and the like-minded; there is no serious analysis anywhere within these pages.For many of us who do not favor individual accounts but who worry about the long-term solvency of the program, this book really is a disappointment; I recommend Diamond and Orszag's Saving Social Security instead.  For those interested in a detached, scholarly account of Social Security's early years, I recommend Achenbaum's Social Security:  Visions and Revisions.  For those who just want a thoughtful analysis of the issues at play in the current policy debate over Social Security, perhaps the best of all is Daniel Shaviro's Making Sense of Social Security Reform.  Anything but Altman's book
Disappointing instalment of Jack Ryan. I'd loved all the other Jack Ryan stories I'd read (though I hadn't read all of them).  This was a little too coarse and nowhere near as good as the earlier ones
You might want to choose a different anthology. This anthology will serve those who don't care about the information that footnotes would provide, and those who already have that information in thier heads.For students who want to give Swift a serious and informed reading, this edition is not ideal. Footnotes are few, and there's little editorial help in navigating the complex historical, political, and religious issues relevant to the text. Without an understanding of those issues the many of the works included are largely unintelligable and therefore a lot less interesting. For the price of a Norton, one expects a bit more padding to come with the text.
Just one long justification. Typically, I enjoy non-fiction, anecdotal books about a subject I can relate to--like mothering--but this book feels like one long justification of the mothering style and feelings of the author. She obviously feels guilty about the way she parented her children, and is using this book as the vehicle to help herself feel right about her own choices. There is NO consideration given for mothers who actually do choose to stay at home, would rather raise their children themselves than have someone else do it, and who actually enjoy the time they spend with their children as stay-at-home moms. She acts like these mothers are lying to themselves about their true aspirations. She claims that couples that feature a stay-at-home mom and a primary breadwinner husband are "backsliding" into traditional roles. If you're a working mom who feels guilty about the choices you've made, this book is for you. Otherwise, keep looking
What a disappointment after Friendship Cake. This book really fell flat.  Lynne Hinton's first book Friendship Cake what such a good read.  I was sincerely disappointed in her second work.  She had a good beginning, but after you read awhile the characters begin to become redundant, and a little dull.  There was some hope of a good plot, but something was definitly missing.  Try again Lynne, you have talent.  Maybe try a sequel to Friendship Cake.  The characters that you developed in that book are really good
Far from the standard of the Delaware series... Two huge problems with this book. One, this self righteous club is leaving clues to a killer and "traveling and learning" when they already know his identity, so I guess he can keep on dismembering women until the psychiatrist figures it all out and then gets teary eyed over his new special wine glass. Two, the city of Los Angeles functions as a character in Kellerman's other novels and adds alot of realism to the novels. This thing drags on in some unnamed, nondescript city
New to Irving?? --> try another one first. John Irving remains one of my most favorite and respected authors, in spite of, not because of this book.  After reading Garp, Cider House, and a few others, perhaps it is my own lofty expectations for consistent greatness that led to my genuine disengagement with this particular text.   Many of the classic `Irving' traits (sub-plots, interior dialogue, overt sexuality) encompassed the novel but the most important aspect was missing.  Even at the conclusion of the story I could not make myself care for or truly understand Dr. Daruwalla (protagonist).  After 700-something odd pages, (usually an aspect of Irving's style that I appreciate and embrace), I was ready for the novel to end.  And it did, rather expectedly and unceremoniously.  This is not to say that the novel should not be read, it was mildly enjoyable (perhaps because I read the majority of it on the beach), but as for John Irving's potential, it pales in comparison to `his greats'.  Hesitantly recommended for the veteran Irving reader is the best rating I can give this book.
Cat's Eye Witness. What happened??! I have really been enjoying the Sneaky Pie Brown series - up till now. Found this one to be extremely disappointing and far off the mark for all the characters- they weren't very likeable. Conversations were too preachy and had little or nothing to do with the basic story line. There was very little focus leading up to how the mystery was solved, and  the condition in which the murder victim(s) were found, more graphic than it needed to be.Ms Brown needs to go back and review her earlier books in this series and refresh her memory on why this series has been so fun to read.Jud
A highly agrivating pile of schlock. Frustrated authors take note, you can be published and you don't even have to worry about little details such as punctuation, sentence clarity, story, structure or grammar. Cormac McCarthy proves it eloquently with "All the Pretty Horses." Had McCarthy ever bothered to revise this draft he might of had a story, however he just cranked it out of his typewriter or computer put a stamp on it and shot it over to some publisher, who was either drunk or high or both, who thought "What the hell, let's print a really awful story and promote the hell out of it. I'm sure people will buy it, after all Americans don't care about grammar anyway."I'm not going to dive into the plot of the story- you can read it above. This book falls short of one of the best in literature. How they compare this guy to Faulkner is beyond me, the comparrison is an insult to Faulkner and people who read books in general. Most fifth graders can write better, more enthralling naratives.
I love Stone Barrington books - but not this one. I had this one figured out by the second chapter. Too predictable and shallow. Hopefully, the next Stone book will actually be worth reading
Disappointing... Simon Winchester's journey up the Yangtze river is often poetic and overruns with historical detail every eddie of the way up the river. If anything, this is an incredible historical text of China. The author's research is impeccable and undeniable. However, every word of the way through this book I couldn't help but feel a profound disappointment in what could have been, but clearly is not, one of the the most epic journeys of our time. Mr. Winchester's timing was perfect, a trip up the Yangtze before the Three Gorges dam would change it forever and as the country is experiencing a rebirth that will soon make it the largest economic superpower in the world where it is destined to stay for the next century.Yet with all his research, all the planning, and all the help he received along the way, we're left with only a few hundred pages of text. Where are the thousands of pictures? Where are the video clips of his journey? Where is the interactive website? He mentions in the opening pages that he packed a Leica M6 camera but, at least in the paperback edition, there is not a single picture in the book. From a man who successfully sued the Defense Department over the Freedom of Information Action in order to get the Pentagon's most detailed maps of the river, I expected more. Instead, we are left with a very long-winded account of the author's journey, but not a deserving account of China's journey
Lacks Soul. Yawn...another self-help book (this one is geared towards the would be business leaders of the future.)  I had to read this for a graduate class and if it were not required reading I would have certainly quit reading it after the first few pages.Leading with Soul is primarily a narrative tale.  That is, the bulk of the book is a tale about a fictional business manager named Steven Camden and his spiritual awakening.  Steven is feeling empty, depressed, etc. so he goes to this wise women in the woods where he learns to find his soul and thus be the best leader (and human) he can be.  (I know...pretty lame huh?) At the end of every section, Bolman sums up what is happening to Steve and what we can do to find our souls.You have probably gleaned from the above description what kind of book Leading With Soul is.  That's right another annoying, fluffy, self-help book that appears, on the surface level, to contain deep insights but is really lacking in sustenance. It really made me laugh when the author mentioned that we are always looking to gurus and fads to tell us how to live our lives instead of looking inward.  (And what, pray tell, is Leading With Soul? Does Bolman really think that his book is any different from the rest of the annoying self-help fads?)The suggestions in this book are nothing new.  You can gain the same insights from reading a book on organizational/industrial psychology.  People like to see their work as meaningful and worthwhile, to feel personally accountable for the consequences of their efforts, and to get feedback that lets them know the results....etc.And for all this finding your soul business...let me sum it up for you.  There should not be a disconnect between your home life and work life.  You should not check your "soul" at the door when going to work....you should be your authentic self...look inward for answers..yaddy yaddy..self-talk mumbo jumbo...etc etc.  Get it? Now you don't have to waste your time reading this book.
Dressed Up Postmodern Metafiction. The first book of Auster's New York trilogy was originally published in 1985, and in 1994 was adapted into this graphic novel. I've never read the original (or any of the other parts of the trilogy), so I can't comment on Karasik and Mazzicchelli's adaptation. However, I can say that since I'm not particularly fond of existentialist or postmodernist literature (those two terms being the most common critical shorthand for Auster's story), this really didn't do anything for me at all. The story is basically an exercise in metafiction, and if you like that stuff, great -- I do not. It is dressed up (at least initially) in the mystery genre, but that's just window dressing. (There's a long legacy, especially in France, of cloaking novels and films of ideas in genre trappings (for example Alain Robbe-Grillet's two books The Erasers and The Voyeur, or the films of Jean-Pierre Melville.)The story begins fairly straightforwardly: a reclusive writer of potboiler mysteries named Daniel Quinn lives in New York on his own since the death of his wife and son. A complete stranger calls him and thinks Quinn is a private detective named Paul Auster and begs him to to take his case. (The writer Paul Auster, and his family, shows up for one scene -- it's that kind of book.) Quinn meets with the strange man, who was raised in rather harrowing circumstances by his professor father, who was seeking to discover the true language of God. The father has been released from jail and Quinn is supposed to keep an eye on him and report. Everything starts to derail when he loses track of both the old man he's been following, and his clients. He spends several months watching the building and going crazy. Once he realizes they've disappeared, he finds his own life has disappeared as well. Obviously this is all somewhat about identity, but it's more about fun stuff like language, representation, and other tiresome postmodern subjects (as are the other two parts of the trilogy, which involve a man spying on someone, and yet another disappearance).It has to be said that the artwork does an admirable job of treating the bizarro world Auster has thrust his characters into. The simple, heavy black and white inking is a perfect match to the material, especially when the representations become less literal and more symbolic. However, if your taste runs more toward things like plots and characters, this is probably not for you. Fans of Auster may enjoy this, but fans of the graphic novel form are probably going to be much less keen.
My eyes glazed over.........FELT LIKE I WAS IN LATIN CLASS!!. Read both books and all the reviews of 2 books with basically the same name and if you want more information in a MUCH MORE user friendly, readable (in English) format at 1/2 the price buy the other book by Smith, Divorce and Money Everything you need to know.  I read a review that the Smith book just wants you to hire expensive lawyers.  NOTHING could be further from the truth. No matter what, you need a lawyer and this book tells you the same thing.   It doesn't mean you have to be stupid!   As a normal, middle class guy with a college education and MY OWN BUSINESS this book makes you feel like you are in Latin Class again.  Do your self a favor and not only buy Smith's book on Money get her book on Children.......you will save lots of time and stress
The Templar Papers. This is the 3rd book I have read on The Templars. The text is a hodge-podge of interesting facts and spectulations on The Knights Templar.  The disorganization and disjointed style makes the information difficult to follow.  There is entirely too much repetition and too many rhetorical questions in every chapter.  There is virtually no chronologic order to the material.  It would have been very helpful to the reader if the author provided a simple map to indicate the location of the many places, temples, churches etc. mentioned in the text. It was difficult to know without searching other references if the location of the place, incident, battle, or refuge referred to was in the Middle East(holy lands), France, SCotland or England!In Chapter 6, one of the contributing authors(Defoe)gives a history of the Canadian Masonic Templars and later in the same chapter, R. Lomas, presents a brief history of Freemasonary.  This was a bit perplexing and again, this underscores the disorganization of the text material.Finally, given the problems that quickly become obvious to the reader, the editor must take some blame or responsibility for the poorly organized material of the text
Where is the real Anne Rice hiding?. Being a day late and a dollar short, I finally decided to buy this book despite the poor reviews.I could not get past the introduction by Lestat (Anne) saying how stupid we all are for "not getting" his/her previous book".  She/he failed to explain what exactly it was that we were supposed to get, to my satisfaction anyway. AND the religious aspect of it all...... well I will keep my own council on that issue.My theory regarding Anne's later efforts is (please do not take offence Ms. Rice) that Anne lost her edge after her beloved husband died.  Could it be that he had some part (a large one)in her previous novels?  The beautiful prose is gone from her writing and I think as her writing deteriorated, her ego grew.All I can say is - Anne, stop writing, retire, open a doll hospital or be a spokesperson for charity. Kick back, bake cookies enjoy your life, just please do not torture us with any more writing.
Sort of awful. The biographer is so obsessed with Eliot's enigmatic inner state that she forgets to mention the things that happened to him during his life.  Gordon speaks of Eliot's desire to enlist in WWI without ever explaining why; she never mentions his attitude toward World War II; she doesn't say that he was expelled from high school, what he majored in at college, what his income was during his years of fame, what kind of contact he kept in with his family and how they thought of him later in his life, what kind of contions he liked to write under in the early years, why he put so many allusions in his poetry if he disdained allusion-hunting.  On the other hand, we do get excruciatingly detailed biographies of women like Emily Hale, Mary Trevelyan, and Vivienne Haighwood.  The book tries to bore into Eliot's psyche and present all of his poetry as autobiographical, despite the damage done to readings of both the life and the poetry
Its lousy. Did not work for a relationship of marriage with a 1 time affair involved. Book was good to start a fire with though. + Make Dr. Phil rich. I recomend "David DeAngelo" instead. Hes much better program
For tru-fans only. The novel was a badly-researched and badly-written third-rate airport thriller.  This illustrated edition is an expensive and attractive badly-researched and badly-written third-rate airport thriller.For tru-fans only
learned but dull. This densely written book gives the patient reader a few of the same insights that one can get from a good Chumash (Torah w/commentary) such as the Artscroll Chumash or the Conservatives' Etz Chaim-- so I would not say it is completely worthless.  The difference is that a Chumash is pithier and more clearly written than this book.  When I read the Torah portion every week, I sometimes can't put it down (especially in Genesis).  By contrast, I found it impossible to keep plowing through this learned but dull, dull, dull tome
Zoolander on the Wagon. Interesting observations about rehab and kicking a bad drinking problem, so part of the book is worthwhile and inspiring.  About half way through I had to quit.  It was too much like reading the diary of a shallow teenage girl.  (Will he call me?  Did the gorgeous guy wear that tight shirt to impress me?  All I do is think about him.  Is he thinking about me? Oh, please, please, please, let him say something to me.  I love you, but I'm not in love with you.)  On and on. The humor is mildly amusing, but seems forced; it doesn't ring quite true, like the author is trying too hard.  An earlier negative reviewer said they didn't like the author.  It didn't prevent me from reading the book - I like the writing of a number of unlikable people.  But I now understand - the book is completely about this shallow person.  His struggle with alcohol is one of the few interesting/humane things about him.  His colleagues force him into rehab, which turns his life around.  He returns to work a changed and invigorated man, loving life, but continues to mock the people who saved him.  It doesn't dawn on him to thank them.
Trees of Pennsylvania. This Field Guide to the trees found in Pennsylvania is typical of a field guide that is written by an author not intimately familiar with the region.  The range maps are generalized and don't accurately represent the actual distrabution of individual species as would range maps derived from research in herbariums with large amounts of Pennylvania material.  The notes that accompany the descriptions are general and again don't represent an understanding of the details of the state's topography, microclimates, and general forest/woodland/tree distrabution.  Not recommended.
The worst book in this series. Sadly, this series has been in decline and has hit a new low with the Cherry Ceesecake Murder. A movie company comes to film in Lake Eden on the recommendation of Hannah's college-age sister, Michelle. Of course, Hannah, both her sisters, her neice, her mother and both her boyfriends are all either cast in the movie or are working for the production company. And let's not forget that that the producer and the lead actress are Hannah's old college buddies whom she hasn't been in contact with for years. That puts the old improbablilty drive into high gear. Then there are other glaring improbables, like Tracy, Hannah's kindergarten-aged niece getting a major role in the movie playing  a spohisticated third grader. And doesn't anyone think it odd that this role wouldn't have been cast more than a day before the shooting began? Talk about a strained plot!Too many things in the book about filming the movie are just plain wrong or so unlikely as to be unbelievable that it is hard to suspend disbelief and stay in the story. But the book's worst flaw is that the prologue tells who will be murdered, but the actual murder doesn't take place until page 203. The preceeding 200 pages of back story give us plenty of tedious details about Lake Eden and Hannah's life, while only minimally advancing the plot. Meanwhile, Hannah continues to be a doormat for her mother and her dentist boyfriend's mother while she wavers between the dentist boyfriend and the law enforcement boyfriend. Frankly, I would have cheered if she had run off with the old college friend and the series had died a natural death.
Betty's Not What She Used to Be. Time was when the words Betty Crocker actually stood for something good in cookbooks, although the books' recipes, for better or for worse, were always a product of their times.  The very first "Betty Crocker Picture Cook Book" was published in 1950 (still available), revolutionized how cookbooks were produced, and was an enormous best-seller.  The recipes were the result of much thorough testing in the company's kitchens and in homes across America.  This was cooking from scratch with very little reliance on convenience foods in its pages.  This gradually changed as Betty and her books became more and more of a shill for General Mills' products and her name got plastered on one mix after another to the benefit of the company's bottom line, but to the detriment of good cooking.The two all-purpose cookbooks that came out in 1961 and 1969 were both loaded with recipes and wonderful tips/helps, although you could see the beginnings of sacrificing quality for convenience--especially in the 1969 edition--but this was still relatively minor in proportion to the majority of the recipes.  If you have one of these books, treasure and keep it; you'll never see their likes again.The current 10th edition looks good but, like the past several editions, the number of recipes has been drastically reduced.  Gone are the many variations, which are especially missed in baked goods.  It was wonderful having recipes of many cakes that were sized for two people or small families and having different mixing methods to choose from.  Now way too many recipes are of the "dump and stir" method instead of choosing methods that would insure the best results.  Also gone is the very friendly, assuring, conversationial voice of yesteryear.  Yes, there are recipes covering a wider range of ingredients and styles, but they are mostly stripped-down versions.It's obvious that the folks at Betty Crocker now seem to think that no one really cooks anymore and can't be bothered with proper preparation of dishes, which begs the question of why General Mills even bothers to publish these cookbooks anymore.  The "Better Homes and Gardens New Cookbook" is a better bet for those looking for an all-purpose, everyday guide.  It has a better layout, the recipes and ingredients are generally of a higher quality, and there are more recipes and variations than Betty Crocker's had in some time.  Even better, if you care at all about the quality of the food you eat and serve your family, I highly recommend the cookbooks of Cooks' Illustrated/America's Test Kitchen.  Their comparable, general-purpose cookbook is called "The America's Test Kitchen Family Cookbook."  The recipes are tested and reworked--dozens of times, if necessary--to be the best their staff can make them and you get precise directions in preparing them.  It's a shame that Betty Crocker has abdicated her throne and good name, but there's even better stuff out there now.  Go for it!
Racist through and through. Wolfe hero worships the Irish, and all others rank below them.The Irish detective Martin, DAs Fitzgibbon and Caughey can do no wrong. The Italians, Jews and Wasps have their good points, but are flawed in one way or another. At the bottom are the "dark people" as Wolfe constantly calls them, who have created a great, dark hole in our once-great society. There is the single exception that proves the rule of the black public defender, though the narrative implies that his legal skills are inferior.Granted it's an entertaining read, but don't be fooled
Don't bother. Bennett has little if any understanding of children, myths, fables and fairy tales. In this book he tries to bludgeon children into "being good" (his version of it) by terrorizing them. That's not how stories for children work. Some of the stories here are butchered; others are just plain bad. You'd be a lot better off by going to the original stories, and avoiding this collection, which is only useful for a door-stop. Bennett wisely avoids stories about his substantial failings -- slot machines, gluttony, smoking, booze. Hypocrisy, thy name is Bill Bennett
Who is really writing these??. I'll be honest, the last three novels have me thinking that Patricia Cornwell has sold off the franchise of her name- the "voice" the writer uses bears no similarity to her other novels, and its very frustrating. Leaves a dedicated reader feeling like she'd been attacked by the pod people or something!I hold firm to the idea that she hasn't been writing these novels. There is just no way
A Little Knowledge Is a Dangerous Thing. This is one of the three books I commented for a book review assignment of a Korean history class, taught by a very very renowned professor on Korean history. I got an A/A- for the review. My professor especially argeed with my comments for Triplett's book. As I disagree with the previous reviews on Amazon(which is the reason I chose to read this book. a big waste of time, sadly), I want to leave my review here for future reader's reference.Rogue State: How a Nuclear North Korea Threatens America, although written by a former chief Republican counsel to the Senate Foreign Relations Committee William Triplett II, is overall a disappointing book. Triplett accuses North Korea of proliferating weapons, supporting terrorism, producing and selling drugs, abusing human rights, and kidnapping females to be sex slaves. Although Triplett provides many detailed allegations and facts, he does not give credible and unbiased sources for many of his allegations, which greatly weakens his claim. Moreover, he presents North Korea as the most dangerous state in the world. He also accuses China for planning behind it and supporting it militarily, economically, and politically for almost sixty years, with a hidden intension to use North Korea as a "borrowed knife to kill other people." (p. 9) Contrary to what is suggested in his title, Triplett does not spend much analysis on North Korea nuclear crisis itself, but just the potential outcomes if everything goes as he argues. He also fails to give any constructive recommendations, only predicting that issues on North Korea, and nuclear weapons in particular, will not progress unless the U.S. define the issue not as "North Korea" but as "communist China and North Korea." (p. 12) Yet America already tried to involve China in solving the North Korea nuclear crisis.Triplett borrows the phrase "killing with a borrowed knife" from a Chinese military classic the 36 Stratagems. He presents this strategy as if it is a secret doctrine of the Chinese people. According to him, it means "to use covertly another country to annihilate your enemy." (p. 9) However, he apparently does not fully understand the meaning of this phrase. Triplett says that to make the stratagem work, it has to be disguised, by keeping your opponent from learning vital information (denial) and misleading him about your true intentions (deception). He therefore argues that China and North Korea have been adopting a strategy of denial and deception, trying to hide their malicious aggressive intensions. (p. 10) However, his interpretation of this stratagem is completely wrong. It is true that to make this stratagem work, one has to disguise his intentions. Yet the disguise is not only for the opponent, but more importantly, for the one you "borrowed the knife" from. The point of this strategy is to deceive someone, make him fight against your opponent, and let that person bear all the costs. That China and North Korea indeed made some secret agreement, as Triplett suggests, goes directly against this strategy.  Therefore, Triplett cannot reach the point that China and North Korea have been using denial and deception by just claiming that they try to "kill with a borrowed knife."Triplett goes on to spend about a quarter of the book on a history of the role Stalin's Soviet Union and Mao's Red China played during the Korean War, to demonstrate their close connection with North Korea. Triplett gives a list of records of the Soviet's and China's involvement in North Korea (p. 9), without providing any source for his allegation. This puts the reader in doubts about the credibility and impartiality of his claim. For example, Triplett writes that "Moscow and Beijing helped Kim start the Korean War; Beijing intervened to block a United National victory in the war." (p. 9) However, the question of who started the Korean War, North or South, is still debatable. In a more impartial view, Bruce Cumings thinks that it is wrong to ask who started the war, since both North and South Korea were at fault. (Cumings, Korea's Place in the Sun. p. 263) Cumings argue that the United Nation's decision to enter the war against North Korea was solely based on American and South Korean sources and was likely to be biased. (Cumings. p. 263) Thus, accusing China of haveing blocked a United Nation's victory without providing enough background information could mislead the reader. In another allegation, Triplett claims that "communist China helped Pyongyang to start the Korean War." (p. 73) This accusation is apparently false. At that time, China saw conquering Taiwan as its priority and did not want the Korean War to divert its energy. It did not support the idea of the Korean War, and did not help North Korea in the war until very late, actually too late in a military strategy perspective.To demonstrate that the Soviet Union, China, and North Korea produced "a series of decisions that initiated a reign of terror over millions of people in the Far East and established the framework for East Asia today," Triplett claims that Stalin, Mao, and Kim decided in a communist summit in late 1949 to let Kim conquer South Korea, Mao conquer Tibet and Taiwan, and Ho Chi Minh conquer Indochina, and attack the Japanese Communist Party. (p. 21) However, Triplett again fails to credit any source for this important decision. What's more, as we can see after more than half a century, none of these goals materialized except for China's takeover of Tibet. Many of these aims were even never attempted, let alone attempted but failed. Therefore, even if Stalin, Mao and Kim did make a secret agreement, with only one goal achieved, I wonder whether China and North Korea indeed have the ability to initiate a reign of terror and put billions of lives in danger, as Triplett claims.Triplett claims that China supports North Korea and is to blame for making North Korea so dangerous. However, Triplett fails to make it clear what China's intension and incentive to support North Korea is. This is crucial to how the non-communist world should respond. China may not have malicious aims to support North Korea. It could have done it partly because of Mao's romanticism to help his communist friend in the 50's. And once the support started, it would be hard to stop. China might also support North Korea to increase its own influence in international politics but without the aim to use North Korea to dominate the world. Such intensions are perfectly justified. The U.S. is also supporting various countries and regions around the world in order to have a stake in regional politics, such as Taiwan, Japan, and Israeli. Another possibility may be that China sees the trend in North Korea towards terrorism and instability. Fearing a neighboring country getting into trouble and the spillover that would ensue, China may be trying to prevent a social and political crisis in North Korea by providing support. Triplett fail to analyze any these possibilities. In fact, China should be one of the countries that want to see North Korea to become a terrorist state the least, unless it can fully control Kim Jong Il, which Triplett fails to prove either. Triplett provides another piece of evidence against his accusation of China's involvement himself. To prove the danger of North Korea, he says that it turned to income from producing and selling drugs, after China cut its support to fund its own economic development. Regardless of the amount of support China has provided North Korea, how could we assume that China is the evil planner behind North Korea right now, after China already cut its support?The weakest point of Triplett's book, in my point of view, is that after making so many unaccredited and rather controversial claims, he fails to go anywhere significant in his analysis. He does not really examine the implications of the nuclear tensions after 2002. He argues that there is no simple military solution to a nuclear North Korea. To solve the North Korean problem, the U.S. has to define the problem not as North Korea, but as communist China and North Korea. (p. 12)  Although Triplett claims that the Bush administration are blind to the role of communist China, what I have shown is that China has always played an important role in negotiating with the North Koreans. And it is not the case that the U.S. has not tried to make China influence North Korea more. If China has tried all it can, Triplett's conclusion does not help the problem. If China tried to hide its influence on North Korea, then what can America do even if it re-defines the problem? If it wants China to move, there will be a price to pay. This is a known rule of the game of international politics. Triplett's suggestion is incomplete without a recommendation on how to employ China into the negotiation at a reasonable price.To be sure, Triplett does provide many examples and tries to prove the connection between China and North Korea from an historical perspective. However, because he fails to give references for many important examples, the creditability and impartiality of his book, and consequently his conclusion, is in question.  Readers with more knowledge about Korean history could easily give alternative explanations of his examples that do not lead to his conclusion. Besides, his conclusion does not contribute much to the situation right now. Given Triplett's role in the U.S. government, this book is important and valuable in another sense--it more or less indicates one U.S. governmental official's perspective on North Korea, a dangerously prejudiced perspecitve.(Another minor point, Triplett should have done a better selection and framing of the cases. For example, in a list of prices the non-communist world have paid for North Korea, Triplett parallels the loss of more than 50,000 Americans' lives in the Korean War, to the killing of a high school girl singing in a chorus in the same shootout that killed the South Korean first lady. (p. 7) No matter how cruel the killing of an innocent high school girl is, it is way less important and significant than the more than the causality of 50,000 Americans in the Korean War. Putting these two on the same list gives rise to doubts about the author's capability.
Pure Pablum. I have long been a Dowd column reader, along with a half dozen other opinion page writers, and picked up this book at our local library.  There are many reasons why one writes a book, you have a story to tell, your editor / publisher gives you an idea, you want to keep your name before the public, you need the money, just to list a few.  I can't think that Dowd needs the money, unless she is being bribed because someone found out she is actually a conservative!  I also don't believe that she has the visceral need to keep her name before her public.  If she had a story to tell, one would think that it would be told in a more convincing, thoughtful manner.  Since I am male and a grandparent, I'm guessing that I am not the target audience for this book, and the positive reviews from several potential career women would seem to corraborate that they are the intended audience.  And herein lies one of my problems with Ms Dowd and this book.  It appears to have been written by a mid to late 30's woman surprised to find out that her options are running out, not by the 50 plus year old that she is!  Those of you with 50 year old mothers or aunts, I ask you, do they talk like this?  Is this the kind of advice you would expect from them?  Or has Ms Dowd, at least emotionally, stopped growing at about the same age as the ladies from 'Sex in the City'?  I expected a significantly more mature viewpoint from her.I also quibble with several other points she attempts to make:  That Hillary killed feminism.  Well she didn't.  Feminism is alive and well, just ask my sisters, wife and daughter.  Some feminists lost their credibility attempting to defend Bubba's actions with Monica L (moral relativism), but what killed that part of feminism which was based on the supposed male belief that women were not their equals, was its internal inconsistencies---the same thing that doomed the USSR!  Please try to tell my wife that men are her equal when she had been leading her family--three brothers just like Ms Dowd--since she was 12!Yes, drugs and plastic surgery are a problem--for folks with too much disposable income and too little to keep them out of trouble!  New York, LA and DC,while fine cities all, are not the entire US, and what passes for currently acceptable behavour, among the elite in those three cities, just isn't on the average person's radar.As earlier reviewers have said, other writers have made the same arguments, much better, so I am left not having a reason why this book was written.  I am left with an hypothesis only, that Ms Dowd is questioning decisions she made over the last three decades, trade offs, questionable choices, etc. and is wrestling with those, not having yet come to a conclusion.  My data points are her lack of a response to Monica L; her acceptance of the job after her potential boss hits on her, giving a bye to Anita Hill for somewhat similar behavour, ditto Hillary.  I wonder what those nun she had in school would say?As commented in the book vis a vis Elizabeth Vargas' removal from the Evening News, perhaps she doesn't have the 'gravitas' to write a book?  Or as Helen Gurley Brown said of Ms Dowd's initial effort for Cosmo 'pure pablum'
Needs to be more accessible. Conscious Acts of Creation: The Emergence of a new Physics by William A. Tiller, Walter E. Dibble, and Michael J. Kohane.Publisher: Quality Books Inc.pages - 418I like and don't like this book. It's billed as a book written for physics, but also applicable to people into metaphysics. But the problem is that the writing for this book is not intended for a general audience. It's intended for an audience that has a developed awareness of the highly technical language of physics and math. As such many people into metaphysics will have a hard time reading this book. I did. I had to read and reread many sections to try and understand the language being used.A big part of the problem is that the organtization of this book's chapters is highly erratic. The authors jump around a lot. I actually understood a few of the final chapters, but only because the language was more general. I think it would have served the authors better to have put those chapters in the beginning of the text. Also none of the terms and acronyms were well defined or spelled out. A glossary would've done wonders for this book.In defense of the book the ideas being worked with are intriguing and the authors did perk my interest and keep me reading...the problem is that while this book could interest a large audience of people, it can only have a big impact on a much smaller audience because of the highly technical language, bizarre layout, and lack of cohesion. As such the potential good this book could do is marred by the inability of the authors to write in a more accessible manner.I did manage to understand a fair amount of this book, but I can only chalk that up to reading up a lot on physics and science. I only hope that the authors' other books are more accessible.Regrettably I have to give this book two stars out of five and recommend to the authors that they work with an editor who can help them with layout issues and with language (in terms of making the language more accessible to a wider audience)
Save your money. . . . This book is nothing but a sales pitch for their newsletter and most of the info is both sales 101 and found freely on the internet. Very disappointed
The information is a bit out of date. Since this book was kind of recommanded with Cakewalk's Home studio so I took it then learned that the Home Studio mentioned in this book isn't the same Home studio 2 product currently made by Cakewalk. Some information still applies but it'll take some mental exercise to filter out those no longer applies. If you are looking for current information on Cakewalk's product Home studio 2 then you need to look elsewhere
Much ado about nothing. There is very little of substance to this book with regard to concrete suggestions on strategies a person can use to work with ADD as an adult - especially in the work place; lots of "stories."  There is great emphasis about enlisting the help of family, friends, coworkers.  People with ADD just want to work with it; they don't want their world to be involved in it. A very disappointing missive
Yawn. I read about one hundred pages and then, when the consistency of the plot did not improve beyond that of an extra runny rice pudding, I quit. This was my first King book and I am not rushing out to buy another one, especially since it appears to me that this author is unable to pen down anything less than a 1000 pages.Is it any wonder that it is selling on Amazon for a penny? Actually, I would not even pay that for a product that is as exciting as a bag of wet hair
This book is seriously dated. The prof at my college chose this book as a textbook for a OS course. That is a mistake. This book is too dry. The content is dated. It is simply NOT readable. I don't know why so many people give it good rating. Go figure.....
what a bummer..... I was on my way out of town and pick this book up on a whim as I breezed through a book store...I love western romance, but I had a hard time finishing this one!I did'nt realize it was a reissue, and after checking other reveiws after I returned home..I can see now why this rancher was such a demanding man (I am glad times have changed!).Anyway...this paperback was a waste of paper...I didn't care for the way Jason treated Kate and I felt it was borderline abusive and Kate just put up with it! Half of the book was spent describing what everyone was wearing, do you really need to know what someone has on everytime they enter the room? or when they light a cigarette?  The romance was hard to find in this novel..at least the heart pounding kind I was looking for! I will be more careful when I grab a Diana Palmer book in the future..
A poor book. Unfortunately this is a poor book, and if you are a busy person I would recommend you find something else, something that is well organised instead.This book had poor organisation, lots of grammatical errors, and a ton of verbose blather with not much meaty info, and badly failed my signal to noise ratio test.It would be possible to strip two thirds of the words out by reformatting concisely, as well taking out all the times the authors say 'as we are showing you'. I would certainly have appreciated it much more if they had been concise, as my time is precious.I purchased this book along with charles petzolds 'Application = Code + Markup" and 'Essential WF', and both are excellent books. They are the standard I expect from 'professional' programming books, particularly ones with Pro in the title! They had a concise and structured presentation, good editiorial proofing and grammar, and gave me insight I could not easily get from MSDN.To the authors: sorry to give your book a bad rap, but it's true and you can produce better work, I'm sure of it. Also, you should get a good editor, who will catch grammatical errors, and stop you being self indulgent and bring your focus back to what the readers want, which is not to hear you say hundreds of time 'as we are showing you'!
More towards knitting. I bought this book but I did not really read carefully, this book has knitting, and more knit than crochet and the crocheted scarve are nothing worth looking at, yarn they use not as nice as the knit.  More to beginner crocheters.. They could of been bette
My Life Frying Peanut Butter & Banana Sandwiches. Another attempt to cash in on the "I knew Elvis before he weighed 475 lbs" craze. Who really cares? The man was an semi-articulate imbecile who sang the same juvenile songs with inane lyrics his entire life. He never grew culturally, intellectually or musically, although he grew quite a bit physically. Only in America could a hillbilly named "Elvis" become the idol of millions. Grow up, people. The only thing extraordinary about Presley was his pompadour which, I believe, is listed in the Guiness Book of Wolrd Records for highest, silliest hair-style. Everything else was due to Colonel Parker, a shrewed promoter and businessman who put a moronic hick, with marginal talent, into a star. The only brilliant talent in the equation is Parker. Your hero Elvis was a lackey
Minus 10000 stars. This book is complete garbage. There is nothing in it that is factual. If you want to read tabloid material please go buy &quot;National Enquirer&quot; or something.. Don't give your hard earned money or attention to this guy. He never knew The Harrison's and the book is fabricated stories by zealous bad author. Please go buy George's book &quot;I Me Mine&quot; or The Beatles 'Anthology&quot; book is want to learn the truth about the man
Pleasing but not thrilling. The twin stories of this book are entertaining and interesting - although not exactly enthralling. However, it's not                           very well written; Peel's descriptions are often rather pedestrian. The book is, in many places, quite repetitive. I also don't think John Peel has got the hang of the characters' - they don't speak like themselves - although I do think he accuately captured their moods. Overall, it's a decent book which could have been greatly improved by more careful editing (as I've found with many Star Trek novels)
Bummer subject to be writing about!. No one alive today cares that NY had fires in 1741 (UNLIKE THE CHICAGO fIRE OF 1871). Why did author Lepore choose to bring up this terrible racial incident. Is she trying to create trouble? Be a traitor to her own race? Book is well researched I guessbut the racial subject matter stinks and was unnecessary to bring up! Totally unnecessary!
Save your money!. Remember those fluffy Life 101 books - the ones written on only half a page, with some dippy quote on the other page?  Fisher's books use extra wide margins and line spacing. Save your money for books with substance,  like Peter Lynch's &quot;Learn to Earn,&quot; Ben Stein's &quot;Bunkhouse  Logic,&quot; or Napoleon Hill's &quot;Think and Grow Rich.&quot
Preaching to the Choir. I was very excited to read this supposed classic of sci-fi but was left very disappointed. How does one take the midieval idea of the devil seriously in the face of a more varied and marvelous universe than anything concieved of in our distant past? We must be less anthropomorphic in our ideas about the universe. The father's reaction to a "perfect" but godless alien species is to fear it was set up to fool humans into thinking they don't need god to be moral. However, that's just it - WE DON'T NEED GOD TO BE MORAL! Even Plato asked more than 2,000 years ago if the good is good because of itself or merely because the gods say it is. If morality is only good because God says so, then murder and rape can be good if God just changes His mind. Please!!!!!!!!!!!In reality, the father's attitude is outdated and in-fact as frightening as Kierkegaard's psuedo-religious justifications of terrorism. If you're looking for a real examination of religious questions coming into conflict with cosmic issues, read something else. This is stacked in religion's favor. Moreover, it's written in a very confusing and tedious style - do we really need a scientific explanation of why a man's eyes get tired from reading too long just so the theme can be so ridiculous!?
Who wrote this?  Surely not Hillerman. If Tony Hillerman wrote this novel (novella actually), I sure can't tell. I have been a Chee/Leaphorn fan for many years, but this novel is not in the same league with Hillerman's other work. It is reminiscent of a 'B' movie. Instead of building suspense, the plot is laid out all too plainly, the characters are unreal, and the Chee/Bernie romance doesn't ring true.  I am amazed that it was published
An Essay Concerning Human Meandering. Not just simple ideas in this one but stupid ones too.  No one should ever read this colossal waste of time unless by reading you mean beating yourself unmercifully on the face and head until death occurs
For absolute beginners. This book could easily have been called 'How to swap out modules in a computer monitor'. It is aimed at too low a level to be of any use to anyone seriously interested in troubleshooting a faulty monitor on their own. Whenever any serious 'troubleshooting' is required, the author simply says ' substitute a know working module' . Yeah!!, like we all have lots of them lying around. If you've got a faulty monitor and you dont know where to start looking for the problem you'd be better off putting the cost of this book towards getting it repaired professionally. Just my opinion for what its worth
Meh. First of all, I just need to state that "Odd Thomas" is one of my favorite novels ever.  That said, "Forever Odd" was a pretty big letdown.  It lacked much of the intrigue of the first one, which is what I was expecting.  By the end of "Odd Thomas", you pretty much know all of Odd's secrets and clear portrait is painted.  I had a feeling that Koontz would not be able to do this novel the same way, and I was correct.What bothered me the most about this book was that it had little to do with Odd Thomas.  If you cut out the first few chapters, last few chapters and change the names of the characters, you would have a book that would not even remotley remind a reader of "Odd Thomas".  In fact, I think that Koontz probably should have done just that.  If he had taken the plot out of the Odd Thomas universe and developed a stronger relationship between the main character and Datura, it would have made a good story.I also felt that a good third of this book was nothing but space filler with Koontz describing Odd wandering through complicated water drainage systems and a burned out hotel/casino.I thought the last three chapters of the book were amazing, but it didn't make up for the less than satisfactory sixty chapters I had to read to get there
Pull-ease. I'm with the reviewers who thought this book was ruined by the ending. I'm all for twists, but this was completely ridiculous and incongruous and dumb.The book tells the tale of Hamptons small-time lawyer Tom, who had a brief career as a professional ball player. Apparently sometime in his youth, he dumped the woman he truly loved, Kate, who became a hard career lawyer in NYC. We know she's hard because she smokes, and has no friends, but in the end, they band together and find true love while defending a young black ball player from a multiple murder death-penalty charge.It's twisting and turning and super derivative, but mostly it's satisfying. Until the last few chapters, when the writers throw in a major monkey wrench that turns the books into a joke.I felt as if the entire reading experience was false, and a waste of time. Badly done. Cheap.Patterson's books may not be the best, but they ususally don't make you feel this cheated
Vauge. The stuff in this book is explained in a complex manner. Though it is well organised it lacks clear representation. It looks like linux man-pages are explained in an organised manner. Could be used as a reference book, but not for learning
Not so good... I just didn't like this book very much. While it may have been a case of personal taste this book didn't seem very engaging or interesting. It was an interesting idea to begin with but the book seemed to drag on and on. It could have been a lot better than it was. I wouldn't recomend it.
i want my money back. I'm really surprised the authors became so famous as the new gurus of CRM or 1to1 marketing. This book is just a collection of superficial case studies but it says nothing on the technologies used, the real problems companies had to face when they implemented CRM programs. This is just a book for high school kids or sunday newspaper readers who want know more about CRM without getting into the details. Not worth the money and absolutely simplistic
Save your money. Poorly done character work provides no insight into this weakly timed and tasteless rendition of a low caliber shot in the dark at a horror "novel".  No scene work, outside of the "Beast house", implies that this author is grinding out a novel with the intent to write a second or third in a series of books about cheap sex, gore, beasitality and pediphilia intent on making the reader retch.  This book would banned from some web sites, and the nanny guards would block it from most computers.Three hundred and nine pages could have been shrunk to about one hundred considering the large print, oversized margins and full blank pages between chapters.  Publishers at Leisure Fiction should have reconsidered printing this one.Save your money and buy a book that is properly labeled as adult porn. At least you will know what you are getting
Too painful. Ms. Headley really does seem to be just thrilled with herself.  That's fine, but I was far too bored with her life to want to keep reading
These Bleachers are HARD!. I was very disappointed in this selection.  Maybe a MALE football fanatic would find something appealing, but I was VERY bored!  Take me back to court, to the lawyer's office, to the judge's chambers,...just about anywhere but these bleachers!!
Sometimes you CAN judge a book by its cover. I wanted to love this book.  I looked forward to reading it, and I found some value in it.  HOWEVER, after I finished I found myself staring at the cover photo, which is worth the proverbial thousand words.  A group of students, each gazing raptly at the author, who is in front of them, smiling outward.  Make no mistake--this book is about the Wonderfulness of Rafe Esquith.To hear Esquith tell it, there's not much good about public education except his own work.  He has nothing but contempt for his most of his fellow teachers and he shows it in the nicknames he chooses for them:  Miss Mothballs, Miss Busy-as-a-Bee, Mr. Incompetent, Mr. Helpless, Miss Egghead, Miss Cruise Director.Esquith is like our great-grandparents who walked five miles barefoot in the snow to school and back--uphill both ways!  There is no shortage of stories about how much he's sacrficed and how much he gives; there are even plenty of tales about how much he's been underappreciated.Still, there are great gaps in his account.  He tells about the many extra jobs he's taken to provide money for his class projects, but it doesn't quite add up to all of the long and expensive trips he takes his students on.  I suspect that what's missing would make for some interesting reading.I took away some important messages:  don't underestimate students' abilities, give them a sound context for the challenging literature one assigns them, let them know that it's necessary to work hard in order to excel, prepare them for field trips so they know how to act, what to expect, and how to get the most from the experience.  Expect excellence of one's students and of oneself.I imagine that Esquith is a pretty good teacher (you need to read Charles Osgood's poem "Pretty Good," quoted in this book, to understand how faint my praise is).  This book, I'm afraid, irritates more than it inspires
Disappointed. This book was as much the author's opinion and imagination as anything else. He makes claims that are not substiantiated by facts, biblical or otherwise. I will not purchase further books by this author
Disappointing. Positives about this book is that, unlike other books which offer "cure", nowhere does Null states or implies that the book is intended to cure or eliminate any sort of disease or illness, besides that aspect, the book is largely disappointing. Unfortunately much of the information contained here can be found on the Internet, but there are several problems as well.In certain illness or diseases he can state up to 30-50 possible herbs/vitamins (which can be confusing at times). The problem is that for some of them he is reluctant to tell you the appropriate dosages to take. Secondly, there side effects, for example; take 200 B6 over the long run can cause nerve damage, which brings up the next point, which he is reluctant to tell the precautionary details of combining certain herbs and supplements, which can be toxic and deadly. You can't just tells the reader, take this take that, and not tell them what might happen. For example he recommends Echinacea, for cancer, and CTS, and other health problems, but in certain cases Echinacea has been known to cause, liver inflammation, kidney failure, or irregular heart rate. That just one example of many herbs that can be toxic....This is book that pretty much, I or you can make just by going to the library, and the internet searching for diseases and illness, but somebody who is scholar, and has PhD, should not take the short cut to make easy $$$, and just throw information, without and facts research. IN THE END YOU CAN'T DISTINGUISH THIS BOOK FROM WHAT YOU READ ON THE INTERNET, SO THAN YOU HAVE TO ASK YOU'RE SELF THIS QUESTION? WHY BOTHER BUYING IT.P.S this absolutely not the "whole encoylopedia" of natural healing, he leaves out a few hundred other major disease/ilness.
Presumptuous. The first page of this book reinforced my belief that no one should attempt to reproduce Jane Austen's writing style.  The cumbersome results always sound as if they were written by Mr. Collins. Presumption: An Entertainment is no exception. Hopefully, someone, someday will have the good sense to keep the wonderful characters that Jane Austen created, get out of their way and allow them to tell the story. It would be that simple if the right person chose to do it.
A promising title, but ... A book that is promising a lot, but just doesn't deliver at the end
the perfect title for this bit of self-indulgent madness. If one reads this, they might do it with one of those foam collars about their necks that people use for whiplash, because that is precisely how you will feel when you finish this work.  It's not bad enough the writer gets SO many facts wrong, out of order or does about faces on her own statement - it's a marathon of WRONG - she actually and consistently contradicts herself!  One can write a small book on the errors this author carelessly makes.Take this as TOTAL FICTION and you MIGHT enjoy it.  If you are looking for a feel for the period, look elsewhere.  Save your money - and the headache!  To see a writer do so much research and get it ALL so wrong, jumping around in chronological order with the consistency of a ping pong ball, had to be a fine madness.I don't think someone could deliberately set out to get something so wrong and do half a thorough job as Murray did
The formula is getting old. Jack Du Brul is a good writer, he actually is a very good writer; but he also is a Clive Cussler clone. And that may not necessarily be a good thing. His hero Philip Mercer is a carbon copy of Dirk Pitt. As a matter of fact Du Brul is acting as ghost writer for Cussler latest installment of his Oregon Files series.His books are good entertainment, this one is a little exhausting, by the end of the book Mercer has gone around the world at least three times, unfortunately you are so tired you don't even care of the outcome anymore. The plots are also kind of dislodged, there is a plot line that starts in Area 51 that never gets resolved...Anyway, if you like the Cussler stile Du Brul fits the bill, but I would try some of his other offerings like "The Medusa Stone" or "Pandora's Curse" instead of This one.
Please Be Careful. Bio-identical hormones are not all they are cracked up to be.  They have serious, dangerous impacts on the human body.  Please, if you are going to try these, do your homework first.  A growing number of women are experiencing lethal side effects.  Some don't make it out the other side.  I am one of the lucky ones - I survived the blood clots in my legs and two near-fatal, year-long illnesses connected with use of "natural" progesterone.  Since that time, I have been contacted by scores of women who have suffered due to use of these hormones.  I hope this information will be helpful to someone else, too.  Please, safeguard your health - no one else is going to do it for you
Booooooring. I had never heard of this author before and picked this book on cd up at the library. It moved at a snails pace, the book jacket made it sound like an inriuging mystery - but more time is spent on analyzing every last detail amongst the characters - finally when something does happen by the 8th cd - its anticlimactic. And althought he main character continually talks about being psychic - she never once has a premonition, other than feeling "spiderwebs" when she walks in a room.  I couldn't wait for this book to end, and I will probably never pick up another book by this author, even though other reviewers say she writes good books. I kept wondering if it would be better, if someone who was not monotone was doing the reading on the cd. That didn't help matters.
Cheap Imitation. Eng has a lot of facts about the life of Jimmy Buffett but that's about all.  Those of us who have been fans of his since the very beginning already knew most of them.  Too much rambling speculation about Jimmy's  possible ancestors. Eng does not have near the writing talent that Jimmy  does so he should not have done this bio.  His motivation seems to be  celebrity and riches. If you want to read a really good book about the life  of Jimmy Buffet up to age 50, &quot;A Pirate Looks at Fifty&quot; is the  best book I have read in many years.  But what would else would we expect  from a master storyteller
Depends on Your Point of View. Grabhorn starts with the assumption that our feelings can change the course of events around us. While there is some truth to this assumption, Grabhorn claims that our feelings could even change seemingly "random" events (like getting rear-ended on the highway). One logical question is that if two people "ask the universe" (to use Grabhorn's terminology) for opposing events, who would succeed? The question belies the assumption that there exists a plurality of distinct and individual freewill. This assumption is conveniently discarded throughout the book. Claims that whatever one asks for will come to pass litter the entire narrative.Grabhorn states that we need to "vibrate" at the high frequencies (i.e., those that make us "feel good") attracting the same kind of frequencies to us. Her analogy is that we are magnets attracting the same kind of frequency back to our lives. The Law of the Universe that she proclaims is: "Like attracts like."One issue with Grabhorn's analogy is that we tend to appreciate a blend of different frequencies. Musical instruments all resonate at different frequencies. It is the combination of different frequencies that appeals to us. Music (spiritual or otherwise) incorporates a variety of frequencies and tempos to arouse our souls. Another is whenever in nature there are forces of attraction and repulsion, it is opposites that attract. In magnetism, we learn that opposite poles attract. It is sometimes posited that we are naturally attracted not only to the opposite sex but also to those with accents that are different from our own.Fundamentally, the assumptions Grabhorn makes are more outlandish than what most readers are comfortable making. The process of "feeling good" does have medically and psychologically proven benefits, but is living "as if" something were true is an entirely different issue. Grabhorn's techniques of make-belief would be too Machiavellian for our post-modern outlook.The book could have greatly benefited from the services of an editor. The text could have been more concise and the narration could have been more crisp and lucid. A good first draft, but more work is needed.Armchair Interviews says: Hampton Roads publishes books for the evolvinghHuman spirit on metaphysical subjects including visionary fiction, complementary and alternative medicine, self-help, science, and spiritual. This seems to be a book you will either LOVE or HATE--depending on your point of view
Disappointing and long. I found this book disappointing. Its pages drag on and on but never deal with the topic. It addresses why, but not the how. I was looking for the how
Skip This One. I've read most of Sandra Hill's books and I've enjoyed the saga of the Eriksson and Magnusson families.  The story of Madrene and Ian is a disappointment.  Hey, try the drinking game (or if you're like me the chocolate chip cookie game).  Have one each time she mentions the size of Madrene's breast or mentions the men (and women) who can't keep their eyes off them.  You'll either be totally drunk or gain 15 pounds.  The story had so much potential with the Navy Seals and a beautiful Viking warrior princess; but this one fell short.  It had some funny parts; but overall the humour found in her earlier books was missing
Enjoyable...if you can accept Weir's bias in advance. Reviewer Alianore's opinion "Rather too indulgent of its subject" is a very accurate portrayal of Weir's work. I will try to add something to that near perfect review. (Note: I listened to the unabridged audiobook of "Queen Isabella", 22 hrs on 18 CDs).The first half or so of this biography is mostly enjoyable, loaded with period details. The last third is the worst: Weir's fawning dedication to a glorious rehabilitation -- nay, elevation -- of Queen Isabella to the role of long-suffering, much-wronged, highly-deserving, and late-redeemed Just Queen of England.This book is really "subjective, rhetorical biographal dramatization". I do not consider it to adhere to an academic standard for objective history and analysis. It is rhetoric because of the endless "weasel words" (and expressions) used copiously throughout: "Some say", "It has been said", "Many believe", "Therefore we may assume", "It can be inferred" ... this isn't just an attribute of her style ... it *is* her style comprehensively. These expressions occur many hundreds of times, commonly in conjunction with Wier's subjective analyses that present her beloved Isabella in the best possible light, always giving her every benefit of the doubt and shifting negative interpretations onto other persons.Equally irksome is Weir's double-standard of historical psychological analysis. She is always 'declaring' for us the contents of Isabella's thoughts. Remarkable gift she has for this. Many times Weir reasonably states that modern psychological and socialogical interpretations of medieval history are inherently invalid or at least not meaningful. But then moments later she will portray Isabella's actions from a 21st century point of view ... always telling the reader how Isabella must have, might have, could have, would have been thinking and feeling about one situation after another ... often presented in a positive way that is only supported by a present-day psychosocial interpretation of 800 year old history. This isn't historical writing, it is historical op-ed, with an obvious agenda.I don't loathe this work, it is enjoyable in many parts for its color characterizations and depth of detail. The narrator of the audio book has a wonderful voice and good pacing. But this is highly flawed in its editorial approach to historical biography. (Other egregious examples of such hagiography include Edmund Morris' "Rise of Theodore Roosevelt" and "Theodore Rex". I could not complete either of those since Morris is so obviously enthralled by his subject, lovingly lionizing him in every sappy sentence. Yuck. Really.)If prefer more history when reading (or listening to) history. And much, much less editorial subjectivity, retroactive psychology, biased interpretation and rhetorical postulation. The only way I could enjoy "Isabella" by Weir is to accept her bias up front and listen accordingly, taking it with "several pounds of salt" as the above referenced reviewer advises.2.5/5
Don't read this book if you want anything with depth. The more I read this book, the less I like it. It's an entertaining enough read, if you're not looking for anything even remotely deep and serious. The characters are very shallow. Guenevere wavers between being a strong woman, and a silly, narrow-minded twit. Mostly, she's the silly twit who goes so ballistic at the mere mention of a christian that you halfway expect her head to start spinning around, ala "the exorcist". Oh, and she has visions. Lots of visions. Doom and gloom visions that seem to be there just so she can put her hand to her breast and feel faint and filled with doom and foreboding.Often times, this book seems to be more of a romance novel in disguise. Guenever loves Arthur. Oh, she loves him. Oh Arthur, oh my love, oh my heart, oh Arthur, Arthur! Arthur, meanwhile, cries a lot. He's always weeping over something, or moping about Merlin. Arthur is perhaps the most shallow character of the lot. There's no depth to him at all, especially later in the book. He starts out promisingly enough, but after Guenevere enters the picture, he turns completely irritating and weepy and..just..blah. Great king? I think not. Someone get the man a box of tissues and some midol.Also, someone needs to inform the author that there are more color combinations out there than white and gold. Yes, we get it. Everything is white and gold. The dresses? White and gold. The wedding? White and gold. The color of their days? White and gold. The chamber pots? probably white and gold, too. Find another descriptor.Merlin is a lech who seems to pretty much be a crazy loon who enjoys wreaking havoc, when he's not attempting to hop into bed with much younger and unwilling women. Morgan is so clingy and weepy at the start that it's really irritating..obviously crying a lot runs in the family.I'm not even halfway through the book yet, and I hope it gets better. It's good enough for some mindless entertainment, but I enjoy books with a little more depth than this..especially when they concern the legend of King Arthur.Oh, and the phrase "thigh-friendship" really, really gets on my nerves.
NO!!!!!!!. On the whole I wasn't satisfied with the book.  In all fairness I did take DE as a summer class.  Maybe that's why I don't have fond memories of this book.  I'm not an engineering major.  I'm not physics major.  I found the books almost constant reliance on engineering and physics to introduce concepts to be very disappointing.  I think the book lacks balance.  Also I found some of the examples lacking.  I found better explanations of identical topics in my calculus book (Larson) and in my linear algebra book (Kolman).  An engineer that I know tried to use the book to review some stuff and found it fairly useless.  Dover makes some good cheap DE book
Susan is no Ann Coulter!. Why would anyone spend money for this book?  It is just more whining.  Susan needs to get her own material and stop trying to be an imitation of someone else.  Isn't Susan happy in her own skin and with her own looks?Ann has the facts on her side.  Susan represents the party that is quite happy taking scissors and sticking them in the back of the neck of a partially born baby whom they want to kill.  Need I say more about who is "Soulless and Godless"?  Don't waste your time and money with this book.
Couldn't get all the way through the book -. I was sadly disappointed to find I did not like this book at all after all the glowing reviews it received here.  The characters were flat and the author gave me no reason to care about any of them.  Everything was very 2 dimensional for me.  I bought the book as a gift based on the reviews here, then a copy for myself so I could get in on the fun.  I forced myself through half the book before I just tossed it and promised my father a replacement - something I'd read already and knew he would enjoy.  But that's just my opinion - obviously not shared by many
She's not the author I fell in love with (in '03). I really liked Boyd's first book - smart, passionate, opinionated and well-paced.Since then, the bar has certainly been raised on TS lit - Chris Beam's Transparent is the new cool - and, alas, Boyd has lost her edge. Most of this book reflects Boyd's time on the seminar and publicity circuit - it's much more circumspect and diplomatic than My Husband Betty; no more dissing Tri-Ess, for example, and that's a shame because Boyd was at her best when she built up some heat. Also, a lot of this book reads as if her lectures have been compiled, then padded to book-length. There's a lot of lazy writing - cliches like "king's ransom," "necessity is the mother of invention," "love is a many-gendered thing," and so forth, everywhere. Sigh. I was really looking forward to this, but it's a flat read.Betty DOES look ravishing on the cover, though
An unfortunate disappointment. I bought this book with the expectation that it would be another &quot;Mists&quot;. Unfortunately, I was quite mistaken. I found this book to be so boring that I didn't even make it through the whole thing--I kept putting it down and picking it up a few weeks later thinking I would eventually finish it, but I never did. For one, Helena may start off as a strong character, but once her husband and son enter the picture, she becomes content to just sit back and watch all of the excitement happen to them. I found it odd that a woman with such intellect and education would quietly retire to her country house, only kept informed by letters and the once-every-few-years visit of her son. I'd recommend not reading this one. Read &quot;The Mists of Avalon&quot; again instead
Not for a modern economist. Book is out of date with modern economic thought.  Essentially restates classical economics and provides little in the way of acceptance of the need for balance between government and the markets.
Read this first... http://www.quackwatch.org/11Ind/perricone.htmlAn excerpt:"Dr. Perricone would be more credible if he could show us a study demonstrating that people who followed his prescription lived longer, had `younger' skin demonstrated by objective measures, or felt better compared to those on a placebo program--or that they were better in any measurable way. Instead, he provides only testimonials, exaggerated claims, partial truths, and incorrect statements. He cherry-picks possibly supportive studies from the literature and ignores contradictory studies. He cites lots of lab studies (in vitro or in animals), but few that demonstrate any clinical effects in humans. The diet he recommends is low in calories, and weight loss alone may improve the way his patients look and feel. His advice about tobacco and sunscreens is appropriate, but there is little science behind the rest of his program. He seems to have gathered every nutrient and skin cream he had any reason to hypothesize might work and advised using all of them [and sells them for an exorbitant amount of money to the exclusion of anyone else's]. A more rational approach would have been to first see which ones really worked, and later to see if any combinations of the effective agents worked better than a single agent.
Pathetic, weak effort - someone ought to be fired over this. So, after 86 years, the Red Sox finally break through.  And, for this special, long-awaited moment, does the once-august Boston Globe take the time to lovingly, painstakingly put together a keepsake for its maniacly devoted fans?  No.  Instead it puts out a complete and utter piece of dreck.  Someone at the Globe or publisher Triumph Books - perhaps the entire team charged with assembling this gaffe - ought to be fired.  Shame on you.This book simply was not edited, fact-checked, reviewed, verified or even given the simplest 'once over.' Even a quick read-through should have caused even the most junior editor at the Globe/Triumph to ask that the presses be stopped.Reviewer Arthur Weeks has compiled a great list and it gives you an idea of just how egregious these errors are - missing box scores, earned runs in shutouts, St. Louis scoring four runs in the ninth inning of a game they lost 6 - 2.  You can't make this stuff up.Here's a couple of more:- On pages 26 - 27, two pictures claim to show Larry Walker (p. 26) and Jeff Suppan (p. 27) making baserunning blunders.  In fact, both pictures are of Walker - different angles, but it's clearly Number 33 in both shots (and Suppan was wearing a warm-up jacket as I recall).- On page 86, they bollix up the name of the very guy who coined the term 'Curse of the Bambino': the Globe's own Dan Shaughnessy, who here becomes Dan Shaugnessy.Furthermore, the box scores are of the variety that appeared in your small, local paper circa 1969.  They've got about 25% of the content of a box score that appears today in USA Today and most other corners of the statistics-crazed world of baseball.  These box scores offer the reader next to no insight on the game.One other metric to give you an idea of how thin the gruel is: the marketing blurb provided on these pages (no doubt provided by Triumph) says the book is filled with 'hundreds of color photos.'  The book, in fact, has exactly 79 photos. And I'm being lenient here by including the front and back cover images and one page that contains six 1.75" x 3" photo head shots of various players.In short: pathetic.It's a crying shame.  I urge all Red Sox fans to avoid this book.I want my money back.
A disappointment. I have read several of Mr. Dickey's books and really enjoy them, however this one sas a disappiontment. A friend whom read this book said it was a great read but I would have to disagree. I was expecting it to end differemtly than it did because I already had a idea about how it would end before it did. I really found the ending boring, but i still intend on reading Mr. Dickey's other books
Compelling Moments, but Disappointing Overall. I can see how some readers might be put off by all of the science and detail in this book, though I was personally not bothered by it.  There were several things that did trouble me however:1.) The abrupt switch in the third section from first person to third person.  I felt separated from the characters, especially Claire, and more or less ceased to care about her.  Her behavior on the expedition didn't feel like the person that was established in the first two-thirds of the book, either.2.) The many parallels between Magda and Claire felt a little contrived.  Her quest to trace her family's history was compelling in and of itself, and didn't need to have those "clairvoyant" elements.3.) The Ripper subplot was pointless and uninteresting.  For a truly fascinating real theory about the Ripper murders, read Alan Moore's From Hell.4.) Absolutely no resolution on what happened to Nick and Christian.5.) The Jack-Claire affair was just creepy.
made me feel. icky.  I like MNS.  A lot.  I like the things he says in interviews, I like his movies.  I don't think they are perfect, but they speak to me.  This book, while an interesting and easy read, is not fun.  I can't imagine that he would like how he is depicted in it....he hasn't really publicly commented on it, other than to say the author had his full support.  I don't know--it just seemed a weird portrait of someone...it seemed over-dramatic and Vanity Fair article-esque.  Or like Confessions of a Shopaholic.  Ew.  I don't know what MNS is really like or if Bamberger interpreted things accurately.  I just try to remember that everyone perceives situations differently.[...
A basic computer primer light on the garden. A third of this book is devoted to basic computer concepts that can be learned elsewhere(and better). The garden part is a collection of freeware, shareware, and sample programs many DOS based. Not worth the mone
about as deep as a magazine article. I was very disappointed in this book - I felt I could have written it myself, using platitudes and the type of jargon one finds in a women's magazine article.  I would have preferred more concrete advice, instead of touchy-feely pseudo-psychology.  I didn't learn a thing I didn't already know
ugh. I started loosing interst in the newer spider man books after this comic, i found a disturbance with the second one that was more artist than story but volume 3's story is cheezy but spider man is still the man, even if they try to change his persona and twist the story
Help!! I keep falling asleep reading this book.... I have always loved the Kinsey Millhone series, they used to be fun and entertaining. But this book is different, it just can't keep my attention. The story may be authentic, but is so thin that it could have been written in 10, maybe 12 pages, at the most!The 'filler' story is boring to the point it puts me to sleep. Descriptions of clothes, meals, surroundings, you name it - ANYTING - are so totally unnecessary and actually get silly if it wasn't so annoying.Too bad. I'll think twice before buying an other Sue Grafton
Lemony Turns Sour. I don't know about anyone else, but this book was the one that made me completely lose interest in this whole series.  This is the most boring one of them all in my opinion, and, well, how many times can the same story be told?  Bad guy wears horribly obvious costume to try to get children, children figure it out, but all the grown ups in the world are too horribly idiotic to see anything, even when it's pointed out to them.  6,000 times.
self-knowledge??. The only paragraphs worth reading are the once Heller got from other books, I'd suggest you'd read those if you want to know about the Tsangpo's history.Otherwise this book is a story written by a man who has little to no self-knowledge, but seems to know what Lindgren (the expedition leader) thinks and feels. Heller criticizes others but doesn't have the gut to look at his own actions.
great topic but literary-esque treatment of it. I like cross-disciplinarity, the world needs it, but when one crosses to fields with rigorous methods, highly standardized and specified and well competed in, from fields with ambiguous methods, not at all standardized hence with only vague impressionistic competition in them, the result is great topics pursued with halting, poorly executed methods.   In the case of this book, cognitive science topics pursued with literature department, mapping of metaphors, methods produces a highly repetitious book with not a single insight, not one (not one, not more than one and not one, that is, no insights, none--am I getting through).Simply mapping one metaphor after another, ad infinitum, with no insights from the first mapping (any elementary school kid would produce a similar mapping if coaxed a little, I am afraid) and even less from the second, tenth, twentieth, does not produce anything but "enought pages to publish".I have to admit I got suckered and put out my money for this thing because the topic interested me.  I should have examined how the topic is treated before buying.  Aw well, live and learn.
Perhaps the Most Over-rated Book of All Time. Under Mark Twain's definition, a classic book is one which people praise but don't read.  By that definition, Tribe's treatise is one of the all time classics--if not, in fact, THE greatest classic in the history of the printed word.Why do people praise this book?  Law professors do it because they all worship Tribe since he somehow gets to teach Con Law at Harvard.  Law students praise this book because they know their professors and their friends will be impressed that they own it and that they are able to bring it up in conversation.What about this book's actual merits?  Somehow that gets lost in the discussion.  The book is not very good.  The prose is turgid, the author rambles a lot and large portions of the book are unclear.  To top it all off, the book is incomplete.  This is Volume 1 of a projected two-volume set that Professor Tribe now says will never be completed (hallelujah).  In other words, you are paying nearly $50 for a book which was meant to have a counterpart but which never will have a counterpart.If any other law professor had written this trash, the book would have been discontinued right after the first printing.  Lucky for Tribe he has somehow made a name for himself, and this book therefore sells thousands of copies every year, mainly to law professors and fawning students, all of whom like to let others know that they own this book, none of whom have actually read more than 40 pages of the book.
blach. This is a childrens book and it is supposed to teach a positive message. It should have been tiltled the "jewish Mother " tree or something. So the message was Use me and use me and use me some more and after I'm all used up, use me some more and I will be happy. Thats something we want to convey to children
Outdated and biased. This book was published in 2001. Five years have passed and there is no sign that China is about to collapse anytime soon. The author was blinded by an inability to see substantial progresses behind the gloomy numbers he one-sidedly presented.Take human right for example, do you know that there are now hundreds of thousands of advocates fighting for the right of ordinary people in China? If these advocates exist in the past, they would have just been thrown into "reformation camp" for years. Yes, nowadays these people are still harassed, but the harassments have become more "civil". What a consolation, you may say! Well, laugh at it if you wish. What I am trying to say is that we should not use an all-or-nothing kind of attitude when we look at China. As a matter of fact, many advocates would tell you that although they are harrased, the government is listening to what they have to say, and it does make essential adjustments based on these voices. Let's face it, the Hu's and the Wen's of China are probably much smarter than Mr Chang, and I venture that they probably care much more about the well being of China than Mr. Chang or you or I.  The pragmatism of the current CCP government testifies to that.Another example is that Mr. Chang's takes (a very brief one in the last chapter) on Taiwan, Tibet and Xinjiag are flatly wrong. He seems to have thought that Chen Shui Bian was a hero. But alas! Time has proved that Chen is a clown.  For your information, his supporting rate has just dropped to an all time low (18%, George Bush must be happy that someone over yonder is doing much worse than he does) a few weeks ago and the pro-independence force is shrinking as the pragmatism of the now energized KMT wins over more and more rational people. As I write this review, the KMT and the CCP are holding a forum in Beijing and I have just read the excellent speeh of Lien Chan, calling for more interactions and cooperations between the two sides. Mr. Chang could not have dreamed of this in 2001. As the CCP likes to say, "the tide of history cannot be resisted." :-)And finally, let's not buy too much into what the Falun Gong people have to say about CCP and China. Their agenda is clear: CCP is pure evil, bring it down at all cost. Well, these people are being consciously marginalized more and more by the mainstream Chinese societies in and out of China, because people do not perceive what they are doing to be beneficial to China. China (the people and the government) needs to be constructively engaged, not demonized.Keep your eyes open, read more from Asian news medias, for they can provide a much needed counterbalance to the demonizing tendency coming from the West. It will be better if you can read Chinese, then you will get a really good balance based on which you can judge the true state of the affair yourself. If you only read the Gordon Chang's of the world, I feel sorry for you.And by the way, forget about this book. If you really want to read it, do so with a critical attitude
The House is Not a Home Run. The pretentious photo of the author in a flowing ballgown on the back cover should have been the first warning.  I've never read a Danielle Steel before and I won't be speeding to the nearest Barnes & Noble to get another one.  Other reviewers have commented on the annoying amount of repetition;  I picked up on that before reading the reviews.  There have also been suggestions that Steel needs an editor.  For gawd's sake, she writes for one of the biggest publishers in the world!  They must have hundreds of editors but perhaps, just perhaps, they are intimidated by the prolific Ms. Steel.  Then there are some worldclass gaps in credibility.  Nobody could be as eccentric as Stanley and run a powerful (and megarich) conglomerate. There's no way a house as large as The House (in the center of San Francisco, no less) could ever be bought and restored for $750,000.  The oh-so-happy ending is as predictable as the setting's weather.  Ms. Steel has made a lot of money from her readers.  They deserve better than this
worst book i have ever read in my life(and i read lots!!!). i thought this was the most boring uninteresting book i was ever fourced to read in enlish class, if it were up to me it wouldnt even get one star!!!!!!! If you are lucky enugh to have to option of not reading this book, u should take advantage of i
Boring, boring and more boring!. MAn, what a boring book! Ok, anyone inhis right frame of mind by now has already undertood that Bush has been practicing foul play all aorund in his war decisions. Everybody by now knows that the reasons given to go to Iraq were fake, a total lie. But Barber uses two hundred pages to sing a single song: opreventive democracy is better than preventive war. Sure. But he uses almost 300 hundred pages of the same arguments, making this a lame reading
Rubbish. Read Thomas Sowell's. This guy is a civil rights movement [...]---making a living off of divisive, racist dialogue.  The blame for slavery depends on the perspective one takes, and how you categorize or label the wrongdoers.  i.e., was it whites that promulgated slavery, because most if not all in power at the time were white?  Or was it Democrats, since they were most strongly in favor of prolonging the institution of slavery?  Or maybe the group to be blamed should be property owners, since they wielded the most power, and stood the most to gain in the continuation of slavery.  Or perhaps we should blame the farmers as a class, since they owned the plantations, and as such, we should seek reparations from today's farmers.  Or hey, let's pin the blame on people of British descent, since the majority of settlers in America at the time were of that lineage.In reality, the blame for transgressions against individual rights should, as always, be rightly assigned to GOVERNMENT.  If you're looking for a consistent pattern of egregious failings---one that doesn't isn't vulnerable to subjective biases---then Government is the culprit.  Alas, as Governments of old are long gone, and to levy compensatory or punitive judgments against any current government would simply be transferred to its innocent citizens, the "reparation solution" is, quite simply, a dead issue.For an interesting take on who's to blame for blacks' relative failure to compete and succeed in this country, read Thomas Sowell's "Black Rednecks and White Liberals."  It offers also a very enlightening discussion of the true scope of slavery, and the minimal impact that American slavery had, when seen in this broad context.
Froud's work is terrific but book's quality is terrible... I'm a long-time collector of Froud and a WOF member. This book was purchased by my husband from my Wish List. I was delighted to receive it but was very disappointed in the quality of the edition. A complete set of 24-pages was missing and replaced with a duplicate set. Amazon's Customer Service (always great to work with) sent a replacement immediately but that book was also a a printing disaster. All the graphics had inappropriate color bled into the images (excessive blue, yellow, red). Definitely not acceptable in a book purchased not only for it's amusing text, but particularly for it's artwork. I returned it also as Amazon could not guarantee me an edition without the printing errors.  As usual, they issued a total refund (thanks amazon)
Only For Beginners. Nothing could be more trite and predictable that almost every detail of Above Suspicion.  If you even occasionally read crime fiction, you'll recognize every plot device and character in this novel.  This is a poorly written book, the likes of which have been published literally dozens and dozens of times before.  New cop Ms. Travis is pretty, but quite self conscious.  She is now working a tough serial-killer case (her first murder investigation), and she's really trying to live up to the memory of her father, a great police detective.  Even though she has zero experience in murder cases, she seems to consistently make breakthroughs so the investigation can move forward.Any good assignment in this investigation is given to her, so she can flirt and blush and simper around her boss.  The chief suspect is coming onto her, and ooohh, it's so flattering that I can't ever be sure if he's bad or good!!  Ms. La Plante obviously wrote this as a made-for-TV movie script.  This should be a MIRA book on the romance-readers' summer beach-reading list.  Skip this at all costs
Too many animals and blankets. I bought the book because I liked the title but was very disappointed. The book has too many animals and baby blankets and few really  clothes for children. The title promises more. I have knitted one of the sweaters, but I am not inspired to knit anymore from this book. The layout could have been good if the drawings had been better. Gret
worthless rhetoric. This book is summarized in a single sentence "be a good teacher".  All the supporting comments should only take up a paragraph - not a  book.  And even then, every thing in the book is self evident and not really needed to be written down. The only people that should be interested in this are those in administration - for some obscure reason they seem to like rhetoric - then again - they are also usually diametrically opposed to the best interests of students and teachers
Too female-centerd. This book is really geared toward women who are into feminism. All the quotes in the book are from women in her groups. If you're not into the female-identity world, pick another book
Really bad ending. I liked this book up until the ending.  I expected the judges to be released and taken care of one by one which would have been predictable (it's what I thought was going to happen), but at least satisfying and believable considering the power Grisham gave the CIA throughout this entire book.  Instead, the ending was quite disappointing and pretty much ruined the book for me
Power of Intention vs Secrets of the Power of Intention. I listened first to the Power of Intention, which was the reason I purchased the Secrets of the Power of Intention.  I found the Secrets of the Power of Intention to be a long version of the Power of Intention, by far the Power of Intention is a disc that will fire up ones sense and the drive to learn more and more.  The Secrets of the Power of Intention is BORING and makes you upset that you even purchased the set, it bring little to lite over the first disc.  I would love to return the disc's, not worth the money
Hey I've got a great idea. The Da Vinci Code is a worldwide phenomenon, staying on the New York Times Bestseller List for over 2 years.  I think I'll throw together a quicky book with some alternate intepretations of biblical "history" that I got from looking up websites with Google one weekend.  I'll slap the name "Da Vinci Code" in the title of my book and market it to delusional paranoids who spend every waking minute thinking about how the arts and entertainment world is at war with Christianity. I'll make a forture off someone else's success. It sure beats working for a living!God Bless Americ
Toxic writing. This book is so  one sided that it's nearly worthless. Stauber and Rampton accuse the PR industry of presenting cooked facts to convince the public. Ironically they do the same thing, just on the other side of the coin
Can we say gay. uh......... no this book had litle to be desired and its just not cool with all them big words i mean come on.  Whats a sherry and what is an  amontdillo i dont even know. loserbook. Go Central High Footbal
Not factual enough. This book is a terrible book in my opinion and anyone who thinks that it is good needs to question their intelligence.  It is not based enough on facts and is full of personal perceptions, opinions, and myths of the author himself.  Not recommended to anyone who is a music maker or true consumer.  Quality music is expensive to create and very time consuming.  That is a fact that Mr. Kusek fails to point out.
A wimpy superficial protagonist!. I wish I had read all the reviews before I bought this book.  The later reviews were more accurate at depicting this book.  At least it was for me.  I found the protagonist, Natalie Raglan, to be wimpy, ditsy, superficial, and extremely indecisive.  She rambled on and on about what she was doing wrong but never took any action to fix it.  She seemed to repeat the same sentence over and over again.  Towards the middle of the book, I found myself just reading the first sentence of each paragraph just to get through it.  I had a very hard time connecting with Natalie and understanding her decision making.I gave this 2 stars because the storyline was cute and if it was better written, and if it had a stronger protagonist, it could have been much much better.I usually love books that are light and breezy, but that doesn't mean it has to be brainless.
Awful. I really don't understand the fantastic reviews this book seems to get. I thought it was horrible. I was incredibly dissapointed after I picked it up. I thought the story line was ridiculous. The language used was not authentic. And the characters weren't believeable. I hated it.
Pass. I enjoy books on skepticism and I was looking forward to reading this one.Unfortunately, I had to force myself to finish it because it is very boring.Don't bother
Terrible. This is the first Grafton book I've read, but I'm pretty sure it will be my last.  Simply put, this is the worst book I've read in the past year.  The plot is ridiculous: it centers around the murder of woman who is prostitute/porn star/water treatment plant worker.  The characters only exist as canned responses to the investigator's questions.  Critical clue are revealed in predictable fashion to achieve an utterly anti-climactic ending devoid of any epiphanies or suspense.
listen to your heart. Send in your query or your three chapters to fifty of these guys and then wait.  First, they don't want to read them.  They hire someone to do this task.  They don't want to do it either.  They send you their rejection card and don't even acknowledge the title of your book.  Once they did. Now they're too many of you.  They do get shills to write good things about their own published book because they want the expectant writer to buy it.  That's how they make money.  You must have a contact with a publisher or an agent or they won't touch your stuff.  Even Hemingway was going nowhere until Scott Fitzgarald reccommended him.  Enough though of opinion.  Ask anyone that you know who is an aspiring writer if they ever got a positive response from an agent.  Michael Blake "Dances With Wolves" never got an agent until Costner said he was going to make the movie.  Even then it was like pulling rotting teeth.  The publishers sent regection after rejection until Blake sold it for $5,000 (to be published in paperback)with a $1,000 bonus if the picture was actually released.  He had given up writing after 35 years when "Dances" sold.  But who did he have to know...Kevin Costner of all people.  Another agent, not Blake's, said he had only taken one client on in one year and only because the guy sent him a bottle of French wine.  He liked French wine.  Go to the agent.  (How badly do you want to be published?) Talk to the agent.  Find out if they are even in the neighborhood of what it is that you're writing.  Call publishers.  Talk to their assistants.  They'll talk to you if you keep it short.  Find out what they really want.  Go to the library or the internet but don't encourage these "Write and be published authors."  They are conning you.  None of these agents have the slightest intention of reading your chapters.  Anyway, one way or the other you will find out.  Don't use someone else unless you have an "in;" be your own agent.  Good luck you writers.  Some of you are great and are anguished over nothing.  You will succeed.  Do it yourself and don't forget foreign publishers that publish in English.  They will read your stuff. For heaven's sake's don't just sit there! Good hunting!
Book in need of an editor!. I ordered this book because I am extremely interested in theuntold stories of the Partition of India even though thereviews told me not to.  I wished I had heeded the advice.  The book is incredibly repetitive--to the point of being unreadable. I learned very little.  Not worth the time to read or money to purchase.
Doesn't live up to the hype. As a stand-alone story (not a "prequel"), this book is relatively fun - if you can ignore the countless glaring grammatical errors and typos. I can't believe this made it past editing!As far as being a prequel to Barrie's Peter Pan, this book misses the mark. There are too many blatant inconsistencies for this to be anything but a shallower "re-telling" of Barrie's richly woven classic. These are not the characters we knew and loved; this is not the Never Land we dreamed about at night. Pixie dust is now nothing more than "space dust" which causes strange and unpredictable genetic mutations on contact. Need I say more
LOST fans, don't bother.  Choose "Watership Down" or other. Fans of the ABC-TV show "LOST" will probably be buying "Our Mutual Friend" in droves after having seen Desmond keeping it to be the "last book [I] ever [read]".  Since I did not have to buy it, having purchased a full set of Dickens years ago, I immediately set out to read it.What a disappointment it was!  Dickens wrote it on an installment basis publishing it in a magazine over a 19 month period.  One cannot avoid a sneaking suspicion while reading it that it is, just a bit, perhaps, 'padded'.  Any good editor could have tightened it up at least 200 pages.Dickens' work is melodrama, but some of it is just more overwrought than is compatible with good art.  As Oscar Wilde said of 'The Old Curiosity Shop', "I simply cannot read of the death of Little Nell without laughing."  'OMF' goes quickly down to this level of bathos and remains there to the last sentence.Even worse is the ending.  Some endings just can't help but feel contrived; and Dickens, having gotten a large number of his characters into drastic positions, pulls so many strange- colored rabbits out of his hat that the reader simply feels cheated.All of this may seem rather harsh from someone who was willing to shell out hundreds of dollars for "The Complete Oxford Illustrated Dickens" but I assure you that my only concern is for you, gentle reader.  Unless you are possessed of adequate time to read the whole of Dickens' oeuvre or are required to read "Our Mutual Friend", I would, instead, direct you to Dickens' far superior works:  'David Copperfield', 'Oliver Twist', 'Pickwick Papers'.If you are looking for 'LOST' reading material, I would refer you to 'Watership Down' (Excellent), 'The Stand' (by Stephen King, entertainment, not literature), 'The Dark Tower' series (by Stephen King, entertainment, not literature, and similar to 'Our Mutual Friend' possessed of a fatally flawed ending) or a review of philosophy like 'Locke, Rousseau and Hume'.Namaste and Good Luck,AKA Redemption Isle on TheFuselage.co
Great Story, Awful Acting. While a wonderful story, this movie ruins it with two child actors who make the movie painful to watch.A bit hard to understand why the child of two English parents would speak like she's from New Jersey!I couldn't watch the end of this it was so bad.Recommend you see another version.
This girl thinks too much. The title and cover page of this book provided a great deal of promise, unfortunately the contents delivered very little pleasure.  Pierson waxes on way too much on the philosophy of life as opposed to just riding motorcycles for the love of them - like the rest of us.  The book drifts from the history of motorcycles to the complicated woes of her own personal life; two trains of thought that she trys to run parrallel throughout the book but fails. Sorry, I could only reccomend that you pass on this one
Worthless. This book is another attempt to capitalize on a name brand (Porter; Harvard) as opposed to providing a substantive, insightful take on what is happening in Japan and what needs to be done in order to correct certain problems in the Japanese economy. It also gives the false impression that Japan is somehow a pre-mature version of the US. Porter is not a Japan expert and I would be very careful, as an American/foreigner, to not to take books on Japan by foreigners who have never lived their or speak the language too seriously. The book is not about Japan, it is a generalized theoretical black box solution to a much more complex problem in which one needs to understand a lot more than just management theory. Japanese management is much more complex and, unlike in the US where a monkey can be trained to fire people, Japanese managers have many more issues to deal with. People tend to forget the fact that Japanese managers have done a much better job (though moving more slowly) at reducing the negative impact of restructuring. Its more difficult to keep a company going and competitive when its against the law to fire people than if you could fire people on the spot-- US management &quot;expertise&quot; is incredibly over-rated the recent market correction shows the incredible amount of resources that are wasted by corporate America on such things as management consulting. Those foreigners who have written on Japan's economy and financial markets who have the language down (speaking; reading) and have been in-country for an extended period of time as expats can provide a very interesting and highly useful perspective for those looking from the outside in a way most Japanese cannot (and will not). Being a &quot;senior advisor&quot; to a few large Japanese companies does not qualify someone to write on this topic
Not bad, but not really good eithier... This was my first reading of Jamaica Kincaid. She has a short, concise style, which made me often feel like I was reading poetry. However, I felt that it also had some downsides, like stifling character growth. In Lucy, the title character comes to America to be an nanny for a rich couple with four young daughters. Lucy watches as their marriage crumbles and tries to avoid turning into her own mother, who for some reason she hates. I wish we knew a bit more about Lucy, like why she hated her homeland so much. It was  an alright quick read, but had it been longer, I doubted it would have held my attention
New Country Home- Waste of your $. I was excited about getting this book but what a disappointment!!Photos were mediocre at best and there was nothing inspiring that gets the juices going for dedorating with her ideas.  It is not a book worth looking at more than once, but even at that I woldn't bother.  Buy this book if you want to adore Susan Sargent and pay a big sum to just have a book with her name on it.  I love decorating and this rates low on my book list.  Sorry if I offend some with being candid, but I prefer to give a my true assessment and hope someone else doesn't waster his/her hard urned money on this book.  Take a look at it at a book store before being lured to buying it based on a name and a nice cover.
Worm-ridden "Wormwood". G.P. Taylor struck out with his much-hyped debut, the tepid religious fantasy "Shadowmancer." And the follow-up, "Wormwood," is even less engaging than "Shadowmancer" was -- while it's fairly well written, it's loosely strung together with dull characters and a plodding plot.In the mid 1700s, London is gripped by panic -- somehow the earth is overspinning, and then it stops so that London is plunged into permanent night. A young servant girl, Agetta, is terrified of what is going to happen, especially because her master, Kabbalah master and scientist Dr Sabian Blake, is predicting that a comet called Wormwood will strike the earth.This information comes from the mysterious book, Nemorensis, that Blake was given by a stranger. The Nemorensis supposedly contains all the secrets of the universe. Unfortunately, the book also exerts a sinister influence over Agetta. But in an attic is Tegatus, an angelic being who might just be the savior London needs...Religious fantasy, or fantasy with religious undertones, is not a bad thing -- J.R.R. Tolkien, C.S. Lewis and others allowed their religions to influence their life's work. But G.P. Taylor not only has the subtlety of a battering ram -- he's also quite boring. The story plods along in a string of little plot-related scenes, without building up much momentum.One of the biggest problems is the way Taylor handles the fantastical elements of his book. Okay, there are weird creatures. Most fantasy books have those. But his seem to just be thrown into the mix for no apparent reason. His handling of superstition and science in the 1700s is sketchy at best, no matter how brilliant a scientist Blake is meant to be.Taylor has a decent enough writing style, and he has a certain flair for description and atmosphere. But his style is also very repetitive and over-the-top -- where are the editors when you need them? What's worse, his idea of creating a fantasy world seems to be to just toss in a few weird elements that have nothing to do with the plot. The actual fantasy plot is just more of Taylor's lukewarm, generic Christian sentiments, and some truly bizarre theology. Can angels drown?The characters are as thin as the pages. There are a lot of characters for a relatively slim fantasy book, and many of them are left underdeveloped. Blake and Agetta are the only ones who receive any character development, and that isn't saying much. Agetta in particular seems almost manic, considering how fast her moods swing. Tegatus the depressed angel is just freakin' boring.G.P. Taylor strikes out again with "Wormwood," another dull religious fantasy that leaves a sour taste in the mouth. Boring, messy, and not worth the effort it takes to wade through
Biblical Fiction. This book is not really a commentary but an explanation of Tim LaHaye's view of the end times which is not thorough and leaves tons of holes. The whole Rapture movement is based on almost no Biblical grounds but is popular just because it makes for exciting books. For a thorough, well-researched, understandable, and Biblically sound commentary on Revelation, pick up Herman Hoeksema's outstanding work, Behold, He Cometh!
Disappointed. Both of the recipes I tried were total flops.  I made the Savory Scraps on p. 55.  It is supposed to produce 9 squares from an 8 X 8 pan, but the result was a crumbly, non-cuttable mixture that I had to stir into the dog food.  The other recipe, Mutther's Day Puppy Seed Bread on p. 64 turned out burned on the edges, raw in the center, and unedible for my dog.  I pride myself in being a good cook who can follow a recipe.  I think they failed to verify their ingredient lists for these 2 recipes.  I hesitate to try any more of the recipes.  Perhaps they didn't verify the ingredient list.  My dog likes the food and the notations in the cookbook are very cute, but I think the customer should expect the recipes to turn out.
There was a reason it was in the 3 for 2 section in Borders. What could have been a hilarious, informative account of breaking outlandish old-fashioned laws and getting (or not getting) in trouble for them turns out to be no more than the story of a couple of clueless young British guys (I think the author is around 23) wryly making fun of America's perceived backwardness. Sometimes it just seemed like they were trying to do things and, when they couldn't, they outright gave up on some great chances. The Swedish girls in Frisco: WHY include it if it didn't come to fruition and, furthermore, involved no lawbreaking??? I'm still wondering why they included their 2-page tour of Hearst Castle when it was little more than a miniscule travel log (cool, Hearst had Greco-Roman statues in his poolroom).They don't get arrested and they don't really accomplish anything. Too bad
It's all a matter of faith. It always amazes me how seemingly intelligent people can become so  irrational when it comes to their religious beliefs.  This feeble attempt  to show how new theories in science point to a God is nothing new.  Ontological and cosmological &quot;proofs&quot; for God have been around  for a long time and this book offers nothing new.  I have a PhD in physics  and have met many other scientists and have shared thoughts on this  subject. I must say the editors and sample scientists views are NOT  representative of most.  It seems obvious the editors picked those  scientists who held similar views.  Sure they chose a few token agnostics.   The only way I could recommed this book is for a laugh and the simple  wonder of how the comfort of religion can corrupt even a well disciplined  scientific mind
Very dissapointed. I wasn't expecting this book to somehow transform my sex life, but I certainly didn't expect the garbage I read.Yes, he makes some preaty good, but obvious observations. For example, "...when a man looks [at another woman], he needs to look appropriately." Or that a woman like to hear she's beautiful.This is definitely a man writing  to an audince of women. There is some good advice here, but you have to be able to distinguish it from the nonsense.
Terrible Book. This book is full of errors and the subject matter presentation is far from an introduction. I used this in an intro class and it was one of the most useless textbooks I have ever bought. If it is a required book, do yourself a favor and buy some additional reading material
All that glitters is not gold. "A long way out in the deep blue sea there lived a fish. Not just an ordinary fish, but the most beautiful fish in the entire ocean."This is a book I have some trouble with.  It is beautifully illustrated, and the glittery silver scales make it very appealing to children. However, I am not entirely sure it is sending the right message. I like to give the author the benefit of the doubt that he meant well, that the overall message is that vanity and posessions will not make you happy.But ultimately the solution to the Rainbow fish's problems give unclear messages, and can possibly be interpretated that to make friends you need to buy them.Other interpretations have been covered comprehensively in other reviews and include possible biass towards communist values and a want for sameness
Bland Book. I had a hard time forcing myself through this book.  I gave it to my 10 year old son, who is a Francophile and a voracious reader, and he couldn't get through it.  Just kind of dry for a biography of a person who was probably pretty interesting
If you're over 35 and trying to conceive do not buy this book. My husband and I tried using this book and it's methods for almost a year with not even a hint at conception. The author's "frank" opinion about trying to conceive after 35 is negative and discouraging. I refused to believe that I was infertile but because I am over 35, it was very difficult to determine my fertile window using these methods. It caused undo stress and anxiety and my husband and I finally broke down and spent the money to purchase an OVwatch. We conceived the first time using the watch. I am not trying to plug them for any reason other than it works. We conceived twice using the watch after a year of frustration and depression. They are the most decent, supportive, positive customer service oriented company I have ever encountered. I found Terri Weshcler to be incredibly negative and judgemental of women trying to conceive at a later age-and the last thing you need is another seed of negativity when you're trying to conceive
Disappointing. Most of the recipes not at all simple, as claimed in the subtitle. I know hors d'oeuvres are frequently finiky and labor-intensive, but I wanted to believe the claim of simplicity made on the cover. It ain't so. Just made  the recipe for &quot;Anchoiade Dip With Crudites&quot; which winds up the  consistency of a vinaigrette. I suppose you could use it as a dip, if you  want it dripped all over the carpet. It's a good dressing but to present it  as a dip is silly. Also, this particular recipe is careless. It calls for       &quot;2 ounces (2 tins) anchovy fillets...&quot; The tins of anchovies I  buy are 2 ounces net. Doubling (or not) an ingredient in a small recipe is  not trivial, especially if it's anchovies. The recipe for  &quot;Cumin-Spiced Carrots&quot; was a disappointment, too. The flavors  involved didn't seem to amount to much. My reaction is this is another  pot-boiler compendium of other peoples' recipes, untested by the editor
Bald self-promotion. I read the first two chapters, scanned the rest, and decided not to waste any more time; there are too many good books to read. The premise of the writer (de Becker) is that intuition is correct where rational thought fails. He tells the stories of the lady who was attacked in a dark parking lot, the lady whose boy died during an operation, and the one whose son was getting a lot of attention from a pervert. In every case the lady had reason to fear for her or her boy's safety before a bad thing happened. To de Becker, each tale is proof that intuition was right and reason went wrong. The author does not cite his sources, but makes it clear that he is the world's foremost consultant, and gets these stories from people who attend his lectures and TV appearances (on Oprah!). The book might be better if it was all stories, but it is padded out to 321 pages with a lot of hot air. It never happens that anyone is taken by surprise, or has an unfounded suspicion. Becker gives us a slanted, unbalanced view, in trying to ratify the bold claims on the book jacket (how to know if every person your child will ever meet is a threat). The evidence is cooked. The thesis must be rejected. I offer the alternate hypothesis that de Becker pads his pockets selling bogus books to gullible parents.
ASK A SILLY QUESTION ... Richard Rothstein is no more qualified to advise on education than the new governor of California  (who is a body-builder).  The  objective of education is economic self-sufficiency.  Getting ahead in life requires connections, not "knowledge."  American blacks are denied connections.  We all  know why and how.  The black-white gap which Rothstein writes about  is not  information but access.Valuable  knowledge is learned on the job, not in school. Teachers do not control access, employers do.  Blacks who are told otherwise are being cheated.Centuries ago schools were for the elite, whose privileged  positiion in life was predestined.  This was not changed by free public schools.  America's political leaders never learned this fundamental lesson.   US Grant  - who in fact  liberated blacks - imagined blacks would quickly join mainstream   America.  KKK put an end to that dream.  Just saying again and again that there is a gap does not  acknowledge the reality.  Ask a bona fide teacher.When black youth knows  schooling will be rewarded, education will command respect.Wallace F. Smith,  Walnut Creek, C
Not Funny. I have read several of Hiaasen's books and loved them.  They were very funny.  This one is not.  It is an endless description of naked strippers.  I found the main character, Erin, to be very unappealing.  She is just so stupid.  Her problems are all of her own creation.  And she is not funny.  I think you have to be a man to like this book.  I, as a woman, just found it exceedingly boring.  I kept waiting for it to get funny.  It never did
Not very good... I could only read an hour of this. I always hate doing this to my own brethren but I can't recommend this
Too complicated. I think this book may work for those who are really against letting their babies cry, but I have to say, if you are truly sleep deprived, trying to remember all of the things you're supposed to do at 2 am (and 3 am, 4 am, etc.) is nearly impossible. When I would wake up in the wee hours with my son, I couldn't remember all of the methods she described, and it wasn't like I could read the book right then! If you are really committed to this type of method, I would think it would work pretty well, but in my completely exhausted state, trying to remember several different steps to help my baby back to sleep made me more frustrated
Who fact-checked this thing??. This book is terrible, riddled with mistranslations, gross generalizations, and mystifying pseudofacts. A lovely idea, with poor execution
Disappointing. John Hodgeman is great when he's on the Jon Stewart show.  The book, sadly,  is boring even as bathroom reading
good, but not great. I've been taking an intensive German translation course this summer and because I haven't taken any German before this, I didn't have any vocabulary coming into it.  I bought this book as a supplement because I wanted to have as many resources as possible to get through class.My problem with it has been that most of the verbs I've tried to look up haven't been in it.  I've only found a few of the verbs I've tried to look up.  Part of this, however, has to do with the compound nature of German, and another part has to do with the fact that 501 really isn't that many verbs in the grand scheme of linguistics.If you're learning German for fun or to travel, this book would probably be pretty helpful, but if you're learning the language for academics or for a field of work with a specialized vocabulary, you won't find everything you need in it
Lots of good advice but poorly organized. The book is filled with plenty useful advice but it is so poorly organized that its potential effectiveness is marginalized.  I had hoped to learn some key strategies and tools to use in a converstation.  However, I spent  most of my time trying to understand how each little tidbit of advice fit  into the bigger picture of actually starting and controlling a  conversation.  Somewhere amongst all the advise are the key elements to  becoming a better communicator but its left to the reader to assemble them  into a practical guide to conversation
Easy read, a very "visual" novel, could have gone deeper. As a debut, this novel is noteworthy, and the author paints a highly visual picture of the Africa she knows.  To me, the disappointment with the novel was the author's inability to go deeper.  It stayed very "surface level" with me, reads almost like a "young adult" novel.  Also deals with the subject of physical abuse, so those who are unable to handle such content should avoid it.
In a Word, "Generic". This is the first book I've not been able to put down - not because it was so riveting, but because I couldn't wait to be done with it. It reads like a grocery list of domestic issues that might be intriguing for an adolescent or, perhaps, for someone who has never left their small town and dreams of the dramas that they assume lie in the big city. The themes, problems and experiences of the Stassos family are so completely generic that, should the book be interpreted into any visual form, it would take the shape of the most heavy-handed after-school special ever made!And as for the "poetic" prose that is attributed to this novel: the use of language is over-the-top and often pretencious. Many experiences are not simply stated, but are rather coated with words that only add weight rather than description or meaning.One example that I underlined: "'I'm always careful,' Ben said, in exactly the spirit he would toss a too-small offering -- a hibiscus blossom, a pomegranate -- into a crater." WHAT?!!!Granted, the context is missing, but even in the context, this quote made me laugh. And by the time i came to the last third of book, the laughter was all that got me though to the end (that, and the fact that I had to finish it because I told someone that I would.)If I could give this book less than one star, I would.
A lesser work. I find the mostly 5 star reviews of Adam Bede rather puzzling. I am a great of lover nineteenth century English lit, and have enjoyed the other three Eliot books I've read--Middlemarch, Silas Marner, and Mill on the floss, the latter being far and away my favorite. However, had I read Adam Bede first, I may not have bothered to read other Eliot works.Eliot's talent is indisputable. The other reviews do an excellent job of capturing what is great about her prose, and many of those strengths are present in Adam Bede. What disappointed me most about this work were the characters. Each was far less complex than I have come to expect from Eliot, and I found the saintliness of Seth, Adam, and Dinah boring, almost irritating. It was hard to care about them. I also found, despite the explanations Eliot provided, that Adam's love for Hetty and Dinah's change of heart about marriage was implausible.What sealed my opinion of this book was Adam's forgiveness of Arthur. After the devastation Arthur's actions caused, it would have been superhuman to forgive him, let alone regard him as a friend. When Arthur asserted that he suffered more than Adam, I could hardly believe that Adam did not recognize yet another expression of Arthur's massive ego.  Despite the book's strengths, this flaw, together with one-dimensional personalities of the main characters, relegates Adam Bede to an inferior status among Eliot's works.
Narrative Equivalent of Home Shopping Network. Saul Bellow won the Nobel Prize. And after his recent death, numerous respectful eulogies proclaimed that the BIG issues of soul and conscience were at the center of his fiction. So who am I, a nobody, to say that THE ADVENTURES OF AUGIE MARCH is boring?Nonetheless, I say that the experience of reading this "classic" of American fiction is akin to watching the Home Shopping Network. You know how those HSN salespeople show some object, pore on the details, and then move onto the next tacky item? Well, that's how AUGIE struck me.You see, what Bellow does in this novel is to focus on the characters that Augie meets as he matures, moving from people who populate his boyhood, to those who populate his adolescence, and onward. And, as Bellow introduces these characters, he heaps, he piles, he shovels on the details. Once in a while, one of his endless descriptions comes to life and the character makes sense. But, what I usually got from these descriptions is pointless and self-indulgent craft. The stuff is absolutely eye glazing.In my case, I put up the good fight and tried to push through these descriptions. But, my reward was-Gaa!-another endless and tedious description, usually of a character that didn't reappear. Yes, some characters do reappear. But, you know what? Then, you often don't remember anything about them. They're strangers, even though Bellow has told you what kind of sandwich they like or how they pull on their pants. The descriptions just don't resonate.I bet that people who like this book start off with the premise that Bellow is brilliant. (Only a writer who considers himself, or herself, brilliant, by the way, would ever write such a book.) And if you think the guy is brilliant, you look at his descriptions and see rich and complex nuggets of great descriptive writing. It's brilliant! But if you're a working stiff like me and want to end your day with a good story about a character moving through an emotional challenge, AUGIE is not for you. Instead, it's a chance to go back to college, where professors assign great books that totally turn off the average person to literature.But, say you're the sort of person who likes to end the day with a progression of baubles? Then, turn on HSN instead. On HSN, at least they're trying to communicate. This book is just a writer indulging himself-a real show-off, Augie might say.
Doesn't deliver what it promises.... The back cover claims the text &quot;provides everything you need to know to set up and manage an Ethernet network.&quot;  More like everything you don't need to know - and little practical information on how to set up a network.  The author takes an encyclopedic and general approach.  Definitely not a how-to book.  Perhaps it provides useful background information for network administrators, but little help for setting up a small network.  Would more honestly be titled &quot;Ethernet:  The Encyclopedic Background of Standards and Options.&quot
An interesting mix of good and bad. Im not really writing this review to sway anyone's opinion of it.  Tastes are different from person to person.  Some may love this book, others may hate it, and a few will think its okay, that is just the way things are.  I only wanted to share my opinion about it, because oddly enough it stirs up strong emotions within me whenever I think about it.The first time i read this book I hated it.  I have read it again since then and upon finshing it twice I still don't like this book at all.  Yet, during both times that I read it I could not put the book down.  This is the bizarre duplicitous nature of The Relic.  I do not like the story or the characters, but still I have been drawn in.  As much as I hate to admit it I consider this book to be a real page-turner.I don't think i need to go into the plot so I will list the offenses this book commits (once again this is just my opinion).Predictability - I dont think I was surprised even once while reading this book.  It gives you the kind of cut and pasted characters that are far to overused these days.  From the first time a character is introduced you can pretty much tell whether they are in it for the long haul, or merely here to serve as entree's for the monster.  The outcome of most of the situations presented are easily deciphered if given any thought at all.  Not to spoil any surprises but I'll give you one guess what happens when we are informed that the museum the beast haunts has a security system with solid metal doors that fall into place to cut off a supposed thief's escape route.  Throw in the fact that we are informed of this right before a gala premier of the museums' new attraction in which hundreds of guests will be attending and...well I think you allready know where this is going.Poor Characters -  All your cliche's are here.  From the overworked, underappreciated heroine, who puts all the pieces together, to the museums management staff who refuse to shut down the museums' premier even after numerous, grisly murders.  Why? do you ask.  Because of revenues of course. I wonder if the museums' head director wears the same suits as the mayor from the movie Jaws.  If the characters arent fulfilling the role as a needed cliche' then they are doing the exact opposite that any sane person would do.  If I heard strange noises in a closed section of the museum I was gaurding, especially after the fact that at least two horrific murders were commited in the vicinity, I would call for backup before I investigated.  Of course I am sane, so reverse what I would have done and you get the basic course of action most of the people in this book take.UNBELIEVABILITY -  There were many times while reading this book when I had to stop and say, "Give me a break."  I also used the expressions, "Oh, please", and "That is so STUPID!".  Many times we are expected to deny common sense, and reason so that the story can progress.  Of course if you had a monster that could be killed like any other animal on this planet, then this book would probably only be 100 pages long.  So in an effort to stretch it out to 400 or so pages you need a creature that can be described as nothing short of the animal equivalent of a sherman tank.  Im not kidding, this monkey-lizard is shot no less than 5 times and probably a great deal more with no ill effects.  I don't want to give anything more away, but there will be many times when you will find something hard to believe in this book.Many "What a rip-off" moments - To often while reading this book I found myself comparing it to some other book or movie that had come before it.  There is a reason so many people compare this book to Jurrasic Park, many plot points and supposed surprises seem to be taken right out of Chricton's book.  So instead of putting the quote "Far above Chricton's Jurassic Park" on the cover of The Relic, I would have put "Not above taking ideas from better books".  Put Jurrasic Park, Congo, and Jaws in a blender and you have The Relic. This "borrowing" of ideas seems so bad at times that I wouldnt be surprised if for every copy of The Relic sold Micheal Chricton received royalties.Once again I feel compelled to mention that for all its stupidity, and predictability, I could not put this book down.  For that reason alone this book is probably worth reading, and sharing with your friends.  Then you can all sit down and compare notes on how many times you each found an instance where you found yourself thinking of another, probably better, book
I'm outraged!. First of all, shame on the women who gave this book glowing reviews on the first few pages!  I was completely shocked (had to re-read the passages several times) by the authors suggestion that a woman who was sexually approached by a co-worker basicallly overreacted by becoming angry, and that she should have instead interpreted the pass as his awkward attempt to "find some way to connect with her.  Might she have deflected the pass but turned the attempt into something more suitable to a collegial work relationship?"(page126)  Give me a break!  I can't believe that this example of gaining influence over people ever made it past the editor.  And if that wasn't bad enough, they again insulted women on page 226, when they explain that a women ponders her failure in a management role by saying "I still haven't figured out why they allowed a female - especially one without an engineering background - to manage the project".  What?!?  I had to check the front of the book to see if it was published in the 60s!  Besides these profoundly ignorant examples, I found the book to be less than marginal in developing my ability to influence those around me.  I'll look elsewhere
inflammatory, there are better books out there on the subject. The things that most struck me was the book was more "attacking" than setting up positive models.  I found the language to be quite inflammatory and harsh.  This made it very unpleasant to read.For a much better book on house-churches, try "Houses that change the world" by Wolfgang Simson
Liberal Bias?  Complete Nonsense... Wow..What lies.  I NEVER hear any kind of news channel favor the left...NEVER.  The media, especially FOX News, has a right wing bias..its 100% FACT, proven beyond any reasonable doubt.  The republican right wing NUT JOB Wackos INVENTED the concept of a liberal bias in the media for political advantage, and its simply not true.Republicans are the worst thing that could ever happen to this country, all they know how to do is lie, cheat, steal, and profit off of the suffering of others.  Oh yeah, and these religious wing nuts are delusional bigots who think some guy waved a magic wand and invented the universe.  Give me a break.This book is 100% lies.  I actually burned the book after I read it...(Notice the lack of credible sources).Good job republicans...Continue to make up news...the people are catching on!
lisa from sgs. i thought that the book was a fair read.  it wouldn't be worthwhile to me to read it again and it hasn't been added to the list of books i would recommend, but to the author's credit, it was well written.  i feel the ending left something to be desired, and it could have used more of what was going on in the character's surroundings;  it became monotonous after awhile
Don't waste your Money on this. I did not find this book helpful at all.  I guess I should have known better, but I thought maybe it would have one piece of useful information.  It didn't
Not what I expected... A bit cheesey... I felt like I was reading a fluffed up self-help book! If you are a fan of The Da Vinci Code looking for more information on the lost sacred feminine, this book will be of little help.  I bought it because I thought it would be an interesting way to absorb some facts, but I found it to be a simplistic, repetetive, overly-idealized account of a woman's "rebirth".  I couldn't even finish it!While its okay as a light read, it won't satisfy your want of solid religious/historical information
Just 'ok'. I started reading 'The no.1 Ladies Detective Agency' but could never really get into it. I liked the idea of this book however so decided to give the author another go. Sadly, although the book has some funny moments (Bertie's tantrums!)it never really gripped me. I love Scotland but am not familar enough with the places and slang terms so felt i missed out on the 'insider' comments. The book also has a very poor ending which leaves lots of loose ends and you end up thinking 'hold on what happened to..?' and 'what was the point of?'.On the whole it is ok and i imagine if you are familar with Edinburgh you would enjoy it more than i did
God Hater's book- Think carefully before buying!. This trilogy is indeed diabolical. The temptation- a captivating, nicely written story- but beware of the message- the world view that the book is advocating is that God is really an evil angel that is just pretending to be the Creator. The devil's revolt was actually the work of good angels. God only does bad things. The enemies of God also do bad things (like intentionally killing children) but they should be forgiven because they are working for the good cause of killing God. There is absolutely no discussion or attempt to show a different viewpoint. The evils of the church are the evils of God. Period!I guess that a lot of people missed these points because they are skillfully camouflaged in a truly imaginative story! But be carefull! Messages work on your subconscious reasoning if you don't think about them rationally. Analyze the message carefully!I read to the very end hoping that there was going to be some discussion or debate, but no. This is a bigoted, narrow-minded, hateful worldview that is pretending to be humanistic. It is presenting half-truth in order to make the rational plausible. All the bad things people have done in the name of God was God's fault and the good things they have done are not even mentioned!If you think this is just a bit of harmless fun and should not be taken seriously, be careful.  The story is indeed very imaginative and captivating, which makes it even more evil. If you hate God this is the book for you.P.s., it is really "funny" to see religious people making such a fuss over Harry Potter, which is a truly moral story, when there are abominations like this one around. This book openly preaches God Hatred! (Which is different from just not believing in God- This book states God exists but he is evil)I don't believe in banning any books but I am very, very sorry I spent my money on this book.
Not Very Practical. While the concept of this book makes sense, application in the life of  a mother doesn't. I have four children and can't possibly retrain myself to think only in terms of my stomach. Basically the author wants you to think about how you sit, stand, carry your baby, cough, sneeze, lie down, get up and that's on top of the daily excercise routine. As an added bonus, she tells you that one jacknife can undo weeks of work! I know that at 3 am if one of my children starts crying, I don't stop to think about how to properly get out of bed first. I'm just trying to quiet my child before all of the others are awake too. That's too much of a time investment for me to make just to mess it up with one mistake.
Horrible. I think this book was the boringest, and dumbest book ever!But I have to say that the movie was pretty good and funny so you have to give that credit
Not worth the $.01 ..... Pure rubbish !!. This book is one of Dean Koontz's worst.  Not as bad as THE TAKING, but right in there.  OK, here is the plot ... really, really bad guy kills girl and parents.  A girlfriend witnesses and escapes only to find herself in the hunt for really, really bad guy.  Girlfriend chases really, really bad guy and craters the guy, but that's not all.  During this (yawn!) high drama, the heroine finds a little girl that really, really bad guy has (yawwwwwn!!) captured.  After knocking off the really, really (yawwwwnnnnnn!!!) bad guy, heroine rescues little girl and adopts her. ZZZZZZZZZZZZ!!!!! Oops, sorry, I nodded off.Please Dean, can you recall this book?  I mean we aren't asking for an apology here -- just take this piece of junk off the market.I did see where "new and used" has it for as little as 1 cent.  Uhhhhhh!  DON'T SPEND IT !!! It is not worth it !!!!And Dean, when you are going to give your email address out to the fans?  Most authors do this.....but, you seem to be reluctant.  Could it be literary cowardice?  Inquiring minds want to know.Much of Dean's work is excellent ..... this book isn't.Densel MyersYukon, Oklahom
Very Amatuer. What a waste of time it was reading this book. If you are not very familiar with FW/IPS or VPN then this may be helpful, but if you have been working with this technology and Cisco's products that address these technologies (ASA, PIX, IPS, VPN3k) then please don't refer to this joke. Go online to cisco.com and do the research. Sometimes it felt as if whitepapers were copied and pasted.Very dissapointed
Hearsy to disprove hearsay. The author of this iconoclastic text claims that the Sinclair legacy in Scotland is based on hearsay and then he proceeds to use hearsay to try and disprove it. I bought the book to learn about the Sinclairs and Rosslyn and came away knowing not what they are, but what they aren't.
A Painful and Slow Read. This book reads like a graduate thesis. It manages to bury interesting ideas with overly drawn out explanations and arguments. Each chapter should be pared down to a third of its length, but I recommend not finding out for yourself; spend your money elsewhere
Slow convoluted read. Lacks any gripping force and it is an effort to work thru i
Vapid. I found this book incredibly boring. While it is obvious that Leddick gets into his characters, I did not. I found them two-dimensional, hollow cliches lacking in authenticity. Mr. Leddick should do more research and try to imbue his characters with more dimensions and distinct voices. I would suggest that he write porn instead, but even the sex scenes in the book are unrewarding, unerotic and unarousing. On the plus side, the guy on the cover is quite tasty and fortunately legal. Someone should just put together a coffee table book of covers of gay novels. I am sure that it would be more stimulating than a great deal of the novels themselves
Mistakes in the editorial reviews of this book. I strongly recommend the two major reviews of this book on this site one by D Roberts, and the other by Alyssa A. Lappen. They point out the books faults and bias in many different areas. However I would like to very briefly point out simple basic mistakes made in the two editorial reviews of this book one by Amazon Com. and one by Publishers Weekly. The Amazon Com. review says that the Israelis and the Palestinians struggled over this land for hundreds of years. The fact is that the Jewish connection to the Land of Israel goes back over three- thousand years. As for what are today called the Palestinian Arabs, they did not exist even as much as one hundred years ago. The various Arab clans and communities a good share of which entered the land from Egypt when there began large- scale Jewish return to the land, did not have a conscious national identity. That Palestinian Arab identity came only in reaction to Zionism, and the presence of the Jews in the land.Another amazingly false claim perhaps taken from Segev's ' stretchers' is that the Palestinian Arabs have shown a greater inclination toward peace than the Jews. The fact is that five times in the past seventy years the Arabs have been offered a state in a part of the land and have refused it. Even when they were offered the great share of the land they refused to live in peace with a much smaller Jewish state.One more word about Segev's cover- up of British hostility towards the Jews, his omitting major events in history such as the White Paper prohibiting Jewish immigration at a time the Jews of Europe had nowhere to go. This cover- up by Segev is fairly characteristic of his work as a whole.An Israeli patriot he certainly is not. Perhaps what is worse is that he is not a fair and objective reporter.
And Now a Lean Dictionary. This pricey little (5" x 8" spiral bound) listing of lean manufacturing terms (Lean Enterprise style) is a good (and the only one that I know of) compilation of the Japanese lanquage terms of lean manufacturing replete with diagrams.It is a great reference for all the lean wanna be's and is great for settling lean terminology bets, but it is far too shallow a reference to appreciably improve your knowledge of lean manufacturing
Data appears unreliable. We used a previous version of this book when my first child was applying to colleges in 2003, and found it helpful. The current edition was a disappointment because of obvious errors. In addition to the Stanford error, the Northwestern evaluation was completely illogical. After stating that Northwestern is "one of the most academically rigorous (schools)in the country,"with an "applicant pool that is easily among the best in the country," the book gives an academic rating of 77. That is the same rating given, for example, to St. Bonaventure University, which ranks high on the "lots of hard liquor" and "students almost never study" lists.  It is interesting to note that three years ago, Northwestern topped the "best overall academic experience for undergraduates list" with an academic rating in the high 90's.  It is now ranked more than 20 points lower. Since both reviews cannot possibly be correct, one is forced to conclude that the authors are either biased or careless. I was left feeling that I could not trust the data presented, and will be using a different book for reference when my second child applies to college
DOES NOT TEACH HOW TO MODEL. I bought this book thinking it was going to teach me how to model a Female Character...I WAS DEAD WRONG!!This book DOES NOT teach anything about modeling,the only thing it says to do is create a box and extrude following the sketch outline.The programs covered in this book are mainly Poser(50%) Maya(15%) and Photoshop(35%)..They should call this book "How to pose and texture a character in Poser" because that is really all this book tells you to do..But if you want a book full of pictures of nude 3D Models then by all means buy this book.
Where are my red slippers?. Oh.... my.... God!!!! There is another Patricia Kennealy running mad through the streets and shouting about high schoolish love fantasies that exist only in her mind. I thought one Patricia was enough. But after reading this book, I am faced with the frightening realization that there are TWO of them!Also, what I find very disturbing is that this version of Patricia may be even daffier than the original version. After reading just 6 or 7 pages of this hallucination horror show it was evident to me that the author is suffering from a case of Patriciaitis and a dose of Kennealyism.By the 40th page I was searching for my red slippers so I could click them together and get back to Kansas. Or anywhere else, as long as my copy of this book didn't make the trip with me. A pack of lies and a waste of paper and time. I would rather read Mary Poppins than wade through this endless journey of rubble.
Sooo slow. One word: boring. This book took 40 pages just to describe people dying everywhere and that the remaining survivors ended up in a hall together. After that, no zombie-killing action for the next 100 pages or so. All of it went something like this: "We were all scared. We didn't know what to do. Michael showed signs of irritation at the group's indecisiveness. How could dead bodies move? Some of us wanted to leave, others wanted to stay here. The whole world was coming to an end." Way too much imagery about their surroundings and emotions but not enough horror element to warrant this as a horror novel. Makes a good read for people who just want to throw away their time at amateur work that offers nothing particularly interesting. The spotlight review written by "citymars" is yet another testimony to the points I'm trying to make.If you really like this or want to see for yourself what I meant, you can download a free ebook version at David Moody's website. Other titles that ARE actually worth reading are: "The Rising" by Brian Keene and "The Walking Dead" series by Robert Kirkman.
Unfortunate display of Robbins' abilities!. I unfortunately could not get through this book. T.R just went on and on, getting a bit carried away with his own wit and literary skills. I wish  I could write a better review, but I can't get past the second chapter. Perhaps further on down the road I will give it another try. In the meantime I recommend all Tom's other novels.
I'll Keep Looking... Before I move into my actual review, I want to correct a factual error in another review. The criticism was made that Edelman uses too much technical and specific terminology with no explanation for the reader. This is false: while Edelman buries the reader in technical terms, the book contains an extensive glossary (32 pages vs. 148 pages of actual text) which explains every term used. The reviewer that made this criticism was simply too lazy to reference it. Although it should be noted that Edelman perhaps made the wrong decision by relying on the glossary instead of including explanatory foot- or endnotes.That said. I am a well-educated non-specialist reader. I am not a biologist or a psychologist. I sought this book out in an attempt to find good entry-level works on the study of consciousness to assist with research I am currently involved in. This book received some praise as the best text to begin with, so I investigated with the hope of getting a quick and solid grounding in the basics of the field.With all due deference to a Nobel laureate, I can not recommend this book to the intended general audience. Despite the disproportionately large glossary it is difficult to follow. Edelman's prose style is murky and redundant (most readers will make heavy use of that glossary). Sadly, the most engaging parts of the text are 100-year old quotes from William James, whose descriptions Edelman acknowledges as a "high-water mark in the field." Much of the text reads, unfortunately, like a specialized research paper that has had one quick pass by an editor to try to make it more approachable. Coverage of the physical (biological and neurological) components underlying consciousness wanders. The principle behind the organization of the chapters - what each contains and why - serves only to emphasize the subjective nature of consciousness: if the way Edelman, renowned in this field, organizes his material and reaches his conclusions is typical of fellow studiers of consciousness, god help the rest of us.Distilled down, there is still good material here, difficult as it will be for the non-specialist to wade through. For example, a reasonably understandable picture of brain function emerges, as does a useful model for the 'primary consciousness' experienced by many animals (distinct from the 'higher-order consciousness' assumed by Edelman to be unique to man and a few other primates). There is a manageable explanation of one theory of consciousness (TNGS). Some of the most interesting material describes magnetoencephalographic studies which, unfortunately, receives too little coverage.My biggest problem with the book is that despite its brevity it actually takes far too many pages to say what it does. It seemed to me that in the end too much space is devoted to explaining and elaborating a single topic. It becomes not much more than a marginally useful introduction to Edelman's personal theory of consciousness: TNGS (the Theory of Neuronal Group Selection). TNGS might be the be-all-and-end-all of consciousness theory. I don't know enough about the field to judge. But this book fails the reader in this regard by going out of its way to neglect competing theories. One must either take TNGS or leave it, because there is no serious attempt to offer an alternative.The book has served primarily to pique my interest in other work. The ideas of reentry and the remembered present, for example, seem solid and appropriate and will inform my future research. Even an idea like 'degeneracy,' which in the end I find difficult to support, is worth knowing.While the complete book does serve to inform a lay reader such as myself with a useful if elementary understanding of the possible evolutionary and biological basis of consciousness, it falls short of being accessible. My search for a truly accessible introductory work on the study of consciousness continues..
Don't waste your time..... I thought this book would give a better insight into the world of the HA, but I came away disappointed.  Quesnel's story is interesting and controversial, but I don't think his story reveals enough details
Not good for Music Appreciation text. I've used this book for three years and am eager to trade it for something else.  Why?  1) Musical examples are chosen seemingly because Yudkin got tired of the tried-and-true favorites (Bach Brandenburg Concerti are not on the student CD set, but the St. Matthew Passion is.  As a result, the students may get to hear Bach Brandenburg Concerti in class but can't listen on their own).  Same is true for Verdi:  Otello is included, but not Rigoletto or La Traviata?   2) This text is written for the average music major (not stellar, just average), rather than a music appreciation student.  He assumes much greater knowledge of instruments, timbre, texture, and familiarity with general musical terms than any introductory student will have.  3) An exasperating dilemma:  many works on the instructor CD set are not on the student set, despite those being the better selections.  Why not put the obscure works on the instructor CDs, and let students have access to really great works?  For example, when he selected a recording of a madrigal, he picked one that has two females singing a verse, then two males singing a verse...nothing at all like 95% of all madrigals students would ever be likely to hear.  The reason?  He knows the performers on the CD!  Students never get to hear real text painting as every "real" madrigal illustrates.  It's hard to build on that when asking students to understand the concept of text painting.Anyway, I'm not Yudkin-bashing, but there are definitely problems with this text that need to be addressed
the cover is the best part?. Kind of a snoozer, despite at times reading like a pep rally.  Wait till the price goes down
Read This to Glorify Surfer Magazine, Not Surfing. Just as sad and unfortunate as missing the wave-of-the-day on the last day of a lifetime surf expedition, The Perfect Day missed the opportunity to do something really important for the ocean-loving community. This glossy coffee-table pantheon of glory to Surfer Magazine focuses on the lame, inane and myopic words of the professional surfer like they mean or represent something. Except for a very small token of tribute to the heart and soul of surfing (Rell Sunn, Miki Dora) and the environment (&quot;turds in the impact zone&quot;), Surfer pats itself on its commercialized back offering no more than a &quot;me, me, me&quot; mentality of self-praise for being Surfer Magazine. Instead of using this fantastic opportunity to offer something back to the community for what surfing has done for Surfer or how we can help our needy Mother Ocean continue to offer choice surf, they blow it, missing the wave-of-a-lifetime in the process. While the quiet surfers were in the water, Surfer Magazine, with their sponsored pros, were lined up at the bank totally missing this &quot;Perfect Day&quot;
Terrible book. What a waste of paper.  Some people should abstain from writing and Pinnock is one of them
Text heavy, poor editing and design. I picked up this book after reading the great one-page summary in Outside magazine.  My suggestion is to go and buy the January 2006 issue of Outside magazine and read the great one-page summary.  The summary has many of the best suggestions from the book, but it is concise and well edited.The first thing that struck me as I glanced through the book was that is consists of 200 pages of almost pure text with very few illustrations and no photos.  As I started plowing through it, I noticed that the prose was littered with an inordinate number of asides and parenthetical comments.  Consider this gem: "So we tend to think runners are better than we are, and because they don't really fight the image (probably more out of preoccupation with their hamstrings than egocentrism, in their defense), that keeps a lot of us - who doubt we're ever going to rule at anything - from running."  At first I assumed that the author was a exercise physiologist who just couldn't write, but then I realized he is a journalist who writes too much.  The book is actually pieced together from articles that appeared in Outside magazine and it reads exactly like one huge magazine article.  The problem is, writing a good book is a lot different than writing a good magazine article.  I would say that about 50 percent of the text could be deleted with no harm done.The production design of the book is especially poor - it focuses on style rather than substance.  The few illustrations are wasted on highly stylized drawings unsuitable for a technical topic.  There is almost no variation in font size which makes it difficult to pick out main points.  There are no chapter summaries and precious few bulleted lists.There are some good points in this book if you can find them.  The book covers a wide variety of topics and I did find a few things potentially worth adding to my workout.  Most people, especially beginners, would be better off looking elsewhere.
ARE YOU KIDDING ME? THIS BOOK IS HORRIBLE!. I cant believe that I actually paid for this book. Anyone with a brain knows that if you buy low and sell high, you will make money. If you know that then you dont need this book. This book is silly. I cant believe that it was even printed.
HORRIBLE!!!. I hate this series, so boring, dumb characters, FREAKIN CRAPPY NINJAS! DO NOT BUY THIS MANGA! Such a waste of money! I prefer magical girl mangas, that don't include crap ninjas! Please don't buy this if you hate dull, boring, and NON- magical girl manga!! Buy kamichama karin instead!
Lacks depth. This book really only covers a general concept of the computer animation field. For people wanting to just unearth the mere basics and lingo, the glossary at the end of each chapter might be useful. Besides that, the book lacks any real depth to the topics discussed, and is rather disappointing when these terms are freely available online. The "Getting Ready" tips for each section was laughable, written with the assumption that readers lack common sense. Furthermore, the unorganized structure of the book meant the referenced picture in the text is in MOST cases a few pages away. My 1 star goes to the coloured pictures and the glossary
Pamuk's First Novel is a Disappointment. Like many others in my book group, I had been looking forward to finally reading something by Pamuk. And like most of my book group, I was fairly disappointed by this short early novel from him. Originally published in Turkey in 1985, the story is prefaced by an introduction in which one Faruk Darvinoglu purports to have discovered the manuscript in a dusty archive. He then goes on to explain that parts of the story can be historically corroborated, but much of it can't. This should immediately alert the reader not to take everything in the book as it comes. Even more so if the reader knows that Darvinoglu is the protagonist of Pamuk's earlier book The House of Silence. Such intertextual tricks immediately bring to mind the works of Calvino, Borges, and their ilk.The basic plot is very straightforward: in the mid 17th-century, a young Venetian gentleman is captured by Turkish raiders and sold into slavery to an aspiring Turkish scholar who happens to look just like him. The two men then spend the next few decades cloistered together, engaged in various psuedo-intellectual investigations of astronomy, biology, engineering, and so on. These bring them to the attention of the Sultan (based on Mehmet IV), whose patronage waxes and wanes, culminating in a lengthy attempt to construct a powerful war machine. Along the way, their claustrophobic relationship swings back and forth, and is interrupted by an outbreak of the plague, whose outcome they are tasked with predicting. The book concludes with a brief section which will challenge the reader's assumptions and calls into question everything that comes before it. Namely, are there two characters or are they just manifestations of two aspects of a single person?This all unfolds at a glacial pace, and the two "characters" are mere ciphers. Their clashing of wills and ideas take up page after page, but the reader is always told about the conflict rather than shown it, and this makes for disengaging reading. Pamuk seems much less interested in storytelling or characters than in grand themes such as the nature of identity, the collision of cultures, and the very nature of reality. But none of these are addressed in a way that is particularly fresh or interesting. The tension between East and West is handled in a fairly superficial manner, as the Turkish master is obsessed with Western advances in science and technology, while the Sultan has a credulous appetite for tall tales and soothsayers. This all comes across as a rather ambivalent satire of the fluidity of Turkish national character. In the end, this is not a particularly good introduction to major modern writer whom many have compared to Eco, Calvino, Borges, Kafka, and Kundera. However, readers who enjoy highly ambiguous works about self-identity with unreliable narrators may find this a satisfying read
Overblown claims from Cassandra. Doomsayers are nothing new.  In the late 19th and early 20th centuries, when Jewish populations were growing rapidly in many parts of Europe, anti-semitic politicians and demagogues leaped to the fore and claimed that Jews were a fundamental threat to society.  Jews stole jobs, polluted and corrupted society, destroyed culture, and were responsible for crime.I see a similar fear now re-occuring, except now it is for Muslims.  Muslims, as a fairly conspicuous minority, make easy targets for Europeans to blame their complex problems.  However, while Europe does face some real difficulties in economic, demographic and social terms (including with integrating minorities), the notion of a collapse of Europe into something like Afghanistan or Iran or Pakistan or Saudi Arabia is nonsense.While Islamic radicalism and terrorism are real and dangerous threats (as the recent MI5 report indicates), terrorists and terrorist threats come from only a small fraction of the Muslim population.  Problems with economic integration stem not just from religion but also from issues related to racial discrimination as well as things like inflexible labour laws, which the French have refused to reform.  When it comes to problems like demographic decline, or economic stagnation, the Europeans have only themselves to blame, and need to adopt a more entrepenurial spirit.  They also need to recognise the need to allow people to openly practice religious faith, lest dangerous pseudo-ideaologies fill the void.However Muslims only form around 10% of the population in France and 5% of less in the UK.  The fear of being 'bred out' is an illusion, and in any case many non-Muslim migrants are arriving in Europe each year from places like Romania and Poland.  Will the UK become Polish and Romanian in two or three decades?  Free borders are important in a globalised world, and history has generally shown isolationism and protectionism do not work to build rule of law, democracy, and prosperity.Demonising Muslims and other minorities is a dangerous way of trying to get out of dealing with complex issues, which Europe has to do if it wants to compete with India and China and the US.  Muslims need to be seen as assets rather than threats to society, and while Muslim community leaders have an obligation to stamp out terrorism and radicalism and ensure proper integration, Europeans have an obligation not to repeat the ugly past in their treatment of minorities
Tired rehash. I'm not sure there is anything here that was not originally in Simple Abundance save for the description of her recent moves and marriage. It all fees so "90s." And I feel just the opposite of the person who  said she likes the way the author quotes a lot of other writers in the text. It breaks up the narrative and feels like filler. I'm glad I just looked at this in Barnes and Noble and decided not to buy
Plowing Through. I never made it past the first three chapters (even though we were assigned to read the whole thing).  The long, drawn out epistomology (the study of knowledge) and boring examples (sucked the life out of Little Red Ridinghood) was so hard to get through, I probably never made it to the good stuff.  Definitely not fun, exciting reading for the average person.  The only interesting thing to me was the constant use of the phrase "the proof is in the pudding".  But then again, I'm not a scholar
Truly awful. I hated this book! I usually love Coulters work and her heroes, but Anthony was just revolting! The rape, the beating, everything about the way he treated her, including the whole 'I loved your mother, you'll do as the next best thing' just left me wishing that another character (even Edward)would come save poor Cassie from this monstrous man! He just completely degraded her. So what if he loved her - move on, get over it. Personally I see his actions as a deranged stalker, not a man in love. I disagree with all the other reviewers who state that we shouldn't apply modern values to historical romances - hello? If I want realism, I'll read a history book. This is supposed to be fiction! If it was really accurate he probably would have no teeth and smell bad! Plus, we as the readers should identify with the main characters. Cassie's decision to love the man who raped her just left me cold. My kind of heroine would have fought and made him pay (maybe castrated him after beating him thoroughly!) If you like romances - stay away
Disappointing. I am sorry to say this book is a great disappointment compared to the other very good books in the series.  The author comes across as arrogant instead of informed.  The illustrations are not as useful as they could be, not of much introductory help for the residents or deeper reference for those in practice. Pablo Ros book (CT and MRI of Abdomen) is much better, if you can find a copy.
Not worth reading!. This was a waste of my time! I sat there and read about this boy and what he could do!  Then read about more kids and what they were good at. It should have another title about not labeling our kids or something. Not late talking children that makes me think that is going to help me with my late talker. Why was this even published. I could go and write about my son and how he is sooo smart but doesn't talk yet. WOW you would really care!
An odd little book... This is a strange little book.  The intention is good, love conquers all, dealing with aging, etc...However,it is full of negative images, and frankly is...creepy.  When the boy is awake, he is exasperating, annoying, foul mouthed, and strange.  The only time the mother shows her love is by furtively entering her son's room and singing her little love ditty.  For what it's worth, my wife hates it too and refers to it as "The stalking story."  It has been unceremoniously pitched out of our house.  If you want a better rendition of this sort of thing, try The Runaway Bunny, or Guess How Much I Love You
A  Perfect  Storm  it  Isn't, A Perfect Bore Maybe. I really enjoyed The Perfect Storm.  So, I gave Ms. Greenlaw the benefit of the doubt and started her book.  I was less than impressed.  I lasted till page 53 where I just ran out of patience with her plodding technique and her lack of story.This is a bad book attempting to ride on the tail of Junger's book.Sebastian Junger's blurb on the cover was "Anyone who loves the sea will love this book"  I think not
Something to read on the "can," otherwise skip it. I have several dozen books on various aspects of success and failure and this book is the most mediocre of them all. Each page has about 100 words at best and there is no detail to any of the stories of the effort and perseverance required to actually succeed. So some slightly famous someone you have heard about had a bad day once. Big deal, there is no lesson to that. The real lesson is in reading about the depth and breadth it really takes to succeed - real commitment, not just a simple piece of good or bad luck.If you have a friend who just doesn't like to read at all, this would be a suitable gift. I'm not saying that to be a book snob...we have all been in "their" houses, where the heck are the books? If you have a friend or relative who is trying to achieve something great in his or her life, but they are just not the type to read, then this book would be an acceptable choice. My younger brother - whom - I admire a great deal, is trying to succeed at a very difficult career path and I will be getting this book for him for his Christmas present. However, if you want anything more than the most superficial read, choose a different book.
Longest Runway in the World. The story takes forever to take off, after an almost interminable, and, it seems to me, unnecessary, set up about pulps and pulp writing.  The author appears to have little confidence in the reader's ability to figure out who the historical characters are and spends a lot of time making sure you are impressed by them.  Perhaps if you are a big fan of this genre of writing, and know a lot about it, the book is more fun, just as stories at reunions are inevitably more interesting to the alumni than to the guests
Not a good book for first course in fluid mechanics. I was a part time instructor over the summer at a certain university in Midwest and found this book extremely difficult to teach from. Though the equations are correct and elegant but author makes huge leaps from the mathematical vector equations in theory to simplified equations in an inconsistent manner. This makes instructors' life hard as he has to fill in missing steps for many solved problems in the book. After reviewing all the undergrad textbooks on fluid mechanics, I would recommend people to use Introduction to Fluid Mechanics by Fox and McDonald. This book can be easily read and followed by the student while leaving instructor(like myself) for more time to elaborate on theory in detail
"pretentious, moi?". Elaine Risley was bullied by her friends as a child and was scarred forever after. Pile up as much philosophing and moralizing as you want, in the end what you are left with here is more than 400 pages filled with a depressing middle-aged woman's memories of her miserable childhood and bullying friends. Paragraph upon paragraph upon paragraph of childhood angst.  What twaddle. Dreary, dreary, dreary.
Historical Perspectives/Politcal Messages. Gay Talese's work on his family's journey from Italy to America is an involved tale that delves into a difficult historical period for both the United States and Italy.  Revolution, social upheaval, racism, and war  color Talese's story from start to finish.  These themes give the tale a  characteristically depressing bent which tends to ramble in certain places.   In addition, there is a decided social message which the author appears to  be trying to put forth during the entire story.  These perspectives, and  those on Italian history, should be viewed in the context of  interpretations of an Italian American writer and not be taken as those of  traditional native Italian scholars.  Still, the book is in a bold attempt  at telling the story of one family's struggle, on both sides of the  Atlantic, during the social upheaval of the twentieth century
Boring. Don't get me wrong, I do enjoy Card's writing, especially his, uh, "Enderverse".  I loved Ender's Game, I absolutely adored Speaker for the Dead, I'm reading Xenocide and I love what I've read, and I liked Ender's Shadow.I don't like Shadow of the Hegemon though.It's nothing but boring, long and tedious talk about...politics.  Also, Card doesn't seem to understand how much the world would have changed in 200 years.  I don't know, I seem to like Card better when he's writing about philosophy, not politics
A dry and uncritical introduction. Zahlan covers the history of the Gulf states with special emphasis on the history of the various monarchical families. Sadly, her attitude is unflinchingly fawning; she seems afraid to say one negative thing about  these countries and their economic and political challenges. As well, the  writing style is very dry and wooden. Her bias is symbolized by one of the  maps showing the UAE as extending westward all the way to Dawhat as Salwa,  at the southwest base of Qatar. This reflects absurdly ambitious  territorial claims of the UAE at a time when the Saudis have claimed the  coast in the vicinity of Khawr Duwayhin, southeast of Qatar. This map is  emblematic of the book's flaws. A much better book despite its age (1980)  is 'Arabia, the Gulf, &amp; the West' by J.B. Kelly
To much detail. Moore, told a good story, but when the action would get going, and you start getting ready for something big, STOP IT ALL, with a flashback.  At times one would have to reread something just to get your bearings again.  Just too much detail, at the wrong time in the story.Loved the bar fight in the middle, but the sewer fight and few pages following with the horse and the gardener, just about ruined the book.  i do look forward to reading his next book on Conan, just cut to the chase.-ERI
Hardly spine-tingling. It has all the right elements: Nazi conspiracies, international intrigue, duplicity galore...but they simply don't gel together in the breathtaking way I've come to expect from a Ludlum novel.  The back cover blurb about the August 1991 attempted coup in Moscow initially caught my attention, so I bought it and eagerly dug in.  No suspense.  No edge-of-my-seat anticipation.  I remained quite firmly in my comfy chair.  I repeated "there has got to be more about the coup in here somewhere" so often that it became a mantra to keep me from throwing the book away in frustration.  There were about 20 pages worth of material on the coup.  I could do better than that just by having watched it on CNN.  Interesting book, yes.  Worthy of the Robert Ludlum name?  A most definite no.  I noticed that the ghostwriter's name appears nowhere on/in the cover, nor on Amazon's entry.  That should be a telling clue in itself
too much Italy...what about the rest?. Grisham is one of my favorite authors. However this one is not one of his bests! We all understood that he loved Bologna and the culture of Italy. It is a nice written travelogue but this is not what I want to get from a Grisham novel. What about the pace, the adventure, the chase..?And talking about the end...could it be more simple?Those who are familiar with Bologna or the Italian Culture, or those willing to visit Italy, you can enjoy but those willing to find a real thrilling novel, try something else
Known as America's Poet, Whitman is not poetic. Walt Whitman's life's work is his "Leaves of Grass", enlarged over the years with additional poems.  Regarded as America's poet, Whitman wrote in the 1840s through the 1880s, encompassing both the "Manifest Destiny" ideology of the pre-war, through the Reconstruction period of US History.The poems are diverse and upbeat.  The language, for the most part, is clear and easy.  Nevertheless, like most poetry today, the poems are so little different from prose, except in the presentation into lines.  Very few poetic devises are used.One may correctly criticize my critique as one who does not appreciate contemporary poetry.  But, in comparison to rhyhming verse by Longfellow, Frost, Byron, Browning, or Shakespeare, current poetry appears meaningless.Although a classic, "Leaves of Grass" offers only one or two poems that qualify for a standard anthology.  None of his poems are memorable.  Not a single line is considered worthy of citing anywhere in literature.I give two stars to the work, simply because I must admit my own incompetence in modern poetry appreciation.  Whitman is considered important enough to be the major poet in the movie, "Dead Poet's Society"; so, the reputation of the work must be quite impressive, though it beats me how that is
Great Book, Ghastly Paper. Since when is beautiful art presented on crappy, low-grade glossy paper. These artists are incredible and deserve so much better than this stock chinese manure. It's like listening to Beethoven on a 1990's era cell phone.   And sadly, the great Doug Chiang had departed the ranks of Lucasfilm by Episode III
Hated It!. I'm a huge Jeffery Deaver fan and until this book had never read one of his tomes that I didn't absolutely love. Bloody River Blues was anything but spectacular in my opinion and it was a struggle to even get to the end.Character development was fair but not the usual style I've come to enjoy from Deaver. I never really knew John Pellam like an intimate friend and was only given tidbits of information about him. Along the way a few more scraps were thrown out but most seemed unimportant. Subcharacters were also underdeveloped - even the villain was so underdeveloped that when the identity was known it was anticlimactic. One of my favorite characters was the paralyzed cop but his story was often short changed - his doctor could have been developed to give so much more to the story but she never was and it left me lacking enthusiasm for the storyline. And his chanting, nutsy wife could have been fun but again she was almost mentioned in passing and nothing more said.The main plot was fair but not something that would grab the reader and not let go. In fact, I kept putting this book down and it was difficult to muddle my way through it. The subplots were tossed in with no clear reason behind them. For example, the subplot that has John Pellam trying to sell his own movie script so he can make it into a film himself had me scratching my head and saying, "So what!" I really didn't care and didn't see what relevance it had in the big picture. The other subplots were similar and left me wondering why they took up page space.Overall this book was just a tad below average but for a Jeffery Deaver book to even be average is a very unusual thing. His books usually grab me from the beginning and I lose sleep trying to finish them. If anything, BLOODY RIVER BLUES put me to sleep! I'd definitely skip this one and read anything else by Deaver.
Wow... what a bad book!. I was very disappointed with this book.  I was hoping for a clear and concise overview of world history in order to gain a general understanding of major world events and trends.  The author had only 513 pages to cover the entire span of world history, so why does he waste space rambling about vague sociological trends, or how one country might possibly have affected another?  The writing itself is incredibly clunky and unclear, and the organization is somewhat confusing.  I only ever had a vague grasp of the details of a specific civilization before the author jumped to another geographic area and back 1 or 2 thousand years.  I couldn't even finish the book ... I'd rather spend my time doing something (anything) else than spend it muddling through this mess
Offers Nothing New. This book takes you instead of the manhunt for the Washington area snipers, but offers nothing that has not previously been reported in The Washintgon Post or other papers. My hope is that after the trial the book will be updated or something else will be published that provides some insight into those issues
Flowery prose in a dull, pointless, illogical story. Robin Hobb knows how to write well and proved it with Assassin's Apprentice. Unfortunately, she seems to be in love with her descriptive prose and forgets mundane items such as plot, action, and likable (or at least interesting) characters. Ship of Magic suffers from an excess of flowery prose adorning a dull, meandering story containing uninteresting and mostly unlikable characters. I read a quarter of the book and stopped. Some of the (mostly glowing) reviews claim that the book gets better, but my patience dwindled to naught.Specific things I disliked:1. Another Hobb book in which magic but inanimate objects (the wood of the liveship) come to life only after multiple people (three generations of ship owners, in this book) die while touching the object. Can't her magic creatures have lives and personalities of their own?2. Teens and young adults rarely learn from mistakes and repeatedly act stupid. (Maybe they are all budding politicians.)3. The interwoven story of sea serpents from some other plane of existence is distracting because of lack of context. It probably will make sense later, but it adds nothing but confusion in the early chapters. Hobb should have started the book at the middle or near-end of the story (so we would know the importance of the serpents and the liveships) and then gone back in time.4. The members of the main family are mostly unlikable. The only likable one has unrealistic lines: the 13-year-old acolyte talks like a 50-year-old philosopher
Very repetitive- and, let's face it... She's not *quite* a master yet. I am an elementary school art teacher, and over the years I have observed more extraordinary child-artists than Alexandra Nechita. Her paintings are extremely repetitive and in the  process of this book her art doesn't develop at all
Did not like at all. Very surprised at the ratings on this book. I thought it was very poorly written and really boring. Actually, just the first 100 pages were boring, I gave up after that.
Great title, bad book. This book is way too long for the substance it provides. I expected to read a book that would help me work with smart executives. Instead, as another reviewer noted, this book focuses on high profile company disasters that were a result of bad strategic decisions by one or a few senior executives.  The book provided little insight into how this applied to other smart executives in organizations.  In fact, there are many smart executives who have made good strategic decisions (perhaps through the same process in this book) yet their outcome was different. I constantly was asking myself in this book, what can I apply to other smart executives and I never got an answer. The only good takeaway in this book is the importance of executives to create an environment where people are able to share different views and challenge the executive team.  I certainly knew this and expect most readers know this as well.  Now you can provide a few examples of when this wasn't done and the dramatic ramifications. I think this book tried to be the opposite of Good to Great yet didn't have nearly the analysis to back it up, despite the length of the book
don't snatch it up. The foundation of success in a horror story is a strong, original beginning.  The author must grab your attention and earn your suspension of disbelief.  Dean Koontz failed to make this upfront investment in The Taking.  The story caroms off of a long series of hackneyed horror elements - stormy night, body snatchers, magic mirrors, ghouls, and (Koontz's favorite) Delphic dogs - before settling down with a very modest storyline about a non-denominational rapture.Koontz can usually be counted on to deliver some pleasant thrills or humor if not the chills of real horror.  But The Taking provides no such return
Loved the book, hated the reading. This review refers to the Audio-book. I'm a huge James Lee Burke fan, but I found the reading of this book to be unbearable. I have listened to Mark Hammer read before and have enjoyed his renditions of other authors like Elmore Leonard, but here he just sounds tired, sloppy and unconvincing as a Cajun reader. His performance is unidimensional and lacks any variety. When he attempts to mimic a southern accent it sounds like someone from Detroit imitating Gomer Pyle. Towards the end of the reading, it sounded like he needed to clear his throat. If you want to hear a stellar reading, try another James Lee Burke work "Purple Cane Road" read by Will Patton.
Written Too Much Towards Evangelicals. Although Scott's story is interesting, I had a hard time relating to it (even as a Protestant who is going through the process of converting to Catholicism).  He assumes the reader has a thorough background in Protestant theology and will be familiar with the ins and outs of delicate biblical arguments.Each chapter is split, with 3/4 of the chapter being Scott's story and the last 1/4 being Kimberly's version.  This can get confusing when trying to remember who is talking.Personally, not recommended
Utterly uncritical, and duller than dishwater... The problem with the book is that it's utterly uncritical of the entirety of Stephen King's work - it's simply a basic recounting of the novel's plot, followed up with a few bits of trivia and the author's "What I Liked" section.The problem is that the author of this book likes everything about Stephen King, even when he's talking about King's weaker material. You could write the words "I love Stephen King and everything he's ever done!" on an index card, then post it next to the Amazon search results for Stephen King and you'd have this book in a nutshell.Plus, he refers to the Gor novels as "wildly popular". Uh, no.-Darren MacLenna
Terribly subjective and superficial. While this series is cute, and useful to get a flavor of the differences between schools, it cannot be used to compare schools "apples to apples".  The comments themselves are revealing of the character of a school, but the actual grades are meaningless, particularly when assessing academic quality - the consequence of subjective methodology since the students themselves (who know only their institution)give out the grades. They simply don't have the information necessary to assess their school against peer institutions in an objective way.  So yes, use it for entertainment, but don't make decisions based on this flawed research methodology:  visit, interview, form your own opinion
Two years later.... I read this book with an open mind in the beginning of what would be a lengthly ordeal that changed my life, my ex-wife's life and the lives of our two children forever. My ex and I had some extremely destructive behaviors not to mention a very immature relationship that had never grown past our college sweetheart phase. I took the advice offered by Dr. Medved and weighed the pros and cons. TRY TO SAVE MY MARRIAGE?? A great idea, had there actually been a marriage. My relationship with my ex was roommates with benefits. There was no partnership, no respect, no real love. I had friends and relatives on both sides of the fence, some supportive, some turned away from me. Much thought and prayer went into the decision to divorce, which was my decision alone.  It turned out to be the best decision for all four of us. TWO YEARS LATER---I am the happiest I have been in my life. Through counseling and hard work, I have made some changes that have made me a much better father, husband (remarried) and friend. My ex-wife has a successful life of her own now, and is also a much more involved parent. Our kids are well-adjusted and thriving. Had I stayed in that relationship, no matter how much work, heart and soul would have been invested, the habits of 20 years would have crept in and the resentments of past would have kept us from growing. The divorce cost all of us a great deal. I would not do it differently.  Dr. Medved pointed out the great costs (emotionally, financially, spiritually) of leaving, but she failed to point out the costs of staying. There is a price to pay for both.
interesting plot but bad details. This book could have been so much better since the plot is really good. The writing here is a knockoff of Michael Crighton and really doesnt juve very well. I found myself skimming the pages after a while. The subject  of a super algorithm to translate code that has been corrupted is a good one and almost deserves to be written over again
Booked to Die: Painted by Numbers. John Dunning's "Booked to Die" was a New York Times best seller, and also won the prestigious Nero Wolfe Award.  It is one in his series of Denver police procedurals featuring homicide detective Cliff Janeway.  Dunning, who lives in Denver, Colorado,owned the Old Algonquin Bookstore in Denver for many years, and "Booked to Die," (duh!) is set in the world of rare and collectible books.I really found it an interesting world to enter, and learned quite a bit about it before the book was done.  But do I believe the designated villain, a book dealer, really would have killed?  Not on your life.  And do I believe anyone would kill over some valuable books?  Not on your life.  Of course, I realize that in the current world, it must require great imagination to write a mystery that doesn't feature as villain a ruthless drug dealer with friends in high places; still, one of the first requirements of a mystery, for me at least, is at least temporary believability.Dunning writes well, he does well by Denver, and, as previously noted, the book trade. He's a thorough-going professional, and the story keeps trucking along, rented U-Haul and all.  As, "I drove south, into the coming snowstorm.  I thought about the U-Haul truck and the mileage that Bobby Westfall had racked up.  I thought about Greenwald and the screwed-up Ballards and the turtle-faced man.  Snow began to crust around the edges of my windshield.  The road was getting slick."Still, the book has a paint by numbers feel to me, or rather it has no feeling, to me.  Supporting characters are cut from the finest cardboard. I'd say the book didn't touch my emotions, but that wouldn't be entirely true.  It left me with a bad feeling.  Consider: the first love interest deserts Janeway without a word when he leaves the police force.  A woman who's met up with the book's actual designated bad guy in an unpleasant way is a total senseless irrational coward, keeping herself and everybody else in continuous jeopardy.  Suspicion is cast on the book's later love interest, a ploy that's been used untold times by writers better than Dunning.  And a 19-year old female character, introduced only to be killed shortly, is made a Glaswegian Scot, no less, and stuck with the given name of Elspeth Pride, known as"Pinky" by her friends. For heaven's sake, if you're giving a character only 30 pages to live, at least give her a humane name.My yiddische grandmother, whom I loved, used to say of someone she disliked," he should live and be well."  After that came an unpoken sentence: "But not in my vicinity."  Dunning should write and be well, but not in my vicinity.
Pathetic. I bought this book while rushing through an airport terminal needing something to read on the plane.  Not one of my better decisions.  Very wordy, and the dialogue is so clipped and stilted it's totally absurd -- reminds me of the way the cops talked in "Dragnet."  We are talking zero development of characters.  Perhaps Mr. Woods feels he doesn't need to give any depth to characters that he's been writing about in previous books.  Well, he's wrong.  You basically just don't care about these people.  They aren't real, and they talk weird.  Not much action either, unless you count actions like:  they got in the car; they got in the boat; they got in the plane.  You get the picture.  This is another case of a well-known author throwing something together so he can get it on the newsstand and rob you of your money.  Don't fall into his trap like I did.  There are a lot better books out there.
More of the Same. I have read all of Bryson's books and loved them. Intuition said to NOT but this book since reliving childhood has been done time and time again.In my opinion, the TITLE of this book is the only creative part of the book - sure, Bryson can be funny but this book reeks of being forced.Really not worthly of what the author has done in the past. We have heard all of this before. Save your money or go to the library
A disappointment. Some of the Reacher novels--such as The Killing Floor--have been incredibly good, but I was genuinely disappointed in this one.  The author describes Reacher as heroic, a loner, etc., but instead he should write in such a way that we reach these insights without being told.  Phrases, such as "back in the day," get repeated much too often.  Reacher has become a caricature of himself
pretentious garbage. i tried reading it, and made it about 3-4 pages.  i'm pretty sure that's a bad sign.  i seem to recall mr. sedaris writing about his mother's bedpan or something.  the impression i instantly got was "BEEP BEEP!  PRETENTIOUS YOUNG WRITER PEDDLING SO-CALLED BAD CHILDHOOD EXPERIENCES FOR FAME, MONEY AND SYMPATHY."  guess what, mr. sedaris?  i don't give a (expletive deleted) about your so-called bad childhood.  millions of people have bad childhoods and don't play the sympathy card.  check out augusten burrough's books, they manage to have humor and touching moments without this kind of pretentious style.
Very boring. I really was interested in the topic of Arab history but found the writing so boring I had a hard time staying awake.  I finally gave up.  I would look for another book on this subject
good ideas, but beware. This book has great ideas for cupcake flavors and frosting/fillings, but the cakes themselves are lackluster.  In 3 attempts, I have yet to make anything better from scratch than I could make with a betty crocker mix.  Which is a lot of work for semi-satisfying results.
POORLY WRITTEN REVIEW OF A VERY INTERESTING PREMISE. Janet Malcolm takes a very interesting premise--the relationship of a journalist to his subject--and turns it into a trite essay on the gruesome MacDonald murders.  The book's words seem to indicate that Malcolm,  herself, fell for MacDonald's smooth veneer--she waxes longingly about the  fact that he can break a doughnut and not drop any of the sugar!  Who  cares?  Had she stuck to her subject matter--the relationship between  journalist and the one being written about this could have been a good  book.  But the book's contents indicate to me that Malcolm had another,  hidden agenda that involved her choice of the heinous MacDonald as subject  matter
Working Moms Don't Bother. I was so excited when I bought this book.  Dispair set in once I disovered the focus was on stay at home moms of very young children.  I couldn't get past all of the examples of the trails and tribulatiions of &quot;new moms&quot; to focus on the 24/7 balancing act of working moms
A finance textbook full of errors and holes. I am a postgraduate student in finance and this book is on my reading list for corporate finance. I must say that I am not very pleased with this book. First, it seems to skip around from chapter to chapter with no real logical organizational structure. Second, it is full of typos and mistakes -- some that are quite dangerous for a proper understanding of the material. Third, it does not develop fully the statistically techniques in Chapter 4 that it builds on in later chapters. This is a major problem in my opinion. What saves this book from the lowest rating is that it does discuss empirical studies and journal articles, and it does not do an entirely awful job about the more qualitative subjects like adverse selection and capitalization policy.For what it's worth, I received my undergraduate degree at Wharton and am now at the London School of Economics. Instead of this book, I recommend Brealey and Myer's Principles of Corporate Finance. This is what I used as an undergraduate and is what seems to be the de facto textbook in the top undergraduate and MBA programs.N
Disappointed reader. This is the worst 'How To' book I have ever read...The author never makes a definitive statement about anything. Instead he says you could do this or that, hire someone or do it yourself, blah blah blah. He rambles on about the same subjects repetitively to fill up the pages. I feel like I have not learned anything of any use after reading the entire book. What a major disappointment
Don't weigh down your luggage with this book!. This book is more of a storey book than a guide to use when you are in Florence. I went to one gelateria and two caffe's out of this book and all weren't that great, more tourist traps than hidden gems. I wish this book would give some idea of prices, because a few of the places we checked out (but didn't order) had ridiculous prices. If you want a wonderful food guide to Florence, check out Emily Wise-Miller's Food Lover's Guide to Florence, it is excellent
inexplicable. i couldn't even get 1/2 through this novel.  documenting the rock 'n roll industry and band dynamics is undoubtedly a difficult task. some have done it successfully, others have not. unfortunately, 'the anomalies' falls in the latter category.goebel's novel, told from multiple point-of-view's (a al faulkner's 'as i lay dying,' could have been intersting, but let's be honest here and cut right to the novel's central problem: how many bands have an 80 year-old, sex-starved granny, an 8-year old girl, an effeminate iraqi soldier, and a satan-worshipping teenager? the novel loses any credibility because its initial premise  completely unbelievable and head-scratching. there's simply no way these people would ever get together, much less form a band.  i'm growing tired of writers who assume they have to have 'quirky' and 'off-beat' characters to make novels interesting. 'quirky' characters more often than not make for obnoxious and annoying characters--and does little more than display an author's inability at novelizing complex human emotions and relaitionships. unfortunately, the united nations-esque, freak-show band is little more than a gimmick, and a tired one at that.the writing itself is mediocre at best.  goebel's still a young man and it shows.  most of the prose comes across as juvenile and simplistic, probably because it is. it never really sparkles, never really reveals anything substantial about the plot or characters. the dialogue is ordinary and by-the-book. the 'quirky' characters are, by and large, one-dimensional stereotypes, and the shifting p.o.v could have been interesting had the band member's observations about each other amounted to anything insightful or interesting.it takes a lot for me to give up on a book 1/2 way through it, but 1/2 of 'the anomolies' was an uninspired, tedious exercise in band dynamics.  a major disappointment
Basically Improper. If you have had little or no exposure to North American culture or media, this book would provide you with all of the fundamentals of the upper class.  Beyond that, Lisa Johnson's advice seems largely based upon common sense or on how to not be lower class.  Very little useful specific information is given.  I also disliked the author's approach to meeting people.  In the unlikely event that one does see a millionaire in the 7-11, it's just not the sort of place that one socializes and properly meets people.  Yet that's just the sort of thing that is suggested by the author.  The general lack of propriety in her methods is what makes this book poor instruction unless you really need the basics.  Try Ginie Polo Sayles's book for something a bit more useful
Just plain dumb. I am having a hard time understanding why people have raved about this book.  I guess everyone is entitled to have loyal fans, but I just don't see what was great, or even good, about this story.Two teenagers enter a school and end up killing seven people.  They are caught, they confess, and the Grandmother of one of the killers hires Spenser to prove the boy's innocense.  We are given the impression a great mystery, with possible red herrings, is about to entertain us.  Alas, it is not to be.  The kids did it, plain and simple.  Why they did it is so stupid.  The story reads as though a sixth grader has written it.  The plot is lame, and even as lame as it is, it isn't executed well at all.The characters are boring and 2 dimensional.  The banter which takes place between the main character and others, while it seems to be trying to be witty, is just dumb and unbelievable.  I just can't say enough about how stupid this story is.  There are too many wonderful mystery authors out there writing gripping, intense works of fiction to waste your time on this one.  This is the first novel I have read by this author and will most definitely be my last
A real downer!. This book is such a downer.  Besides the ridiculous sibling rivalry between two grown-up sisters, and all of the complicated problems between Julie & Romeo's families, we have an eight-year old, Sarah, running the show in Julie's house.  Besides watching Charlie & the Chocolate Factory endlessly, she manipulates adults in to buying her lottery tickets!!  They have their very own Veruca Salt living in that house!!If you want to read a depressing story about an extremely dysfunctional family and a woman with no backbone, this is the book for you.  It's a shame because I really enjoyed the first one.
Misleading to Business Owners and Sales Professionals... First and foremost, let me say that I am a Graphics Professional with over 10 years experience in the advertising arena.  My company represents a host of national brands across more than 30 states. Yes, we're big and yes, I'm for real.Many times a month do I have some "wanna-be designer" salesperson, business owner, etc. sending over a so-called "camera ready" piece of garbage created with Microsoft Publisher.  Besides the ignorant misconception that just anyone can create effective and professional advertising "all by their lonesome" or even worse have their receptionist or secretary do it because she "knows computers", once this monstrosity gets to your designer or print facility they will have to completely rebuild your creation from scratch using a professional graphics application (this should have been done in the first place) produced by Adobe or Quark.  By the way, what should concern you at this point is that you often have to pay an added fee with a reputable printer when they have to rebuild a Microsoft Publisher file. Think about it.Wake up and smell your Starbucks people! This book is blowing fairy dust up your skirts and telling you that you can fly! Meanwhile your valuable time and advertising dollars are being futily wasted following this advice.  I realize that you don't like paying for a competant designer, and that's exactly why you have an incompetant one who doesn't understand basic marketing principles!  You want real advice?  Don't buy this book.  Find a real designer with the strengths and tools your business deserves and buy him/her a cup of coffee while you discuss your next advertising campaign.Yes, I read this book and I totally disagree with everything the author is trying to sell to unwitting businesspersons
The Problem with Lust (In Particular to the Sexual topic). Author Joshua Harris, who have scored (no pun intended, mind you) a great hit with his first book on the subject of dating called I KISSED DATING GOODBYE, spawned a sequel documenting his courtshipping days with his now found wife called BOY MEETS GIRL. This time Harris had come up with a third installment on the subject of Lust, particularly on the aspect of human sexuality.Eventually the book just went on as being more of a stuff to only propagate organized churches' ideals rather than to convey to its readers what its premise supposedly have guaranteed: a book to help Christians overcome their problems with sexual temptations - presenting a certain idea of dependence to the common church communities' norms (chapters 8: "Lone Rangers are Dead Rangers") although it did affirmed that the key to total deliverance from sinful problems IS a sturdy connection with God (chapter 3: "You Can't Save Yourself"), which at the same time apparently only show the inconsistencies of what are the currently and commonly accepted prevailing concepts amidst the church circles of our day; along with their popular explanation regarding God's salvation - that runs like a confusing pretzel logic, which only go around in tangled circles, proclaiming that being Salvation is only attainable by Grace, one has no real need to obey God, and yet they would strain a gnat to follow into their church's system, or otherwise condemnation is not too far around to be driveled out into the particular if one wouldn't submit into the dictates of their church's ideals.Thus, unfortunately this book never delivered; and in the long run, Harris stated it so in the book that he has no solution and there is no secret method at all in overcoming the lust problem.Harris' book NOT EVEN A HINT live up to its title under the constriction of being a completely impotent material to help anyone who has a great problem with sexual temptations.And not as to dismiss or belittle every person's own strengths and capacities regarding an individual's own area of weaknesses - I find it crazy on the author's part to have strong sexual problems when it comes to seeing a copy of lingerie catalogues. I mean being that he is a Christian, and married to his wife, which would mean that he loves his wife synonymous to his devotion and commitment with his wife in that respect, presumably - and in being thus out of his respect for his wife - sure enough although its automatic within a male's psyche to have that sexual suggestion in the mind whenever the sight of an `insufficiently' clad woman comes along - he would've not have a problem at all with that and be tempted to indulge in it; or otherwise there is something wrong with his own perspective as a Christian, and for that matter: about his love for his wife and how she really meant to him. 'Cause if one is really in love and needless to say devoted out of that condition to his wife - he wouldn't have the knack to look lustfully at nor desire any other women at all but his very own wife (believe you that!).Thus at this point, it only gives the idea that Harris should've taken more time in analyzing his own personal condition, and learn more about the topic at hand before coming out with this book on the subject.The aspect of a person's sexuality is the most private and personal thing that each person possessed. As occultist and book writer Donald Michael Kraig wrote on his book MODERN MAGICK, "Therefore, sex is totally involved in our psyches. Control a person's sex life and ... you control the person." Kraig cites that the matter regarding sexuality is the very aspect wherein those who'd like to manipulate and control its subjects within a group, sect or cult is the very effective means to do so and is indeed used for "brainwashing" methods. It's crazy that in most church communities these days, they even control matters of courtship within their members.Not for the purpose of trying to peeve away many "christians" that perhaps this little review have done enough already for those who are so Up with Joshua Harris (as he's someone who's in the camp of their church's idealisms) - I think so-called Church of Satan founder Anton LaVae presented a more better idea regarding the method to solve the problem of sexual urges (although I bet that his motives could be moot as far as his sincerity goes, under the context that he's on for the faade of trying to assert an appearance of some idyllic pretense against the Christians, and that it's not for the sake of plain earnestness in itself) - that one could have the means for sexual release or relief, through indulging in sexual fantasies without committing to involve anyone upon it. Such as in example - one would masturbate without fantasizing to involve any real person within those fantasies, but are such that are consisting only of self-created images (kinda like in the movie COOL WORLD) or of a fictionary person visualized for those sex-fantasies.Therefore under that context, not only would the individual be free from the act of fornication but is also not guilty of committing any mental adultery towards another person .Deliverance from sexual struggles involves one's own personal acceptance, understanding and knowledge about his or her own sexuality.There are other books and resource materials that are much more helpful than this one by Joshua Harris that are available out there. Hence regarding the topic, NOT EVEN A HINT scores not an inch of any helpful doze for its readers.Rather, Smooch unnecessary church demands goodbye.
This book [was bad]!. I don't know what Kluver and Powers were thinking, but it was obvious that they have never even VISITED china, or spent any time around real Chinese people.  If they have been to China, it only shows that they are totally ignorant of the topic at hand.  This book is another in a long line by small minded, western biased, anglo-loving nerds.  In addition to that, there were numerous typos and errors in the book.  Too many to begin to list here, but page 116 contained one of the BIGGEST blunders I have ever seen.  Unless a professor forces you to buy this book, stay far, far away from it, because you can learn more about this topic on MTV than in this book
Readers are "spoon-fed" this one... I was soooo disappointed with this one that I had to quit reading.  I felt that the authors insulted my intelligence as a reader -- no depth in its characters, no real plot, such TRITE writing!!I was really excited to see a story that incorporates a fun "chick-lit" genre with cooking and recipes.  Unfortunately, I couldn't stomach the characters or the way the authors "spoon-fed" the story to me.  Very condescending...  I, too, am wondering how this book was published
Don't be fooled!. Sounds up to date, and I bought it thinking it new, but tired forecasts from 1990 can easily be beaten by anyone of average thinking from the vantagepoint of 2000. Avoid and think for yourself instead
Fails to look at all angles... After thoroughly analyzing this book for a college paper I can say that I am no less than disgusted with the content of this piece.  It does nothing more than to bash &quot;whites&quot; as all being racist, biggots, and horrible human beings.  All it talks of is the disadvantages of being &quot;black&quot; and the inability of a person of color to come up in this world.  I wish the author would have analyzed the situation rather than just focusing on putting down &quot;whites&quot; for the sake of making a point.  I find the novel utterly disgusting and written in a poor, distasteful manner
Choppy.... This novel reads more like an outline with big holes in both the character development and the plot.  Unlike the professional reviews, I didn't mind the excerpts that were the foundation of the historical quest - what bothered me were the characters themselves.  I found their behavior to be at times bizarre and had a hard time liking any of them.  The situations and the characters' reactions were far-fetched with no surrounding build-up of detail to back up the plot.  I give this 2 stars for originality and 0 stars for detail and character development
I Agree!. I agree with the reviewer who wrote the parental warning.  I tried to submit a similar review when I first got this book in December of 2000, but Amazon edited it out because I mentioned some of the chapter headings on various forms of sex covered in the book.  I guess in four years' time mentioning oral and anal sex has become more acceptable.  I bought the book because I had found Mavis Jukes' first book to be so helpful, wry and well written.  While this book is indicated as a book for pre-teens, it is much more advanced in it's sexual content than I felt my then 11 year-old was ready to read about.  Now that she is almost 15, I am thinking about bringing it down from the topmost shelf of the cabinet where it has collected dust for the last 4 years.  Be warned that it is not really appropriate reading for a pre-teen, at least not in my hosehold, and certainly not without heavy parental input and discussion.
Essay on Gen X, WTO, and other flashbacks from the 90's. Turner's book relates a collection of his opinions and personal anecdotes regarding 90's culture/counterculture, and the pivotal role (he argues) the Simpsons played in all of this. While the premise was thought-provoking enough to keep me reading out of curiosity, the book falls short in several ways.First, you probably won't learn much new about The Simpsons!Secondly, this book is long and dense; Turner's writing style is not just erudite, but overly sophisticated in a way you'd expect to see from a college student who is really, really, trying to earn that A++ grade. His style often slides back and forth from "academic" to "hipster". You find yourself marveling at his vocabularly... That is, until the umpteenth reference to "American hegemony"... Which brings us to the second problem...Political bias intrudes all too often. While I'm not at all offended by his taking a liberal perspective on the Simpsons, Turner's unrelenting focus on The Simpsons' supposed fight against "American hegemony" gets old and starts to look downright immature. More importantly, he seems to miss the point -- The Simpsons satire *everybody*, right? The Simpsons writers have always skewered aging hippies and disaffected youth (liberal targets) right along with the "easy" targets such as corporate stooges and lazy Americans.Turner's impassioned analysis often gets derailed by his own inability to take a break from his own pet concepts. Pages that may have been devoted to something like what The Simpsons says about childhood in America (much could be mined from the whole world of Ralphie, Nelson, Milhouse and others), are instead given to rambling tangents about 90's zeitgeist and such things as the raves and concerts the author attended. In this way (as other reviewers have said here) the book is too often about *Chris Turner*, and not often enough about *The Simpsons*.Some parts are actually very funny... But it should be noted that these funny parts tend to be in the footnotes, which re-tell in detail various antics from Simpsons episodes that perhaps you haven't seen for awhile... As other reviewers have rightly pointed out, you may as well just put your money toward the DVDs and enjoy it firsthand!This hefty book is clearly a labor of love. Overall, it's a mildly interesting, sometimes amusing, and often annoying essay. While it's *long* enough to be a good academic treatise on The Simpsons and Society, a disappointing number of pages are consumed by the author's birdwalking socio-political rants and stories
not very good. I am Laotion and wanted to be up to date on my language skills, so I purchased this book a couple of years ago to expand my Lao vocabulary. I noticed that some of the words are wrong, not just spelled wrong, but are of a totally different subject! Also, the diagram for the different Lao tones at the beginning of the book are difficult and complicated to understand. It's not clear on how to pronounce each tone. For a language that is based on tones, I think it's better just to buy a book w/ a cd rom so you can hear exactly how the tones are pronounced. I was extremely disapointed w/ this book
Sooooo Last Century's News. The only reason to go for this book is if you are a real collector of sex instruction books and need to have this to complete your "classics" section. This book was written a long time ago and is rather "out of date" and certainly not informed about alot of the really powerful devellopments in human sexuality which have occurred in the 90's and beyond. I mean, even lame sex-instruction authors like Nora Hayden and Lou Paget do better than this re-issue. If you really want to get something worthwhile in this category you should look at "9 Free Secrets of New Sensual Power" by Clint Arthur. That book is very modern and covers all the bases. Or go for something on video like Dr. Corynna Clarke's "Goddess Worship," which is a truly fresh and beautiful look at "modern sensual healing.
This is one of the worst economics textbooks ever. I have to say that this is one of the worst economics textbooks that I have ever read. The font is tiny and reading it strains my eyes. The book is not written in a clear style at all. In fact, I often have to reread paragraphs just to understand what's going on. Sometimes, the authors go into needlessly long and complicated tangents to explain simple concepts. Someone needs to seriously condense and clarify the material in this textbook or else it'll become the bane of every college economics student's existence
Another Dorling-Kindersley children's book. A good book to leave lying around in dentist's waiting rooms, but if you actually want to concentrate on reading about Shakespeare you'll need something much more grown-up. Anyone with such a short attention-span as this book imagines its readers to suffer from would have trouble getting to the end of a Shakespeare sonnet, never mind a whole play. This book is all bright pictures and sound-bites -- it's completely facile, a series of short-cuts to the aspects of Shakespeare which for some reason people think high school students need. They probably aren't the ones you want anyway.
Not top quality. This item was worn on the edges and didnt live up to what was promiced, but you get what you pay for
A highly agrivating pile of schlock. Frustrated authors take note, you can be published and you don't even have to worry about little details such as punctuation, sentence clarity, story, structure or grammar. Cormac McCarthy proves it eloquently with "All the Pretty Horses." Had McCarthy ever bothered to revise this draft he might of had a story, however he just cranked it out of his typewriter or computer put a stamp on it and shot it over to some publisher, who was either drunk or high or both, who thought "What the hell, let's print a really awful story and promote the hell out of it. I'm sure people will buy it, after all Americans don't care about grammar anyway."I'm not going to dive into the plot of the story- you can read it above. This book falls short of one of the best in literature. How they compare this guy to Faulkner is beyond me, the comparrison is an insult to Faulkner and people who read books in general. Most fifth graders can write better, more enthralling naratives.
Sloggish, Boring, and trite. Not a very good book on any level. Not horrific, but overall really lame. A whodunit that you could never predict, because there was nothing to predict. It's like the author wrote the book and then when it came time to publish it, chose a character at random that 'did it' and wrote the last 10 pages. So save yourself some time, read the last few pages and make up your own adventure
don't read if this is your first scifi book. It was my first and it was quite disjointed. I didn't finish it. Not a beginner scifi book even though it may be a classic. Too weird for me
Utter disappointment. Being a fan of such authors as J.R.R. Tolkien, H.G. Wells, and C.S. Lewis, I figured I'd try and broaden my horizons by reading a book about the American West, a sort of historical fiction that might be entertaining.I did some research and Cormac McCarthy seemed to be the author to start with.  He got very good reviews (from this site and professional critics).  I find it amazing that he received such great reviews... this book failed to impress me in the slightest bit.  The book seemed to fly away from the plot for a while and suddenly, unexpectedly return to it.  I have never read a book like that before.  After completing this book I had found out more about the life of a prostitute than I ever wanted to know and also I received a free lesson in swearing.  I understand that it was custom in the West to swear, and dealings with prostitutes was common, but I think McCarthy went over the top.  This made it uninteresting and redundant.  Then there was the fact that he rarely used punctuation other than periods, question marks, and exclamation marks.  I did not see a single quotation mark and the word "and" was excessevely overused due to the exclusion of commas.  Dialogue was at times hard to follow and seemingly run-on sentences were monotonous.  After reading this book I also felt ignorant being uneducated in the Spanish language.  Much of the dialogue I could not understand in the least bit.  There were entire conversations written exclusively in Spanish at times when it seemed relevant.  I felt like I missed a lot of important information in the story.I did find that at time McCarthy did use some beautifully crafted language but the formerly mentioned factors left a very bad impression on me.  I don't suppose I'll ever read a book by Cormac McCarthy again
The spokesman for the Church. This book is merely a hundred something pages long and yet 99% of what the two authors said are in defense of the traditional church doctrine. The only credit they gave Dan Brown is the fact that he stirs up the debates reguarding Mary Magdelene. That's it. The rest are just praises of how the church's version of the history makes better sense, has more morality and is more ethically-oriented. They completely dismissed any Gnostic ideas. You don't need to waste a few dollars on this book when you can attend the church for free and have the pastor tell you the same things
Missed the point. Sorry guys.....but this is a very POORLY written book.  It has a tendency to bounce all over the place and leaves the reader wondering what point are they trying to make?  It also discusses neanderthal technology.  Haven't these guys heard of the &quot;Three Step Method&quot;, or &quot;Control Point Theory&quot;.  I think if I were wanting information about how to &quot;Manufacture at Warp Speed&quot; I would think they should at least know how to get to warp speed.  This books doesn't have the answers.......it missed the point
Intelligent but Dated. This 1998 book examining the war between Russia and its breakaway republic Chechnya is a product of great expertise and tremendous thoroughness.  The war is examined from all angles in great detail.  Furthermore, author Anatol Lieven has an affecting writing style when he relates his personal experiences among the Chechens.  But things are still unsettled in the former Soviet Union, and events have overtaken this book.  New wars have broken out in ways and in places that call Lieven's theories (which were based on the best information available at the time) into question.For the person who needs to know the current zeitgeist in the former Soviet republics, this book is too dated to be of much use; while for those who are interested in the Russia/Chechnya war as a historical subject are going to have to wait until the region settles before a definitive account can be written.  This is a good book from a thoughtful, talented, and well-informed author; but the lapse of time has rendered it unfit for its purpose
A  Definite 'Bonk'!. I am not often motivated to rate books, but this one annoyed me.  It is dull, repetitive, disorganized and discouraging.  As another reviewer noted, I guess I just didn't get the joke.  Don't buy it unless you want to be bored and depressed
Suzanne Somers is giving middle aged women false hope. Suzanne Somers is partial scam artist. She claims that if you follow the advice in her books, prepare her recipes, use her skin products, etc. you can look as good as she does for her age. She never mentions all the cosmetic surgery and lipo suction she has had done. I know a number of Plastic Surgeons and Dermatologists, and they all claim that there is no way that her face and body can look as good as it does for her age without Cosmetic Surgery on her face and body and touch-ups along the way. However, her books with their beautiful pictures of her and her recipes are lovely to look at but she is giving women who are in their 50's and beyond false hope. She should really write a book about all the work she has had done, what it was like, the cost (which the average woman cannot afford), etc
The writing almost ruined the story. I'd suggest that Ralph Helfer hire a professional writer to get him through the next account of his interaction with exotic animals. Although I'm an avid animal lover, enjoyed the unique perspective and experience related in Mr. Helfer's story, I'd be hard pressed to say that it wasn't difficult to wade through the sometimes smarmy, Liberace-style of writing that detracted from the essence of his message. Had Zamba been a literary critic, he'd have turned on Helfer before he was a year old
Excellent Writer.....Poor Plot. West is without a doubt a superb writer, however I found The Shoes of The Fisherman to be a great dissapointment.  In spite of the fact that most of the reviews I have read higly praise the book, it never really got to me.The concept seems quite interesting at first:  an unknown russian, cardinal Kiril Lakota is elected pope.  After being held prisioner for quite a few years, he steps up to lead millions of people around the globe in a new world which he basically has knowledge of only from his years in captivity.At the same time, Kamanev, the man who had been Lakota's prision guard in Russia, and who tortured him beyond belief, has become the head of the russian government.The fact that both men now need each other provides for a very interesting plot, which in my opinion is never fully developed.  The main issue I have with the novel is that it is plotless...nothing really happens.  A large portion of the book consists of  a series of endless, and a bit boring, thoughts  from Lakota.On the other hand, the reader is exposed to the way the catholic church funtions and thinks, which is an interesting way to humanize religion in he eyes of the reader.There are also a series of sub-plots dealing with what Lakota has to face as a pope, regading human cruelty, poverty, and most of all politics, which could have proven to be enough for a good novel.Unfortunatelly, the narration goes astray in many parts, which lessens one's interest in the book. Quite frankly, I had to make a great effort to finish the book, hoping that at some time it would pick up, which it never did.As I mentioned before, West is a very good writer, but this book is in my opinion, highly overrated.  I can honestly say it never got my full atention.
Self-indulgent piece of crap. I'm all in favor of silly, irreverant books, but this book is just so pointless.  The author doesn't show any skill as a writer...it could basically have been anyone off the street making claims like "I hate TV animals...but I love Salem the cat from 'Sabrina, the Teenage Witch.'"  This book reads like a stream of concious exercise done by a ninth grader.Who cares?He doesn't say anything really interesting or eye-opening about why he does or doesn't like anything.  For his analysis of "Full House" (which he loved), all he did was sum up the show, then claim it wasn't self-important.  And, as some others have written, some of the items seem to contradict each other.  He loves the "loamy schlock" of "Full House," but hates the "corny, artificial"-ness of "The Brady Bunch."Once again, WHO CARES
find an old edition if similar. find an old edition of this book if the editions are similar.  The cases in it are old so the law isn't really changing so if you can tolerate not being on the exact same page in class & can deal with figuring out the different pages save your money since this text is hard to follow! the notes and problems aren't helpful
Written too soon. I got this book on remainder, very cheap. It was not worth what I paid for it tho.This was quickly written..or ghost written...by Larry Garrison and his sister Stephanie Good.It is poorly written and hard to follow. There are no specifics, and much speculation. Things seem to be thrown into the mix simply for "sensationalism"There are some passages that seem to show real emotion from Dave and this is sad. However, the book was totally premature, written much too quickly. Even since it's publication various new events and things occurred and it was out of date the day it came out since there has been no real resolution to this case.Why did he write it so soon? It seems to be thrown together. The "Shango" stuff is pretty silly too, since those poems and stuff were on the web for months and were pretty much discredited. That was a prank not some real "cult" LOLSad book altogether and not worth the time
I don't agree with the other reviewers. I was not convinced. Having tried Mr. X (it had such a "must have" look about it) and found it seriously wanting, again the main character is not persuasive enough. He actually sounds like a complete jerk. Maybe it would have been more convincing written in third person but as is.......... Not as bad as Mr. X which was a total dissapointment but definititely much ado about very little
I just wasted my money. This book is not for those who want to either learn mathematica graphics or extend their knowledge, as in my case. It is not clear who the audience is for this book. The book starts with graphics primatives (points, lines, polygons, etc), by page 10 your building 2D plots of rotated Cantor sets that have little to do with the topic at hand. By page 49, examples of inverted Farey fractions illustrate something having to do with Graphics, but what it is has already been lost. It only gets worse, roughly each page has a dense set of mathematica code for generating esoteric graphics. And their is about one to two sentences to describe this code. You are left on your own to unravel it. As and intermediate user of Mathematica and one whose been using it since version 1.0. I find the coding hard to understand. (Remember there is no explation) Thus, this book is not for beginners and folks like me. Its target is for those who work at Wolfram Research, such as the author, and play with Mathemeatica all day. In this case, they already understand the material. This book is a disaster
A Disappointment. I have enjoyed almost all her other works but this one was a waste of money and time.  I couldn't force myself to get to the end.  Continually I turned the page in hopes it would get better but it didn't.  The way she moves the point of view from Katharine back to the story is not enjoyable.  I would hate not to enjoy Philippa Gregory again but this one will make me think twice before paying full price again
Spew and Nonsense from A Sleaze Merchant. James Baker, of F The Jews infamy, claims that he never wanted to involved in politics. It might have been better for all Americans, Lebanese, Chinese, Israelis and others had he heeded his own advice.Not only an incompetent Secretary of State who created messes wherever he stepped, but a guy who never met a dictatorship or a totalitarian regime he never liked.Remember Baker is the guy who told us to move on while the Chinese Communists were butchering students in Tianamin Square. The guy who allowed Syria to brutally take over Lebanon just prior to the Gulf War, slaughtering Christians while this churchgoer and his churchgoing boss Bush I just twiddled their thumbs. This is the guy who also whitewashed the intelligence pointing to direct Syrian involvement in the downing of Pan Am Flight 203 over Lockerbie, an event that encouraged one Osama Bin Laden.Later on, Baker bluntly told Israel to stay out of the first Gulf War. Had Israel told this bigot to shove off, we might not have had to deal with the morass Iraq has turned out to be, and the current President Bush, a much more courageous and honest man than daddy, would not have to call on this sleaze operator for help. Israel, of course was rewarded by Baker after 39 SCUD strikes; first with heavy-handed demands to appease both Syria and the Palestinians; when Israel did so, Baker twisted the knife into the back of Israel, withholding loan guarantees promised before the first Gulf War began, then by saying "F The Jews, they didn't vote for us anyway".Not a Patriot, nor a good or even competent Secretary of State but an operator, a sleaze merchant. And a bigot. He should have heeded his own advice and did the American people a favor.(Amazon - stop practicing censorship
Pompous Windbag. I was asked if Umberto Eco was as much a pompous windbag in Foucault's Pendulum as he was in his other novels and responded:I would say his novels are aimed squarely at the purveyors of pretension. When I was reading Foucault's Pendulum I got the same "pompous windbag" impression and concluded that I could have photocopied vast sections of the the Necronomican of Abdul Al-Hazred and the Yog-Sothoth just as easily and pasted together my own book by following the Dungeons and Dragons Rule Book. But don't listen to me -- I have never been that impressed with Eco, especially as a novelist -- Hamlet said it best: "Words, Words, Words" or was it "very like a whale"? I suspect Eco was just trying to sound as erudite as Joyce (or at least Professor Irwin Corey). However, Foucault's Pendulum might well be his greatest work since no novel he has written since has been as well received.I did peek at the sales figures for this novel but they have been suspiciously hidden away in a monastery in the Apennines and the only hint I got was the mention of the bump Eco's sales received with the popularity of The Da Vinci Code. Interestingly, someone asked why Eco didn't sue Brown for plagiarism; a better question might be why the authors of The Holy Blood and the Holy Grail didn't sue Eco ... And the answer of course is, follow the money.But rest assured, despite having attempted to read this pile and given up in disgust, I will give it a generous rating -- 2 stars. Suffice it to say, however, that Foucault's Pendulum had more in common with The Da Vinci Code than just the arcane historical mystery.I'll be traveling back to New Jersey next week and will be able to visit the large dent in the wall of my office where the parabolic arc of this novel met with the obstinacy of lath and plaster.But let's be a little fair about this and realize the Foucault's Pendulum, when compared to the other airport gift-shop thrillers, is certainly adequate to cover the time taken for a trans-oceanic flight, whether it keeps you awake or not. Although if they are showing Raiders of the Lost Ark ..
Wow... what a bad book!. I was very disappointed with this book.  I was hoping for a clear and concise overview of world history in order to gain a general understanding of major world events and trends.  The author had only 513 pages to cover the entire span of world history, so why does he waste space rambling about vague sociological trends, or how one country might possibly have affected another?  The writing itself is incredibly clunky and unclear, and the organization is somewhat confusing.  I only ever had a vague grasp of the details of a specific civilization before the author jumped to another geographic area and back 1 or 2 thousand years.  I couldn't even finish the book ... I'd rather spend my time doing something (anything) else than spend it muddling through this mess
Well Written But His Theories Still Need Work. I have to admit that this book is well written, but it presents a very definite bias.  It builds a "case" for how modern witchcraft was invented and has no old roots at all, that nothing about witchcraft today has any connection to the witchcraft of the past.Something that no one can "prove" one way or the other, and Hutton doesn't manage to do any differently here.  A close reading of the sections re Gerald Gardner, etc even has him come close to admitting as much, since everyone who was around at the time that he was using to collect his info from has proved to have not told the truth at one time or another, and there aren't enough "documents" available to scholars to sort fact from fiction.  As if by putting something down in print automatically makes it so.  Still, Hutton bemoans the lack of paper evidence where the beginnings of witchcraft are concerned, not taking into account that there may be good reason for that and one that he perhaps should have more respect for since it is a living religion today, regardless of how it got started.But then disconnecting the present from the past is a bias of Hutton's in all his books, which are full of great and interesting and useful collections of folklore and mythology and history--so that I end up reading them just for that and skipping over his actual theories and so-called conclusions--as they then go on to state that what we have as folklore survivals today have no real link to the rites and rituals and beliefs of the folks of the past.  This book is no different in that regard, even if it is fixed on witchcraft in specific.
Full of "perhaps" and "maybes". Admittedly I wasn't reading this book for pleasure, as I had to read it for a class, but it is very poor indeed.  Okay, I'm not a PhD historian like Bennett, but that shouldn't mean my criticism is invalid.  The book is an interesting concept, trying find out what a peasant's life was like, but is just FULL of "perhaps she did this..." and "maybe she did that..."  Bennett, in reality, is writing a book about the medieval peasantry, trying to make it interesting and accessible to college students by making the book revolve around a character.  However, the book proves condescending, and left me very frustrated as a slammed the book shut on the final page.  Here are a few examples:"I felt as if Cecilia was demanding...that I write her life" p. 138And regarding the 'doodle' in the court records: "If Cecilia is the woman shown in this drawing, we can surmise that she was tall, thin, curly-headed, and perhaps the bearer of a prominent nose" p. 130As with many other textbooks for college, this was too expensive for only 138 pages, and should be the $10 it is in the Marketplace, not the $30 that my bookstore was charging.The unfortunate truth is that it will be very difficult to ever know what life was like for the average medieval peasant since they did not write anything, and Bennett's account seems to add no real value to this subject area, and the 'story' of Cecilia Penifader could have easily been summarized on a page or two
Frustrated - can't give any star, but your system insist. I have ordered the items twice and still have not received it by now, because your shipping department have problem to provide the correct mailing address to DHL.
Good sex, no plot. I just finished reading Laurel K. Hamiliton's latest, `Danse Macabre'. I was very disappointed. The novel gave a good sense of her true strengths and weaknesses as a writer. She is good at talk, bad at plot; good at sex, bad at action; good at erotica, bad at depth and breadth of character. The `story', such as it is, goes: talk about relationships, fight with Richard, have sex, move to another room, talk about relationships, fight with someone else, have sex, move to nearby corridor, fight with Richard, have group sex...repeat, etc. One novel like that could be an accident or bad editing, two or three is a weakness in the writer. I admire her for starting a genre but she now just writes women's porn, and the problem with women's porn is that we're not really into i
Save your Money!!!. This book is awful.  I have read the entire thing, and it says nothing that is useful.  I have been in public accounting for 10 years, and i am now ready to start my own firm.  I wasted my money on buying this book.  I know it is tempting to buy, since the title is exactly what i was looking for, but trust me, choose another book.  The accounting Guild website that the author constantly refers to is no longer in existence
Make sure you know what you're getting. Be warned....this book has little to do with modern plagues and more to do with a left-wing environmentalist agenda.  Even worse, Mark Walters has trouble deciding how to write his book, switching back and forth between semi-scientific writing and silly poetic descriptions.  In the end, though, he doesn't present the reader with anything new.  All of this information should be fairly common knowledge to anyone who reads a newspaper as often as once a week
Disappointing, self-centered, and unchallenging. After multiple shopping excursions leave her captivated with Amish dolls and quilts, affluent American Sue Bender attempts to impose herself on an Amish family in order to use their community as a personal spiritual retreat. The result was a pseudo-spiritual "journey" that gave rise to this short, self-indulgent, ethnocentric work.Needless to say that Sue Bender is not an ethnographer (she is, we are repeatedly reminded, an artist), and PLAIN AND SIMPLE is not an ethnography. However, in between vapid musings, Bender squeezes in a few pages (about 40% of the book) recounting some of the experiences she had while living with two Amish families for a few months. This is the part of the book that's actually interesting. During her stay, Bender even manages to cast-off a few of her prejudgments and sterotypes about the Amish people and their culture.Although she admits that she expected a prompt spiritual revolution, her instrospectional conclusions are still tidy and conciliatory; she resolves that it is, tragically, not in her "nature" to be "calm", and then labels this epiphany as triumphant progress. Such is the depth of her revelations that she contradicts herself when describing them. Bender's pap analysis of the Amish identifies several "paradoxes". In science, the emergence of paradoxes tends to indicate a flawed theoretical model, but Sue Bender instead chooses to cling to her convenient, superficial interpretations of the multifaceted Amish ethos (which she regards as a novelty).Having learned so much from an Amish community in Iowa, Bender proceeds to simulate the experience by remodelling her modern kitchen entirely in synthetic materials. Years later--but only a few paragraphs after comparing herself to a "Zen monk"--she finally admits that cultivating a focused, Amish-like calm might actually require some sort of inward, self-actualized change. At least that's something.Maybe Sue Bender will grace us all with a follow-up work in which she experiences another spiritual awakening while hat-shopping in Tibet
Overated Book. While some of the book is interesting it is more geared for the beginner in investing.  A lot of the issues brought up are nothing more than common sense.  I read it in a couple of days and felt let down by the simplistic approach to investing problems and the suggested solutions
Not what it appears to be. The play "Into the Woods" not only contains sinister elements, but has an overall dark message to convey.  It preaches moral relativism as blatantly as any catechism teaches religious doctrine.  It teaches is that lying, stealing, cheating, and even murder can be justified as long as it is not against one's perspective on life.  Also, that life is grim and experiencing things forbidden will help you.  This religious doctrine of corruption is conveyed through the story and through specific lyrics of the songs
What a difference!. Evereyone has an opinion on a book, so I thought I would share mine. Yes, this book has a ton of information, maybe too much for the exam.This edition is a far cry from the first one. The Lab configurations could drive you crazy. It was very hard to follow because 1 pod is 4 routers plus a frame switch and 2 Backbone routers! How many people have 7 routers????The first edition called for 3 routers in a pod and 1 backbone router. This made preparing for configuration exercises easy.Comparing the OSPF section from the 1st to the 2nd edition is totally different. All the information is the same but the 2nd edition makes for much harder reading.I acutally returned the book. I was uncomfortable with the layout and organization of it. I am very disapointed with the way the authors changed it. They should have left it exactly as the 1st edition and updated it with new information. Instead they changed sections and made the Labs difficult.I guess if you never owned the 1st edition, you would think this book is great
cumbersome. I find it much more difficult to navigate this book than, say, Moreland and Fleisher's book of Latin grammar. Furthermore, it's verbosity is frequently difficult to penetrate. The author seems to have an aversion to synthetic explanation, relying instead on an overabundance of examples that serve to clarify little of the readers confusion
The only Europeans you will find in Belgium, live in Brussels. After hearing so much about the book, I must admit to a disappointment in its contents.  As a Belgian that has immigrated to the USA, I am well familiar with the many contrasts between Europe and the US and found Mr. Reid's observations to be lacking both in perspective and completeness.  For example, Mr Reid appears enamored with the European welfare state, vaunts its many virtues and describes it as a central pillar of the new "European identity" that is superior to the barbarous American model, but admits in small print in its Appendix that the European welfare state faces a crisis that far surpasses the US social security system in magnitude and will not survive in its present form.  I felt that a fair discussion on the topic should have included a discussion on the countless challenges to the welfare state.I thought that many of his other observations lacked the same kind of roundness.I felt that the book lack depths and was primarily suitable to a reader in search of a caricature on the relationship between Europe and America.
Unfortunately this one didn't work for me!. I must be getting old since I've never done this sort of thing before, but I was so frustrated after about 70 pages of this book that I brought it back to the store. Expecting a solid historical novel set in the declining days of Roman Britain, I found that it started off smartly enough . . . lots of action tautly presented (apparently essential in today's market if you want to see your stuff published). But the tale just didn't catch fire. Told from the protagtonist Publius Varrus' point of view, the story sputters along as our hero leads an expedition into the British hinterlands to trade for iron (becoming ever scarcer as the Roman occupation winds down), stops to slaughter some invading Celts and burn their ship, rushes back to sit by the fire with his superior Caius Britannicus (of solid, old Roman stock and an old friend) to decry the aging process, etc., then dallying gratuitously with the lascivious wife of another friend (who finally kills her in a rage, along with everyone else in his household and himself), and listening to his own fine upstanding mate bemoan the moral deterioration in their little Roman colony as a harbinger of terrible things to come! All in the first 70 pages or so -- I couldn't take much more of it and shut the book, rushing it back to the store to reclaim my cash. Haven't given up on historical novels but this one clearly didn't work for me. Perhaps I am just growing less patient as my own aging process sets in. Still many others here liked the book so perhaps I just didn't stay with it long enough to give it a fair chance. The truth is my eyes aren't what they used to be so I don't want to waste them reading things which don't take off in some fashion for me. And this one just didn't. -- SW
Some Good Techniques, but Totally Off-Base on Theory. In this book Bash Dibra, the self-styled "dog trainer to the stars," recounts some of his experiences raising and training an actual wolf.  You'd think this would lend a great deal of credence to Dibra's training techniques and to his retelling of the now discredited alpha theory, which states that the social instincts of dogs and wolves is based on who's most dominant within the pack's hierarchical structure.  But since this book was initially published in the early 1990s, it's now totally out of date and off-base, at least from a theoretical standpoint.For instance early in the book Dibra says, "You should take the alpha role with your puppy early or he will always try to dominate you."  But the top wolf experts don't even like to use the word alpha anymore because, as David Mech puts it, "It falsely implies a hierarchical system in which a wolf assumes a place in a linear pecking order."  (Canadian Journal of Zoology, 2002.)  Mech has also stated that in wild wolves "dominance displays are uncommon."  So how can you "play the alpha role" with your puppy if there is no such thing as alpha?  And why would a puppy always try to dominate you if dominance displays are rare in nature?Why the disparity?  Because it turns out that the alpha theory was based on studies done on wolves kept captive in sanctuaries, not on the behavior of actual wild wolf packs, who behave in a more cooperative and harmonic manner than captive wolves (or most dominance trainers) do.Dibra also says that training a dog to lie down on command is difficult because lying down is a submissive posture and dogs never want to be submissive.  There are two flaws in the logic here: First of all, the posture for the obedience "down" -- lyiing with the spinal column in a straight line, head up -- is radicallly different from a submissive down -- rolling over on one side and putting a back leg up in the air.  That posture would not win points at an obedience trial!  Meanwhile, Patricia Gail Burnham, in PLAYTRAINING YOUR DOG, says that she saves the down for last because it's too EASY.  Again, why the disparity?The other flaw in Dibra's logic: if dogs always want to dominate and never be submissive, and training them is about showing that YOU'RE dominant, doesn't that describe an ongoing, unending battle between you and your dog's instincts?  Does that sound healthy, happy, and productive?  Wouldn't it be better to find a way -- as Pat Burnham, Kevin Behan, and others do -- to work WITH your dog's instincts and not be constantly battling them?With that said, there ARE some good bits of training advice here: don't rush the training process, give your dog lots of vigorous exercise, etc.  Just keep far, far away from anything that smacks of dominance...the logic of that approach no longer makes any sense
Completely ignores phonology and completely unsuitable for a beginner. This book and CD are a grave disappointment compared to the other Teach Yourself books I've used.  Although it introduces itself as suitable for the "adult learner with no previous knowledge of German and studying on your own," it's completely unsuited for that purpose, since it fails to begin by teaching the basic sounds of German.  I actually know a bit of German, at least enough to know that my pronunciation of "ch" needs work.  The book and CD give no help on this, or on German's other phonemes which differ from English; the first lesson starts using, for instance, "Ich," with no warning or explanation.  Much later there is some discussion of some points on which German's spelling conventions differ from English, but this still largely assume you have already mastered German phonology and only need help with its orthography. Compare this with, for example, _Teach Yourself Esperanto's_ careful introduction to Esperanto's (vastly easier) phonology and orthography, and you'll see how far the publisher's standards have fallen, presumably with the goal of looking easier by avoiding necessary discipline.
Misleading, mis-informed, missed the mark. Much of the coverage is incomplete and misleading.  Souder, in his 1984 work entitled Project Selection and Economic Analysis provides a much more useful, cogent and useable account of selecting and rating projects; if ROI is to be used as the key selection tool!  The book touts the benefits of Critical Chain with zeal; but with limited if any defensible evidence.  For those new to professional project management, the book provides much cheerleading but little value related to delivery of projects within the context of a viable well managed, competitive business environment.  The book's reference list is anemic.  Assessment of the broad scope and depth of information related to PMOs and Portfolio Management is questionable.  While somewhat dated, PACE by McGrath and Portfolio Management by Kleinschmidt et.al. provide far more definitive, proven, actionable, and valuable insight and direction
iteration reiteration. back and forth and back and forth.  im happy.  im sad.  happy.  sad.  love him.  dont love him.  love him.  dont blah. blah blah.  we're poor.  we're not poor.  we're poor.a series of a series of a series of deus ex machinas.malamud's writing style is easy to slip into, and the story is addictive yet annoying (any pulp novel can be addictive).spoilerhe rapes her and and spies on her undressing and it's ok!  (no, don't try to sell me any of that oh the author's not giving this his approval, no no no.  when there is nothing to contradict something, it's the same as saying it's ok.  the same as if someone writes a book where everyone is racist and there is nothing in the book to say that being racist is bad.  in this book there is nothing to say that raping someone is bad and that irks me.)
Be aware of faux liberals!!!. Colmes is an invention by FAUX NEWS!!! He cant even be considered a FAUX liberal because he was invented to be Pawn Hannity's...uh pawn so he can announce that there will be a commercial during their so called liberal/conservative talk show. This book was so mind numbingly..uh..dull and as Faux as Colmes himself..he oughtta banish himself for such buffonry
Shame on Lesko!. I found this book completely useless except for a paperweight or doorstop!  What I did find interesting is that Vickie Adkins-Marcum seems to review all of Matthew Lesko's books.  Of course Vickie highly exalts him using such phrases as &quot;KUDOS to Matthew Lesko! He's making this world a better place!&quot;  For those of you who are a little slow, let me inform you that Vickie Adkins-Marcum is really Matthew Lesko, or someone Matthew gave this review to and paid Vickie to post it.  It's strange that Vickie's reviews all start out with the same first paragraph and have many of the same phrases throughout.  It is also strange that Vickie only reviews Matthew's books.  Shame on you Matthew Lesko for writing your own review
Politically independent?. I bought this book after seeing Mr Florida talk on CSPAN-2. He does have some interesting things to say about creativity, but...I found it very difficult to finish.Mr Florida claims to be politically independent, but he doesn't even hesitate to engage in the sort of casual Bush bashing one see's only in the extreme left, and along with this he repeats almost every silly platitude of same, including the ridiculous "pentagon holding a bake sale to buy a bomber" bit.If he's politically independent, then I'm the King of Siam.And his solution? right out of the leftists playbook, we have to spend more, lots more, way more than we ever have, "several orders of magnitude more" on "education", "culture" and "the arts."Anyone interested in buying a used book? Only read once..
As authentic as a daytime soap opera. I'd heard the buzz (both pro and con) and thought I'd take an independent read. I was dismayed with this book.James Frey has insulted anyone who has gone through a real experience with substance addiction by trivializing the truth of whatever experience he really had. One of the hardest things an addict has to grasp is the TRUTH so that he can take ownership of his actions and take the 12 steps or whatever is necessary to save his life and often the lives of loved ones tangled up in the mess with him. Lies are what enable "slips" and "enabling" and "denial" and those other catch words that describe continued misery and failure. Recovery is nearly impossible without honesty. So, can we look at this man's "memoir" and expect it to offer anything of value? It's poorly constructed, repetitive, and narcisitic. Even if Oprah hadn't exposed him, the writing takes the tone of "whoppers" like Frey's account of the drug house visit in which he "rescues" Lilly. Other reviewers and Smoking Gun have written about the fantastic episodes one by one, and I can't improve on that.Suffice to say this mockery of misery and hope is no more real than a daytime soap opera.  Story lines in a soap may look like real life to one who is isolated from real life, the same way A Million Little Pieces might look to someone who has not been touched by real addiction. A real addict with typical delusion could be misdirected from a true course of treatment with tragic result.I was left with the impression he thinks institutions and people who help others with substance recovery are pitifully misdirected or inept. Like a joke of some kind. I'm not laughing.
A Bit Like A 30's Serial. Frabato (Bardon) battles the Evil Lodge on the eve of WWII.  This book is written in a "Flash Gordon Vs. The Cosmic Meanies" style, further fractured through the services of a bad translator.  If this is Bardon in action, then imagine a scratchy sound track, really evil bad guys in black suits and top hats, and the ultimate good guys being Koot Hoomie and His Ascended  Masters gliding to the rescue on flying carpets.  Bardon's secretary wrote this one and I really believe she was planning to farm this script out to Fritz Lang. At most, quaint, at worst, a disappointment to anyone seeking enlightenment on the Hermetic front.
Overrated. I bought this based on the effusive praised heaped by other reviewers here, but it was a waste of time and money.  Don't bother unless you like your plots thin, your prose repetitive (if I read "palace that may only be told of in song" one more time I swear I am going to hurt someone) and your characterization feeble.Of historical interest only
Dreadful. I can't fathom why this book is beloved.  It's just awful.  Alright, that's a little strong.  The first third-to-half of the book is just awful:  tedious, depressing, tiresome, plotless.  Indeed, Lawrence put a sentence in that, amazingly, perfectly summarizes the first half of the book:"The days seemed to grind by, with curious painfulness, yet nothing happened."That really does say it all.  The protagonist plods through her dreary, depressing life, and nothing happens.At times during this book, I got the feeling that Lawrence really wanted to be a botonist rather than a novelist, because he spends more time talking about every last plant in the woods than he does talking about any of the people in the story.  For a while I had to keep going to the dictionary to look up every plant I'd never heard of, until I finally just gave up.Eventually, in the last third or so of the book, it starts getting a little more interesting.  But sadly, while it starts to appear that something resembling a plot is finally developing, in the end nothing very much comes of any of it.But we DO get long, windy, insufferably self-righteous political nattering, of a Rousseau-ian nature:  all industrialism and capitalism is bad and we should go back to some idylic state of nature thing that never in reality existed (in reality, life in the state of nature is nasty, brutish, and short).  This is at its most ludicrous when the title character makes all these chicken-little doomsday predictions about how mankind is going to be basically wiped out in 100 years unless we give up industrialism/capitalism and all.  Well, the book came out in 1928, so he's still got some 20 years to not look like an utter nincompoop.But I could tolerate the misguided ranting if the rest of the book were good.  It is not.  The biggest problem is the oppressive dreariness of it.  This stems largely from the fact that Lawrence only ever seems interested in writing about emotionally crippled people (so much so that I strongly suspect  that he was emotionally crippled himself).  Every character is decidely neurotic, each in their own special flavor.  The closest thing we have to a representative of mental health would be Mrs. Bolton.  The central character Connie does eventually get her head screwed on straight by the end of the book, but it sure takes her long enough.  I just could not identify with these people one tiny iota.  Repeatedly I just wanted to hit them for their behavior and emotional attitudes.To its credit, the book does advocate an unabashed, unashamed joyous love of sex, something with which I am totally on board.  But that's about the only good thing I could find to say
Random. I listened to Naipaul's nobel lecture, and found many of the things he touched on in that speech echoed in this short work. Naipaul speaks at length about growing up in Trinidad, and of the people he encounters. He speaks about his education. He also speaks about his father's short stories. Reading this book gives one a good sense of what led Naipaul to his first novels, as well as what led him to his later ones. The somewhat puzzling ending wraps up the writer's pessimism re: the future of the novel, which I found disingenuous. It's both unconvincing and the ultimate ingratitude to the form that won him the Nobel Prize
Tell Me Something I Didn't Know. This book may be somethat interesting for polisci majors when they are first starting out, but once a person has their degree and their resume, it is not worth the time to read it
Too wide,incomplete and expensive. After spending too much money, not only you end up with 4 rows of tabs which make it hard to find anything but some of the chapter and tables are missing
This is Basicly New Age Demonology. I can do all things through Christ who strengthens me. Philippians 4:13Put your faith in the bible and Gods wordsNOT THROUGH SHAKTI GAWAINTrust Jesu
Not worth the paper it's written on. I read the book, came to this site to write a review, and was flabbergasted by the people that wrote positive reviews.  Had they never encountered dietary information before?  Was this their first knowledge of how food is processed in the body, and what foods one should eat?  Even if that were the case, there are still better guides available.  I found this book to be a cheap attempt to earn a little money at the expense of people wanting serious nutritional information.  Maybe the positive reviews really were written by friends or by the author's own public relations firm...which advocates napping...induced by reading his own book no doubt
Asinine with Vapid Characters. If this were a satirical view of Regency books, I might have bought the far-fetched storyline, the flat, idiotic characters, and the absolute silliness of the rather dull plot.  As I rather suspect it is not a satire - Catherine Coulter being a best-selling Romance novelist - it was disappointing to say the very least.  I only, I repeat, only listened to it in its entirety because I hadn't brought anything else to listen to at work one day.  If you like historical romance that's fun and funny, try Katie MacAlister's book "Improper English", or for some more serious historical fiction, check out Phillippa Gregory's Wideacre series
Avoid. Only to be used if you want to learn to converse a bit in Japanese. I used this for couple weeks- and I found that "Japanese Step by Step : An Innovative Approach to Speaking and Reading Japanese " is a better option.
Dull, trite, maudlin &amp; cliched. This is probably one of the worst books ever published. 1st of all,it is trying to be allegorical when it really isn't. Kafka is great allegory. Innocence is not. Her ramblings read like bad confessional poems- like Sharon Olds- she had every cliche- being trapped underwater, blood, melodrama, etc... The ironic thing is that this book is SO bad you won't forget it. So I do recommend it so people can see how bad it really is. The sad thing is that there was a review written by a young girl who liked this crap &amp; said how it has &quot;inspired&quot; her to be a writer. Sheesh. This is why bad writing does us no good. This book is easy to write and easy to read, and it gives hopefuls who can't see Jane's lack of talent hope, just as Sharon Olds gives bad women poets hope. UGH
Very inadaquate. The text doesn't come close to describing any of the terrain rendering algorithms adequately. For this, the author refers the reader to whitepapers on the companion CD written by the original authors. After a short search on the Internet, I turned up a wealth of better written descriptions on 3d terrain rendering algorithms. I suggest others to do the same.The author makes a big deal out of the importance of morphing vertex points to minimize the effect of  popping but provides no implementation description. As he says in the text: "I didn't want to limit your imagination..."  What a cop out!The c++ code provided on the companion CD is cleanly written, compiled and ran without problems, but is also clean of any useful comments further mystifying the subject. Another search on the Internet turned up many source code examples with better documentation.
Please read why I give this book one star (it deserves less). I have the Institutes and I have read with careful atention Calvin`s Doctrine of Salvation. He teaches pretty well some  christian truths. He uses the bible and the church fathers, but when Calvin gives his (or Luther`s) peculiar teachings, he shows how unchristian his doctrine really is by NOT quoting a single NT text or church father to support what is nothing more than an heretic view. Just to give an example: he teaches in this book that the good works of the christian stink, smell horrible, but Calvin doesn`t give a single quote from the NT or the fathers to support this view. His teaching is clearly anti biblical. One more: When he teaches about Righteousness he never quotes Matthew 5:20. In this text Jesus tells us that if our justice is not superior than the scribes' we won`t enter the Kingdom of Heaven. Justice for Matthew is good work of love for God and the needy (Mt 6:1). Calvin simply doesn`t quote this biblical text, and just read his commentary on his "Harmony of the Gospels" and you will see how in some 29 lines Calvin just run from the simple sense of this text, and that`s because Mt 5:20 goes against his doctrine (salvation by faith alone).Calvin taught that salvation can`t be lost, even tough this doctrine wasn`t taught by the church fathers (not even by Augustine). Read Daniel Corner`s Conditional Security of the believer"Yes you will find in this book his classic insult to God: that He has predestined some people to hell. And Calvin`s use of violence to support his views is well known. Let`s reread the Bible without Calvin`s lens.
Big Trouble Starts Early On. Interesting experimental fiction.  In Big Trouble, Barry employs the technique of shifting protagonists so well that in the end the reader isn't sure who the story is about.  Characters are abandoned with abandon and neglected through carelessness, leaving a laser sharp focus on what the novel is really about--which is not the psychodelic frog.  It's something less original.The genre is also well disguised.  Is it a comedy or a thriller?  If a novel is funny, can we take the thriller part seriously enough?  In some cases, yes.  When, for example, the comedy is built on clever dialogue by characters truly capable of mayhem.  In this case, no.  It's a little jarring when a comic cop is traveling around, chained to an entertainment center, while a teenage girl is in the clutches of a sex-oriented crazy.In all fairness, the novel does feature a ticking clock, which is handy to have in a thriller.  It's more effective if there is something believable about the story.I expected a novel with an overdose of silliness, but I was spared that, which was a plus.  No characters with absurdly meaningful names.  The nuts and bolts aspect of writing was competently performed.  While there was little depth to any characters, that's probably less of a requirement for characters  we want to laugh at.  The characters could have used some personality, but that's a common flaw.The novel should have been funny in places, for a list of situations would show some potential.  But I had no difficulty keeping a straight face throughout.  Others would disagree.  The politically incorrect portrayal of Miami was entertaining, if not actually funny.The overall effect of reading Big Trouble is to bring about a yearning for the days when an editor would say, "Sir, I know your name is a household word, and I know we could make money on whatever you write, but I have to turn down too many good novels to give a green light to...to something like this."If there ever were such days.
Horrible.... I am taking Calc II and am using this book. This book is horrible! I missed a lecture and when I tried doing the homework I got stuck. There are no example like the examples. I am here on this site to buy companion book so that I can do better on my homework. I wish they would stop using this book at university level courses.
only 1 star. I simply could not get into this book. Maybe I am being picky, but why do words have to be italizied in every paragraph
It didn't work for me either. I too read this book cover to cover with high hopes for success.  I took notes and paid extra attention on how to perform each technique.  When a particular therapy had more than one technique I tried the first with no improvement and worked my way onto the next and still I saw nothing.  I got no immediate results as promised and no results still.  I've been very disappointed with this book
Simplistic. I read this book two years ago hoping that it will give me an insight and an interesting frame of reference for my thesis. I was disappointed. The only aspect I found useful was the information on the different policies of assimilation of the Turkish minority during Communism
No real strategies for making money in all markets!!!. This book is full of historical facts graphs and charts but when it comes time for the author to expose her secrets of how to make money in all these markets...her book is a bust!! Three paragraphs of common sense statements like buy low sell high...Duh!!!!!Not worth your time or money!
For musicians only. I am a moderate guitar player ( with a Hamburg type Rickenbacker guitar) and wanted to learn a little more about the guitar cords used in Beatle songs. I am not afraid to tell that I don't understand anything. If you haven't learned   music theory for at least some years at school this book could be a dissapointment for you as it turned out to be for m
DO NOT BUY THIS!. I would like to reiterate what's already been said. The questions are not helpful and do not reflect the actual questions on the GRE physics exam. Furthermore, there are many typos, and several of the answers they provide are incorrect. Overall this book is completely useless, and I wish I had not purchased it
Boring Book. I read a lot of books and have been doing a number of reviews and this is one of the only books that I couldn't finish. After beginning to read this book I found that it just bounced all over the place. The book was not focused on anything or anyone in particular especially Andrew Jackson. If the book did focus on one thing in particular then it was details of the types of personalities some of the men around Jackson had, which I am not sure how one could be so familar with that not knowing any of the people personally. Sure you can learn something about personalities from letters but the detail about personality types was too much. Spending too much time on small detail does not make for great reading nor does it help one to see the big picture behind the story. So if what you like in a book is learning about personality types you will love this book.The book also seemed to be written by a some what biased point of view by the author. The title should have been something like Politics in the early 1800's. This book will NOT keep your attention from one page to another. If you want to know more about Andrew Jackson spend your money on something else!
Don't waste your time or money on this... ...unless you've never read any of his other books.  Don't get me wrong, I can't say enough good things about Robert Kiyosaki's books.  If you haven't read them (Rich Dad Poor Dad, Cashflow Quadrant, etc.), I highly recomemd that you do.  But there's nothing new in this book.  It just a retread of ideas already presented in his other books, and not as well.  If fact, reading it felt like a advertisment for his other books and products
Very overrated Lincoln biography!!!. I generally enjoy reading biographies, but this one was an exception! A very boring read! I did not think that Lincoln was being portrayed as overly religous as another reviewer did, but I seriously doubt that lincoln had evangelical inclinations. I was dissapointed in the lack of overall perspective of Lincoln's life. I feel that there was too much concentration on Lincoln the politician (his political development) and not enough about his family and social life. I wanted to know Lincoln better on a personal level and I did not feel that this book provided much insight. I may have been expecting too much, but I prefer a biographry that maintains my interest rather than puting me to sleep, as this one frequently did
LACKS OF DETAILED STREET NAMES. I use this book occasionally, but it is lacks the detailed for use by itself.  Where I do use it is with mapquest, that tends to not show the smaller lakes, but the Gazetteer does a much better job
the literary equivalent of candy corn. The success of this book might be chalked up to the old axiom how no one ever went broke underestimating the intelligence of the american people.I was drawn to this book by it's title and central premise.  TOo bad Ben Sherwood can't write worth a lick.I'm not sure which is more upsetting:  how poorly Ben Sherwood writes, or how low our expectations have fallen as readers, given the number of positive reviews this book has received.
Extremely Dull. Jensen's biography of Schumann is a merely adequate portrayal of this most extraordinary composer. The prose is incredibly flat and repetitive--the &quot;insight&quot; that Schumann loved children--hardly original considering the &quot;Kinderszenen&quot; and &quot;Album fur die Jugend&quot;--is made several times, though any further elucidation is avoided. Another glaring failure of the book is the lack of musical analysis. After spending far too much time on the youthful &quot;Papillons,&quot; Jensen practically ignores such ground-breaking works as the &quot;Gesange der Fruhe&quot; and the eerily gorgeous &quot;Geistervariationen.&quot; Often, such works receive only a curious aside, such as &quot;dense texture&quot; and the like. Altogether an unsatisfying read
Avoid at all costs!!!!. I am having to use this book for an Accounting Grad class and it is perhaps one of the worst txt books I have ever laid my eyes on!  Wordy doesn't begin to describe how bad this book is, did this go through an editor or straight to press?  It just goes on and on and on throwing in examples that come later in the chapter, the examples are poor never follwing a simple path, and the questions at the end of each section are as bad as the book.  This book reminds me of someone who decides to teach you something off of the top of their head, they didn't bother to make any notes or set a goal for how they wanted to approach the subject.  Avoid at all costs!!
I feel sorry for Isaac Asimov. If he were alive to see what Allen did to his Robot Universe, he would strangle the guy. This is a perfect example of why Allen should've stuck to those Little House On The Prairie sequels. The basic idea of Inferno (Just like it's predecessor, Caliban) is the creation of two new kinds of robots: The New Law robots and the No Law robot, and their effect on the society of the planet Inferno. The New Law Robots are freer than the original Three Law robots in Asimov's books, but have their own share of problems; Caliban, the only robot created with no laws, is of course the most free, but is far from human. This is all well and good, and in a more capable writer's hands would have been interesting, but Allen takes his one or two good ideas and throws them in a turbine. I'm sorry, Mr. Allen, but I don't really care about the intimate details of Tierlaw Verick's body, or anyone else's, for that matter. Whatever happened to &quot;don't tell, show&quot;
Too slanted. This book is so slanted to the left that I could not finish it because I ended up on the right.The endless accusations of fascism and nazism to the people on the conservative side are tiresome. Gerry has a great novel called "Half moon and empty stars" and that is a book
Shipping cost. When I ordered the books and checked out, there was no indication of the shipping cost. Since I dealt thru Amazon before, I assumed the shipping to be included. When I received my invoice, the shipping cost equalled the cost of the books.I contacted the seller and was told that was the way it was.I am very unhappy that I have to pay this cost as the books were already shipped.If you are going to use this type of outside services, I would advise you to insure that the customer knows what he will pay, in total, before they complete their order.This transaction is a  negative for Amazon.Regard
Brain Dead Main Character Kills Story. This book was simply not up to Baldacci's usual quality.  The story goes all over the place, but doesn't get anywhere until the last 50 pages.  Even after 200, 300, and even 400 pages we are still chasing dead ends and no closer to figuring out where this thing is going.  I don't mind suspense, but you can stay "suspended" only so long until it becomes boredom.The main character is the worst one Baldacci has ever created.  One minute she is crying her eyes out, and puking her guts out totally paralyzed by fear, and the next minute she is tracking down trained bad guys and saving the lives of the inept FBI agents and police.  This is repeated throughout the story.........I would think she had worn out all the emotional crap by the end of the book.  She makes one blunder after another resulting in the deaths of innocent people, but at the same time comes up with brilliant deductions that help her stay one step ahead of the mastermind killers.  By the end of the book I found myself pulling for the sadistic killer to finally finish this stupid [...] off.This is one of those books to keep next to the bed in case you are having trouble sleeping.
Don't All Religions Lead to God?. This book implies that the reader will learn about other religions, but   brings few facts or new information to the reader.  The content is quite shallow.  Our small group is quite disappointed in this selection and would not purchase another from this series
Ambition is the death of thought. ``People  say again and again that philosophy  doesn't really progress, that we  arestill occupied  with the same philosophical problems as were  theGreeks.But  the people who say this don't understand why ishas to be  so. It is becauseour language has remained the same and  keeps seducing us  into asking the same questions.  As longas there continues to be a verb  'to be' that  looks as if it functions in the same way as 'to eat' and  'to  drink', as long as we stillhavethe adjectives  'identical', 'true',  'false', 'possible',as  long as we continueto talk of a river of time, of  an expanseof  space, etc., etc., people will keepstumbling over the  samepuzzling  difficulties and find themselves staring atsomethingwhich  no explanation seems capable of clearing up.And what'smore,this  satisfies  a longing for the transcendent, because, insofar  as peoplethinkthey can  see `the limits of human  understanding', theybelieve of course thatthey  can see  beyond these.``''Philosophy is a battle against the bewitchment of ourintelligence by means of language````Ambition is the death of  thought'''These three quotes are from Ludwig Wittgenstein who redefined philosophysome70 years ago (but most people have yet to find this out).Dennett, though he has  been a philosopher for some40 years, is one them. It is also curious that both he and his prime antagonist, John Searle, studied under famous Wittgensteinians (Searle with John Austin, Dennett with Gilbert Ryle) but Searle got the point and Dennett did not. Dennett is a hard determinist(though he trys to sneak  reality in the back door), and perhaps this is due to Ryle, whose famous book 'The Concept of Mind'(1949) continues to be reprinted.  That book did a great job of exorcising the ghost but it left the machine.  Dennett enjoys  making  the mistakes Wittgenstein, Ryle(andmany others since) have exposed in detail.Byaccident,just before this book, I had  read ''The Minds I'', which Dennett coauthored withDouglas Hofstadter in 1981. They made some bad  mistakes(see my review), and saddest of all, they reprinted  twofamous articles that pointed the wayout of the mess---Nagel's `What is  like to be a bat?` and an early version of John  Searle's Chinese Room argument explaining why computers  don't think.Nagel pointed out that we do noteven know how to recognize whata concept of a bat's mind would be  like.  Searle similarly explained how we lack a way to conceptualize  thinking  and how itdiffersfrom what a computer does(eg,it can translate Chinese  without understanding it). Likewise, we lack a clear test for recognizing  what countsas good  vs bad--or just intelligible-- for many philosophical and scientific concepts. Our  use of the words consciousness, choice, freedom, intention,  particle, thinking, determines, wave,cause, happened,  event(and so on endlessly) are  rarely a source of confusion  but as soon as we leave normal life and enter philosophy(and anydiscussion detached from the environment  in  which language evolved) chaos reigns. Wittgenstein  was the first to understand why and to point out how to avoid  this. Unfortunately, he died inhis prime, his works are composed almost entirely of a series of examples of  how the mind(language)  worksand he never wroteany popular books,  so  understanding of his work is restricted to a very few.Searle  is one of the world's leadingphilosophers and has written  manyextremely clear  and highly regarded articles and books,some of which have pointed out the  glaring defects in Dennett'swork.His review ``Consciousness Explained  Away'' of Dennetts 1991 book`'Consciousness Explained'' and his book''The Mystery of Consciousness'' are very well  known,and show, in a way that isamazingly clear for philosophical writing,why neither Dennett(nor any of the  hundreds of philosophersandscientists who have written on this topic)havecome closetoexplaining the hard problem--ie, how do you conceptualizeconsciousness.Many suspect we will never be able to conceptualizeany of the reallyimportant things, but it isclear that we are  nowhere near it now. Dennett has mostly  ignored his critics but has favored  Searle with vituperative personal attacks.Searle has been accused by Dennett and others of  being out to destroy cognitive psychology which is quite funny as modern philosophy is(mostly) a branch of cognitive psychology and Searle has made it very clear for 30 years that WE are a good example of a biological machine that is conscious, thinks, etc,.  He just points out that we don't have any idea how this happens.   Searle characterizes as ''intellectualpathology'',the views ofDennett andall those who denythe existence of thevery phenomena they setout to explain. Dennett repeats his  mistakes here andleaves his reply to his critics to the penultimate page of  the book, where we are told that they areall mistaken and it is a waste of spaceto show how! Unsurprisingly, there isnot one reference toWittgenstein or Searle in theentire book.There arehowever, many references to other old schoolphilosophers who are as confusedas he is.Like most people, it does not cross his mindthatthe very inference engineshe thinks with are forcinghim to cometo  certainconclusions and that these will oftenbe quite  unconnectedwith or wrong about the way things are in the  world. They are a jumble of evolutionary curiositieswhich do various tasks in organizing behavior that were useful for survivalhundreds of thousands of years ago.Wittgenstein was a pioneerin doingthought experiments in cognitive psychologyand beganto elucidate the nature of these engines and the subtletiesof language in the 30's, and thus he made the sorts of commentsthat this review begins with.Dennett says(p98)that  his view is compatibilism, ie, that  free will(whichI hopewe can equate with choice) is compatible with  determinism(ie, that''there is at any instant exactly one physically  possible  future''--p25). He wants to show that determinism is not the same as inevitablity. However, the whole book is smoke  and mirrors by means of  which choice, in the sense we normally  understand it, disappears and we are  left with ``choice``,  which is something we cannot choose. Naturally, this  echoes  the fate of consiousness in his earlier book ``Consciousness  Explained``.It is remarkable that, at a time when we are  just beginning to  reach the point where we might be able to understand the basics of how a  single neuron works(or how an  atom works for that matter), that anyone should  think they can  make the leap to understanding the whole brain and to explain  its most complex phenomena. Please recall the last sentence of Wittgenstein  from the opening quote: ''And what'smore,this satisfies a longing for thetranscendent, because, insofar aspeoplethinkthey can see `the limits of  human understanding',theybelieve of course thatthey can see beyond  these.`` The  relation between language, thought and reality is  extraordinarily complex and everyone gets lost. If one is very, very  careful,some understanding is possible, but Dennett throws caution to  the  winds and we are dragged into the quicksand.There are  at least 3 different  topics here(evolution of our brain, choice  and morality) and Dennett tries  vainly to weld them together into  a coherent account of how freedom evolves  from the deterministic  crashing of atoms. There is, however, no compelling  reason to  accept that bouncing atoms (or his favorite example, the game  of  life running on a computer) are isomorphic with reality.  He knows that  quantum indeterminacy(or the uncertainty principle)  is a major obstacle to  determinism however defined(and has  been taken by many as an escape to  freedom) but dismisses  it due to the fact that such events are too rare to  bother  with. By extension, its unlikely that any such  event will happen now or even in our  whole lifetime in our  brain, so we appear to be stuck with a determined  brain(whatever  that may be). However, the universe is a big place and its been  around a long time(perhaps forever) and if even one such quantum  effect occurs  it would seem to throw the whole universe into  an indeterminate state. The  notion ''there is at any  instant exactly one physically possible future''  cannot be true  if at any instant a quantum indeterminacy can occur--in this  case  there would seem to be infinitely many possible futures. This  recalls  one of the escapes from the contradictions of physics--each  instant our  universe is branching into infinitely many universes.He correctly rejects the idea that quantum indeterminacy gives us the answer to how we can have choice.  This obvious idea has been suggested by many but the problem is that nobody has any idea how to specify an exact sequence of steps which starts with the equations of physics and ends up with the phenomena of consciousness(or any other emergent phenomenon).  If so, they will definitely win at least one Nobel Prize, for not only will they have explained consciousness, they will have explained the universal phenomenon of emergence(how higher order properties emerge from lower ones). So, they would have to solve the 'easy' problem(to determine the exact state of the brain corresponding to some mental state and preferably specify the exact position of all the atoms in the brain over time-ignoring uncertainty) and the 'hard' one(what exactly correlates with or produces consciousness or choice etc?). And while they are at it how about also doing the  impossible--an exact and full solution to the quantum field equations for a brain.  It is very well known that these equations are uncomputable, even for one atom or a vacuum, as it would require an infinite amount of computer time.  But infinite will do for one atom so maybe a brain will take no longer.He starts off on the  first page appealing to the laws of  physics for protection against fantastic  notions such as immaterial souls, but physics is made of notions just as  fantastic(uncertainty,  entanglement, wave/particle duality, Schrodinger's  dead/alivecat etc) and as Feynmann said many times ``Nobody understandsphysics!'' Many think nobody ever will.On pg  2 he says  our values have little to do with the goals of our cells and  on pg 2  to3 that our personality differences are due to how  our ''robotic teams are  put togther, over a lifetime of  growth and experience.`` This is a bald  dismissal of human  nature, of the abundant evidence that our differences are  to  a large extent programmed into our genes and fixed in early  childhood, and  is typical of his constant confused wandering  back and forth between  determinism and environmentalism.On page  9 he notes that free will is a problem and our  attitudes to  it make a difference, but for whom? Nobody but philosophers. We make choices. What's the problem?  One has to step  outside life to experience a problem and then  everything becomes a problem.  What are consciousness, pain,  yellow, intention, matter, quarks, gravity  etc.? I doubt that  anyone has ever experienced a fundamental change in their  interactions  with people or their decision making processes due to their  thinking about choice. This shows that there is something  strange about such questions. Wittgenstein would probably say that the language games are  different. There are games  for language connected with the cognitive  templates for decisions  or seeing colors etc, and thinking philosophically is operating them in decoupled mode. Decoupled modes permit  thinking about the past, planning for the future, guessing  the mental states  of others, etc, but if one takes the results  in the wrong way and starts to  think `'John will try to steal  my wallet'', rather than just imagining that  John might  do it, confusion enters and those who cannot turn off the decoupled  mode or distinguish it from coupled mode,  enter the realm of pathology. Some aspects of schizophrenia and other mental illness might be  seen this way--they lose control of which mode they are in, eg, notbeing able to see the  difference between the motives people  have and the motives they might have.One can then see  much of the philosophizing people do as operating in  these  decoupled modes but failing to be able to keep in front of them  the  differences from the normal mode. Normal mode--eg, what  is that lion doing--  was undoubtedly the first one evolved  and decoupled modes--what did that lion  do last time or what  does he intend to do next--evolved later. This was  probably  never a problem for animals--any animal that spent too much  time  worrying about what might happen would not be very successful  contributing to  the gene pool. It is interesting to speculate that only when humans developed  culture and began degeneratinggenetically, could large numbers of people  survive with genes that  led them to spend alot of time in decoupled modes.  Hence, we  have philosophy and this book, which is mostly about running the  decision templates in decoupled mode where there are no real  consequencesexcept earning royalties for putting the results  in a book for other people to  use to run their engines in decoupled mode.' Let us alter Wittgenstein's quote to read:  ''As longas there continues to be a verb 'to decide'  that looks as if it functions in the same way as 'to  eat' and 'to  drink',as long as we continueto talk of  freedom of action, of saying I  wish I had done otherwise,  etc., etc., people will keepstumbling over the  samepuzzling  difficulties andfind themselves staring atsomethingwhich  no  explanation seems capable of clearing up.''As withmost philosophy books, nearly every page, often every paragraph,  changes from one type of language  game to another without  noticing that now one would have to be joking or  dreaming  or acting in a play or reciting a story , etc, and not actually  intending anything nor describing an actual situation in the  world. On page  10 he says we count on free will for the  whole way of thinking about our lives,  like we count on food  and water, but who ever, outside philosophy, standing in  front  of lunch counter full of food, ever thinks how fine it is that  they  have free will so they can pick coke instead of mineral  water? Even if I  want to be a serious compatibilist and  try thinking this in decoupled mode, I  have to exit and  enter nondecoupled mode to make the actual choice. Only then  can I go back to decoupled mode to wonder what might have  happened if I had  not had the ability to make a real choice.  Wittgenstein noted how pretend  games are parasitic on real ones(this is not a trivial observation!).  The ability to engage in very complex  decoupled scenarios  is already evident in 4 year old children. So I would say  that normally, nobody counts on having choice, but rather we just choose.On the same page he shows again that he does not grasp cognitive  basics.  He says we learn to conduct our lives in the conceptual  atmosphere of choice,  and that `'It appears to be a stable  and ahistorical construct, as eternal  and unchanging as arithmetic,  but it is not.'' And on page 13--''It is an  evolved creation  of human activity and beliefs''. The whole thrust of  cognitive  psychology is that we do NOT learn the basics of planning, deciding,  promising, resenting, etc, but that these are built-in functions  of the  inference engines that work automatically and unconsciously  and start running  in very early childhood. There is no evidence  that they change as we grow,  or are in any way subject to  our beliefs,only  that they mature just as our body does.On pg 14 he suggests  its probable that our having free will depends on our believing  we have  it!  Do we believe we see an apple, feel a pain, are  happy? The language  game of belief is very different from  that of knowing. We can believe we have  a dollar in our  pocket but if we take it out and look at it we can't  meaningfully  then say that we still believe it(except as a joke etc.). The  inference engine can run in decoupled(belief) mode so we can  imagine havingchoices or making them, but in life we just make them and it is only in very  odd situations we can say  that we believe we made a choice. But Dennett is  saying thisis the universal case. If making a choice had any dependence on belief than so would everything everything else--consciousness,  seeing,  thinking,etc. If we take this seriously(and he says 'the serious problems of  free will' ) then we are getting  into trouble and if we actually try to apply  it to life, then madness is minutes away..On page 65 et seq., he  discusses causation, intention and the `informal predicates'  that we use to  describe atoms etc, but cognitive resarch has  shown that we describe all  objects with a limited number of  ontological categories which we analyse with  our intuitive physics  modules and that when agents (ie animals or people or  things  like them--ie, ghosts or gods) are involved we use our  concepts (engines)  for agency, intuitive psychology, social minds, etc to  decide  how to behave. There is almost certainly no causation module  but  rather it will involve all of these and other inference  engines, depending on  the precise situation. Discussing  possibility and necessity is much  easier if  one talks in terms of the output of our modules for intuitive  physics,  agency, ontological categories etc. Of course there is no mention  here of Wittgenstein's many incisive comments on causation,  intention,  deciding, nor of Searle's now classic works  on Intention and Social Reality.He spends much time on  Ainslie's book 'Breakdown of Will', in which is  discussed  the hyperbolic discounting faculties (ie, inference engines) by which  we evaluate probable outcomes.Hemakes much of the excellent work of Robert Frank on altruism, emotion and economics, but the book he cites was 15 years old when this book was published. It was Bingham's idea, amplified by Frank and by Boyd and Richardson (1992) that  cooperation  was greatly stimulated by the evolution of means for punishing cheaters. He suggests these as examples of Darwinian approaches  that areobligatory and promising. Indeed they are, and  in fact they are standard  parts of economic, evolutionary  and cognitive theory, but unfortunately, he  makes little reference  to the other work in these fields. All that work tends to show that people do not choose but their brains choose for them. He does not establish any convincing connection between this work and the general problem of choice.Onpg 216 he says that making oneself so  that one could not have  done otherwise is a key innovation in  the evolutionary ascent to free will,  and that we can only  be free if we learn how to render ourselves insensitive  to  opportunities. But where this ability resides is not revealed  for  several chapters! Dennett has a penchant for hiding  his ideas in a massive  amount of rather irrelevant text.  Again, he gets things backwards, as there is  a vast body of  very good evidence from biology and psychology that we are get  the feelings that we should behave in some way from our inference engines and  these are not provided by some part of our conscious  self, but by the automatic and unconscious operation of the  engines. As he notes, hundreds of experiments  with the Prisoner's Dilemma  and related protocols have shown how easy it is to  manipulate  people's choices and that their calculations are not conscious  and  deliberate at all. When the situation is manipulated to  make them conscious,they are much slower and  less reliable. So, there has been  constant pressure of natural  selection to make the engines fast and automatic  and inacessible  to deliberate thought.Dennett says `we make ourselves'  so  that we could not do otherwise and that this is the basis  of morality and  choice. The evidence would seem to be exactly  the opposite. Our inference engines give  us basic moral intuitions and  we generally act in accord with the results.  If we or others  do not we feel guilt, outrage, resentment etc, then cheater genes will invade the population and this is one of the main theories as to how a good part of morality evolved.Our genes make us so we can't(mostly) do otherwise, not our will or whatever Dennett thinks can do it.   We can often choose to do otherwise but our own  intuitions and the knowledge of social disapproval  usually serve to limit our choices. These intuitions evolved  in small groups between 50,000 and some  millions of years ago. In the modern world the intuitions are often not to  our  advantage and the social controls weak. This is a prime reasonfor the chaos in the world.On pg  225 he finally sneaks in a definition of free will  as ''a complicated snarl of mechanistic causes that look likedecision making(from certain angles)''. He claims that thisplays all the valuable  roles of free will but lacks some  (unspecified) properties possessed by  traditional free will.  The smoke is thick but I  am pretty  sure one of those unspecified properties is what we understand aschoice. He insists(top pg 226) that his naturalistic  account of decision  making leaves plenty of room for moral  responsibility, but making ourselves so  we couldn't do otherwise  does not seem to describe the way we actually  function, nor  does it seem to leave any room for morality, as that would seem  to consist precisely in being able to do otherwise.He  does not propose  any test for deciding if a choice is voluntary  or forced and I doubt he could  do so. Normally if someone  asks us to move our hand, we know what counts as  having a  choice, but, typical of philosophers, I expect that regardless  of  whether it moves or not he will count both as evidence for his position.At this point he also starts his discussion of Libet's well known work on conscious attention which is the only part of the book that I felt was worth my time.On page 253 et seq., he sneaks in his definition of conscious will--the  ''brains user illusion  of itself''' which has as one of its main roles  providing  ''me with the means of interfacing with myself at other times``.  And ``Illusory or not, conscious will is the persons guide  to his or her own  moral responsibility for action.`` He says  the trick we need is to see that  ``I`' control what is happening  inside the ''simplification barrier''...  ''where decision  making happens''. ``Mental events'' become conscious by  ''entering  into memory''. ''The process of self description... is  what we  are''. The crucial thing is that choice is possible  because the self is  distributed over space(the brain) and time(memories).  He realizes this is  going to leave many incredulous(everyone who can follow this and really understands!). ''I know that many  people find it hard to graspthis idea or take it seriously. It seems to them  to be a trickwith mirrors, some kind of verbal slight of hand that whisksconsciousness, and the real Self , out of the picture just when it was about to  be introduced.'' Many will say he took the words out of their mouth, but I would  say it's incoherent and  thateverythingwe know about consciousness and the whole  universe(making the obvious extensions of such claims)  was gone long beforewegot this far.On pg 259 he says that culture has made us rational animals!  This is a stunning denial of human nature(ie, genetics and evolution) coming from the person who wrote 'Darwin's Dangerous Idea''!  Presumably he is talking about his idea that it is memories spread over space(the brain and other people) and time that give us choices and morals and consciousness(line 6 from bottom).  He says consciousness is a user-interface but it is never made clear who or where the user is and how it interfaces with the brain(you will have to suffer through 'Consciousness Explained to find that there is no answer there either).  Though he makes many references to evolutionary and cognitive psychology, he seldom uses any of the terminology that has been current for decades(social mind, intuitive psychology, coalitional intuitions etc) and clearly is not familiar with most of the concepts. If he means that we got the fine details of morality from culture, thats ok, but this is the icing on the cake and the cake was baked by the genes.We are also told here that R&D(by which he means evolution here, but other things elsewhere) has given us the self  and that language creates new kind of consciousness and morality.  I am sure that he will get little agreement on this.  It seems quite clear that consciousness and the basics of morality evolved in primates(and earlier) long before spoken language(though it is a very deep topic as to how language evolved from extant capacities in the brain).  He continues ``morality memes arose by accident some tens of thousands of years ago`` which would be OK if he meant the icing on the cake but he clearly means the cake!  And then he says the point of morality is not the survival of our genes, which is an amazing (and totally incorrect)thing to say, even if he was only referring to memes.On pg 260 he claims  that  because we do not comprehend our ''bland dispositions  to cooperate'', they  mean nothing to us, but it is the operation  of our templates that is  everything to us. There is ample  evidence that if one of them is damaged a  person cannot function  properly as a social being(eg, autism).  I would say it is the operation of the templates for intuitive psychology etc which lead Dennett to the counterintuitive views that we do not have consciousness and choice in the way we think.He also says here that it was one of the major  evolutionary transitions when we were able to change our views and reflect on reasons for them. This again reflects his lack of understanding of evolutionary psychology.  I know of no evidence that the basic moral intuitions, like all the templates, are accessible to consciousness.  We may decide our cheating was justifiable, or forgive someone else's cheating, but we still know it was cheating(ie, we cannot change the engine). I suspect my ancestors a million years ago had the same feelings in the same situation but what has happened is that there are lots of other things that may be taken as relevant and that sometimes these will lead me to act contrary to my feelings.  Another issue is that as culture developed, one had to make many important or 'moral type` decisions for which the engines were not evolved to give a clear answer.On pg 267 he says that we now replace our `free floating rationales'(probably corresponding to what cognitive psychologists call our templates or inference engines) with reflection and mutual persuasion. And on pg 286 he says that it is a child's upbringing --demanding and giving reasons-- that affects moral reasoning. Again, he just has no grasp of what has happened in the last 30 years of research--the templates do not change with reflection or upbringing. We are then told again that consciousness makes moral issues available over time to the self, which takes responsibility.  It is not any more coherent or credible with repetition.On pg 289 he has a chapter summary which repeats the mistaken notions that it is culture that makes it possible to reflect and that choice depends on education(memory) and sharing.  It's clear that it is not culture but the inherited cognitive structures that make it possible to reflect and to choose and that culture determines the acceptable actions and their rewards or punishments. On pg 303 he discusses the classic philosophical barrier between 'ought'and 'is' , unaware that our templates solved that problem long ago--ie, they tell us how to feel about situations regarding other people.  He also seems to be unaware that there are hundreds of cultural universals implanted in our genes(eg see 'The Blank Slate').He often starts into what looks like its going to be a good discussion of some issue in evolutionary psychology, but invariably wanders off into philosophical arcana and winds up with more confusion.  This happens on pg 261 where he states that concepts like 'praiseworthy' were shaped over millennia by culture, while most would say the basis for such concepts is in the genes and each culture only detetermines the details of acceptable reactions to the intuitions its members get from their innate mechanisms.   On pg 262 he tries to explain how an ESS(Evolutionarily Stable Strategy) can produce morality. His idea here is that genetic `R&D` produces dim understandings of morals and then culture(memetics) produces variations and clarifications.  I would say that we all know, and much research has made clear, that we commonly get very clear results from our inference engines and only dimly understand in special cases.  Culture merely decides what we can do about our feelings.The last part of the book is mostly  concerned  with moral culpability. He refers to the legal classic by Hart  and  Honore, which I started reading 30 years ago since it's  authors were deeply influenced by Wittgenstein.  Dennett tells us that we have  control over our own morality and  that thinking about morality will improve us.  But, there seems  no justification whatever for this view in this book. There is nothing at  all  here to help anyone escape from the dictates of the monkey mind. It is a defensible point of view that those who manage this do so by traveling a spiritual path that  has no connection with philosophy- and there is not a hint of  spirituality in this entire book--another telling point considering that many mystics have fascinating things to say about the functioning of the mind. I find  more wisdom about how  to be free and moral in any of Osho's 200 books than anywhere in philosophy. One rarely finds spiritually and morally  advanced people teaching at universities. There is no sign here, nor in  anything he has done, that Dennett is morally superior. After 40 years of thinking about morality he launches personal attacks on his critics or arrogantly dismisses them.  It seems clear that, like all of us, he is trapped in the limits of his inference engines.So, how much opportunity is there to  improve our morality? It seems  clear(eg, see Pinker's `The Blank Slate`) that  most of our behaviour  is genetic and the rest due to unknown factors in our  environment, in spite of the vigorous efforts of parents and religions and political parties. On  average, maybe 5% of the variation in moral behavior(variations are the only thing we can  study) is due to our own efforts. The moral choices that matter  most today are  those affecting the fate of the world. But our moral templates were not evolved to deal with overpopulation and the greenhouse effect.How remarkable it would be if just one of the hundreds of millions of educated people in the world managed to figure out what consiousness or choice or any mental phenomenon really is.  And if one did, we would expect them to be a scientist at the cutting edge of research using some exotic fMRI  equipment and the latest parallel processing neural networked fuzzy logic computer etc.  But a philosopher or physicist just sitting there thinking, coming up with the solution to the greatest puzzle there is!  And then writing a whole book about it without checking with the sceptics first.  To return to the quote at the beginning--'Ambition is the death of thought'.  Indeed--though clearly Wittgenstein was thinking of interesting thoughts
Stop-- This is a "must not" read. You really need to be careful when reading this book.  Understandingly, people facing the challenges of ADD/ADHD are stressed out and overly receptive to a voice like Hartmann's.  Strangely unprofessional, Hartmann offers a "soft ball" lob to those looking for a feel good camp-fire-like discussion of the challenges of ADD/ADHD.  This is not a productive way to approach these challenges.  Overcoming these challenges takes discipline, a manner of thinking totally absent in Harmann's writing.  I would go so far as to say that the author's writing style, the manner in which he presents his ideas, and the thinking behind those ideas represents the worst, rather than the most optimal aspects, of traits associated with ADD. Beware
Do you believe in "etheric formative forces" ?. This is total BS. Absolutely nothing grounded in reality. These people or completely mad. Unless you believe in magic and hocus pocus, stay away. Scary!!
Waste of time. This book is pretty pathetic. Writing style is cheesy and even ridiculous at times. Waste of time
Misleading Title, Too Academic for Rock and Roll. Unfortunately, many so-called "rock journalists" are nothing more than sociology majors who let their devotion to an artists or group cloud their vision of unbiased criticism.  In this case, we get a bit of that from the contributing writers as well as a bias toward progressive "rock," which is in most cases nothing more than classical music composer wannabees who don't want to miss out on the fabled rock lifestyle.  Perhaps "Understanding Irrevalent Prog Rock" would have been a better title. And why would anyone analyze a four-minute song in 20 pages?  Does any true rock song need more than a couple of paragraphs?  This ain't Mahler, y'know
Angry judgmental words. The tone of the book starts off seemingly angry, cynical and sarcastic. For these reasons I may not be inclined to recommend this book to anyone who is not one hundred percent passionate about having a natural homebirth. I found the first half of this book to be abrasive at times and repetitive. It seems that Ms. Wildner feels the need to convince her audience to see things her way and if they don't then they are at fault. The wording in the book does not seem to leave much room to allow women to choose what is right and comfortable for them unless it is a drug-free, intervention-free homebirth. The book at times is very judgmental of women's lifestyles and choices that do not conform to the author's viewpoints. I feel that the tone of this book may turn women away and they will not benefit from the very useful information found in the latter chapters. Mother's Intention seems to be full of contradictions. Ms. Wildner seems to be trying to convince women that childbirth is not naturally painful but that they have just been conditioned to believe that it is and therefore they feel it. She uses the reasoning that women are told by the bible that it is "Eve's Curse" so they are programmed to think that God made childbirth painful and so it is. She then goes on to say that women who are not Christians are not effected by that but also have painful births. I personally feel that pain is an important part of the birthing process. Learning methods to cope with the pain and work with your body to birth your baby is an empowering event. The experience can transform a woman into a warrior that is ready and able to confront and work through any situation life has to offer. I also feel that the pain is a link to the awareness and consciousness of the event and the child. In my opinion Ms. Wildner did not emphasize this very important element of birth but discounted it by implying that birth should be naturally pain-free and if it is not then you are not doing it the right way. Once you read past the repetitive attempt at convincing you to believe that birth is painless and only natural homebirth is the correct way, this book has a lot to offer. The information on how intervention can lead the birthing process down a road to unnecessary cesarean is a message all women need to hear. Knowing that they do have a choice and having labor support can help them to have the birth they intent is also a valuable message. I would however recommend a more objective book like The Thinking Woman's Guide to a Better Birth by Henci Goer instead
Very biased and Anti Communist Propaganda book. I m not a big fan of communism, nor of Stalin. But I cross checked the facts mentioned in this book with facts in some other books I have read on similar subject and found that author Edvard Radzinsky is strongly biased against Stalin. In the entire book he seems to give no credit for anything to Stalin nor to his leadership qualities during the course of Second World War. Dont waste your money on a propaganda book. Better to go for an unbiased account from a neutral observer, thats what Biographies are supposed to be
Read "Blindness" and Pass on The Plague... Dr. Rieux, the main character of the novel, moves throughout the book in a detached surreal hopeless manner.  He goes thru the motions of "doing his job" while death surrounds him from a wide spread and accelerating plague.I find Jose Saramago's "Blindess" to be a far superior book to The Plague.  Similar theme and concept but more descriptive and moving.  The Plague was clinical in its approach - almost bloodless.I found this highly acclaimed book to be very difficult to re-read, often having to re-read many pages over and over.  I would pass on this book
Too old to matter. This book really should be removed from circulation.  While basic MIDI information is in there, it is so out of date it just makes it hard to read. Examples are of obsolete or vintage gear and has no real relation to todays musician.Illustrations are all cheesy and look like bad microsoft clipart. Photographs are all poor and dated. The section on MIDI and a personal computers lists atari and commodore as possible good choices - get the picture!If you are looking for charts of Control codes etc, - they are in here, but you can find those anywhere. If you are trying to get information on MIDI in the last decade or so,  buy a different book
Outdated Advice. I'm getting married again after 20 years of being single &amp; was looking for relevant advice.  It was not to be found in this book.  It's a very traditional stodgy book for people who are afraid to break the rules.  There are better choices out there.  Hint:  look for books with the word &quot;grownup&quot; in the title
Magnum Obfuscation. If you absolutely have nothing better to do one day, try wading through Eisenman's prolix and heavily befogged dissection of his own crudely assembled `theoretical' positions.  It is one of the failings of current architectural writing that it's authors seem compelled to make seemingly simple things unnecessarily complex.  And to an intelligent reader, (i.e. one not taken in by the industry's self-laudatory stances), it is evident that few of these authors have anything worthwhile to offer real architectural or urban discourse.  In the world of contemporary architectural speculation, Peter Eisenman is the weakest of the amateur-hour theorists playing word games in the quasi-philosophical sandbox.  Of his many failings, the most pernicious is that he lacks the basic ability to distinguish between assumption and fact.  And lacking any really systematic approach to reasoning, (quasi-Derrida one day, pseudo-Foucault the next - all, incidentally, deeply misunderstood), he takes the usual academic low road of clouding his conjectural positions in vague and deliberately impenetrable prose.  Remarkably unreasonable and capricious suppositions are here presented as though a valid design methodology.   Never one to be phased by a lack of substantive evidence, Eisenman merely invents a loosely-fitting diagram to substantiate his thesis.  (His improbable dotted lines and diagonals may seem to suggest great import, but the careful reader will have fun spotting the many inconsistencies and contradictions in the logic that is randomly applied.)  -   Not to put to fine a point on it, this book is nonsense overly dressed up in obtuse semantic verbiage.   There is nothing of value in this bloated and extremely tedious volume
Please buy our advertisement. Skip this book. It's simply an over-glorified advertisement for the store of the same name. Reading this, you can enjoy page after page of &quot;To shave properly, you need this product which we conveniently carry in a range of exorbitant prices.&quot; Yes! I do need that sterling silver shaving handle, hand crafted by the finest Elbonian craftsmen especially for me, and I cannot live without the lavender-rosemary-thyme-sandalwood-myrrh-poison ivy pre-shave oil! How did I ever shave before these things? Just buy some shaving cream you like and use a gentle touch if you want a better shave
I didn't like it. Samantha seems a lot like Becky.  A young woman whose life is very out of balance and doesn't know how to face up to the consequences of her decisions.  Instead of staying at the firm and working out her "mistake," she runs away.  This is just like Becky hiding her bills.  And then she gets a totally implausible job, because she can't tell the truth - again like Becky.  Samantha doesn't tell the truth until the very end when the media coverage forces her to.I agree that the firm would never have taken her back; they probably would have viewed her as a former lawyer who had a nervous breakdown and was in need of psychiatric care.  Samatha, like Becky at times, seems somewhat manic, in that she's frantic somtimes and makes major life decisions on impulse in a state of agitation.  just like Becky when she rushes after her sister on a hike for which she is totally unprepared.  Lithium, anyone?I don't have an opinion on the housewife/lawyer "controversy," but I do think Kinsella's protagonists need to grow up
Ouch. I'm a Pagan, and I do not hold this book in high esteem.  And there is plenty I could say about the book and its author.  I've tried to do that in a couple of Amazon reviews.  But they were deleted, so if you really want to know what I think of this book, you will have to e-mail me
mixed praise for an important work. This book is composed of two stories.  The first, called Folded Hands is nothing short of brilliant.  Jack Williamson created a rather bizarre, almost tongue and cheek idea, that works well in this quick blast that had me laughing and feeling chilled all at the same time.  Williamson didn't take himself too seriously but the short story had some terrific ideas.  Unfortunately I cannot say the same for the novella.  The second story, for me anyway, felt weighed down by far too much dramatic dialog and unrelenting techno babble that dragged the story down.  The Humanoids idea -- that mankind must be protected from itself ,can't help but sound a bit silly in execution and in the second story, Williamson goes for the straight dramatic and it feels awkward.  Granted there are some brilliant ideas but they don't play out because the author is too busy trying to explain this bizarre science that can defeat the humanoids.  That in itself sounds like a parady but he plays it straight! When Asimov wrote robot stories he understood when not to take himself too seriously.  On top of that, I found it a bit hard not to feel sorry for the Humanoids.  They really are passionate and just completely naive about what they are doing and its consequences.  I wish logic instead of mass destruction would have been formulated to deal with the issue.  Oh well
Yuck!. Man, oh man, I think this is one of the worst books I've ever read.  If I could give The Thanatos Syndrome negative stars, I would!Seriously, half way through, I came to Amazon to see how bad other people thought it was.  Boy was I shocked to see that almost all of these reviews were positive!I found the book bizarre, unfocused and poorly written.  The volcabulary repeatedly seems misused.  The plot is not reasonable given the safeguards that US funding agencies have in place with regards to human experimentation.  The physics, engineering, psychology, medical chemistry and biology are uninformed and unrealistic.  Characters are introduced as though they will be important to the outcome, only to have them dissipate.  And so on.The characters don't even seem like real people.  For example, the main character recognizes his cousin by seeing her ankles - and only her ankles - flashing below a curtain, and yet he is apparently unaware of what degree of cousins they are.  How could someone know a person that well, but still only have a vague idea of how they were related by blood?  Or:  one of the more reliable male characters blows duck hunting calls at women he finds attractive - as though he really thinks this will attract them.  C'mon, if the guys a nut (and anyone who tries to seduce women by talking 'duck' to them is nuts!), write him as a nut the whole way through, don't make him the cornerstone of reliability at the book's climax!The book's title isn't even explained, for crying out loud.  Thanatos means death in Greek, I believe, but I could never understand what the author/editors/audience thought was dying.I won't read this one again, nor will I look for anything else by Percy Walker.
Useful Historical Tool. This book doesn't exactly have an original premise; a West Point graduate named Philip Dru fights for the rights of the oppressed by overthrowing the American government and implementing a benevolent dictatorship (forgive the oxymoron) so as to correct the problems of society. Such a book, while shocking at first glance, is so common that rarely would I consider it worth reading. This one, however, comes with an interesting catch... it was written by none other than Edward House.The name might not ring a bell for most people, but Colonel Edward M. House was Woodrow Wilson's closest advisor during the first six years of his presidency, and as such this book yields amazing insights into the philosophical and personal character of a man who was one of the most powerful in the nation (and, for a brief period of time, in the world). For that alone it deserves to be read. It suffers, however, from House's own shortcomings as a writer. The prose is pedestrian, the dialogue cliched and trite, the narrative development utterly predictable (and often unrealistic), and the explanations and analysis given to major problems of the day simplistic and absurd. Indeed, it is amazing that a man of Wilson's great intellect and brilliant insights would have ever associated with, much less trusted, someone who could write something so poor. The fact that Wilson was one of our greatest presidents is a wonder, given the content of this book; aside from its historical significance, it has no redeeming value.
Fans of Island of the Blue Dolphins: Stay Away From Zia. Longtime fans of Scott O'Dell's classic Island of the Blue Dolphins, do yourself a favor and avoid this lackluster sequel.Island of the Blue Dolphins was one of my favorite books as a kid.  I must've read it at least a dozen times.  Somehow, I didn't find out that it had a sequel until years later.  Intrigued by the idea of a sequel to Island, which kind of ends on a cliffhanger, I read Zia.  I was interested in seeing how Scott O'Dell would handle what happens to Karana when she is finally rescued off the island after being stranded for 18 years.As you probably know, Island of the Blue Dolphins was based on a true story, but the facts are few about the real Lost Woman.  So how would the talented writer Scott O'Dell concoct what happens to Karana?  The result, Zia, is terribly disappointing.For starters, fans of Karana won't have much to read about.  At least half of the book deals with her niece and nephew trying to go to the island to rescue her.  The story is told completely from the niece's point of view.  We never get to hear what Karana herself thought about experiencing a new land and being reunited with people after so many years, and the sadness she must have faced at finding that her tribe was gone.  We learn almost nothing about what happened to Karana's father and sister, just that her sister's children have ended up orphans in a missionary.  And sadly, there's nothing interesting about Karana's niece Zia and her brother.  They merely serve as plot devices to stretch this paper-thin story out over 100 pages or so.I now appreciate the "cliffhanger" ending of Island of the Blue Dolphins in its perfect simplicity.  It is better to leave the story when Karana leaves the island, and let it be.  Your own imagination about what it was like for Karana to live at a missionary where no one spoke her language and there was no trace of her tribe left is better than the depressing depiction of her life in Zia.  I wish I could erase Zia from my mind.Zia truly is a sequel that should not have been written
An Absolute Travesty--Deliberately Misleading. I bought a copy of the report feeling that I ought to research the government's account of the events of 9/11.  That is of course, exactly what I got.  Questions so basic as why the Air Force couldn't prevent the first, second, and third crash, or why the towers collapsed when no steel superstructure building ever fell as a result of fire in all of history before that day, are left unasked and uninvestigated.  Additionally, there is no index (a lot like the original Warren Report volumes detailing the events of JFK's assassination), which is absolutely unforgivable for this type of book.This report is, to a large degree, official subterfuge.  It answers no important questions and its recommendations are as ridiculous as they are ineffectual.  The US government purpose here was obviously to create an interpretation of the events of 9/11 that neither hold anyone accountable, nor suggest constructive anti-terror policy.This book angers me a great deal.  It should anger you too
Thin and Padded Out. I've always enjoyed Sara Paretsky's novels, despite the left-wing preaching. In the past this has been subordinated to character & plot. But not here. There's not much plot -- a few elements here & there -- & it never really drives the story. Far too much space is given to the standard left-wing caricature of the rich & the repetitive, boring stereotyping of 'family values' as just so much plutocratic hypocrisy. Ms Paretsky, we _know_ you hate the American rich, & they're probably as hideous as you paint them to be. But here they're just cardboard cut-out characters. And of course the book is just a long, boring wait to see just how the filthy rich committed the crime & how they'll get away with it. Plus the satisfying way in which the horrible rich are (once again) forced to cough up the money they at first (of course) refused to give. This is getting tedious.
WOMBAT - Waste of money, brains and time. Don't bother - complete and utter rubbish. Too bad this cannot rate zero stars, it's not even worth that
A major dissapointment. I bought this book nearly as soon as it came out, and I absolutely loved it.  The cartoons and the layout of the book are superb. I did not really use the CD's, however, because I was in transition between computers.  It was still nice knowing that there were 60,000 more cartoons waiting for me if ever I wanted to read them, and with the stellar quality of the book, I assumed the same for the CD's.I was wrong.  The cartoons on the CD's are very low resoluton- this means that the pictures are not clear; they look a little blocky and pixelated.  Also, the large, multi-panel cartoons have been compressed even more so as to fit on to one page.  I was severely disappointed. The captions, however, are very nice.  Too bad it's often difficult to see what they're referring to. I don't really have the complete cartoons of the New Yorker: I've got about half, with the other half illegibly thrown into the mix.Why then two stars?  It's simple: The book itself is very nice.  With the price lower now, It is a very reasonable price for the Best Cartoons of the New Yorker, which is what this book is without the CD's.  The book is wonderful, just don't be confused into thinking that you will be able to read every cartoon as the book claims
Full of information, needs editing, and focus. The first four chapters of this book are very useful, but they are short and jumbled. The information in the appedicies is more useful than the rest of the text. It provides an entires methodology for using programs to complete projects.'The biggest problem I see with this book is the grammatical errors, at least two per chapter as well as spelling mistakes such as wonder. ie "people continuously wonder to and away from the presenter." the word is wander. These are doctors at Penn. State, they should be able to spell.anyway there is probably better books out there but this one was fairly inexpensive and does have alot of information
Disconnected. This novel is narrated by a senior at an exclusive boys' boarding school, portrayed as the type of place where all of the students are hiding their true selves.  Those who are wealthy try desperately to hide that fact, and those who are on scholarship, as is the narrator, try even harder to hide their heritage.  As this story is told from the point of view of one character, it is impossible to determine if this is actually true, or if his fear of being exposed as a fraud clouds his vision of everyone else.  It is hard for me to believe that these boys are so disconnected from each other.  According to the narrator, nobody is really friends with anybody else, despite the fact that they have been living with each other for so many years.  No student has any real relationship with any other student.What is real, is literature.  Writers are artists, who form their own social club and are therefore able to escape the boxes into which their heritage has forced them.  It seems every boy at school aspires to write, and once every semester the class is rewarded with a visit from a famous author.  These visits are paired with writing contests, in which boys submit a piece of writing in the style of the famous author.  The student whose writing is chosen by the visiting author is rewarded with a private audience with him or her--an unbelievable honor for the student.  The narrator of the book is desperate for one of these audiences, and devastated when his opportunity to interact with Robert Frost and Ayn Rand passes him by.  When he finds that Ernest Hemingway is to be the next visiting author, he is willing to do anything, even plagiarize a story he comes across in a literary magazine, to meet the famous man.Some of the parts of this story are interesting, especially those focused on the visiting authors.  I particularly liked the passages about Ayn Rand and was delighted when a boy asked her, quite seriously, "Who is John Galt?" and received nothing but looks of utter loathing in response.I also liked the responses of the authors to the works of the students.  The boys submitted very earnest bits of poetry or fiction that were terribly misinterpreted by the authors who judged them and read much more into them than the boys had ever anticipated or expected.However, I didn't really connect with any of the characters, perhaps because the narrator of the story never got close to anyone.  He talks about his roommate and how the two of them lived together for years and kept seeming like they might become friends, but it never really happened.  In fact, the narrator, although friendly with many, seems to have no actual friends.  There is only one girl who might be a love interest in the story, but the narrator also has only minimal feelings for her.  In the end, this lack of interest for anyone in the story left me feeling rather uninterested in everything, as well.
The book is not complete and at times can be misleading. Being a student of photojournalizm in Moscow, Russia, I looked for the most complete book on photographic composition that is available. I had studied one book on the subject by the russian author, but knowing that photography in the US is much more developed and professional I was striving to get a book by a professional photographer.I was disappointed by the book "Photographic Composition" by Tom Grill for a number of reasons:1. It does not cover all important compositional elements, and those that it covers are not explained in full detail. It does not explain:- how elements with the similar shapes, similar sizes or similar tone interact with each other,- the reverse perspective effect and its uses,- why right and left sides of the photograph differ and why, how it can be used on practice,- how to balance "weight" of different elements of the photograph, it touches it briefly and furthermore provides an incorrect example,- difference between compositional center and the center of interest, how to balance them if they are in different parts of the photo (does not match each other)- all signs of perspective, it does not say anywhere that overlapping of objects is a clear sign of perspective (trivial as it may sound, it still should be marked in any complete work, especially when the author covers other three elements)- and much much more.2. It does not use photographs of the best masters to illustrate the topic, neither does it show how composition works in art, which I believe is very important.3. Most examples are in color, while most ideas on composition are best explained using B&W photographs.4. Last but not least, composition is about meaning, making a message, not just how to balance different elements within a frame. The book makes this statement, but in my opinion fails to provide poverful examples, while you can fully appreciate the power of composition only by studying powerful photos with good explanation why precisely this photo is good.OVERALL: I believe that if you want to study composition you want to know all important considerations, not just a few and briefly explained "how-to-quickly-improve-any-photo-you-take". This books fails to provide complete approach to composition and at times can be misleading.I'd be very grateful if you could recommend me (and other folks that look at our reviews) a more thorough book on composition, I'm sure there must be a good book in english on that subject. Thanks!P.S. For those who can read in russian I advise a book by A. Lapin "Fotografiya kak..", which compared to the book by Tom Grill explains composition in full
What a disappointment... Let me start by saying I had no less than 4 books I consulted on a regular basis during my pregnancy and my favorite was the week to week guide.  This book was a huge disappointment.Not only do the weeks not always correspond to the age of the child (weeks vs. months), but I  found that a lot of the milestones were a little ambitious as well.  The book also comes across as very judgemental (baby swings are known as neglect-o-matics & cosutmes can scare a baby so keep him home on halloween) and gives you things to worry about without telling you why (to soothe a baby you can swing them, but don't bounce!).  I think the book should offer advice and then it's up to me to figure out what to do.At first I thought it was just me being post-partum and sensitive but my baby is 13 weeks old now and I can see, the book is just not helpful.  Buy "What to Expect the First Year".  It gives enough information without making you worry about every little thing and gives you enough information to make an informed desicion without telling you what to do
Manufacturing error. On the one hand, I loved the book, since I am a big fan of Thomas Paine. However, my particular copy was missing the last 50 pages or so of "The Age of Reason". When they get the printing and/or binding problems straightend out and have purged the inventory of the defective books, they should remove this review. At that point, I will eagerly buy a new copy
Futile "Coming-of-Age" Tale Where the Hero Learns Zilch. If Tom Perrotta meant "Joe College" to be a coming-of-age story, he fell flat on his face.  Danny (the protagonist) comes from a working-class family and struggles and scrapes his way into Yale.  Good for him!  Too bad that's not the story.  By the time we meet Danny, he's already an ivy leaguer.  Despite his proletariat backstory, Danny tends to behave just as selfishly and irresponsibly as any of his silver-spoon, trust-fund classmates who I guess we're supposed to think he's better than.I don't want to give too much away here, so suffice it to say that Danny makes one of those BIG, life-altering mistakes that any guy can make. You know, the tried and true premise of the young man with everything going for him who suddenly faces something that threatens to screw up his future.  Does he face it like a man, resolve the conflict, and "grow" as a human being?  Nope.  Perrotta lets Danny get away with ignoring the serious consequences of his actions and, instead, focuses on a ridiculous sub-plot (or was it the main plot? I couldn't tell) about the mafia and ruthless bodybuilding snack food vendors.  What's worse, Danny basically gets a free pass.  He ignores his self-created crisis, and it just sort of fades away.  And once it's gone, Danny strolls right out and does the same, stupid thing he did the first time to get himself in serious trouble.Lessee . . . a self-centered Yale student who makes big mistakes, screws up other people's lives, ignores the consequences, shirks responsibility, lets other people deal with his mistakes for him, and then caps it off by going out partying and acting irresponsibly again. 'Psssst,' Mr. Perrotta -- That's not the kind of character we root for.  That's the kind of character we boo. And occasionally elect President.Two stars because "Joe College," despite its flawed premise, is pretty readable and provides some insight into the mildly interesting, seedy underworld of mobile snack stand vendors
Lots of Information - poorly written. Ths book contains lots of information about what 'ought to' happen in order to make a good golf swing.  However, the writing style is so ungrammatical as to make the information inaccessible to me.  I had to focus so hard on reading the words that I was unable to grasp the essential concepts that Kelly is trying to get across
A Real STINK Bomb. I can't believe I wasted as much time as I did on this book.  This is perhaps one of the worst slap-together-a-story jobs in recent publication.  I was looking for a slice of NY life, and what I got was no Big Apple--just a rotten apple.  Does anyone want to buy my copy (only about 3/4 read and slightly vomit stained)
Whewww!  Not For Me . . . A friend of mine, who is an avid reader of many types of literature like me, highly recommended this book.  I made it about fifty pages before the confusion, depression, and disinterest forced me to cast it aside.  The book just made me disoriented and tired.
A Potent Soporific. This book's tongue-in-cheek title led me to expect an entertaining and informative history of one of the world's great foods. I discovered, rather, an informative but tediously boring history of the rural peasantry  of Ireland, England and France in the 18th and 19th centuries. I can only  recommend the book as a potent soporific capable of curing the most  pernicious case of insomnia. If your sleep habits provide sufficient rest,  don't bother
forget it. This wasn't any good as a hardback and reissuing itin paperback doesn't change matters.To get an idea of what you are in for, see the reviewsof the hardback version.Bottom line: don't waste your money
Poorly written and edited, nothing new here. I wish I hadn't wasted my money on this book. I used to work for Rand for twelve years and was always amazed at the poor writing abilities of Rand scholars, this book does capture this element of Rand and military research culture. The essays appear to be unedited, and a few of them (for example Rubinstein &amp; Harrell's disjointed chapters) are so poorly written and edited that they read as if they were parts of several papers quickly jammed together. Simons' chapter is silly and seems to have been written as a way of rationalizing her training of those who combine anthropology and violence. Too bad there wasn't more time put into the editing and writing this book, there must be more to the views of these authors but this book is so poorly produced that there is little of any value to be found here. Very disapointing as I'd hoped to find more on the secret culture of power that I worked in for so long at Rand, instead we are left with these blurry images already well known to the public
Ewwww....... Let me start off by saying that I'm not a fan of contemporary art.  That being said, this book is incredibly difficult to read.  For me, each sentence took several re-reads before I could get some type of clue as to what he was trying to say.  I consider myself a good reader and this book was way out there with the uppity language.  My husband would get a kick out of me reading sentences to him, just because they were impossible to understand.  If you like this sort of thing, then you might like the book.  I, however, did not like the book.  I also did not like how they would describe a work of art in great detail, yet show you a totally different piece from that artist.  It made if difficult to visually see what they were talking about.  My professor did a much better job explaining the material covered in this book
Readable but not worth the money... This book was on the bestseller's shelf at my local bookstore.  I asked an employee about how books were selected for that shelf and was told that selection is based on a number of factors including positive customer reviews.  Shocking.  As a number of other customer's have commented on this site, this book was not worth the money it cost.  It was silly, contrived and unrealistic.The cover of the book states that the writer is one of the best romance writers of all time.  I typically don't read romance novels but I can't begin to imagine that that's possible.
Hard to Swallow. I tried to read this book, but only made it about 50 pages.  Despite the many rave reviews and status of this book, it did not ring true to me. I read it while vacationing in the Galapagos, and I just didn't buy it.  I love the genre, Krakauer being number one.  In the Heart of the Sea, etc, all good.  But this one did not work for me.  Sorry
As an adventure the story falls miserably short!. The hullabaloo surrounding the book will lead one to believe that this is an epitome of all adventure/suspense stories. In reality, the book is nothing but a wanderings of a disturbed mind, disillusioned with life and suffering from abnormalities of mind - so common among soldiers after attending a bloody war. Those readers who praise the book sky-high must have some ulterior motive in mind; otherwise this is a shoddy piece of work and written obviously with a film script in mind rather than a book, which anyways what Hilton was, scriptwriter in Hollywood!  His other tiny book  Goodbye Mr. Chips is a better read and doesn't pretend to be something else or is it we who label a book. No wonder Lost Horizon is out of print and should remain so. I don't blame the writer as much as the so-called critics, readers and other writers for whom the world begins in Western Europe and ends in North America. A very myopic view!
I caught a fish, this big!. In Let Freedom Ring, Sean Hannity sends out the subliminal message that he and his writing are about truth, justice, and the American way. Just the title represents everything true and good about him and America. For his five-star reviewers his message reinforces their pre-conceived beliefs and Hannity's words are the validation of those beliefs.If this was written by a ghost writer, he should have withheld payment. If it wasn't written by a ghostwriter, Hannity should have one for his next attempt at literary hyperbole.The first chapter is written in a maudlin, "those-were-the-good-old-days" wistfulness of his immigrant grandfather who he describes as an honest man of integrity, and a believer in the American dream. But before you can say "Erin Go Braugh" he is talking about the courage of George W. Bush for standing up to terrorism. Exactly how G.W. does, he doesn't elaborate. How he goes from grandfather to Dubbya is a bit of magic.Hannity's next trick is to impugn Clinton and Gore as being soft on terrorism. His source for this is, of all people, Dick Morris who knew the Clintons and now works for the Fox Republican Advocacy Network. He quotes Morris who makes such vague statements as "It seemed they were afraid of talking about terrorism," or "they seemed to be indifferent to terrorism." These "Morris mind-reads" are conjectural, but Hannity uses them, which he does with impunity.Let's take a closer look at Hannity's unimpeachable source for a moment. It was Dick Morris who quit the Clintons shortly after the second election. It was Morris who had a penchant for streetwalkers, did some jail time, and entered alcohol rehab. You'd think SH could find a better source if he expects freedom to ring!But, Hannity doesn't skip a beat. He points out how democrats such as Senators Kerry and Daschle voted against certain defense-spending bills. What he neglects to inform his readers are the reasons they did because of riders that were attached to the bills, or the number of republicans who also voted against the same bills, or the many defense bills that Kerry and Daschle did vote for. He never once advises his reader of the defense spending programs that were killed by Dick Cheney when he was Secretary of Defense. Such deception is called propaganda.Propaganda is something that Hannity has no compunction using here. This he does in continuing to tell a tale that has long since been debunked. Namely, it is the story of President Clinton being offered Osama bin Laden by the Sudanese government. Again, it's what he doesn't say that misdirects the reader. Sudan made the offer in the hope of having the economic sanctions against them for slave-trading, lifted. However, the FBI determined that the Sudanese were playing us because they had neither the ability nor the intent of handing over bin Laden. The Sudanese also made the offer to Saudi Arabia, but the Saudis had revoked bin Laden's citizenship, and refused to take him.Benjamin Franklin said "Statistics is a liar." Hannity uses charts for the same purpose. He shows how under Reagan, the army bought over 500 tanks. Under Clinton, the army bought none. This leads one to the assumption that Clinton did nothing for the services. He doesn't mention that the army buys tanks, not presidents. He doesn't mention the army had all the tanks they needed for armored warfare against the Soviet Union that never came. He doesn't mention that the army began changing its warfare strategies which would include more transportable fighting vehicles.Be grateful that Hannity cannot rewrite famous works of literature as he attempts to do with history. If he could, instead of seeing a dead Captain Ahab being killed by the whale in "Moby Dick," we might just see a grinning captain standing next to a tethered whale with the caption: "I caught a fish this big!"There's something very fishy about his facts, his historical parallels which aren't parallel, and what he chooses to tell you, and what he chooses to leave out.In this book, he tells whale-sized whoppers!
An expensive disappointment!. I've admired Mr.Faudree's work in Traditional Home magazine and just knew I would love the book.  Unfortunately, most of it was a rehash of photos and text I'd seen before.  The rest was dull and tired.  If you are looking for something fresh and authentic, this isn't the book for you.
Well-written, terribly researched. This was the first book about Ottoman History I ever read.   Having  now read litterally hundreds of books about the subject, I re-read Kinross and have some comments:- Kinross has an engaging style, and this book may ignite an interest in Ottoman history in readers, but only for the EARLY history of the empire, which is clearly where Kinross' interests lie.  Even then he doesn't seem to be able to distinguish between history and legend, and a rich and dynamic history is reduced to an Oriental soap opera.  His account of the decline is depressing, reflective of Victorian bigotry and bias, and innaccurate and condescending to the point of being mildly insulting.- Kinross uses NO Ottoman or Turkish sources whatsoever, but then he doesn't really use anything written later than the 19th c.- He brushes over the 19th c, and subscribes to the 19th c British static view of imperial decay - the Ottomans just sat around declining and having things done to it.  In reality, the 19th c is one of the most interesting periods of Ottoman history, wherin the empire was forced to respond to th impact of European capitalism and imperialism.  Really dynamic and creative reform programs were instituted with the result that the Ottomans at the turn of the 20th c were incalculably stronger than they were at the turn of the 18th.  The Tanzimat is given short shrift as an insincere effort to please the powers and is portrayed as the idea of the British Ambassador (!) and the Hamidiyan era is portrayed as a period of retrenchment, fanaticism, and decadence, when in reality Abdul Hamid, albeit with oppressively autocratic means, enormously modernized the empire and created the school system that educated later reformers including Ataturk.  Kinross is totally ignorant of intellectual trends in the Ottoman Empire and their interplay with other Muslim lands and the West.If this is your first Ottoman history book, I would read it up until the death of Suleyman and then drop it.  I am not aware of a more modern and accurate general survey of the same type that is not too dry and academic for the casual reader, but I would highly recommend Selim Deringil's "The Well-Protected Domains" to get a feel of the self-perception of the Ottomans in the late 19th c
Well, his heart was in the right place. There are parts of this book which are utterly engrossing.  Rosemont constructs a fine narrative of events.  Perhaps I should say "events", as it is at times researched like a eighth-grade paper.  Lots of conjecture, unsupported speculation, hearsay and other aspects of irresponsible scholarship.  Mr. Rosemont freely admits that there is frustratingly little concrete evidence about much of Hill's life, but he chooses to try and flesh out a lengthy book anyways.  This is exasperating at times as when one is forced to try and endure each and every tedious mentioning of the drawn or painted art of Joe Hill, despite the lack of much actual material (surviving anyways).  However, by doing this he touches on many peripheral aspects of Hill's life that have gone by and large unnoticed till now, but which are much easier to verify than the sketchy details about Hill himself.  Several mentions of correspondence, lives affected by Hill, and reactions to Hill's art, and many others tidbits of information are thrown out for more or less the first time in cohesive form.  Less cohesive, and downright teasing at times, are many starts and stops of several ideas that would be very interesting on their own.  The Wobbly influence on the beat poets, the slighting of the IWW by other revolutionary and pseudorevolutionary groups (rarely written about from a fellow worker's perspective), and others seem like promising beginnings for reading but then are waded into only ankle-deep.  At one point when abandoning a topic Mr. Rosemont even suggests that it would be a good idea for further research, by someone else.  All in all a fairly decent read but could have used prodigious editing and some fact-checking with standards higher than those of the NY Times
the whole rambling mess... After the hype on this book, I was extremely disappointed at how it rambled along with extraneous detail that never made a cohesive whole. I kept at it, hoping it would improve but alas, dear reader it does not.
Not her best effort. I'm a Tami Hoag fan, but this book was weak at best.  The plot was predictable; the characters stereotypical and 2 dimensional.  The reparte between the characters was overly witty and contrived.  Hoag is definitely capable of a more intricate plot and better writing.
What happened?. What happened? Magic Tree House series books 1-28 were great, with educational tales filled with historical relevance that used just enough magic to make the story work. Buy the complete set of 1-28! However, the Christmas book (#29) and apparently all the following books are pure magic, fantasy drivel with no redeeming qualities. Did Mary Pope Osborne hope to capitalize on the Harry Potter craze? (I'm basing this on heresay, since I haven't read Harry Potter.) I slogged thru this book, cringed and gagged thru #30, and made my wife read the next ones to my 5 year old. I'm going to tell him there aren't anymore, because they are too awful to buy and read.I very, very disappointed in what happened to this series. Please, please Mary Pope - get back to writing good stories and not this nonsense.
Boring. As someone who loves graphic novels and who has traveled widely in Asia, I wanted to like this book. Unfortunately, the vignettes lack feeling or meaning let alone structure to tie them together--I suppose a comment on Delisle's experience overall in the country--and so at one point, I was flipping the pages to figure out how much longer until the end.I am giving him one star for the consistent tone of his stories. He certainly conveys well his isolation and the surreal (to him) experiences of an extended stay in an industrial city in China.  Since it's an autobiographical travelogue, I won't attempt to separate the author's intentions from the character in the book. So, more stars would have gone to someone who tried to see the many encounters from his Chinese colleagues' points of view.Another star goes to the soft shadings of his panels. There are some wonderful scenes, like the candles in the gym. To be honest, I wish I could give him only half of star for the drawings, since after a while, the slanted eyes and buckteeth do become tired, if not downright annoying.Delisle is one of those travelers who eats at the same place over and over, and even orders the same dish over and over. Many of the stories reek of condescension, fear or that amusement that comes from thinking "they are so strange and different." It's sad, actually. For example, after three months in China, he admits that he only begins to get to know his translator half an hour before he leaves the country.In a few stories, outright stereotypes fuel the images and the dialogue. If it's intentional, this depiction of an unhappy, displaced individual with seemingly no amount of curiosity or compassion could be taken as a statement on Westerners' attitudes about China and its workers.If you prefer the company of expats when you travel, this book will resonate with you. If you at least attempt to make connections with people in your host country, then this book is a delightful guide that shows how NOT to travel
Unpardonable Error. Unfortunately, my copy of edition 3 fell open to page 81, in which the author compares forces from a piston engine to forces generated by living tissue. Unfortunately, this type of comparison is often completely invalid, particularly when the force is accompanied by zero motion in the direction of the force. For example, if the combustion force is replaced by a highly compressed spring, and if the crank is balanced exactly at top dead center, the spring will never "get tired" of exerting its force. In contrast, a human leg WILL get tired, even though no motion occurs. This is because chemical energy is consumed to exert the force even in the absence of motion.Unfortunately, with this single unreasoned comparison that drives to the core of bicycling science, the author has shot himself in the credibility foot, leaving all else he has to say in question.
This Book is NOT Very Good. It's about a boy who started out in kindergarten. He found out that he would be in school a long time. He had a problem and through-up every were any given moment.The only thing i liked about this book is that it had a somewhat ok plot. And it it's about a boy and his life.The main thing i didn't like this book because it was pretty dull and boring. I fell asleep most of the time i started to read it. If you realy realy realy like books that you might think it's ok. It just was not like somthing in real life... but it was not a good fictional story also.This book was not very interesting. It was pretty much like if you HAVE to read a book for i'd say ok. But if you wanna read it for fun... i wouldn't if i was you.
Heinlein's Worst (Sorry). Standard Heinlein Disclaimer: Heinlein is a frequently-polarizing figure in American literature. The people who dislike his work (e.g., A. Panshin) seem to *really* dislike his work, and often for reasons that seem to me spurious. The people who like his work are in many cases blind or too forgiving of Heinlein's problems as a writer. I like Heinlein's work quite a bit, and find all but two of his novels consistently enjoyable, but I would not rate any but one or possibly two of his books as being the "best of the SF genre." They are for me, however, always enjoyable, and that is no small thing to find in an author.And as you may have guessed, this is one of the two.  (The other is "Rocketship Galileo" which, in my opinion, only suffers from the mistakes of a person new to writing novels, and a hoary "Nazis on the Moon!" plotline that, to put it mildly, has not worn well with time.)  The story behind this book is, apparently, that Heinlein was ill as he was finishing it, and it was published without the traditional editing cycle that he usually employed.Could be.  Frankly, it's hard for me to imagine editing making this novel more readable.  This is a relatively interesting idea (a man's brain transplanted into a woman's body), but as many others have pointed out, the execution is poor.  Frankly, there's not much story here at all, aside from a man exploring what it's like being in a woman's body.  But the exploration is by turns dull and absurd.  Man in woman's body has many sexual flings!  Man in woman's body poses nude for a painter!  Man in woman's body cooks dinner for widower husband!  Man in woman's body finds that piano lessons he took as a boy are now useless, but he can run secretarial equipment!  The thrills never stop.There are any number of other irritating things about this book (personally, I find being forced to try to pronounce "Joan" as "Joanne" really irritating, but that's probably just me [If you want it pronounced "Joanne", spell it that way, Bob!]), but I'll let you read the other reviews.  The summation is, for this lover of Heinlein, who has read almost everything he wrote, I can't reread this novel.  And for me, folks, that's really saying something
Disappointing!. I've read several other mysteries by this author, but was quite disappointed in this one. The writing seemed "padded"--i.e. paragraph after paragraph that did nothing to advance the plot.The plot itself was okay, but certainly not exceptional, and some of it wasn't even believable. For example,although there was some explanation for the seemingly total imcompetence by the local police department (understaffing), the idea that even a rookie (much less the police chief) would miss so many of the pertinent and obvious clues that an untrained 32 yr old shop owner ferreted out seems more than a little farfetched.Another part of the plot that strained even the most willing suspension of disbelief is the handling of the dv incidents by the police. Again, only the most incompetent of professionals would have handled the case they way it was.All in all, this novel was not one I'd recommend to anyone.
Not Worth the Money. As is sometimes the case, the title of this book is somewhat misleading.  Having read several books which were generally favorable to Greenspan I thought this one might give a balance counter view.  Overall, it turned out to quite a disappointment.In the first few pages Professor Batra made it clear that he thinks he is probably more qualified to be the Fed Chairman than Greenspan.  On page 1 he says "He had not done any path-breaking work in economics, at least not that was commonly cited."  On page 3 he says "It could explain how he had advanced so far without sufficient credentials; how his extraordinary career appeared to derive crucially not from merit but from favoritism and connections".  Also on page 3 -"Greenspan did not even have a Ph.D. at the time; nor had he penned anything pioneering to earn the recognition of his peers".On page 7 I again knew the book was in trouble when Batra stated "...because in my view intelligence and integrity go together".  Does anyone actually believe that all dishonest people are dumb?  On page 9 Batra made it clear that the book was as much, or more, about his economic philosophy than it was about Greenspan when he wrote "In fact, I will offer a new economic paradigm to cure the global stagnation that has resulted from tax trade, and monetary policies inspired by Greenspan".  He does offer a paradigm; unfortunately, real world experience shows that the paradigm does not to work as he postulates.  Clearly, the book is attempting to put forth his agenda.As the rest of the book demonstrates, Professor Batra is a fairly strong liberal in whose world the working poor will spend all additional income and the idle rich will simply put extra income under their mattress.  He regularly harps on reducing income taxes on the "poor" and increasing them on the "rich" and "big businesses".  As recently as 2003, the Congressional Budget Office documented that the bottom 40% to 50% of the population pay little or no taxes while the upper income individuals and businesses pay the vast majority.  How the government could reduce the taxes on people who do not pay taxes is never addressed.  Professor Batra does correctly point out that the Social Security tax is quite regressive.In order to discredit Greenspan, Batra gives Greenspan gives Greenspan far more power than is warranted.  Throughout the book, Batra tries to convince us that the President and Congress did whatever Greenspan might suggest or support.  As written, the book makes one believe that Batra never watched Greenspan testify before Congress where the congressmen tried to get Greenspan to support their way of thinking.  Basically, Batra tries to blame Greenspan for all of the acts of Congress.Batra's new paradigm he calls Economic Democracy.  In this Economic Democracy the Federal Government would buy most of the stock of the large companies and then give it, or sell it at a big discount, to the employees of the companies.  That way the employees would be in control rather than the CEOs and boards of directors.  Clearly, Professor Batra is not living in the real world.  In the real world most of the employees who were given the stock would simply sell it in fairly quick order and that, of course, would return things to where they originally were.  For many years I was an "employee owner" of the nations largest totally employee owned company and I can attest that they do not operate in any way close to what Professor Batra assumes.  The good professor needs to get out his ivory tower and get a job in the real world.If you want to learn about Greenspan, this is NOT the book to read.  Save your money.
Lacking in Practical Advice. If you are looking for inspiration or motivation to travel with your child(ren) (or maybe just encouragement that it can be done), then this is the book for you.  If you are looking for practical advice, as I was, this is definitely NOT the book for you.  I flipped through the entire book in 10 minutes, turned to my husband and said, "Well, that was a waste of $8.
Not Much of a Storm. The Approaching Storm does not reach the level of the first books in the Star Wars Expanded Universe. The book is a tale of two Jedis (Obi-Wan Kenobi and Luminara Unduli) along with their Padawans (Anakin Skywalker and Barriss Offee) being sent to the insignificant planet of Ansion to reach an agreement between two widely divergent races of beings to keep the planet from seceding from the Republic. Sinister forces are working behind the scenes to encourage the secession. Even though Ansion is not an important place, it is tied in with a number of other worlds through old treaties. If Ansion leaves the Republic, the others are obligated to follow. The Jedi cannot let this happen.All of this could have told in a short story or novella. Much of the book involves an interminable trip through the prairies of Ansion as the Jedis try to find the Borokii, the overclan of the Alwari. Our heroes overcome a number of mishaps along the way, find the Borokii, convince them of the correctness of a proposed agreement with the city folk of the Unity, and then still have to make their way back to the city of Cuipernam before a binding vote to secede is taken.Mr. Foster's writing is not the best. His touch with dialogue is heavy and stilted. One exchange between Obi-Wan and Anakin can serve as an example.Anakin: "Are in the final analysis all relationships between sentients ultimately reduced to politics of one kind or another, Master Obi-Wan?"Obi-Wan: "It is thought so by many....."Enough said. I don't think our two heroes would hold a conversation like that.As usual with the Star Wars books, each new tale introduces new species. My favorite in The Approaching Storm was the ever-curious Gwurran named Tooquii. I couldn't help but be reminded of the Ewoks. Tooqui, even though small in stature and a real pain to have along for much of the journey, proves his worth at a key point in their struggles. We also spend an inordinate amount of time in the book experiencing Anakin's internal struggles with missing his mother and with his ongoing feelings that he is not being allowed to advance as fast as his skills warrant. I realize that establishing Anakin's frame of mind is important for future events, but Mr. Foster dwells on it too much
Sensitive types. Highly Sensitive People (HSPs) are already sensitive to the role a book like this can play in their ability to take an active approach to self-understanding. Once one's status as an HSP is established, by way of this book's sensitively provided self-tests, the book then goes on to provide the tools to categorise one's sensitivity-type (ST) even further. The rude and insensitive sector of the population (RAIPs) would no doubt be surprised to learn that there are several types of HSP, with different levels of sensitivity depending on the life domain. Introverted, creative, sociable, and worried HSPs everywhere will be grateful to have these tools at their fingertips to increase the depth of their self-awareness on the HSP scale.My own self-awareness journey, however, has been hampered from the beginning by the gaudy colouring of this book's pink and yellow striped cover, with bright green and red overlaid font. Can't the publishers provide a version of the book suitable for highly photosensitive types like myself? We HPSPs are too often undervalued and ignored by the HSP community in general
A long-running series has run too far downhill. It's not unreasonable for authors to give the characters in their mysteries background lives, and to have those lives evolve in volume after volume. However, there is such a thing as changing a character so much that she or he is no longer recognizable. That's happened in this volume - along with a lot of sloppy, stilted writing that seems almost as though someone took words of Brown's and tried to arrange them into one of her mysteries and didn't quite succeed.Let's start with the biggies: Harry quit the Post Office. While a reason is given for this, let's face it, without the day-to-day Post Office stuff, and the people who help at the PO and the people who come in, and the downtown businesses, an awful lot of the atmosphere of the village is removed. And an awful lot of the interesting things that Harry filled her days with, as well. Among other things that have changed all out of recognition: Harry's become friends with Boom-Boom, the woman who's the reason that Fair is her ex-husband. And, not only Harry, but all her friends as well, seem to have suddenly become Virgin-Mary-groupies. A statue we've never seen before is suddenly treated as if, oh yeah, all the women in this town go up to pray to it regularly all the time and always have, and it's really important to them. Oh, really?Then there's the dialogue. For the first 20 pages or so, it's mainly about trucks and cars - talking about the Ford F-150 vs. the F-350, complaints about the BMW 7-series. Have we ever known these things to be so important, before, that Harry and her friends would spend 20 pages talking about them? Not only is there a lot of talking about them, Brown inserts text explanations that sound as though they came out of an owner's manual for the vehicle.And then we have the monk, supposedly very devoted to his monastery, visiting his family for Thanksgiving, who suddenly says "Land is the ultimate wealth, you know," and launches into a speech about the land that sounds like Scarlett O'Hara's daddy, not a man who's devoted his life to God and things of the spirit for 60 years.I could tell who had committed the first murder within about 5 minutes after we first hear about it.And there's an irrelevant, totally unforeseen, and totally unnecessary plot twist at the end concerning one of the secondary continuing characters. Just comes out of thin air, and then is brushed away as quickly. What the???I always endeavor to mention something I like. Well, Simon the possum makes a brief appearance in this one, and so do a bunch of the barn mice. I really enjoyed when they made fun on Pewter by singing "The Old Grey Mare" at her. (Pewter is a fat, grey cat, you may recall.)Summary: even for dedicated series loyalists, this is a tough one to swallow. I won't bother reading the next one
Deeply flawed. The shortcomings of Doniger's general Indological scholarship have been detailed by Michael Witzel and Rajiv Malhotra. This book suffers from the same flaws. The translations are idiosyncratic, and she is obsessed with finding sex, even in situations that none is called for
Nut case. Type Cooper's name into Google and learn about what a nut job he really was.  He allegedly threatened a neighbor with a hand gun.  A court issued an arrest warrant.  When two deputy sheriffs attempted to serve the warrant he shot one of them.  They returned fire, killing him
A once great book whose time has passed. Once upon a time, I could not recommend this book highly enough.  That's the problem--"once upon a time".  In 2004, this book violates what I consider an overriding consideration for instruction books: Never distract the new user with picky details that s/he'll will rarely need in practice.The first few chapters are written using INPUT and DATALINES; commands to enter data.  For those unfamiliar with SAS, that means the authors enter all of their data as lines of text typed inside their command language.  No one works that way any more! It's a hold over from the days of punchcards.  Does the new user really need to know thatINPUT  ID 1-3 AGE 4-5 GENDER $6;means "look in columns 1-3 for a numerical id, columns 4-5 for numerical age, and column 6 for a character designating gender"?  When the 4-th edition was written, the answer might have been yes, but even then it would have been given grudgingly.  For more than a few years, data almost always arrive as data sets that have already been made into SAS files or as spreadsheets that can be imported directly into SAS.  This method of data input would not be a fatal flaw if the material were in a later chapter or an appendix, but it's woven throughout the text starting with the first example on page 3.I would love to see this book updated with a more modern view to how data are processed and analyzed, but I can no longer recommend it in its current form.Added in edit:  Instead, get a copy of "The Little SAS Book: A Primer, Third Edition" by Lora D. Delwiche and Susan J. Slaughter.  If I ever get around to reviewing it, I'll give it 4 or 5 stars. In the meantime, there are already a bunch of reviews you can read on the book's own Amazon web page, mostly good, a few bad, for an average of 4 stars
Revisionism. Sheila Fitzpatrick has written that the total number of those murdered by the Soviets is in the "low hundreds of thousands."In other words, she is a crank. There are numerous books out debunking Fitzpatrick and her fellow apologists for Lenin and the Bolsheviks. Yale University's "Annals of Communism" series is a good place to start."In Denial: Historians, Communism & Espionage" by John Earl Haynes and Harvey Klehr is an excellent read on how Fitzpatrick and other academics distort facts and lie through omission to cover up the atrocities of Lenin, Zinoviev, Radek, Trotsky, Stalin et al.Fifteen years ago, Fitzpatrick's apologies for a regime which murdered over 20 million of its own citizens could have been (weakly) defended. Now that the Soviet archives have been opened and we have testimony from those involved in the regime, her book is simply inexusable.Read "A Century of Violence in Soviet Russia"by Alexander N. Yakovlev and Anthony Austin.  Yakovlev was the architect of perestroika. He was a communist. He had access to documents western researchers have not yet seen. Yakovlev details how the regime was a criminal organization from its founding. It never had the support Fitzpatrick claims it did.
MaryJanice, what happened????. The first two Betsy Taylor books were short but packed with humor and action.  I've re-read them both several times, and still love them.  This one? It seems like she whipped it off in less than a month, and didn't put the care and craftsmanship into it that she did the others.  The plot is thin, the characters far less developed, and the book is overall a disappointment, especially in light of how excellent her first two Vampire Queen books were.  Sadly, the fourth book in the series, Undead and Unreturnable, is even worse.  I advise anyone wanting to read either Unappreciated or Unreturnable to get them from the library--they are not worth buying.  Try Kim Harrison's Dead Witch Walking instead, or Katie McAlister's You Slay Me if you want something lighter, and hope that MJD gets her act together and starts writing well again
Anti-Western new age nonsense. Zukav has a decidedly anti-Western tone and is obviously biased in favor of oriental thinking.  This is new age gobbledegook passed off as a bare bones reader on physics.  Rather than writing a laconic outline of physics, Zukav spends the majority of his time praising Eastern thought and toying with the idea that everything is subjective.The reader is referred to any college physics textbook or Isaac Asimov's History of Physics or a good set of encylopedias.
Welcome back my friends, to the show that never ends... "When will it end?? NEVER! MUWHAHAHAHAHA!"REVIEW CONTAINS SPOILERS*****First off, up until this point, I found the series moderately entertaining (especially the 2nd book). Granted, in every book, there are certain aspects of Jordan's redundant writing that are very annoying. For instance, the childish, and extremely immature thoughts and actions of the female characters. Realistically, in a time period like that, if a woman acted as arrogant and sexist as they do in this book series, they would get a good "thumping" and be forced to learn from their mistakes (As would anyone really). Instead, the men grovel like slaves around the women. It's very annoying and infinitely un-realistic. Even in fantasy, there are certain rules one must follow pertaining to the characteristics of the human race. Hardly anyone in this series of books makes a rational, practical decision. There is hardly any Logic here, and when someone who is supposedly "Wise" speaks up, its merely common sense that hopefully everyone in real life should, and probably does know. Most of the so-called "intellectual" sayings in this book bassically translate to somthing a 10 year-old kid would know.Human characteristics aside, Jordan has a great attention to detail when it comes to scenery (Clothing, geography, battle fields etc...) Hardly anything is left out. I suppose this is good, if one really wants to leave the real world and become part of the reality that Jordan has created.But here we are...at the 5th book. I hate to say it, but not enough happened in the time-line to justify 5 long books. Sometimes, it is hard to tell just how much time has passed from one point to another. Jordan has virtually no sense of time at all in these books. This can either be as an excuse for such a long series, or its just basically poor writing. I'm a little undecided on that.This book is full of the usual aspects that the previous 4 had:1. Most of the men can't think for themselves (However there are a number of Characters that I do like allot. Uno, Julian, Matt, Asmodean, Lan, Thom, Loial (Who isn't even in this one..go figure) What happened to Elays?? Uhg..2. The female characters whine and complain like my 2 year old daughter3. Rand's increase in the One Power, is directly proportional to how much of a complete idiot he is turning into. It all started when he absolutely refused to believe he was the Dragon Reborn (End of Book 1 I believe). It takes him a number of books to finally stop being so damn immature and finally step up, and take action. This is the ultimate annoying aspect in this series. Rand attains the 'Sword that cannot be touched'. A weapon that can level cities...What does he do? Shoves it into the floor at the Stone Of Tear, and scampers off into the woods for another adventure. Wow..smart huh?4. The Forsaken are scheming as usual. It's a mystery to me that they were picked by the Dark One. Powerful as they may be, they're mostly stupid, too paranoid, and un-trustworthy of one another. It would make more sense to create a truce and simply eliminate Rand. They could. Everyone knows they could. But they don't...Frustration level ever increasing...This series seems to remind me of a poorly written play with too many characters to have on stage at any given time. Jordan seems to shove various ones on for certain amounts of time, then shove them off, with hardly a word of goodbye.Something that I must point out is the way Jordan decides to kill off, or deal with the "Evil" characters. This whole re-incarnation nonsense is spoiling the importance, and fear of death. I believe it is wrong to kill off so many "Evil" characters at one time. Characters that have potential are eliminated.And yes...Asmodean. Here comes my biggest gripe of all..I rather liked Asmodean, his character was interesting, and it was rather refreshing to have someone cross over from the "Evil" side, to "Good" side (Even if it was un-willingly).He does provide a lot of insight for Rand. If I was a Forsaken, I would defiantly cross over to Rand's side, it only makes sense. BUT...Instead of keeping Asmodean alive and allowing him to help Rand with his great struggle...He's killed off at the end of the book.Right there, Jordan drops a huge amount of story potential, and trades it for the same, un-inventive, one-sided drivel that the rest of this book contains. Then Rand goes on to Kill Rhavin. Another interesting Character wasted. Lanfear has also been killed (as far as we know). Again, another interesting character wasted. I could care less about Moraine. After the first book, her character is basically rendered useless, and is completely unneeded.All in all, Jordan has a tendency to do away with the interesting characters (Hurin, Ingtar, Elays etc..) And keep the boring, immature ones. (Nynaeve, Egwene, Elayne, Aviendha etc...)The series is simply too long, and I'm positive it has over 1000 pages of material that needs to be discarded. If Lord of Chaos is as bad as this one, I'm burning my collection and sending the remains to Jordan's house.So, to those who are in the midst of this series like I am, I say to you; 'Welcome back my friends, to the show that never ends'.
Avoid this one. The original Changewave Investing came out in 2000, at the height of the dot com boom. The book touted the "New Economy" or "Techonomy", and how the future for investors in this area has never been better.  Talk about bad timing and terrible advice.In the late 90's almost anybody could make money in the market especially if one was invested in technology.  And everyone thought they were geniuses.  This euphoria seems to have afflicted Mr. Smith.  Taking his advice when the book came out would have resuted in significant losses, since 2000 was the peak of that market and 6 years later it still hasn't recovered.Along comes CW2.0 in 2001 with the added "protecting your gains in a volatile market" as he still raves about the "Techonomy". Hmmm....When I make investment or trading decisions I listen to those who actually know what they're talking about with a proven and consistent track record.  Tobin Smith's record is dubious at best.So if you really want to get a hold of your finances and become an excellent and astute investor, start with the greatest investors of our time: Warren Buffett, George Soros, Jim Rogers and Peter Lynch.  Look at their histories, methods and commentaries.  It will be far more insightful than a misguided book full of made-up words, ridiculous projections and bad ideas
A poorly organized book about a fascinating topic. Psychology and Alchemy has a lot of interesting information, but it is not presented in any sort of organized fashion.  Alchemy is well known for its perplexing symbols, but in the book these symbols are only referred to in passing.  This book is not for anyone who is trying to understand how the symbolism of Alchemy relates to psychology.  The descriptions of basic elements such as the planets, the caduceus, or birds are only 1-2 sentences in length and are scattered throughout the book.  Trying to use the index won't help either, as the pages listed in the index as containing information about a topic are often incorrect as they contain no mention of the topic being looked up
boring dog trainer. The book is fine, except I had to skip lengthy descriptions about the dog trainer.  She's such a boring character.  She's young, but not motivated to work.  In fact, she quited one of her jobs when Macon covered her rent.  The dog training job was just a pretext for her to try to hook up with some men, and get support.  The point is that she doesn't enjoy the job, thus, a detailed description of her dog training job (which she doesn't seem to enjoy) was just a boring digression
Okay for a beginner. I found this book rather...well...lame.  To me, and this is just me, the information was nothing that you could not find on most basic websites.  I would look elsewhere
ServSafe Coursebook - disappointed. I am very disappointed in this purchase.  The only reason that I bought this book was to receive the NEW Scantron test!  The Scantron test that arrived with the book was the OLD test.  All information at the Amazon site said that the new test was included.  That information was in error
Type too tiny to bother. I'd heard about this book on some cable show and eagerly ordered it with the intent of reading a passage or two every day. But I was really dismayed when I saw how unbelievably tiny the type is. I don't have extraordinary problems with my eyes, but if a book is uncomfortable to read, then I'm simply not going to bother. The authors should complain to the publisher about the shoddy presentation. Rodale press was apparently trying to save some bucks and as a result, buyers -- and the authors -- will be hurt.There are similar books out there, such as An Incomplete Education, and you might consider taking a look at them before you spend your money on this one
What a silly, immature book. What a silly, immature book.  The publisher should have packaged up some rabid froth to go with it.
the plot itself could make a movie on Lifetime or Oxygen. do yourself a favor - don't waste your time with this book
Late. As i still have not received this book, which is long overdue, i can not review it!!
Paul and Roman Mithraism?. Per the editorial review:"In his own writings, Paul draws from Mithraic vocabulary and symbolism."That's interesting, considering the earliest Roman mention of Mithras was by Statius (ca. 80-92 AD) and modern scholarship places the earliest known Roman Mithraic bull-slaying monument to ca. 100 AD (see Richard Gordon, "The date and significance of CIMRM 598 [British Museum, Townley Collection]", JMS 2, 1977-8, 148-74) and Paul was dead by then.If this author was using the outdated work of Cumont to develop this untenable theory - well, that's simply embarrassing.  The controversial theory of David Ulansey offers no earlier concrete evidence either as all he has to go on is the second hand (or made up) account of Plutarch who connects the Roman cult with some Cilician pirates ca. 62 BC.  But beyond this unsubstantiated literary reference the only concrete evidence for the Roman cult appears in the latter part of the 1st century AD...after Paul had "flourished."
almost boring. i just finished reading the book.  there is nothing in it about velocity... It's boring, predictable and has lots of "filler text
We should all thank Ravi Batra. We should all be for Mr. Ravi Batri.  By selling enough copies of this book and its sequel (&quot;Surviving the Great Depression of 1990&quot;), he singlehandedly prevented worldwide economic collapse
Action/Adventure:YES Compelling:NO. Although his interesting childhood kept you glued to the first quarter of the book, the rest is just a basic cowboy's life written with little or no techniques to keep you compelled to read every word. It is interesting to read, however, since he was a true to life cowboy. If I had to do over, I'd saved my money.
Nostradamus: Prophecies Fulfilled and Predictions for Millen. Order the book Nostradamus by Stephen Skinner Francis King. Than
Who wrote this?. I have read every Leaphorn/Chee book by Hillerman more than once and am a great fan. I just finished this book and discussed it with a friend.. we both agreed it was so disappointing.. we cannot believe it was written by the same person. The writing was awkward and heavy-handed... by the second page I suspected something was wrong here. It reads like some cheap Harlequin mystery/romance.The sensitive handling of Navajo spiritual beliefs, the beautiful rendering of the landscape, the terse but meaningful conversations are all missing.All I can say is, the publishers need to pay more attention to future manuscripts and insure that a writer of Tony Hillerman's caliber is not allowed to decline in the public eye... he has given us much enjoyment.... he deserves better.And if someone else is fleshing out Hillerman's plot lines.. the public should be warned
Almost Useless!. As an engineering student, I found this book very theoretical, which makes it more difficult to read than an actual PDE textbook. Also, unlike other Schaum's series, this book does not have many worked-out examples and does not have solutions for all the problems. It is poorly organized
Did you all actually read it?. First off, I am an avid reader and love a long challenging read, however, this novel is one of the worst I have ever read! It is long, boring and has absolutely no plot. I purchased it when it first came out without reading any reviews. Although from the looks of most of them here, I personally suspect that many of those who raved, never actually read the book
undone. i would just like to say that diane's recipies are not my personal favorites but whatever that marielle woman has to say is probably untrue.  that was rude
If you've read GTD, you can probably skip "Ready for Anything". Key points:1. One should read Allen's "Getting Things Done" (GTD) before reading "Ready for Anything" (RFA).2. If you've read GTD, you can probably skip RFA.  It reinforces some core GTD principles, often in a mind-numbingly repetitive fashion (which can be a good teaching style), but also tries to fill in some of "The Vision Thing" content absent in GTD.  Unfortunately, Covey is better than Allen in addressing "The Vision Thing."  Together, GTD plus Covey's "7 Habits" and "First Things First" (FTF) make an interesting collection.3. RFA suffers from the same design and layout issues I found with GTD: the "inspirational quotations"  in the margins destroy the reading flow as they push into the space occupied by the main text.  The quotes distract the reader from the main text due to their intrusion into such and a lack of white space. IMO, there are too many inspirational quotes.  Allen should have simply started each chapter with one relevant quote, ala Covey's "7 Habits..."  I've noticed that some of the inspirational quotes are recycled from GTD and are sometimes better than the associated essay in RFA.  To see how to place quotes or references in the margins of a book's pages, Allen should review any of Edward Tufte's books, such as "Beautiful Evidence."4. There are obvious parallels throughout RFA to ideas in Covey's "7 Habits" and "First Things First."  However, there's no mention of Covey in the book (and he's only cited once in GTD via an inspirational quote).  Both Covey and Allen have interesting things to teach, but it seems Allen eschews any reference to Covey despite the obvious parallels to anyone who has read both authors.  In some cases, it seems Allen is taking pot-shots at Covey ideas, such as his reference to the "quadrant matrix" on page 22 of the paperback edition of RFA, an obvious reference to Covey's Urgent/Important matrix in FTF.5. RFA makes no attempt to indicate when the included essays were originally published in Allen's newsletter.  It would be interesting to know when the original essay was published.  I'm sure they've been edited and updated for the book, but some connection to their stated original publication dates might be helpful in understanding where Allen was in his personal journey at the time he wrote the essay.6. The "By the way..." items at the end of each RFA chapter may be valuable for readers who've not yet asked themselves some of the deeper questions or who are struggling with their GTD implementation.7. IMO, the GTD Workflow chart, in a revised form in RFA, still needs work.  Perhaps they should not try to fit it on one page: use a two-page spread or, even better, a fold-out that one can also tear out.  The chart would benefit from the help of someone who knows how to draw flowcharts.8. The paper in the paperback edition of  RFA is of a cheap, inferior quality compared to that used in the paperback edition of GTD.  To me, it feels like cheap newsprint.9. RFA lacks an index.  A book like this, without an index, is most unfortunate, indicating perhaps a rush job to capitalize on GTD interest by recycling old essays.  Recycling content for additional profit is a good idea, but any book like this should include an index
No, NO, NO!. Menstrual bleeding, personal stories of abandonment and enlightenment, blah blah blah, a bunch of rubbish from aging people who were abused and now are better. Join a women's liberation group or a "moon cycle" clan for free, but don't buy this uninformative and uncreative  rubbish that has nothing to do with psychology or liberation
disappointing. I can't believe this book was written by the same author as Like Water For Chocolate.  That book was brilliant.  This one starts off promising but soon falls flat on its face
Don't waste your time. This book is beyond weak.  I would like to give it negative stars if possible.  The characters are confusing and little goes on with them that is worth reading about or believable.  I suppose if you like fictional sex and rambling writing you will love this book.  Personally, I want a refund
Several important points, but de Soto oversells and is mind-numbingly repetitive. De Soto fundamentally argues that the reason poor countries are poor is because they have bad property rights: it's incredibly difficult for poor people (specifically, recent urban migrants) to get legal title to their land. As a result, the poor make "extralegal" arrangements, squatting on and using land that neighbors (but not the government) recognize as theirs. But because they don't own the land, they can't get a mortgage on their house to start a business, electricity and water companies are less likely to reliably provide services, the government has difficulty taxing them because they don't have a legal address, and so on. And so on.It's a very important point but de Soto oversells, arguing with exaggerated (and oft-repeated) ideological claims but weak empirical evidence that solving this problem will actually enrich the poor.He occasionally shares insights from his interesting field work. For example, he has helped businesses in Peru to navigate the overwhelming bureaucracy and become legal, and he has found that most businesses would rather be legal and pay taxes than be illegal and pay bribes: a useful bit of empirical information, but those gems appear all too occasionally.Before reading this entire book, I recommend going to the website of de Soto's foundation (the Institute for Liberty and Democracy at www.ild.org.pe) and reading the main point there (in one tenth the words)
An unreliable guide. When you are a big movie fan it's a good thing to get yourself a reference book to keep track of all things film.  Although this particular volume is not bad to have around it has some major flaws, especially in the review department.  There seems to be no continuity from review to review.  Because there are so many different people writing reviews there is no general opinion of what makes a good movie.  How is it possible that the same source gives a thrown together mess like ARMAGEDDON three and a half stars and a superb satire like FIGHT CLUB a 'turkey' rating?  The review of FIGHT CLUB is so far off it really seems that the author didn't even see the movie.  There are more examples as well that induce some head scratching.  With a guide such as this you need to have a kind of general opinion that gives you an idea of when to buy into the reviewers advice. I've bought the last five or six volumes of this guide and found the VIDEOHOUND GOLDEN MOVIE RETREIVER book to be far superior and chock full of extras that, over the years, this book didn't have or had to get rid of to put in more questionable movie reviews.  I've actually rented movies based on highly recommended reviews within the VIDEO AND DVD GUIDE that were bad calls.  Not bad if kept in the bathroom for quick reference but definitely not for coffee table presentation if you are a hard core movie buff
The operative word here is "Lightweight". I'm still searching for a really amazing, knock my socks off Adobe Acrobat book, that will take me beyond what I could find in the Acrobat help, or figure out myself.  I can capably make a PDF from Word or any other application, I don't care about embedding multimedia, and I still see a sore need to find a book that covers forms really well.  This book fails both the breadth test and the depth test; it might as well be one of the "dummies" books.  Thanks for nothing
this is the most suckiest book i have ever read about algebra. this book sucks, it taught me nothing, because of this boook i faild algebra.DO NOT BUY THIS BOOK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Worthless. This book, as the other Olivia books, is witty and creative. Unfortunately, the book is rendered worthless and inappropriate by the poor content. Olivia lies. Yes, all children enjoy fantasy, but when she's directly asked for the truth, she lies. Again, most kids will try that at least once. But for Olivia, there are no consequenses. What an awful message for children.It gets worse. She shows a very negative attitude about her "boring uniform" that she has to wear to school. What a brat. And at the end she intentionally defies her mother, and of course, no consequenses.  Blech. It's worthless, which is too bad because this author definately has talent
Did I miss something?. Did I miss something?  Clearly from the title alone Dr. Sarno believes tension and tightening of muscles is the cause of most back/leg pain.  Where is the chapter that gives you steps to change this?!  I didn't need to buy this book
The horror... the horror... That was pretty much how I felt after finishing this terrible book.I'm a Buffy fan (something of a purist - as I don't like the Angel spin-off), and only an occasional reader of BTVS novels, which - except for The Lost Slayer - always disappointed me. They were like McDonalds food - good to have around when Buffy's not on TV, but never satisfying.So when I saw this novel, I thought it would be good. Holder is a four-times Bram Stoker award winner, and I figured the first novel set after the climax of the BTVS TV show would be of a much higher quality than previous novels, to satisfy the BTVS fans who want the story to continue.But I was very wrong.This book is absolutely god-awful.I'd give it zero stars, if I could.It's hard to pick on thing that makes this book so bad.Unscary and cliched villains;Regular Buffy characters acting out of character (since when does Oz give speeches?);Terrible dialogue (unrealistic, and with none of the wit or intelligence that's the hallmark of the TV show);The Yet Another Apocalypse plot, (something which Whedon and co. acknowledged was a cliche when the TV shows were running within the shows' storylines);Ignoring the continunity set up by the final series of Angel; during which this book is set (unless the worldwide Apocalyptic weather systems featured in this book decided to skip LA, and no one at Wolfram and Hart thought to tell Angel "A Hellmouth in Cleveland has opened");Borderline racist characterisation of non-Americans (all Italians speak-a like-a this-a and are obsessed with clothes, while girls from Indian are all shy and hide behind veils);And there's the uncountable number of unnamed new Slayers who are casually slaughtered (it seems a new Slayer has a shorter life expectancy than a red-shirted officer in Star Trek).But the worst thing about this book are the events Holder skips - battle scenes, action sequences, and major dramatic events she set up earlier in the book - they're just skipped and you're told the result of what happened.For example, early in the book Buffy and co. encounter a pack of shapeshifters and go out hunting (doesn't have any bearing on the main plot). Only I think they do, because Holder skips the entire hunt. Buffy and co discover the monsters.Turn the page, the critters are all dead.The same thing is repeated again, and again, and again. Big set up. Expectation raised of major drama/action scenes. Turn the page and the events already in the past - sometimes by days.Admittedly BTVS jumps around genres with wild abandon, but action is a major part of the series and the novels. Something that Holder either doesn't want to handle or can't write, so skips.Even major events in the story - including the final battle, are skipped.The only good thing about this book is twist at the very end, which completes the "Journey to adulthood" arc Whedon and co have been running since the start of season 4 of BTVS.However, its execution makes me think Holder got her idea from reading Buffy slash fiction, and too many reports of angels visiting the dying in hospitals.Only BTVS fans would buy this book, but they'll end up hating it.In my view Holder took the publisher's money, handed in a first draft, and then legged it.That all said, I found this book inspirational.Because after reading it I thought, "I can write a better novel than this piece of junk!"If you're a BTVS fan, avoid this book and spend your money on the new Buffy comic coming from Dark Horse - it's Buffy the Vampire Slayer, season 8 written by Joss Whedon
Hello my name is Bertie Wooster- I mean Jason Bourne- I mean... This poor unfortunate book has a tragic case of identity crisis.  It is Wodehouse dressed up as MI-6, and the whole getup just looks absurd.  Hugh Laurie is actually a pretty good writer- especially for someone whose day job is acting- but this particular fairy tale was unsuccessful.  The protag. is amusing, and the narrative is pithy.  However, the plot is one which requires the reader to sympathize with the characters.  Basically, I didn't.  Laurie spent so much energy trying to make his protagonist funny, and forgot to make him interesting or loveable.  I'm a little bitter about that, because I'm pretty sure "Dr. House" is capable of better work.  Come on, give us better! Chop, chop!
A Little Disappointing... I bought this book because David Sedaris recommended it at the last reading I attended.  The stories are all on the "dark" side and they do not appeal to me.  Admittedly, I prefer something much more light hearted, so others may love this book
Some good stories, Not a great Collection. There are some good things as well as some bad things about Micro Fiction. The good thing about this book is that it has variation in the texture and tone of the stories. My favorite would have to be Morning News which was written by the author himself.   Also the author has managed to touch on many different subject matters. However the bad news is that many of the stories in the book are not very well written, some of it is formula fiction and I had trouble understanding the meaning behind a couple of them. The upside is that the book costs less than $2
"What to Expect" way off the mark. I read this book after reading "What to Expect When You're Expecting" and was very disappointed.  I liked "Expecting," most likely because while pregnancies differ, the biology is pretty much the same for everyone, so it's hard to miswrite pregnancy.  However, after reading "First year" I have found myself overly concerned for no reason simply because a lot of what is in this book has not accurately described my child's behavior or abilities.  I know the authors put out the disclaimer that every baby is different, but I'm not talking about when kids will walk or talk.  I'm talking about their claim that babies can feel embarassment at the age of ten months or understand that I want my son to help clean up if I hand him a paper towel.  Additionally, the book does not always offer a good answer to a question...the answer usually comes in the form of "some babies will, some babies won't."  How is that helpful?!!  After noting a string of inconsistencies and claims that are simply false, I finally had to put the book down or drive myself crazy.  In long, I do not recommend this book to anyone, particularly a first time mother.
Less credible than Christian orthodoxy. As a somewhat unorthodox Christian, I am not opposed to efforts to revisit the earliest sources of Christian tradition in order to discern the original teachings of Jesus and his followers.  It is indeed quite possible - even probable - that those teachings underwent transformation and development, and that some of these developments eventually ran contrary to the original teachings.  There are books that follow this process in a way that is intellectually respectable and based on sound scholarship;  this book - unfortunately - is not one of them.This book will appeal to those who despise orthodox Christianity yet feel a compelling need to reinterpret Christianity according to their subjective psychological needs.  For such people, facts do not matter, and any theory which radically reinterprets traditional Christianity - no matter how far-fetched - will find a ready audience.For those who want views of early Christianity that pay attention to the historical facts, I can recommend - without necessarily agreeing with - the scholarly works of Geza Vermes, Raymond Brown, Bart Ehrman, Marcus Borg, N. T. Wright, and even Bishop Spong (if you insist on ultra-liberalism).  Do not waste your money on the rubbish of the aptly-named Timothy Freke.
Skeeter is Jar Jar Binks. Rabbit Redux is by far the worst of the Rabbit series and for one reason - the character of Skeeter.  Never have I read a book where the author allowed such an annoying character to hijack his story.  What Jar Jar Binks (that annoying character who never shut up)was to Star Wars-The Phantom Menace, Skeeter was to Redux. After a while of putting up with the boring and endless rantings of this character, I began skipping pages. I hate doing that but I had no choice. I found that it didn't matter much anyway - nothing Skeeter said brought anything to this story, nor does it to the following two Rabbit booksThe book was good overall, but why did Updike have to devote so much of the story to Skeeter and his mindless rantings.
What amazing insights from a guy who talks to God (snicker). Sorry for the sarcasm, but I can't help thinking just how uninspired this book is.  Imagine a counter to this book.  This book would promote "hate", "dishonesty", "immorality", "ignorance, "ingratitude".... you get the picture.  This Mormon leader's great contribution to world is to say we should be honest?  Now that was profound!  Sadly, Gordo and his wrinkled cadre have this bad habit of taking the basic decency of the members of the church and attributing it to the implausible myths they peddle to the world.As an avowed atheist, I encourage everyone to be honest, moral, learned, and all the things Gordo promotes in this book.  There is nothing wrong with promoting these and they have nothing to do with Mormonism.  But this book is written for children and sheep.  Promoting this book among the various books that seriously discuss morality, ethics and other serious issues is like watching a high school team play the New England Patriots or comparing a Janice Kapp Perry vapid song to Bach's Mass in B minor.Mormonism is declining in real terms because their leadership does not have the capacity to address and provide any illumination to the relevant issues of the 21st century.  This book should confine itself to the children's section or to the local Deseret Book store.
No longer standard!  Do not use!. This dreadful anthology was once the standard English edition of Plato.  I  had to assign it when I taught courses on Plato because there was nothing  else.  Many of the translations are bad.  Even the decent ones often are  quite old, and their flowery Victorian diction is off-putting.  The  collection isn't complete, as it leaves out a number of important dialogues  from the Platonic corpus.  And the introductions are uniformly ghastly; the  editors have little understnding of philosophy, and keep saying horrible  things like &quot;There's a lot of boring logic-chopping in this dialogue,  but at least the personality of Socrates is engaging.&quot;      There is  no longer any need to be subject to the tyranny of Hamilton &amp; Cairns!   There is now a far better edition, with excellent introductions, excellent  translations, and including all the dialogues.  It's the COMPLETE WORKS  from Hackett Pub., edited by John Cooper.  It will be the standard edition  from now on.  Go get that one!  Don't get this one
Cheap, totally junky, do NOT waste your money!. We got this for our kids who are big Pirates fans. This toy should never have been released, it's a piece of junk to make a quick buck from the movie.  It's a junky non-functional ripoff of the classic Viewmaster concept, and while my kids (3 & 6) can work Viewmaster, this telescope in no way works--there are several MAJOR design flaws.  The disks holding the picture don't center so the pic won't show up, the disk pops out when you try to turn to the next picture and won't stay in if you so much as move the telescope, you can't even see the picture unless the telescope is totally collapsed (which is tough, since the wobbly piece of junk won't stay shut).  And IF your kid can get all this stuff right, you are rewarded with... A BLURRY barely visible image. I've bought a lot of toys and don't always expect perfection, but this is seriously the junkiest hunk of *$#* I have ever purchased.  Whoever churned this out in time for the P.o.t.C. marketing blitz has surely never met any kids or any quality control personnel.  I wish I could give less than one star.  Thank God the designer of this is only making children's toys and not airplanes or cars
Lovely Topic. It's A Shame It's So Poorly Written!. This is perhaps the most poorly written general history I have ever read. Assigned reading in a Modern Indian history course, I cannot recommend strongly enough that instructors and students avoid this text. The largest failing of this book is to poorly integrate the scope of the topic. The book goes from focusing on one tiny event in India to another, with absolutely no flowing, overarching narrative to tie them together. There is very little context given for most of the events described, and the reader is left wondering why certain actors are behaving the way they are. There also seems to be a strident anti-British tone throughout the text, which generally is a fair assessment for Indian historians to make, however the authors fail to capture the Pro-British vs. Anti-British debate within the reform movement with any objectivity, which is essential to understanding modern Indian history. Overall, a wonderful opportunity to introduce Westerners to the rich history of India has been wasted, and educational institutions everywhere should take note.
poor investment. A redundant and poorly written tome that does not answer the important questions
not the best self-help. The self-improvement books How to Win Friends and Influence People and Talking the Winner's Way are both way superior to this short book. Most of what you read is basically review if you've ready other similar books. And what's present doesn't pack enough substance or &quot;how to&quot; to make it really worth your time. About half-way through the book, Gabor started presenting fresh ideas. The problem, however, is that it was half-way through the book. Not a bad read, but there's so much better. If you happen across it one day on the street, it won't do any harm to read it. But I can't recommend paying money for something you already know, or can get for a better deal
Review on what?. If this is an item you are interested in, forget about it. At least, forget about ordering it from Amazon. I ordered it in mid-January. It is mid-March and I still haven't received it. So honestly, I can't write a review on something I haven't read. Order it from somewhere else so you can actually read it and write your own review
All common sense. everything in this book is common sense.  There is really very little to learn from this, and it is overpriced
Obsolete. This is a civilian reprint of the 1983 ST31-91B. The issue version with it's waterproof pages is a collectors item and not worth much else. Both versions are now very outdated in much of their treatment and management of  illness/injury. Frankly when I first got the book in 1983, I didn't find  it's sparse outline presentation of information very useful. You can find  more current information, better presented in some of the newer books on  Wilderness Medicin
ABC-CLIO STEALS FROM THEIR AUTHORS. ABC-CLIO STEALS FROM THEIR AUTHORS, PAYS THEM NOTHING, AND ROBS THEM BLIND. DO NOT PURCHASE BOOKS FROM THEM OR FROM THEIR SUBSIDIARIES. BOYCOTT THESE THIEVES!!
Just enough truth to deceive - avoid this poison pill. Yes, childhood sexual abuse is a real problem, and those who were victimized in that way need to have the suport to move beyond it. However, "Courage to Heal" and its companion, "Allies in Healing" set about providing that support in entirely the wrong way. If you compare thier suggested approaches to recovery and overcoming the symptoms to the professional psychiatric organizations, there are repeatedly in contradiction to one another. I used to recommend these books and own them both and the workbook too, but after seeing their practices carried out and how they work to actually isolate the potential victim from existing suport networks if hte "recovered" memories are disputed by uninvolved family members, I can't come up with a strong enough warning.Over the course of my marriage of seven years, my wife has steadily declined in function as her therapist has continuously encouraged her to try to recover her "memories" of childhood abuse and has worked to incresingly isolate her from family and friends concerned about her steady decline and the contradictions present in her memories. Over and over again she has pointed to "expert" sources like Courage to Heal" to dismiss efforts to get her into a form of therapy that is not focused on trying to interpret bad dreams and imagining abuse to convince oneself that sexual abuse really occurred.It is a myth that someone with emotional troubles has to recovery the memories of why they have difficulty, or that things have to get worse before they get better. The long term psychotherapy and memory recovery methods recommended by the author are actually considered to be harmful when a patient is having a bout of severe depression. The real experts (e.g. the APA) stress that the focus sould be on short term therapeutic methods proven to yeild results in handling one's current life situation and only pursiing long term therapy and working through firm memories when the patient has fully stabilized, and then only if the memories present an ongoing hindrance to a full recovery. If you can become fully functional without recovering any potentially buried memories, there is no reason to seek them out.Avoid, avoid, avoid. If someone has already recommended these books to you, research for yourself the professional recommended treatment approaches for the symptoms presented (e.g. depression, OCD, etc) and how to evaluate if one's therapy is good or bad
Down On "Main Street". "Is it really my failure, or theirs?"Carol Kennicott asks herself this question nearly 250 pages into "Main Street," regarding her impossible relations with the residents of  the town of Gopher Prairie, Minnesota. By this time, I was asking a similar question: "Is it really my failure, or Sinclair Lewis's?""Main Street" seemed a good idea as it sat on my shelf. Touted as a satirical look at middle-class America, it was Lewis's first successful novel, ushering in a new era upon its publication in 1920, and breaking critical ground for the Golden Age of American Literature, of Hemingway, Fitzgerald, and Faulkner. Lewis was the first American to win the Nobel Prize for Literature. How could I go wrong picking it up?The book tells the interminable story of Mrs. Kennicott, who marries a country doctor while imagining herself an improving influence on his as-yet-unseen town of Gopher Prairie. Imagine her surprise when she is greeted not as a liberator but grist for the gossip mill, with her Big City ideas and lack of churchiness.Carol's alternating turns of resistance and acceptance are about the sum total of this plotless book. Lewis's descriptive powers are much in evidence, and you find yourself trapped in G.P. as much as Carol, his descriptions of noisy neighbors and smug dinner parties bearing the unmistakable imprint of someone who grew up in small-town Minnesota and knew of what he wrote. The problem, when you get past the period slang and the barbed commentary, is that the subjects of Lewis's satire are so miserable and nasty you can't understand why Carol thinks she can change them, except perhaps with the idea nature couldn't possibly create people as one-dimensional as those found here.I thought I'd never read a duller work about small-town Americana from the early 20th century than Thornton Wilder's "Our Town." My apologies, Thornton. "Main Street" is as down on the same locale that "Our Town" exults, only Lewis lays on derision with a dripping trowel. Wilder, by contrast, seems almost surgical in the delicacy with which he makes his points. Lewis makes sure that when he presents us with the atheistic radical Miles Bjornstam, he is not only a voice of reason and affability to Carol but ultimately run out of town for his beliefs on the heels of having suffered a great tragedy, just in case we didn't otherwise get how miserable a town Carol is stuck in."And you want to reform people like that when dynamite is so cheap?" Carol fumes early on.There is one effective section in the book, when Carol first discovers how isolated she has become and feels the "moist, fleering eyes" of prying neighbors so powerfully she draws down her window shades. Passages with her husband, the stolid, straying, but not worthless Dr. Kennicott, present some desperately-needed ambiguity.But the book just keeps going, hammering home the same points, before winding down with an ending that feels more like a cop-out, in which the still-radical but more placid Carol settles for the status quo while imagining her sleeping infant daughter as "a bomb to blow up smugness." Polemics can produce great writing, but seldom great literature, and "Main Street" is a case in point.The Signet Classic edition from 1998 features an introduction by Thomas Mallon which was the most enjoyable part of the book, candidly pointing out the book's faults but arguing for its continued value, as it imagines Carol's experience being like that of a young Hillary Rodham first arriving in Little Rock. Suffice to say I had a lot more fun reading it than I did the rest of this book
Not a good book. My daughter is "into" the Civil War so I bought this book for her.  I read it first and am glad I did.  I cannot recommend it.  It is boring and has very little suspense.  I know the Civil War was a sad and serious time, but familied still had some happy times in the midst of it!  Cass, the main character's younger sister, has visions and all sorts of weird things.  I do not want to expose my children to that. Another character also reads cards and supposedly has second sight.  These things are occultic to me.  Therefore I cannot recommend this book at all
Designer. This is a very nice coffee table book, and for a beginning art novice there are some "secrets". But, for artist with general high school level education this is little more than a nice picture book.There is no discounting Yves Lanthier's skill or excellent creative ability but the few tips he gives are not for creating the Trompe L'oeil ceilings he exhibits in the book. Rather he shows simple stone / marble technique, a basic wall effect and basic light shading in the last fifteen pages of the book.This is not a book the speaks to basic line and eye illusion of ceiling depth which I was looking for.
still shopping. I could have written this book in six words.......&quot;Because it makes you feel good!&quot
Weak arguments, full of Hubris. Adams uses typical arguments meant to disarm traditional theists. Too bad the arguments are weak and tired.  By the way, the only person who can say that all the roads lead up to the top of the mtn is the person who sees and knows all roads.  I don't know anyone truly that arrogant who believes he knows all religious systems, especially since there have been thousands of them!  Beyond the thought experiment there is little to commend here.  It might be best if Mr. Adams were to stick to his comics
thoroughly disappointing. Watch the mini series, skip the book.If you are a fan of history, and I'm certain you are if you're reading this review, skip this book.  Read Rick Atkinson, or Dick Winters' account, anything, just skip this book.The writing was high school quality, a poor job by the editors (apparently the atomic bomb was "dripped" on Hiroshima), and the story is short on the details that make reading historical accounts interesting.Enjoy the mini series, but if you're interested in this topic, find another book
Worthless Book - NO table of contents and pathetic index. We couldn't find ANY of the collectibles on which we needed information - and the index was the WORST I've ever seen!  I felt totally ripped off with this book but it would cost more to return than it was worth.  Maybe I can find an antique outhouse and supply it with a fresh 2007 price guide...
Same as: Picture Book of the Continental Soldier. If you think this is a new title, beware.  It is a new title on an old text: Picture Book of the Continental Soldier (Stackpole Books, 1969). The contents are dated, i.e, the hunting shirt pattern bears no resemblance to the original at Newburgh, NY Washington's HQ, research shows the cooking gear was more like tin buckets than iron pots, the cartridge pouches became standardized during the war, enlisted mens tents are not as they are pictured, the Pickering musket tool was probably never made as none have ever been found, etc...  For the 1960's this book was pretty good, but 30+ years of research contradicts much of what this book pictures as being typical Continental soldier equipment
Your Average topology student will be frustrated... This text is very very difficult to read for people like me, your average topology student. A difficult subject to grasp, the layout of this book simply does not help organize the material. I have purchased several other books, that while they don't make topology easy, at least make it digestable. Pass on this book and go with Munkres
dissappointed. how can you have a book about past new orleans and not mention shotgun houses a very bad decisio
High hopes - not fulfilled. I was really looking forward to reading this book after several warm recommendations, but I was sadly disappointed.  The contents was reasonable giving, but the language and the presentation...I give it..4 for contents,2 for language and grammar,2 for presentation and structure.Hmmm. 8 divided by 3 is... 2.6.  No, that's more than it deserves
Shoddy Reserched Novel. I purchased this book a week ago and hardly impressed by Mr. Laurence Gardner's extremely shoddy scholarship and laughable gullibility.  The book reads more like a novel rather than a well researched historical book.  Indeed, Bloodline of the Holy Grail is more novel than historical fact.Let us begin by investigating the forwarder of this novel (which the author intends to market as the historical fact).  Lawrence Gardner traces the supposed blood line of Jesus Christ to the HRH Prince Michael Stuart of Albany who in fact writes the forward to Mr. Gardner's book.  So who exactly is this "Prince of Albany"?  Well our "Prince of Albany" turns out to be a self-styled "Prince of Albany" (one among his numerous self-bestowed titles), an imposter born not of the Stewart bloodline (it ended with Prince Henry Cardinal Stuart in around 1806) but of common stock as Michael Lafosse of Belgian pedigree.  No Scottish much less Stewart blue blood flows in this imposter's veins.  A little background research by the perhaps gullible Mr. Gardner could have ousted Mr. Lafosse from his throne.Using and placing exclusive emphasis on the Gnostic (heretical) writings which appeared  between 300 A.D. and 500 A.D., far later than the Synoptic Gospels (60 A.D. -100 A.D.) further stretches the imagination.   Testimonial evidence of the authenticity, devoid of imagined Catholic manipulation, of the Gospel texts speaks to the fact that all but seven verses of the of all four gospels can be constructed wholly by original works by commentators on the gospel who lived between 100 A.D. to 250 A.D. long before the supposed writing of the first Gnostic "Gospel".  Rather the Gnostic gospels are nothing more than another piece of writing much like the Joseph Smith's Book of Mormon.Mr. Gardner alleges without proof that Jesus Christ's apostles were princes, magicians and doctors (with the exception of Peter and Andrew).  He gives these all apostles numerous aliases (with the exception of Peter who has none in Mr. Gardner's book) which quite frankly is confusing.  The fact remains that the only apostle who had an alias, Simon (better known as Peter), is the only one devoid of an alias in Mr. Gardner's book!In short Mr. Gardner seems to seek to capitalize on market trends in which any book with freemasonry underpinnings are faddish and hip.  Hardly a launch platform for any historical research, Bloodlines of the Holy Grail is a shoddy novel that masquerades as honest historical research.In summation poor novel, even poorer historical novel and a gullible charlatan for a novelist.
I'm Really Sorry,. I tried to read and love this book several times , and I have a degree from Columbia in Literature and I read a lot of Fantasy but I just can't get into this book!Nothing HAPPENS! It just goes on and on and I can't like or identify with or wish to live vicariously through anybody!Isn't that what the Fantasy genre is supposed to be about
Don't buy it. It a waste of money. This book is so lame... I regret every minute I spent reading it.
Good information buried in fluff. This author needs to take two classes at whichever university she teaches: (1) instructional design and (2) writing concisely. This book has quite a lot of good information, but it is all buried within convoluted fluff.There are many other books on research methodology that (a) do a better job of explaining, (b) include more comprehensive rules for research, and (c) don't take up so much of your valuable time with fluff. I recommend you look at those other books -- especially if you are a professor who is choosing a book for your students
Sooo Lifetime!. If you like this book you will probably like "Bless the Child" by Cathy Cash Spellman.  They are very similar.  This book can be summed up in one word, simple: simple-minded, simple characters, simple plot (applied loosely), and simple premise.  What a contrived piece of garbage!I can't describe everything wrong with this book because there's not enough time.  If it's meant to be a mystery it sucks because you figure out who did it about halfway through.  If it's meant to empower women it sucks because the women are either victims, in denial, weak, worried about what everyone thinks, or oblivious.  If it's meant to promote animal adoptions it sucks because the author's plea for that is irritating.  That's how bad this book is! It can make an animal lover say that its plea for more animal adoptions was annoying.This author has no style.  The book reads like an episode of inside edition.  There is no immersion into the story.  The total lack of character development leaves you with no compassion for them.  As a reader I felt completely outside the story; an uncaring observer of a poorly described scenario.  The attempts to tug at my heartstrings were laughable.  I've been more moved by the appearance of colorful weeds on my lawn.  The only reason I read the whole thing was that my neighbor recommended it and loaned it to me.  Do not waste your time.I must say though that this novel was inspirational.  If this crap can make the best seller list, it gives me hope that my original fiction might get published
Not appropriate for MBA level. Somehow this book ended up being a required text in my full-time MBA program.  We complained so much that this was a 1st year 'college level' book and not appropriate at our level that my school discontinued it the following year.  Now I can't resell my 'unused' version on campus.  What a waste
No ZERO stars option?. Does anyone even care that the "Author" John Miller, formerly of ABC's 20/20 and then the head of counterterrorism for the LAPD, is currently the Assistant Director of Public Affairs for the FBI in the BUSH regime...I mean...Administration.This book is Propaganda. Period
Well played Nick, you took our money and didn't deliver. City girl and I recently read the six books.  It was a delightful, warm, fun time, drinking wine and reading a book a night by the fire.  I read aloud the male parts and she the female.  We would laugh and wonder and hypothesize and puzzle over the meanings.  They were wonderful memorable evenings.My opinion of The Books:He should have stopped at the first one!!Like a movie company that sees dollar signs after a successful first run, Nick wrote a sequel that was a shadow of the original.  The subsequent books prove to be good evidence that he had very little in mind as far as a story line goes and with the judicious application of vague, confusing and nonsensical teasings, he told us nothing.  Just as "Jaws XXI" and "Halloween XVI" still brought the teenagers to the box office, so will "Sabine Becomes Cleopatra" and "Griffin Returns to Pleades" bring bring the Bantok herds stampeding into Barnes and Nobels.  The cash registers will ring, Nick will smile, and the faithful will say, "May I please have some more?"I didn't like his artwork either.
don't waste your time nor money. Terrible book.I followed the Scott Perterson trial, and I agree with a guilty verdict.So I thought it would be interesting to read what was going on behind those closed doors.The editing was terrible, the story was told very poorly.Names used were confusing.They had nicknames, sometimes the nickname would be written down, the other time it was not.So, who the heck are they talking about now.Don't waste time or money
Beauty is skin deep. Such beautiful pictures, and they are great inspiration. Makes you want to spend the day in the kitchen.  There it ends. I tried the white chocolate-candy cane recipe twice.  It just doesn't work.  We (I have a professional kitchen) added flour to make a manageable batter, but after baking could not get them off the baking sheet.  More adjustments, and finally succeeded in making a cookie that no one liked.  We also tried the two layer desert with brownie bottom.  Expensive mess.  The  beautiful photographs are worthy of framing or put the whole book on your coffee table.
What a Boring Book. Shadows on the Rock was a really really boring book! It didnt focus on any one subject and kinda just drifted from story to story. Why, a lot of the words were written in french. I would feel sorry for a person reading this  book that has no french knowledge. I kept finding myself reading the same  page several times before i realized that i had read it already. It doesnt  capture your attention. I have one word for this book. BORING
Stuffy, predictable and annoying!. I borrowed this book a while ago, hoping for an enjoyable light read. Unfortunately not.The main character of this series, Amelia Peabody, is supposedly interesting. Unfortunately not. Obsessed that men are the evil of every age, her rants occupy almost every page. Her "supposed insights" and commentary were so long that I found myself speed-reading through the pages, scanning as many as 20 pages every few minutes.The sidekick is just as annoying. While she isn't complaining about the weather, she is busy fainting.Anyone who has read a handful of mystery books would already know who the "Mummy" was. What little intrigue there was, was ruined by the predictability.Although the writing was quite enjoyable, it was ruined by many of the characters. I'd take one of the case studies of Sherlock Holmes over this any day. Or any book by PD James or JD Robb.
I don't know what's to like about this book!. Interesting and suspect that there is only one review and of course its &quot;raving&quot;.  This book has not merit and is not worth the time it takes to read it
Title Contrary to Content. My husband purchased this book so that we could both spend time for devotional reading in efforts to build and maintain a stronger marriage; only to find that the book was 'really' written for couples who have children; hence, the misleading book title.  Needless to say, we were rather disappointed.  In addition, the author seems to have grabbed Bible verses at random, then writes examples based on, not only his, but his family's experiences....and the vast majority of the verses he used had NOTHING to do with his stories.  This is a book more geared to families; however, I'd caution this recommendation due to the randomly selected Bible verses.
Despite my  fear of being accused of... not being hip, I must venture out and say:Oh my God!!!  What????  Who cares?  Franny is pregnant.  The big twist in this story was that it was in the 50s.  But beyond that, what's the point?  Take out the pregnancy and we are left with hyperintelligent, overanalytical, pretentious young adults whose parents did them a disservice by never offering them a real childhood.  Boring in the 50s and boring now.As a fan of Catcher if the Rye, I couldn't wait to get my hands on Franny and Zooey.  Holden was familiar.  Franny and Zooey made me want to shower.  I really wish I had the time back that I spent reading this trite piece of...
Worset movie ever. I can't stand this movie, it's one of the worset.The acting is horrible, it's dark, gloomy, and so boring.It's fun to watch and make fun of it, but thats about all. I do not recommend it, I would give it zero stars if it was possible.The child actress "mary" and then the older grown up "mary" actress isn't suitable, she doesn't even look like she could have been the same person or type, how awful!Watch another version, this one is a waste of time and money!
A Bit Disappointed. I have read several of Nicholas Sparks' books, but this one was different for me.  It was a very very slow start.  I was more than 150 pages into it before I got interested in the plot.  I had even considered quitting reading it at times.  It ended up being an okay story, but nothing that I couldn't have lived without reading.  What I did enjoy is the way Mr. Sparks writes about male characters in the romantic way women wish men really were.  I would suggest another read from Mr. Sparks like "The Notebook" or "The Wedding" if you want a good romantic read.
boring and inexact. the recipies in this book are plain and uninspired.  they are also inexact.  in the recipie for Tuna Noolde Casarole it calls for a bag of pasta.  What type of pasta? How big a bag.  I put a 1 lb bag of egg noodles in and tried to put it in the recomended size container, didn't fit.  The sauce is also not nearly enough for the quantity (if you use 1 lb of egg noodles)
Not for beginners. I am a beginner to real estate trying to understand pros and cons of real estate investment. I wanted a book which would explain me step by step on how I can start in a small way and grow big. This books starts big and talks about $2 million dollar investments. I do not want to take such a big step to begin my real estate investments. I would recommend reading 'How to Succeed and Make Money with your first rental house' for beginners in this business.This book is not worth reading even once
Better for a good laugh than anything..... Thankfully, I found this book at a secondhand store so I didn't pay much for it.  It is not worth the money.  Granted, there are a few good tips included but the really ridiculous, BAD tips FAR outweigh the good ones.  For example:-1- Budget for fresh flowers.  *Okay, not everyone can do this.  Some people have bills that need to be paid instead.*-2- Put a small refrigerator in your bedroom for chilled glasses and strawberries.  *If your house is too big to pop into the kitchen for these items, then you need a maid to BRING you chilled glasses.  Besides, honestly, who wants a refrigerator in the bedroom?  NOT ME!*-3-  She mentions that one of her friends leaves beef tips simmering on the stove in her apartment whilst she is at work.  *HELLO!  Fire hazard!*-4-  When she was sick with a "mild case of the flu" she got an armload of magazines and called the florist to have a hyacinth sent over.  *Must not have been very sick.  Forgive me for saying it but really, I have NEVER had a hyacinth sent over when I was sick and doubt that I ever will."-5-  Mark on your calendars to have your knives professionally sharpened twice a year.  *I'm doing good if I can remember to schedule to have my teeth cleaned twice a year.  Knives?  I don't think so!*On top of these and myriad other laughable "tips", she name-drops throughout.  "When I was so-and-so, in the luxurious hotel so-and-so, with Peter for relaxation and beauty" or "my actress friend, Mrs. X does so-and-so..."  I don't care where she has been or who her friends are.  I wanted nice, sensible tips for daily living that commoners (which I'm sure I would be in her eyes) could relate to.  I didn't find that here.She also goes onto a tangent about obesity in America in the bathroom section.  I have no idea where it came from but it really took up a lot of my reading time.  It was unnecessary and had NOTHING to do with how a bathroom could contribute to a beautiful life.  She really gets off course a lot.So, I won't be reading mine over or trying to sell it to anyone else.  I figure my copy will go straight to the trash, which, incidentally, is not a white wicker basket.
legalism to tha max. justifaction, santification and holiness, are all linked to one thing the finished work of christ. guys like this say we are justified by faith but were are pertty much on are own when it comes to living the life of a christian.1 the 5;23  eph 5;25 and many othe rscriptures state that we are present tense justified, santified and glotified. by any effort of our own. o foolish jerry who has bewiched you. you stated in the spirit are you made perfect by the flesh.surrendering of the will not will power is the key to the christians walk. only god is holy. how do we become holy, the same way the temple became holy Gods Spirit resided there, "whos temple you are." he says he tried the let go and let god method of holiness and failed, so it was false. he then says try his method but do not be discouraged by constant failures and setbacks. read hebrews 4 and do not try to do it but trust god and apprehend it for yourself. by faith and faith alone. brother stop laying burdends on others you yourself can not bear.
not very good... i've read close to 100 outlines on bible prophecy. 'watcher's a sincere but sadly poor guide. the information's winded. sorry marilyn hickey
WHY IS NEWT PERPETUATING THE "JESUS FREAK" CAUSE? OUR FOUNDING FATHERS WERE NOT CHRISTIANS!!!. This propaganda is by a guy who tried to impeach Clinton while he himself had an affair. On top of that, Gingrich tried to PASS A BILL THAT WOULD GIVE THE DEATH PENALTY TO POT SMOKERS (people who brought 40 grams of weed with them over the border - talk about crazy). This guy shouldn't be in politics - he should be in a Siberian Labor Camp. He, like all Christian Fundamentalists, should just take his bible and his 'lord baby jesus' and shove it deep up his a**, because the rest of the country really doesn't want to hear the bells of theocracy anymore. Do we really want to put our nation in the hands of this antiquated nihilistic Jesus myth? I think not.Again, this isn't the 'United States of Lord Baby Jesus,' and we as a nation should do everything in our power to prevent it from becoming so.It's also important to realize that OUR FOUNDING FATHERS WERE NOT CHRISTIAN. They were deists which is akin to today's agnosticism.George Washington's practice of Christianity was limited and superficial because he was not himself a Christian... He repeatedly declined the church's sacraments. Never did he take communion, and when his wife, Martha, did, he waited for her outside the sanctuary... Even on his deathbed, Washington asked for no ritual, uttered no prayer to Christ, and expressed no wish to be attended by His representative.HERE ARE SOME OF THE MANY ANTI-RELIGIOUS QUOTES BY OUR FOUNDING FATHERS:JOHN ADAMS - "This would be the best of all possible worlds, if there were no religion in it."- "The divinity of Jesus is made a convenient cover for absurdity. Nowhere in the Gospels do we find a precept for Creeds, Confessions, Oaths, Doctrines, and whole cartloads of other foolish trumpery that we find in Christianity."THOMAS JEFFERSON - "I do not find in orthodox Christianity one redeeming feature. They are all alike founded on fables and mythology."- "Christianity neither is, nor ever was, a part of the Common Law."BENJAMIN FRANKLIN - "Lighthouses are more helpful than churches."- "The way to see by faith is to shut the eye of reason."- "I looked around for God's judgments, but saw no signs of them."- "In the affairs of the world, men are saved, not by faith, but by the lack of it."THOMAS PAINE - "I do not believe in the creed professed by the Jewish Church, by the Roman Church, by the Greek Church, by the Turkish Church, by the Protestant Church, nor by any Church that I know of. My own mind is my own Church. Each of those churches accuse the other of unbelief; and for my own part, I disbelieve them all."- "All national institutions of churches, whether Jewish, Christian or Turkish, appear to me no other than human inventions, set up to terrify and enslave mankind, and monopolize power and profit."- "The study of theology, as it stands in the Christian churches, is the study of nothing; it is founded on nothing; it rests on no principles; it proceeds by no authority; it has no data; it can demonstrate nothing; and it admits of no conclusion."Save yourself the money and do the research yourself.THE PROPER ROLE OF A GOVERNMENT IS TO REMAIN AGNOSTIC.AND REMEMBER, OUR FOUNDING FATHERS DID NOT BELIEVE IN JESUS.
One of the worst novels I have finished this year. Maybe it is me but this novel was about as exciting as watching the grass grow.  It is the first mystery novel that I have read by a female author and I hope that it is not representative of the gender.  But, by the reviews here, all by women, I can see that Jance writes to that crowd.  Her readers seem to like being taken down the aimless boring pass of relationship drible. If you want to spend 10 pages with the main character sitting and talking about nothing in her mothers house or on her friends porch talking about their health than this book is for you.  It is amazing that Jance can start great with the murder scene and then 200 pages later start uncovering her first clue, the insulin bottle.  Jance gives no indication that Oak Vista or the stranded stranger are even remotely related to the story. Do not start this book it is absolutely a total waste of time.  If you want a good mystery read Coben, Crais, Patterson or Michael Connely
The protection of the Remnant. Petra of all places. Supernatural protection, persecution, on ad naseum. The one drug on, and on, and on,  and on ......Same tired story, persecution by Carpathia a lame attempt at evil incarnate and his lackies. Sorry..I think the series denegrates Christianity rather then exalting it.   I've read all 12 and found it morose and condemning. The opposite of how I view Christianity is.
Not Krentz's best!. I usually really enjoy Jayne Ann Krentz and her alter ego Amanda Quick, but I actually returned this one to the library unfinished. I found it boring and the whole dream reader concept to be unbelievable
Save your money. I have not read this book either and do you know what? - I've found that all the best book reviews at Amazon are written by people who never read the books that they were reviewing.I'll tell you what can happen when someone gets a book into Amazon: they get all their mates to speed-read their book and award it five stars and a glowing review. When the poor suckers like you and me buy the book we find that it's just another re-hash of the thousands of other money wasting books on investment and we've been conned again.IMHO these authors have no idea how to make money from investing. If they did, they would not be broadcasting their knowledge to the world; they would either be using that information themselves, or selling it to the king of Saudi Arabia or Bill Gates for millions of dollars so that he could make some serious profit from that knowledge.I'll tell you how to make money from investing: Buy a low cost index fund and hope that things go your way. If you get lucky you'll make money, if luck does not come your way then you won't. But buying investment advice books will get you nowhere fast IMHO and waste the money you spend on the books. If you want to learn about investing its all free on the Internet, so why buy books that are probably out of date when you get them anyway?I reckon that writing investment books is a racket. I've got boxes full of them and I read the first few pages of most of them and never read any more. Wow have I wasted money on books like this. No More! Joint my revolution and stop buying investment books.
Does not start the job well. This book does not do a good job of getting the small experiments running. And w/o that, it is difficult to get any handle over the big picture. If you haven't done XML and Oracle integration before, this book definitely is not what you are looking for.
An easy read to kill the time, but not much more. Reading Dark Harbor is like watching a mediocre TV show that you can't be bothered to turn off. I listened to Dark Harbor as an audio book, so I don't feel too badly about wasting my time on it because I `read it' while I was doing other things that had to be done anyway, like driving.If you are looking for something that feels fresh and new - Dark Harbor is not for you. This novel is about as innovative as an episode of Murder She Wrote. To illustrate: Stone Barrington and his cronies quickly deduce that an apparent suicide must have been a murder because the gun was found in the victim's wrong hand. (I think I actually saw that one on Murder She Wrote) Woods either can't be bothered to come up with a new idea or he simply doesn't care.It is clear early on who is responsible for the murders in Dark Harbor. This isn't because the clues come together in any logical way, but rather because of the predictable nature of the novel. You can just tell. This doesn't mean that the solution makes sense. In fact, there are huge inconsistencies in the plot that make the ending feel forced.It is as if Woods couldn't be bothered to think all of his plot lines through. Woods is compelled to include his regular characters in the novel even though they have little to do (except of course, to have sex with Stone). Holly barely says a word on her first trip to the island. On her second trip she has an obligatory romp with Stone and then gets kidnapped for the remainder of the novel.Why was she kidnapped? I don't think anyone - including Woods - can answer that question in any plausible way. My theory is that Woods needed to work Holly into the plot and decided that putting her in peril would allow him to fill a few pages. It also allowed him to include Holly's dad (another regular character) in her search. Wood's motive seems obvious. The kidnapper's motive however isn't - her kidnapping makes no sense. But clearly this was something Woods didn't think was worth worrying about.The best I can say about this novel is that it is a quick easy read (of course, in my case it was read to me). It may not be worth the time and trouble to actually read (and certainly not to buy) - but as an audio book from the library (with a limited selection of audio books to choose from) it helped me pass the time in traffic.
very dissapointing. I was very dissapointed in this book the only good story was Sherrilyn Kenyon's and it was far too short!I was really looking forward to this book and was extreamly dissapointed
Many important topics not discussed. This is supposed to be a concise book, but it sadly does not tackle the most practical aspects that are needed for front-liners.Example: when talk on amputee, prefers to talk on amputee gait instead of practical things like how to improve stump, how to deal with troubles with doning or doffingExample: when talk about SCI, not even mention let alone discuss very important topics like bowel problems & sexual problems these young patients haveExample: when talk about pain, not even touch upon the topic of centralization, let alone discussing how to treat. The discussion on CRPS not up-to-datePoor Buy, good alone for junior medical student
Okay, but there are better books out there. If you get this book, do so for one of two reasons:1)You want entertaining tidbits about weird stuff2)You already own everything else Randi's writtenThis book simply pales in comparison the the Skeptic's Dictionary (available free online) when it comes to debunking a wide range of paranormal claims.  In fact, I'm not sure if there's any good debunking in there.  If you want to read about the akashic memory and various forms of flat-earthism, this books if for you.  I suppose its nice to have someone who can provide entertaining tidbits in a non-credulous manner, but I wonder it would be better just to buy a believer's encyclopedia and ignore the fact that the author believes the things he's talking about
Boring. Don't get me wrong, I do enjoy Card's writing, especially his, uh, "Enderverse".  I loved Ender's Game, I absolutely adored Speaker for the Dead, I'm reading Xenocide and I love what I've read, and I liked Ender's Shadow.I don't like Shadow of the Hegemon though.It's nothing but boring, long and tedious talk about...politics.  Also, Card doesn't seem to understand how much the world would have changed in 200 years.  I don't know, I seem to like Card better when he's writing about philosophy, not politics
Don't expect much~. This book is the first one you will reach for if it is your first pregnancy. Save your cash and get it from the library. Then read something that expects you to be a thinking woman, not a child taking orders or information without question. If you want to go through pregnancy, labor and birth, and have no say at all or learn anything useful, then stick with this book; i.e., go to the hospital, have an epidural, episiotomy, then finally the c-section that 'must' have been necessary, this is it.Beyond that, read Ina May Gaskins, Henci Goer, the Sears' books, and "Childbirth Without Fear." Read a broader selection - many of which you can also get from a library or spend a night thumbing through at a bookstore.  I am a mother of 4; have had healthier, more positive birth experiences than anyone I know. This book is misleading and negative.Make it the joyful event you deserve
Really lousy attempt at depth and humor. This is the kind of garbage they teach you to write in college--imitations of what's on the shelf right now, only "smarter," which really just means "condescending to those not born with a silver spoon in ultrawhite Marin County." But you shouldn't be surprised--the authoress also writes a blog which is just as bloated with self-absorption (even if she wants to pretend this is a novel: novels have PLOTS, honey). Bypass this and read some Dorothy Parker instea
Very Basic Info. Wow.  This basically boiled down to a waste of about ( ) of the book's purchase price.  Before you buy, beware.  This would probably be a good book for you if you are just out of school or are just getting started in &quot;the biz&quot;. However, as an experienced musician who thought this  title might provide some helpful marketing tips and ideas, I was very  disappointed.  Its extremely basic.   Also, Weissman's idea of what  constitutes a local music market seems to be off as well-I would consider  Boston, or Portland or any of these cities major metropolitan areas-- not  just New York, LA, Nashville and Chicago.  At least 2 chapters are wasted  on the history of the music scenes of some cities, including those I just  mentioned-- how is this important to you if you live in a small  Metropolitan area, such as Harrisburg, where I'm at?  Also, as a former  Boston resident, I don't think Weissman really does the city's scene  justice-- major acts besides New Kids on the Block have been broken out of  Beantown-- look no farther than the Mighty Mighty Bosstones or Aerosmith.  However, there was some interesting, albeit vague, info about the Union,  Grants, and Artist in Residence programs. I would think that someone with  the qualifications of Weissman would be able to offer much more specified  info instead of vague statements such as &quot;Try to set up a meeting with  the Creative Director of an Ad Agency&quot;.  But, then again, maybe its  supposed to be more of an overview kinda book. If you're just getting  started, this might be a good book for you.  If you're out there doing it  full time, look elsewhere- there's not much I got out of this book
Tiresome recap of an exhaustive list of life events. President Clinton's autobiography reads as a near endless series of events rehashed from his diaries.  It frequently appears as though the brief, daily notes and events were simply written into complete sentences with some emotion or perspective added.  It does provide an extensive recap of President Clinton's life events, so if that's of interest you may want to check it out
For those who like this kind of book... If you think you'd find a lot of unrelated platitudes interesting, then you'll enjoy this book.
Avoid if you have a working brain... Actually, I would give this "book" NO STARS, but there's no tab for that.Let's begin with the title to Chapter 29: "Who Needs N*ggers?". I asterisked that so it wouldn't get edited out - he of course spells it out. That should pretty much wrap up the essence of this fabulistic screed of pseudoscience, limp-wristed white racism, anti-semitism and a surprising anti-Christianity. This epistle to the mindless is at least written so that its target audience can read it: it is an endless series of single paragraphs. I am presuming this is so it can be read with one's finger pointing out each word, and thankfully for that same audience there aren't any big words, either.If, as a previous "reviewer" said this is "the second greatest book ever written", obviously that Dick and Jane reader was the only other book they ever read - and slowly at that. What "white man's bible" seems to mean - not to give away anything important - is that the existing bible is too "polluted" with Jews. What a briliantly racist revelation! Or is that Revelation? The only other major criticism is that the paper is too stiff to replace that Sears catalog that's hanging in the outhouse..
I disliked Anna. I can actually understand Morvan's character better given the 14th century backdrop of this novel. However, Anna sounded more like a 21st century feminist to me. She did not sound very genuine for a woman in that period. I wish Madeline had never written this book, given that this is the only one of her 11 novels (if I remember the number correctly) that I had to put down before reaching the end. I just could not take the characters, mainly Anna. However, I loved to see David drop by :)..Rags
Don't waste your money. First, it took forever to get this book shipped and then when I did receive it - what a disappointment.  Most of the photos are poor, lots of "noise" in most enlargments - which is very surprising for "Life".  Second, there is very little written information.
Not What I thought. As a student starting law school I thought that this book would give me an advantage in my legal research and writing class, boy was  wrong... The book is full of useful information but none that realy pertains to law student. It is however, very basic in its approach and gives you a good start, so it is not a total waste.., The subtitle says that the book is for "non-lawyers", as if somewhere out there is a person who is not a lawyer and finds legal research fun. my recomendation is, that if you want a brief explanation of legal research and how to do it so that you are not totaly lost when you start law school this is a good book, but if you need it for some legal purpose and you are not a law student call a lawyer, trust me it is well worth the fees. Among the books flaws is that it tells you where to go to get the information but neglects to tell you that the resources they list, in the case of Lexis-Nexis and West Law require very expensive memberships and that most Law Schools restrict the use of their Law Library to students in their Law School and do not even allow students from the affiliated university to use the Law Library, as the Law Students in attendence at the law school require all of the resources of the Library and Legal Librarian ad nauseum and outsiders are most unwelcome.
a cynical author who hates animals. I decided to give this book a chance, but wish I hadn't. The author has a hateful attitude toward animals that is simply offensive.  That, combined with his extreme cynicism, really prevented me from enjoying the book. Not recommended
Lacking Insight. If you're lookiing for valuable insight into how great businesses were conceived and executed this is not the book for you. Each business is given only a few pages of what essentially amounts to fluff. Most of the information is anecdotal in nature and rarely goes beyond the sort of superficial treatment one might get in People magazine. The articles reminded me of something a high school student might turn in as a short essay assignment. The roster of companies chosen is rather suspect. There is disproportionate representation by the cosmetics and fashion industries. I think that every company that sells makeup is covered here. Many of the other selections are some of the more glamorous and obvious success stories. C'mon, we ALL know the MicroSoft story by now. I was also puzzled by the lack of variety in the writing. Time and time again profit is referred to as "turnover", going public is referred to as "floating", a line of products is called a "range" -- was this book edited? I cannot recommend this book for business persons. It may be appropriate for a young person who has not been exposed to these canned legends before.
dont buy. My goodness this book droned on and on about belonging and longing without any real wisdom coming through. I will never buy a book again because someone else said it was good I lost money on this one
Ultimately simplistic. This book has its good points. The editorial review mentions "dynamism," and the lectures are certainly that. Also, when the review argues that this book is a sort of "manifesto" of the author's vision, I wholeheartedly agree. It is nice to read a coherent perspective on writing and the process of artistic creation from a writer that does not sacrifice passion for some kind of mechanistic clarity or something of the sort.However, the ideas are ultimately simplistic. I would even argue that they are harmful ideas if not taken with a grain of salt. I, for one, stop trusting anyone who begins to put a limit on what writing can be. Writing is feelings not thoughts. This is literature, this is non-literature. That sort of thinking. It is another situation where an author has wrestled with himself and the establishment to find a unique voice, but who after becoming "legitimate" would like to close the door on what other voices might sound like. And it doesn't come as any surprise to me that Butler, in his picture of what good literature is composed of, manages to overlook a dimension missing from his own works (let's call it an artistic blindspot.)I think Robert Olen Butler is a very good writer. Particularly in the short story form, he has achieved some moments of brilliance and excellence. But his short stories read like long prose poems. And when he tries to lengthen or elaborate them, they fall apart under their own weight. This is why his books or novella-length works do not operate as well. When I compare his works to those of a greater writer (say, a William Faulkner, a Joseph Conrad, a Henry Miller, a Norman Mailer--and that's no mean company I'm putting him in), I find that what is missing is the intellect (but writers "are not intellectuals"!) Yes, there's a dimension of ideas that exists in all of those authors' works that is missing in Butler's works. His argument, of course, is that that dimension doesn't exist for any purpose but to illuminate some system of emotions that is in play within the work, that a work is ultimately only for the expression of some unique emotion. It doesn't surprise me, then, that his work is exceptionally powerful in one direction, but it falls flat in a number of other ways.His most successful work, A Good Scent from a Strange Mountain, benefitted greatly from its timely political setting and topic. In a sense, Butler could do what he does best, simply represent the emotional movement of characters, and the profundity of the period and the larger issue at stake helped to make up for and in some ways substitute for the lack of this other dimension.In any case, for a new writer to take Butler's ideas in this book as gospel would be to limit him or herself greatly. An older writer could probably better benefit from the collected lectures. A pleasant enough read if you remember to hold it at arm's length and to eye it critically. No, I wouldn't say this author has found the way.
Great Marble Ilustrations, but try and find the description!. This book has fabulous marble illustrations, but absolutely no cross-referencing so a user can look up the description of the marble pictured. The author pre-supposes you are an expert and know what marble  maker and type you are looking for. Illustrations are grouped together in  one section of the book and each is identified only by the auction number  and lot number it came from. Unfortunately, the descriptions of these  marbles are not in the same order. Descriptions are ordered by marble  manufacturer and type of marble.  Even then, the auction numbers within the  types are random.  The book is only useful if you know what kind of marble  you have and want to see what some similar marbles by the same manufacturer  sold for. It bogles the imagination to understand why any sensible editor  would not cross index this publication, so a person finding a marble they  like in the illustrations, can then go read the description. It could take  you a week to find the matching description.  The sad thing is, that data  was readily available to the author and the illustrations could have been  keyed in a day! Worst example of editorship I have ever seen! Totally  clueless! They never thought about, or cared, how a person might try to use  the book. Save your money!  I wish I had
Can we give 0 stars?. After seeing Ted nearly amputate his own leg on TV while cutting down a sapling that a boy scout could've cut down with a Gerber camp axe, I have decided to dismiss Teddie as a bombastic nutjob who will, in the end, be a caustic detriment to the TRUE culture of sportsmen in America.  Oh God no!  I'm starting to sound like him now!  The near amputation actually was the beginning of the slide for me.  Reading his article in American Hunter of Dec 2005 and then re-reading this book actually sealed the deal.  Ted is not the epitome of true sportsmen!  It was bad enough watching Kerry drag around geese that had been dead for a week during election time to try to gain the Duck's Unlimited vote but watching Ted do anything in the name of modern sportsmen is just as bad.  How can Ted's actions help our image?  There's an old saying in the South: An empty can rattles the most.  Holds true for Ted
Not-So-Real Stews. This book reveals just how precious and convoluted the process of cooking has become for the self-consciously culinarily sophisticated. As a previous reviewer has mentioned, many of its recipes require obscure ingredients or time consuming procedures which when closely examined would appear to have been included for the sake of sheer novelty. Case in point: the author asks the cook in several of the recipes to braid a "rope" from flour and water which is then placed inside the lid of the cooking pot, ostensibly as a seal. After cooking, this "rope" is discarded. Since most well-made casserole dishes or large stewpots include tight-sealing lids, this extra maneuver can only be viewed as the sort of one-upsmanship beloved by upscale cooks with too much time on their hands. Likewise, complex steps such as rendering one's own lard (which the author requires the cook to do in more than one recipe) or tracking down expensive, obscure spices which will in all likelihood be used only once, and then in minute quantity, simply do not justify the time or effort involved. The basic idea of a stew is to create a tasty, satisfying one-pot meal from available ingredients. When it takes weeks to assemble the ingredients and more than a day to prepare the dish, somebody is definitely missing the point.Another problem with "Real Stews" is its seeming obsession with the exotic over the familiar. All cultures have delicious culinary traditions -- well, at least most of them do -- but to insist that American cooks precisely duplicate the ingredients and cooking conditions necessary for ethnic verisimilitude smacks of snobbery at best and condescension at worst. A little more emphasis on user-friendly and, dare it be said, familiar recipes would have made this book considerably more useful. As it is, for most home cooks, it's likely to gather considerable dust.
for the coffee table, not the kitchen. I got this as a gift from my son, since I had just visited Tuscany last year and loved the food. I am an experienced gourmet cook. This book needed a test kitchen in the worst way. I tried two recipes: one for polenta (as basic as pasta) and a Garbanzo bean bread. The proportions for both were totally wrong. The polenta balled up in the pan, and the "flat bread" was like a soft egg dish. I checked in one of my favorite chef cookbooks (Sheila Lukins of Silver Palate fame) and the proportions were very different for the polenta. the other recipe couldn't find anywhere. I'm donating this one to the library for the Friends of the Library sale.
An interesting... something. Someone should really recommend a dictionary in addition to this book.Words like 'dearth', 'didactically', 'enantiomorph', 'cancan', 'croon', 'corporeal koan', 'cachet', and 'largess', just to name a few, are completely unnecessary. Rewrite this book in ENGLISH and I may just take another look at it.From the small bit I was able to understand through this screen of nonsense, there is only a minimal amount of real content to be gained. Takarazuka is a fascinating aspect of Japanese culture, and I was greatly disappointed by this book.The author's first mistake seems to have been to take on too big of a task. The chapters do not connect with each other. And there is a general failure to trace various aspects of the theatre either from or two underlying Japanese cultural ideas.A simple way to start such an investigation would be to write about which roles the (female) audience identifies with, is it the otokoyaku (men played by women) who caresses the happy blonde haired female? Or do they imagine themselves as the women who are seduced on stage by the otokoyaku? Does it matter which they identify with? Answers to questions even as simple as this one are never addressed in the text.The whole time I read this book I felt as though the author was just trying to disguise the fact that she really doesn't have anything at all important to say, even after a decade of research.If you're linguistically inclined, you may want to give it a try.  But it doesn't seem likely that there's much of importance here
This book is not worth the paper it's printed on!!!. This book should get 0 stars; speaking as an artist myself, the theories laid out in this book are ridiculous. The basic gist of the argument seems to be that the work completed by the old masters was just too difficult to have been done without the use of optics, etc. To me it sounds like the desperate argument of a man who did not have either the talent or the determination to attain the skill of a great master, and therefore spent years constructing an elaborate excuse.Admittedly, I could not even finish this book; after reading for the nth time a line of shaky, circumstantial evidence like "all artists know that the ellipse of that collar is very difficult to draw, but there are no correction marks, therefore optics must have been used," I could not even stand to keep reading! On the contrary, all artists who have spent time and dilligent effort in becoming technically skilled know that although that ellipse may be difficult, after a few years of daily drawing and painting it becomes second nature, and could very well be drawn naturally with minimal correction.That is just one example... the book is filled with flaky examples such as those - Hockney claiming "this is too good to have been done without optics" or "this was too difficult to have been done without optics" - and I found myself thinking over and over that the man simply must not have been disciplined enough in his own art, if that is indeed what he thinks. And, modern artists must remember this: nowadays, the work of the old masters seems very difficult because in modern times artists get nothing like the education or practice time had by the old artists, for many reasons. Superior art education is very hard to find, and there are many distractions in the modern world (TV, computers, having to hold a 'day job', lack of patrons, etc.) and therefore modern artists usually lack discipline and do not live and breath art in quite the same way that the old masters did. Therefore, most will never attain the skill of the old masters. But that is certainly no reason to assume that the old masters could not have done what they did without the help of technology!Some of the other examples used as 'evidence' refer to 'odd' proportion, perspective, etc. in otherwise masterful work. I am surprised that this author (and those readers who are artists) apparently does not realize that throughout history, great artists did NOT necessarily strive for EXACT realism - even nowadays, photorealism is not necessarily considered great art by many artists, because after all we are ARTISTS not cameras! The point of realist art is to ACCENTUATE the reality, not to copy it! Therefore, many inconsistencies in proportion, perspective, etc. evident in old masters' work are not 'oddities' or 'mistakes', but purposeful exaggerations or adjustments to benefit the composition.All that being said, I think this book may even be harmful to the budding artist, since it may cast doubt in the mind of the art student that he or she can build the skill necessary to paint in a masterful way without the help of 'trickery' or technology of some sort. Instead, an art student should be encouraged to build skill, discipline, and self-reliance - because THAT is the true secret of the great masters
Johansen is obsessed with showers. The characters in this book are forever taking showers.  When they're not taking showers, they are either planning to take a shower, wishing they could take a shower, or telling each other to take a shower.Why in the world does she make the main character, Kate, a scant *29* years old??  It's ridiculous.  Not only does she have an MD, she has at least one PhD.  And she has managed to reach the top of her field by 29.  But wait, there's more!  She also, during all this achievement, managed to squeeze out a baby at the tender age of TWENTY, and then raise it.  Uh huh.Why does Johansen not just make Kate 39, and be a bit more realistic on all counts?  There is a hint early on when Kate muses that Benny, her ex-husband's new girlfriend, is only 23, which makes her so much more attractive than elderly Kate.  ARGH! Clearly, Johansen does not think a woman can be attractive at the advanced age of 39.  *snore*  How ridiculous
Let's get real. This is the kind of art that show me the power of fiction over reality. Why did he use those sizes? Wow! Did you see them? I do have fantasies but come on! Let's get real. Real guys with real dimensions. No more no less,  that's the beauty of life
Poor scholarship. I have often enjoyed this author's work; however, this time I believe that the author uses her evangelical Christianity to mask unexamined prejudices. I believe that, in this book, the author uses holy scripture and psuedo-intellectual gloss rather than rigorous scholarship to discuss race, gender, sexuality and the church. I find her arguments on sexuality shamefully dismissive. I hope that the author will reconsider this work
Terrible Book. Oh my, all the terrible reviews for this book are true!!  Ms. Steel is excessively repetitive....I mean EXCESSIVE.  Ms. Steel goes into too much background on the characters way too early in the book...and she continues to repeat this information over and over and over and over...you get the picture.  I too found myself saying, "Okay, we get it already..."  I also agree with one of the reviewers who mentioned the bonding experience the men had.  I don't know the men Ms. Steel knows and hangs out with, but she had these me talking about their feelings with each other, as well as how their dysfunctional pasts had affected them.  Oh please, no man on earth talks that way.  Especially to other men.  This book is completely aweful.  The plot is so slow and does not grab the readers attention.  I have read many of Ms. Steel's books and I believe this one is her worst.  I have now started reading Sandra Brown and she is sooo much better.  I recommend "The Alibi."  So far that has been my favorite by her.  She has mystery, suspense, romance...  Her words are so much more descriptive and interesting than Ms. Steels.  To sum it up, I was completely disappointed with the book "Toxic Bachelors."  I highly recommend Sandra Brown, she is a much better author
Highbrow Negotiation Techniques. Although I admire Howard Raiffa's book Smart Choices, this book doesn't appeal me at all. I felt his approach to negotiation too theoretical and extremely difficult to apply to real life issues. As one of the other  reviewers states correctly, the book is rather for students of negotiation.  I do much more prefer Getting to Yes, which sets an easy framework for  approaching negoatiation
not really what i wanted. i was kind of disappointed in this book.  the format was really neat, but i thought i would really love it and it was just okay.  there weren't any recipes that sounded good to me or contained nuts to which i am allergic.  i returned this book - it just wasn't for me
a waste of paper. I thought this book was very unrealistic and insulting,for one thing the girl's name is spelt wrong.i had trouble finishing off the book because it was so boring overall I thought this book was a waste of paper
too much ego. For someone who has spent so much time ostensibly obliterating his ego, Pinchbeck uses the words "I, me, and mine" with surprising frequency.  "Breaking Open the Head" was a brave and well-told story, and Pinchbeck does have great skill at telling the tales of his own adventures down the rabbit hole.  He is, at his best, a journalist with a skill for wrapping his own experience into fascinating questions.But 2012 is a disorganized, rambling repeat of many of the delightful "Breaking Open" tales with some vague and poor attempts at analyzing and synthesizing "scholarly" information about the upcoming apocalypse, mysticism, crop circles, and psychedelics.2012 left me with the nagging, slightly sticky feeling that Pinchbeck was not a wide-eyed explorer of consciousness, but rather a rich Manhattan art world brat (his description of walking around Berlin in the rain is particularly indicative) who left his wife and daughter in pursuit of the End of the World Party complete with as much free sex and intoxication as he could afford.  Rock star or mystic?  Free thinker or man trapped by his own pursuit of What Is Cool?After bushwacking through the crop circle revelations and the mysteries of the modern calendar, 2012 settles upon and rediscovers - or discovers, as Pinchbeck seems to believe - the complex world of non-monogamy.  He declares that the polyamorists among us are more emotionally evolved and free, and uses this thin, tired excuse to treat women with great disrespect.  One wonders if the feminine principle Pinchbeck claims to value includes women over 40, mothers, and women who choose celibacy as a spiritual pursuit.Pinchbeck pays a great deal of lip service to the necessity of compassion and community, but all his stories are about skipping from country to country, enjoying himself at Burning Man, exploring the jungles of priestesses and princesses...all quite selfish pursuits.  If his compassion is so great, why doesn't he write about his volunteer work with the poor?  The hungry?  The disabled?  The unhip, unwashed masses?  I finished the book realizing that it doesn't make as good or salable a story to spend your time with those members of your community, that Pinchbeck's fans would much rather read about the heartfelt, wacky hijinks of the Man Who Would Be Terrence McKenna.Leave yourself entertained and intruigued by "Breaking Open the Head", and forget the ego of "2012"
DO A GOOGLE SEARCH FIRST. Before you buy this book cut/paste the following words into a Google search:"Hank Hanegraaff" financialThen come back to this review.It makes me weap to see Christian ministries misuse God's money. My advice?  If you really MUST read this book, buy it USED so the money goes to a struggling book seller.
"Dear god please think of the Children" or "Falafel.". Amazon truly did you all a favor by mercifully offering you an excerpt of ten whole pages of Mr. O'Reilly's book. This was a luxury I was not given, and now I can't help but feel it's too late for my poor soul. I stomached the whole enchilada, and I warn you this is one Mexican (or wet-back, as Mr. O'Reilly ocassionally refers to people of Mexican origin) dish you do NOT wish to tackle. The first ten pages alone tell you exactly what kind of person Bill O'Reilly is. It is obvious that this iteration of this children's edition of his wildly  asinine "The O'Reilly Factor" is just another attempt to gouge his enamored viewers for more money. This book offers no real advice that cannot be already garnored by the occasional disney channel blurb or the elusive "common sense." It takes him two precious pages to explain to his obviously mentally ill readers that "real friends" are not anything like those on the show "Friends." Being a fan of the show I have to agree with O'Reilly, but then I'd be forced to ask "What the hell Bill?!" He recently settled a lawsuit pressed against him for a rumored $10 million by a Ms. Mackris for sexual harassment. He attempts to teach our children about sex, but is himself a barely disguised chauvenist and borderline deviant. His previous "The O'Reilly Factor" has it's own section on sex. Here he shows just how little respect for woman and boastfully describes many of his "sexual conquests." In his fiction novel "Those Who Tresspass" he self inserts himself as an irresistable and dangerous womanizer. Feel free to use the main character in this novel as a personality guide for O'Reilly himself. He is desperately and consistently seeking admiration from his audience. It's both sad and sickening. He barely alludes to his "rambunctious" childhood misadventures with his friends, trying to pass by his readers what he "learned" from those experiences. However, both his massively (depressingly) popular cable "news" show and his series of near toxic books reveal a man borderline insane. He's rediculously angry at the most obnoxiously inane things, a chronic liar, and has the memory span of an 80 year old hamster with alzheimers. He will literally make points in this book and provide evidence that counters his own argument. His show is no different. He will make wildly offensive comments. When his callers call him up on it, he has his chronies "replay the tape." Of course, in the year 2006 we are completely unable to actually replay this tape on modern television for viewers, as you can see when his chronies shout back off camera a completely different statement. He has never apologized for his actions, only grunting with simian aggression and angrily moving on to the next segment. This man cannot hold multiple marriages, yet he attempts to teach children about relationships. Mr. O'Reilley is to televised journalism what pornography is professional photography. Any person who truly consider themselves a conservative should be horrified by how he represents the demographic. A recent example is of a jewish man who called into his show to make his case that having Christmas during school as he grew up made him feel uncomfortable because he felt constantly pressured to be more Christian. O'Reilly responded by telling the man that if he didn't want to live in a Christian nation he should move to Israel. Any truly religious person whether Christian, Muslim, Jewish, or Buddhist should find a comment like this wildly offensive. Well, perhaps the Buddhists will let that one go. In a country where religious freedom is one of it's main tenets, perhaps O'Reilly would be advised to know that a marginal amount of secularism in public and government institution is necessary for religious freedom. The founding fathers considered religion a largely personal matter, as did Jesus. "Render unto Caesar's what is Caesar's."But I digress. As several reviewers before me have already stated, their is no real advice to be taken from these pages. It is a shameless attempt to slip into his fans' pocketbooks. Please do not support Bill O'Reilly. He is a hack journalist. He does not cite sources, and he both dilberately and unknowingly misinterprets data graphs. His debates are nothing more than one sided scream fests where the slightest hint of losing is barbarically avoided by screaming to his producers: "CUT THE MIC!" He is just one more piece of evidence that the FOX News Channel can take any angry, opinionated moron and turn them into a popular "media icon." This man is literally a danger to our country. Please do not endanger your children as well. The chances of accidental death are marginally better bringing a handgun into the home than "The O'Reilly Factor for Kids." He lowers political commentary to the standards of Jerry Springer. He may be loud and entertaining, but he is also manipulative and not very good at hiding it. Please Factor fans, attempt to see what a horrible man he really is when you ignore this review and read through these demonic pages. Consider this a review for each of his nonfiction books, as I have read them all and each is written in progressively poorer quality.
soldier-poet wannabe. This book has a great cover and not much else. If the actual combat could be condensed into a smaller book, it would be about 15 pages long. Unfortunately, one has to painfully sift through some pretty bad prose or attempted poetry. He's like the Bonnie Parker of the German Army. His references or image to us wearing a mask were so redundant I could have screamed. I'd bet he used the "mask" image no less than 20 times, and in a small book that's 19 times too many. I only wish it could have been a true combat memoir and not a failed attempt at a Hemingway/Sasoon legacy. I truely wish for his sake that something better did book-wise come from his experiences.
[Misrepresented]. This book was not written by Hayek. It was written by editor and confidant W.W. Bartley when Hayek was sick and incapacitated. The only parts written by Hayek were just random notes that only show up in the appendices
High expectations, bitter disappointment. As a prospective Brittany owner I have been researching the breed for about 6 months and from the outside, &quot;Living with Brittanys:A Survival Guide&quot; seemed like it would provide me with the essential information I needed to decide whether the breed was right for me.  Sadly, I was bitterly disappointed.  &quot;Living with Brittanys&quot; is a frustratingly OVER-descriptive, self indulgent short story that actually made me angry in parts because of it's non-relevance to the subject matter.  The story itself could have been about ANY dog and I learned all I needed to know in the last two pages through a bullet pointed list of common brittany traits.  I wish I had saved both my money and time
Check this book out of your public library. White author Andrew Hacker mercilessly flays Whites and shamelessly sucks up to Blacks. 'Two Nations' is for Whites who want to feel guilty about being White, and Blacks who want to blame their troubles on Whites. For  people truly interested in race and culture, I recommend buying Thomas  Sowell's 'Race and Culture' . . . and returning this book to your public  library
A Failure of Nerve?. Yes, there are worthwhile portions of this book, such as the author's dissection of some of the idiocies of "free market capitalism" and the "children of Abraham." Nevertheless, the book could have been so much better.First, I must heartily agree with those who have criticized the book's poor organization. Where was/were the editor(s)?Second, the book does go on at unnecessary length about Princess Diana. Furthermore, although Wheen is certainly aware of "Mother Teresa," who died days after Princess Diana, he gives Ma T (who is, as far as I'm concerned, one of the most over-rated public figures of the 20th century) no more than a passing mention. Now Ma T is a subject ripe for the sort of treatment the author gives to Princess Diana. However, not a word about Ma T's grotesque warehouses of the sick and dying, not a word about the vast sums of money and other contributions collected by her organizations that were obviously not actually used, and not a word about her perverse ideas on suffering, for example: "I think it is very beautiful for the poor to accept their lot, to share it with the passion of Christ. I think the world is being much helped by the suffering of the poor people."Third, although Wheen does deal to some extent with the anti-scientific fraud of Creationism (he doesn't give it enough attention, in my opinion), he does not deal with the "Shroud of Turin".Fourth, the relatively few pages on "right-wing conspiracy theories" seem like lip service. There is so much more that he could have mentioned. He could have mentioned that the Birchers still would have us believe that President Ike was a "conscious agent of the Communist conspiracy." He could have mentioned the persistent efforts to (ahem) whitewash slavery (part of the heinous liberal plot to defame the white, Christian South). Recently, one of those efforts, the booklet "Southern Slavery as it Was" found itself into classes at Cary Christian School in Cary, NC. He could have mentioned the ongoing attempts to promote the obvious lie that large numbers of Americans were being held prisoner by Vietnam for years after the return of the POWs, and that there was an elaborate government coverup to hide the existence of these prisoners. You can still find assertions that there are still US prisoners in Vietnam. He could have mentioned those things and many others, but he did not.Finally, he seems afflicted with the "Must Have BALANCE!" disease that crops up in so many pundits. Hence the section devoted to the crimes of various (gasp) heinous leftoids. Much of this section verges on being outright ridiculous. For example, he goes into high dudgeon over the dastardly anti-Americanism of Noam Chomsky, who, among other crimes, was insufficiently critical of the Khmer Rouge. Wheen conveniently fails to mention that the US government, for no discernible reason than to spite the government of Vietnam, *who were the ones who overthrew the Khmer Rouge*, "...became tacit supporters, for nearly a decade, of the Khmer Rouge, despite their murderous regime. The United States government continued to recognize the ousted regime as the legitimate occupants of Cambodia's seat in the United Nations" (Arnold R. Isaacs in _Vietnam Shadows_). Most of that period occurred during *Republican* governments in the US, but it wouldn't be convenient to acknowledge that. Wheen also gets self-righteous about something Michael Moore (a favorite whipping boy of American Fascists and their useful idiots) wrote that is obviously a comment on the savagely murderous absence of any sort of selectivity in (...)choice of targets. Wheen conveniently neglects to mention that Ann Coulter openly expressed the wish that the planes had hit the New York Times. Coulter has also openly advocated the persecution of "liberals". In fact, *far* more prevalent and dangerous than any heinous leftoids are the legions of poison-pen and poison-tongue right-wing propagandists, backed by vast amounts of right-wing money, who constantly dump their raw sewage into American society. No, it wouldn't do at all to acknowledge that particular unpleasant truth about "life in these United States." This books's glaring faults significantly outweigh its small virtues, in my opinion
I Agree With The Others. I defenitly agree with all of the others. Some of the stories were good... Like 3 or 4... the Sarah Dessen one, Sarah Mylnowksi one, Sonya Sones and Megan McCafferty's own also the Interview one and maybe one or two others. Others were complete and utter crap. Like others said... sometimes i didnt even know if the characters were girls or boys and some of them were just plain wierd. I recommend borrowing it from the library and reading only the stories you want... this isnt a good book to read cover to cover. I guess ive lost so respect for Megan McCafferty on this one. This is defenitely not a good present for a soon to be sixteen year old
Underwater close encounter of the boring kind. This 1987 thriller focuses on Norman Johnson, a psychologist who specializes in large disasters like plane crashes.  As the novel opens he is being taken to an undisclosed site by the US Navy.  Johnson learns that the crash site is located 1000 feet under the South Pacific and the craft is some sort of a space craft.  He was been included because of work he did sometime before organizing a first contact team for a previous administration, an assignment that Johnson would just as soon forget.Once the team is taken to the Navy deep sea facility and begins to study the craft Johnson begins to find disturbing circumstances - that the Navy commander has been less than honest with both the team and his superiors and that the craft itself bears a remarkable similiarity to current human technology, labels and directions are even written in English, leading the team to question just how alien this technology really is.  The suspense continues to build as the undersea facility loses their support ships above due to inclement weather and then conditions in the facility itself begins to turn hostile.This novel is quite predictable, just a few pages into the story it is obvious to anyone who has ever seen a disaster movie that there will be no comforting support ships nearby, that the undersea environment will become threatening, there will be many deaths, there will be sexual tension between the hero and someone else and so on.  While there is some slight redemption in the last few pages this book is a big disappointment, Crichton is capable of so much more.  If you are a fan read it but be forewarned, if you are unfamiliar with his work begin with anything but this.
The writing never really comes together... This is a collection of short stories revolving around the new founder of her own detective agency.  The book spends a fair amount of time on local color.  The mysteries, if you can call them that, are light weight.  There's nothing wrong with any of that, often I want a light read, but there were two big factors that I could not get around that make me give a one star rating.First, the people in Botswana are presented very negatively, and the men are even worse than the women.  Maybe most Botswanans truly are self-centered bastards, but I found that too hard to believe.  (Even so, I could accept that depiction in a hard-boiled detective book, but this is more of a sunny-side-up book.)Second, the author keeps presenting contradictory pictures of the characters, particularly the main character.  In one story she is shown as exceptionally honest, while most other stories show her freely lying.  In one story she says she would never commit a crime, and in another story she steals a car.  In one story she is attracted to a man who beats and rapes her, in some stories she has no interest in any man, and in one story she is attracted to an apparently nice man.  I kept asking myself if the author was trying to make some point by these contradictions, but I couldn't discern any theme and came to believe it was simply poor writing
Pass on this one. It's not just algebra, there is some statistics also. For the most part not well layed out. I would pass on this one
this book is garbage. i had to rate this book one star because there was no "ZERO"!  This book is complete garbage and the worst investment you can make to start your investment career.  There are other books on investing in this series, which do an incredible job for beginners.  Even the resource centers at any decent online broker has better information for you than this book has and the links won't go bad
NOT a history book!!. This book should be placed in the historical fiction section.  It is NOT a history book! The author was so skewed and biased that it was laughable.  I would not recommend that this book be used for any serious history class.  His portrayal of the Roman Catholic Church was very biased as he narrated his own perspective on history. It was hard to take him very seriously because of his own personal prejudices.  Homeschoolers beware
A lot of pages with little to say. In all, I think this story could have been written in about ten pages in The New Yorker, or some publication like that. Mr. Sierra simply took too long to get to his point and rambled about topics not relevant to the crux of his book. Because it was originally published in Spanish, part of me wonders how much was lost in the translation. Then again, that would only account for a better read, not a better plot
Disorganized. I found this book to be poorly written and disorganized. It also mentions some products in general terms but never tells what the products are
Throwing the baby out with the bath water... This book makes some decent statements. However, Korten goes way overboard on his assault, and in doing so ends up "throwing the baby out with the bath water".What I wish Korten would write is "WARNING - if we are not careful, corporations and the short term goals that they inspire CAN and WILL ruin not only the planet, but your life and life as we know it". But so will any organization that is left unchecked (think of 1984 and/or Brave New World for excessive examples of both). Korten warns that corporations have the potential to be excessive in their quest for greed, and that is true. However, corporations are made of people, and if people decide to give their lives over to greed, then yes, there will be consequences. Korten never really says this, but it is obvious -- life is more than just work, and it is every person's individual responsibility to think about the values of life beyond just simple greed. This means (I think) sharing a healthy passion for improving your position economically in life, but also balancing it with other equally important needs - love, family, friends, environmental balance, love for your neighbor (regardless of territorial boundaries), etc...Korten's attack on corporations is excessive and looks at the worst case scenario in every sense, and then finds a way to place the blame on business. He tells you about all the people that he has seen misplaced over the years due to terrible economic corporate greed. However, is it just corporations that are at fault here, or could it also be politicians, local police, warlords, lack of execution, or any other things that could have made a situation bad. Korten decides that it is the fault of corporations and leaves it at that.Korten also likes to talk about all of the failures of capitalist societies and how evil greed and pro business leaders caused all of this pain. I agree with him that there is no government in the world that is perfect, and the US (the leader of corporate society) has many skeletons in the closet of history, but the US history is also one of constant improvement, relentlessly seeking to improve the balance between companies, individuals, and the different elements that make up all of life. The "Robber Barons" was a chapter of US history that was excessive, but it was also one that was ultimately fixed (or balanced), and after this was done the US not only emerged as one of the strongest economic powers, but also a place that immigrants loaded onto boats by the thousands to come to. And yes, this was a CHOICE that they made - no corporation forced them to come.Korten (as well as the first review of this book) goes into talking about how even Adam Smith was opposed to large corporations. To quote, (page 81) "Smith... opposed any form of economic concentration on the ground that it distorts the market's natural ability to establish a price that provides a fair return on land, labor, and capital". This is incorrect. What Smith opposed was any economic force that led to COLLUSION or MANIPULATION of the markets away from their free workings. Today free market principles are espoused and they should be. When they are not, and often times they are not, we are dependent on the courts and our elected officials to rectify the problem. Sometimes this works and sometimes it does not, but simply saying that corporations are bad (and Adam Smith says so too) is just wrong. Free market capitalism is a work in progress...I could go on, but I will give one last example of Korten's excess. On page 76, he talks about the beliefs of free market ideologues. He writes "These beliefs are based on a number of explicit, underlying assumptions... (1) Humans are motivated by self interest, which is expressed primarily through the quest for financial gain. (2) The action that yields the greatest financial return to the individual or firm yields the most benefit to society. (3) Competitive behavior is more rational for the individual that cooperative behavior and ultimately more beneficial for society. (4) Human progress and improvements in well-being are best measured by increases in the aggregate market value of economic input."  OK, fair enough - this seems to be a fair statement in general. However, Kurton then puts his EXPERT OPINION on things to work. He then interprets all of this in the next paragraph when he says "To put it in harsher language, these idealogical doctrines assume that: (1) People are by nature motivated only by greed. (2) The drive to acquire is the highest expression of what it means to be human. (3) The relentless pursuit of greed and acquisition lead to socially optimal outcomes. (4) The interests of human societies are best served by encouraging, honoring, and rewarding the above values." This jump to "harsher langauge" is absurd.Reading this, I just cannot see how Korten is looking at this with any sort of objective lens. To reinterpret the first set of thoughts into the second is just a ridiculous leap and assumes that all people in large corporations must be Gordon Geckos. This type of comparison is made time and time again in this book and is the reason I don't think his arguments can truly hold much weight other that one off examples of corporate ills.In the end, Korten does have some points. If you, or society, or the world, cannot understand the difference between economic growth and happiness/quality of life, then we are all in trouble. However, I give the world more credit than that. It is not a perfect world to say the least, but just because there are some problems in certain areas, we should not be totally against that area. While throwing out the bathwater of economic growth and improving qualities of life, let's make sure to hold on to the baby that we are trying to take care of
Sholarly and deeply considered? NOT. I am so appalled that I contributed even one penny to this blatently anti-semitic, history denying xenophobe.  I only wish I could rate this a zero.  This book incites hatred and paranoia against everything Jewish.  He buys into every nazi and neo-nazi theory denying the ethnic and historic origins of the Jewish people. He refers to the holocaust as the "so-called holocaust."  Jews are simply Khazars from Russia who are removing native Palestinians from their land.  (Yes, I was already aware of this theory that has been amply and roundly refuted). He  makes the patently absurd claim that Christianity is the only religion that represents the Old Testament creed of Yahweh. (And makes no effort to prove it--He only goes into  talmudic "examinations" which are totally one sided.  Of course I doubt the authenticity of many of his talmudic quotes at all, but I am aware that the talmud contains everything "and its opposite." He doesn't bother quoting the opposite sentiments. I only wish someone had warned me about the content of this book before I bought it. I only hope that people will realize this author does not represent what true Christians believe. This guy is scary.
Voodoo Physics. Gary Zukav states in his introduction "I had never studied physics. In fact I didn't like science and I had no mathematical aptitude.On Opra (TV) he admitted that he does not have a TV which may explain his lack of contemporary physics let alone any depth.I noticed that some reviewers refer to the "New Physics" is that like "New Age" or voodoo physics?90% of the matter must be missing from this book. Or else how can he take physics out of context and make such fantastic leaps to religions parallels that he knows little of. He even twists the religion around to serve some unknown purpose.Many people say they did not understand physics until this book; Surprises, you still do not. You now know what Zukav wished physics was. Take anti-mater for instants that does not mean the opposite of mater. And the relationship between particles has no correlation with the relationship of dogs and cats.At least get it straight before mixing it up. Try reading some of these:"The Ascent of Man by Jacob Bronowski". The book available everywhere the DVD's available from the UK."The Upanishads" by Eknath Easwaran (Editor), Michael N. Nagler (Photographer)Or just about any mainstream material on physics and religion.Then if you still want to mix worlds into one read someone saner:"The Tao of Physics: An Exploration of the Parallels between Modern Physics and Eastern Mysticism" by Fritjof Capra.Also on the fringe but not as radical as Zukav is a series called "What the Bleep." (both in books and on video)
don't waste your money. I should have listened to the people who wrote negative reviews, this book is a complete and total ripoff, it tells you nothing , save your money and buy a bottle of wine instea
amazingly naive vibration. This is a truly amazing book! This is a book written by a highly uneducated person for even less educated reader. As the author says in the introduction, this book is designed for young people of all ages... Well, what's that, "young of all ages?"  Simple: those "whose imagination has not been stifled by standard educational process."  At the very outset, the author reassures the reader that the book is not going to be a technical or scientific one. He says with a poorly concealed pride "My brush with academia was a fairly short one:  I was expelled from kindergarten at the age of four... and have never managed to resume normal studies since, not to mention graduating from anyplace."  As a result, "I am a fairly stupid fellow who could not learn any mathematics at all."  This lack of really serious knowledge of anything does not prevent the author from making judgments, always with a sort of  "elegance of ignorance", regarding very big topics, like, say, theory of relativity, and holography, and brain functioning (through electromagnetic and sound vibrations), and Biggg Banggg, of course. So, my recommendation to those with at least K12 education: do not waste time and find a better way to spend $9.97.The most surprising aspect of  this book is that Dr. William Tiller, a  respected scientist and writer, found it possible to write a preface for this book.  This preface is the best part of the book.
Biblical Creation attempts to be a science. Morris believes that the Bible can be scientifically proven.  This is impossible, since the Bible is a religious text.  It is an interesting read, but keep in mind that Morris uses bad science and fallacy after  fallacy to make his religion look scientific
Disappointing. General common sense advice on confidence and self-improvement, but nothing very specific or useful.There are other books much more helpful if one wants to learn how to approach and attract women
Profound Disappointment. Perhaps I had been expecting a true sequeal to the original. I was so excited when I saw the book but instead of a taut, touching tale I got a rambling, frequently boring, difficult to follow story that I had to force myself to finish.  It seemed more a tale of politics and religious infighting than a science fiction story.Problems?  How about WAY too many characters, many with multiple names. I consider myself intelligent and widely read but the rush of people created such a flux that the plot seemed almost secondary.  I liked the hero but for all his potential he did little more than whine, worry and wonder.  His boss, the antipope, became the star of the show along with the swordsman.The story did not "flow" and bogged down several times in minor details.  The first section covereding the time in the abbey passed uneventfully but for a few personal crises. Then we journey toward the conclave and are introduced to host of new folks.  Finally we arrive in the city and meet yet another cast of characters.  The story was as much about Native American culture as anything.  The language issues, interesting at first, became tiresome as we switched from various dialects (some almost unpronouncable with special symbols) to Latin (frequently) to English.  All in all, not a success
Civil War history lite..  skip it. Treats some of the stories of the Civil War in the west without explaining the larger issues.  This is an inexpensive book, but not necessarily a good value
Great story - poorly developed... I ordered HOW I STOLE HER HUSBAND after reading all the positive reviews here and thought I would get get a fun breezy romance type novel much like you can find it in any one of Jackie Collins books.  Reading it was very disappointing and rater boring and I'll explain why:The main character Alison takes a job as nanny for Peppers 3 year old daughter August, which is lengthly drawn out over 100 pages including all the likes and dislikes of this job.  Also we learn that Pepper seems to cheat on her husband Spence.Spence, which we know has been Alison's High School Sweetheart, is on a business trip to Hong Kong, and noticeable absent the majority of the time, even Alison states on page 104 "I had begun to think of Spence as just an occasional talking point, not really part of the household".  Maybe I was wrong to begin with but I thought the romance between Alison and Spence was supposed to be the major plot line.When he finally appears, he Alison and August go together to a restaurant the used to go back in High School talking about old times, still no romance building up yet.Then the whole clan moves to New York, we learn that Pepper has another affair there; Alison, Spence and August go to central park together and one evening they go out to dinner without August and start kissing each other after that.  A few days later Alison moves into Spence's hotel room, and a week after that she decides to leave him after finding out he had had an affair with the prior nanny too.  Within a few days later than that she starts a new relationship with this guy Finn she knew.This book is more a run down of events than any kind of a  romantic story, everything just seems to happen for no reason, I miss the gradual  growing attraction between Alison and Spence.  For me that makes this book a major disappointment
Outdated and Jaded. This book is a nice overview of various options available to those having difficulty conceiving.  Unfortunately, this field changes quickly, and since it's publication it's very outdated.  Techniques she discusses are now rarely used because newer/more effective treatments have been established.  Also, her slant against fertility treatments (as she admits in the preface)is obvious throughout the book.  Finally, the author's understanding of research appears limited.  Specifically, she fails to consider that IVF pregnancies are not at higher risk of miscarriage - maternal age is the risk factor.  It just so happens that those who receive IVF treatments are generally older
Deviance or Brilliance?. Mr. Irving is a renowned writer who has pleased readers with books like, The World According to Garp, Prayer for Owen Meany and Cider House Rules.  There is a creativity about his writing and a quirkiness in his characters that I find appealing.  What happened here?  I was so mired down in wordiness and child sexual abuse that my commitment to the book ended with the protagonist's early grade school sexual experiences.  If somebody walked into a person's home and found drawings of what was verbalized in the book, they would probably consider the individual a pedophile and his home would be marked on public records as housing a pervert.  It seems strange that a brilliant writer could go on ad infinitum, describing the same things in words and be considered worthy of praise.  Anything the book had to offer was lost on me because I couldn't get past being inundated with pages and pages dedicated to pathetic images of a young boy's penis; crude and rude, abusive adolescent girls; and body hair fetish.  Maybe had I been pulled in enough to read further, I would have found redeeming value in Until I find You.  As it played out for me, the book is not worthy of John Irving.
Good Grief This Was Bad!. I am an AVID reader, pretty intelligent and read at least 1-2 books a week (more when on vacation).  I have read books about all kinds of people in all cultures...and this book turned into a quest...a quest to FINISH it!!!  I never stop reading a book once I start it, but I was about ready to shoot myself in order to end my distress.  If you want to read a REALLY, REALLY good book about desperation in the Indian culture, you simply MUST, MUST, MUST read "A Fine Balance"...one of the best books I have ever read.  It's always on my suggested reading list when people ask me for the name of a good book...along with "Life of Pi."  I simply don't understand all the wonderful remarks about this book.  It went on and on and on and on with the same thing happening to this man over and over...with only a change in his location.  It would pick up every now and again, and I would think "now it's going to start to get interesting" but I was only entertained for a page or two before Mr. Biswas returned to his same ol' depressing self, repeating the same mistakes over and over and over and over and over and over...well you get the point.  Boring, boring book.  I would have given it 0 stars but that wasn't an option
G is for Gumshoe. The second tape does not move backwards or forwards. I am very diappointed
Disappointed again. I think, like many readers of the Anita Blake series, one question keeps coming to mind. Why do I continue to read her?  The reason is that there is always hope that the series will shift again.  Laurel K Hamilton has invested a great deal in Anita.  She is a necromancer, a succubus, and a panwere, with a very convoluted and confusing personal life.  She is also a Federal Marshal licensed to handle Preternatural crimes.  That is the part of these stories that captured many readers.  However, Laurel K Hamilton has not been paying any real attention to Anita's job, and has focused instead upon the ardeur- the power that makes Anita a succubus.  I tend to find this aspect of Anita the most uninteresting.And this novel is no exception.  We have some new characters which promise some intrigue in the vampire world, but nothing ever comes of it.  Two of Jean-Claude's "friends" arrive to help celebrate an all-vampire dance troupe.  Both of them have ulterior motives for coming, and cause some problems.  But we don't focus on that.  Merlin, the leader of the Dance Troupe, makes a power-play against six Vampire Masters.  But we don't focus on that.  Instead, we have many sex scenes- some of which are just far too long and descriptive.  The plot seems to stop whenever this happens, and therefore, the story never really gets going. This was the exact same problem in the last two or three Anita Blake novels.I love the character of Anita.  I have enjoyed watching her deal with her growing powers and her growing understanding of herself, while trying to deal with some interesting preternatural criminal.  But the last few novels have been solely focused on her growing powers and the problems they create. My problem is that there has been no resolution to these problems.  Anita has stopped growing and changing, and is becoming whiny and uninteresting.In the preview of Harlequin, we find out that Edward is returning. We haven't seen him since Obsidian Butterfly.  Since that was also the last Anita Blake novel I could recommend to someone, I have hope that the series will shift into something worh reading.We can still hope.  Which is why we're still buying her books
bloodless and draining. This book should have been better--it's a comprehensive collection of journaling ideas--but the final effect is bloodless and draining.  Sadly, the author saves significant journal writing examples for a final section and uses quotes instead of examples in the chapters.  Perhaps she's trying not to sway the reader as to a preferred type of writing, but it also doesn't impart much energy or passion.  Go back to &quot;The New Diary&quot; or &quot;One to One,&quot; or go forward to &quot;Leaving a Trace;&quot; this one isn't worth the effort
Absolute trash. What sort of racist trash is this? As an Asian, I was extremely insulted by the occasional racial slurs against Asians in this book. Chinese people like nothing better than eating dogs? Japanese men are still saying outdated sexist things like "Men know better, women no listen?" I stopped reading after the first few chapters, which I only read because I was bored out of my mind. I'm a big fan of chick lit, but even I thought it was pretty damn bad writing. Sex and the City may have gained fame by being incorporated into a TV series, but that doesn't have anything to do with Bushnell's writing skills--it's just about the plot. Yet another brainless book by a talentless hack
Based on Impractical  Assumptions. The benefits of an armed society can never be adequately weighed against the detriments for a variety of reasons, the chief one being a dearth of records on both national and local levels. Firearms, like alcoholic beverages, can be both used and misused; however, unlike firearms, alcoholic beverages have no socially redeeming purposes. There are significant numbers in our society who are alive and well because they had a firearm they could depend on when police weren't available.Courts have consistently held that governments don't have an obligation to protect individuals, but the population at large. Indeed, most murders are committed when there are no police present. When one considers that police functions depend more on deterrent and solving crimes rather than protection, the benefits of an armed society becomes even more apparent.Over the past several years, the media has reported that police presence has been sparse to almost non-existent following hurricanes like Katrina and Andrew and other natural disasters. Police have their own families to tend to and in extreme conditions it's conceivable that many thousands of people can be caught alone in extremely hostile environs, unprotected.When gun deaths are posted, no one has any idea how many are criminals are shot by police, how many criminals are killed and captured by citizens, and how many criminals are killed by criminals. We do know that nearly 50 percent of all handgun deaths are due to suicide, and there is no evidence that restricting handguns would result in fewer suicides. In fact, a 5-year Department of Justice study conducted a number of years ago found that Japanese-Americans had about the same rate on violent crimes as Japanese-Japanese. The same was true for white Europeans and white Americans. And, not surpisingly, it was true in both cases with suicide. The bottom line was that cultural disposition had more to do with violent crime and suicide rates than gun laws or the lack thereof.Speaking about gun laws, there is no documented case in which more restrictive gun laws ever resulted in less violent crime. In fact, the opposite has almost always been the case.So who can measure the cost of the human lives saved because a handgun was present when the local rift raft came by to cave someone's head in with a 2x4 or to rape or pillage? In well over 95 percent of the time an armed citizen doesn't even have to shoot a criminal (much less kill) to prevent a violent crime. Thus, how do we calculate those benefits? The same is true for hikers and campers who use firearms against bear, snakes, cougars, or use them to signal others when they are injured or are lost?I would be far more impressed had the authors tried to calculate, or even concede, that guns might actually be beneficial. For those who complain about the criminal use of guns, perhaps getting criminals off the streets would have a far more conclusive result on the "real" costs.
Went in with high hopes... ...and was left putting the book down every two seconds because I was annoyed by it. It is not marvelously written; in fact, I found myself correcting his sentence structure and grammar in at least every other paragraph, if not more (editor, please?). It's an interesting enough plot, but the way it's put forth is mindnumbing. The non-fiction information he put in there could have been ten times more interesting in two ways. First, if the information had been summarized in about two pages. And second, if he hadn't pretended like everyone reading this book was in the second grade and had minimal comprehension abilities.I'm usually a fast reader, but this book (a quick 415-page paperback read) took me more than a month, just because I had to keep putting it down. If you simply want something to "frighten" you, or are unusually interested with autopsies (there are about five million in the book), and don't care about poor writing, pick this book up
No Pressing Instructions???. After I cut out all the pieces for the My Heart Belongs to Chocolate quilt I discovered that there are no pressing instructions for this quilt and it REALLY needs them!  One of the main reason I buy patterns is so I don't have to spend time figuring out things like pressing instructions. I won't buy any more books from this author
Huge disappointment and overly simplistic. I was really looking forward to this book as a fan of some of his earlier books, especially five dysfunctions of a team, which is one of the most elegant frameworks i've seen on team dynamics.lencioni's solution to silos and politics?  a shared goal with supporting objectives and metrics.  it's a lot more complex than just that, and i'm surprised he didn't bring in some of his other work related to team dynamics and leadership, which must also be significant levers to help combat this problem.if you're looking to solve your problem with silos and politics within your own organization, keep looking..
For the Choir. Santayana has a flowing style and is a master of rhetoric.  Do not read  this work if you are looking for a well argued thesis.  He lets points  stand on sweeping generalizations that will only be accepted by those  already in agreement.  Santayana's critiques of religion rest upon  sociology rather than philosophy, and his appreciation of religion is  limited and patronizing
Poor service. Product misrepresented. The book we received was not the full book with the ISBN number we ordered. It was volume one of two with a different ISBN number, which was clearly noted on the back of the book. We had to send the book back AT OUR EXPENSE
Good book, bad reading. Unfortunately some audio books are read in monotone-very dull indeed-but in this audio book the reader goes too far in the opposite direction by reading an adult book as if it's story time and she's a preschool teacher.My daughters and I loved the main characters in audio books such as Bridget Jones Diary, The Nanny Diaries, and Sammy's Hill because the reader made us sympathize with them. We knew that whatever the characters did they did with sincerity and whatever happened to them could happen to anyone. Emily Gray, the reader of Can You Keep a Secret, made the main character sound witless and very, very phony. All of the other characters sounded one dimensional.We listen to audio books on our frequent long car trips. Although we had nothing else to listen to at the time, we could only stand  of this book before we had to turn it off. A few weeks later I randomly read a few chapters of Can You Keep a Secret in a bookstore and thought that it was amusing. Perhaps Emily Gray didn't find the book amusing, so she thought that she needed to go "over the top" to add humor. If so, it didn't work. She took a lighthearted, enjoyable book and turned it into the equivalent of listening to nails on a blackboard.
Very Disappointed. I am very disappointed with the recipes in this book.  I love to cook, love to try new recipes, and bought this book on the strength of others' reviews.  I've tried 6 recipes straight out of the book with no adaptation.  2 of them were OK, but had little flavor.  The other 4 were barely edible, with strange flavors.  Another reviewer said this book is a good spring-board for crockery cooking.  I would definately say that you need to be experienced enough with the crock pot, and spice usage in general, to adapt these recipes to taste, in order to enjoy recipes from this book
You are kidding right?. This book proports to be a serious expose of a vast conspiracy involving the space program.  The landings and moonwalks that we watched worldwide were, according to the authors, faked on a very earthbound set.  To backup this claim they offer a vast array of evidence and theories about those involved and the reasons for this deception. Some examples are:The 'evidence':The shadows on the photographs do not line up if there is only one light source, as there would be on the moon.  The authors do not allow for the light reflecting off various surfaces or the fact that while the lunar surfaces are described as flat they are not completely flat, small dips, bumps and slopes exist and would effect the shadows.The Motivation:The Moon program was a means to take public attention from Vietnam (although elsewhere in the book the authors claim that this started during WWII or before).The Consipracy:The conspirators, according to the authors, include all the astronauts, NASA, various members of the government, Department of Defense, the Russian space program, large portions of the British government and astromonical community, movie technicians, and author Arthur C. Clarke to name only a few.  Very little explanation is given to how all these people have been kept quiet all this time.Other clues to this conspiracy are present, according to the authors, in various press releases, interviews, movies, and STAR TREK episodes.  The authors present this evidence in a very unprofessional fashion, they state their points, embellished with many exclaimation points, scatter about boxes with collaborating points decorated with cute little headlines.  This is made even more annoying when some of the 'points' are well known bits of historical fact and the sideboxes contain illrelevancies like British nursery rhymes.The authors find connections between the Apollo program and the clandestine entrance of scientists from Nazi Germany, Roswell and other UFO incidents, crop circles, ley lines, pyramids, Stonehenge, intervention from aliens in the constuction of the solar system and many other unlikely events.  They identify relationships between many mathematical measures but do not take into consideration that many measurements are purely arbitary and by no means universal even among humans much less any other civilizations, and therefore 'relationships' involving miles, hours, days, etc are only concidences and not clues to a higher truth.  By the time I reached the end of this book I was waiting for the authors to include Atlantis, Free Masons, the Knights Templar and perhaps Big Foot.This is to be read for entertainment purposes only.  The research involved here bears the same relationship to serious scholarship that jelly beans do to vegetables.
This book is Bedlam!. The back cover to this book was intriguing, and captured me immediately. The writing, however, was so plodding, so inconsistent, and so non-sequential that it was painful to get through to the end. This is aside from the fact that this man appears to be socially inept and unable to manage his affairs from day to day.  I can't believe that this book made it past the editors.  In one paragraph Jon Katz tells how Rose is the only dog for the job of helping him capture his runaway herd of sheet, and in the next he says that Rose is too young to herd sheep.  In one paragraph he can't live without his wife, she gives his very existence meaning, and throughout the book he describes how he lives apart from her in order to...what was it again?  Oh, right, herd sheep!  At one point the dog he loves the most is also the one he can't connect to and finally gives away.  And then can't stop visiting, even though everyone knows how confusing that would be to a dog. And why is he wondering why the world looks at grown men funny when they hang around too much with teenage boys - there's a reason, Jon!If you care at all about literarure, stay away from this book
More than a disappointment!. I wanted to cry when I put this book down because I miss the Danielle Steele that wrote 'Thurston House', 'Family Circle' and others.  For years now I have felt that she is simply putting out books because she is contractually obligated to by her publishers.  I really feel like her heart just isn't in it anymore.  She has become very idiosyncratic and predictable.  Every book has her main character 'being honest.' I keep reading because I am a loyal Danielle Steele fan and I write this in hopes she'll read it and either decide she is writing because she loves it (like she once did) or decide to retire and let us love her through her earlier works.  This book was just awful.
Instructions Not Included!. This book is for very experienced quilters only, in my opinion.  I didn't see instructions regarding how to sew the various block parts together to make the block.  This book might be a good idea to get for picking a block, but then you'd have to go elsewhere for instructions on how much fabric to buy and how to make it into something.  I am very disappointed
Shows the weakness of the Catholic church. Amy Welborn has written a kind of book that I find hard to believe exists at all: A book written specifically in reaction to another book, with the intention of debunking it. The funny thing is, that other book is a fiction thriller novel. Anyone else find this odd?Catholic apologists have been bashing Dan Brown's peculiarly popular DaVinci Code for the past few years, apparently because their faith is threatened by it. It escapes me why any devout Catholic (or any Christian for that matter) would feel the least bit unnerved by a fiction novel but since several books have been written in attempt to destroy the DaVinci code, I must comment on them.I found the DaVinci Code to be a slick, fast-paced thriller which uses Catholic themes and history to drive a fictional (yes, FICTIONAL) tale of murder, codes, art, etc. Little did I know when I read the book that some people would be so affected by it that they would go on to write books of their own, leeching off of Dan Brown's success and generally using the old "But I heard that..." approach to debate and of course failing miserably.The fact that a number of books have been published that basically attack Dan Brown's work is distressing, the same way that Michael Moore is distressing: I'm no fan of widely-published, personal attacks on others. In this case Catholics are writing to defend their faith like holy crusaders against a fiction novel which has been bolstered in popularity, not weakened, by the Church's jihad against it. This shows a prime weakness of the Chuch: They use their book (the Bible, and subsequent liturgy) to bash someone else's book.I love a good argument, but Welborn's book (and the other attacks on DaVinci Code) is a classic "I'm right because my beliefs and my church say I am. THIS is the truth, don't believe that other guy" ploy. The obvious spectacular degree of arrogance shown here only furthers the divide between rational readers (like those who read the DaVinci Code and enjoyed it because it was a fun fiction thriller and nothing more) and those who would go out of their way to make a huge crying fit over a novel that happens to use the Church as the basis for fiction.Don't waste your time with a book like De-Coding Da Vinci. It's a subjective assault on a popular novel, a book intended to encourage Catholics (and others that have been swept up on the controversy surrounding DaVinci Code) to bash the book every chance they get, as opposed to simply accepting its popularity and not believing its fiction if they don't wish to. Of course not everything in The DaVinci Code is true. Everyone else seems to understand this. There is no need to write a book about it, unless one's own insecurity about their personal faith and religion is so complete that it becomes necessary. In that case, be my guest.
Wow this product really sucks!. I was very interested in this product when I read the description.  However, after recieving the product was disappointed to find that way in which you catch a liar is to become a bigger and more manipulative liar.  If you have any sense of intergrity ignore this product.  The author must me one of the biggest decievers out there to put such effort in this product
Save your money. Don't buy this book. The Magic Lantern Guide, late though it is, is a much more comprehensive book.The book's title is misleading. It's not a "field guide." A field guide would be a book dedicated to fully categorizing and explaining each of the camera's operating modes, controls and menu selections. This book simply regurgitates what's in the manufacturer's manual and then goes to boilerplate on how to make better photos. The things unique to the Nikon D200 are largely done by page 72. The remaining 178 pages is largely a generic digital photography volume.All of the current DSLR cameras are amazingly feature-rich. They have complex architecture and much hidden capability. They also have capabilities that can actually get in the way if not properly understood and they have gee-whiz features that are most often best left alone. The manual that comes in the box explains each feature as if that feature were co-equal in importance with every other feature.The fact is, some of the camera's feautures are very important. Some are less so. And which ones often depend on the type of photography being done. A good book on this camera would offer real-world explanations and advice with respect to the long list of capabilities represented by this camera.The reality is that there is little to be gained from this book that is not available from the camera manual and from the photography books that you probably already own
Rechy's mosting disappointing and retch inducing novel. Open this book to any page and you'll be bombarded with one graphic, gratuitous, poorly written, laugh out loud sex scene after another (Oh yeah baby give it to me, that's it like that . . . seriously that's how inane the dialogue is).  Don't get me wrong, I am a huge fan of Rechy's and some of his work is downright brilliant.  I loved City of Night, This Day's Death, The Fourth Angel and especially Bodies and Souls.  However, The Coming of the Night is a thinly vieled excuse for straight up porn.I went into the novel excited, thinking Rechy would have something profound to express about gay life before "the coming of the night", a metaphor for the AIDS epidemic.  Instead I was bombarded with episodic sexcapades of several loosely connected one dimensional characters. The sections involving Clint, haunted by and trying to escape from the mysterious "cancer" killing off his friends in New York; Orville, a handsome gay black male trying to get by in the predominantly white gay community and Thomas, a lonely single "old queen" who just wants to be loved were the only compelling and interesting characters to me.  As an ardent supporter of AIDS awareness and a gay black male getting up there in age, these characters could have really got a message across.  Instead they, and the rest of the novel, are squandered away under the weight of the grossly explicit sex scenes that appear on EVERY page.Other characters were pointless.  Za-Za LaGrand's sections (a thinly veiled reference to porn director Chi Chi LaRue) were utterly pointless and did nothing to further the plot along.  Dave, the sado-masochist leather biker man and Ernie, the body builder with endowment issues were one dimensional characters I could care less about and Buzz, Boo and Fredo, the homophobe gay bashing punks were predictable and boring.It's sad that this novel is so bad because it really had a lot of potential to get across some extremely powerful messages.  Instead of focusing on the characters, fleshing them out so I could care for them, Rechy gets too wrapped up in the sex scenes, the majority of which are poorly written with some of the worst dirty talk dialogue I have ever read. Read this only if you've read every Jackie Collins novel and long for a dirtier gay version of what she does.  Rechy must have wrote this for the money because it really stinks. PU
If this is classic nature lit, then maybe its just me... I am going to resign from critiquing this book on a literary scale, and just say that I didn't enjoy this book for the same reason a couple others mentioned - its boring and repetitive. Maybe its because I'm not used to aimless - albeit eloquent -landscape descriptions, or maybe it's the fact that NOTHING happens for 264 pages, but reading this book felt more like a chore than an enjoyable reading experience. Case in point: Casual readers beware
Hey I've got a great idea. The Da Vinci Code is a worldwide phenomenon, staying on the New York Times Bestseller List for over 2 years.  I think I'll throw together a quicky book with some alternate intepretations of biblical "history" that I got from looking up websites with Google one weekend.  I'll slap the name "Da Vinci Code" in the title of my book and market it to delusional paranoids who spend every waking minute thinking about how the arts and entertainment world is at war with Christianity. I'll make a forture off someone else's success. It sure beats working for a living!God Bless Americ
Bit More than a "Kiss.". In the Long Ago Far Away, I remember reading some of the Anita Blake series, but being no fan of mysteries or detectives I let the series fall by the wayside.  If a writer is truly great, then I can stay rivited even if the subject isn't one of my favorites.I adore Faeries, to the point of practicing a post-modern version of Faerie Faith with no rules and no boundaries (and hence no obsessive traditionalism).Ms. Hamilton now has fairies with no rules and no boundaries.  None.  Zip.  Nada.  Yet somehow, this is the inverse of liberating.Oh, I am not surprised.  I have something of a fetish for well-written negative reviews, and reading some of the erudite, articulate attacks on Ms. Hamilton's writing have been illuminating.  I am fully aware of the direction taken by Anita Blake and I knew to expect it with Meredith Gentry.So essentially, mixed blood fairy girl (1/2 Unseelie, 1/4 Seelie Brownie, 1/4 mortal - or some approximation of that mess) without the immortality gene runs away to escape torture at the hands of the Queen of the Unseelie Court, her Aunt Andais.  She becomes a private investigator in Los Angeles.  Auntie sends a few of her bodyguards to retrieve the wayward Princess Meredith and bring her back to the Court, where the Queen will make Merry an Offer She Can't Refuse.  Part and parcel with this offer comes the requirement to have sex with the Queen's Guards until she conceives, because a child will guarantee Merry the Throne.  Merry's competing with her cousin, Cel, who is under the same orders to produce a child.And that's about it.From some of the reviews here, I expected a lot more sex.  There are a few near misses and a few actual sex scenes, but they're nothing special.  The kink quotient is quite mild, comparatively speaking.  Even the scene that involves tentacles peters out to nothing.  It seems that, if the character is unattractive or undersirable in any way, Meredith will be spared sex with this fiend at the last minute, in the most contrived way possible.  Merry, apparently, doesn't take any for the team.The most diffecult thing about reading Laurell Hamilton is the way she writes.  Her vocabulary seems very limited and the writing is quite repetitious.  Whenever someone bites/something stabs Meredith, the pain is described as "sharp and immediate.""Burning and instantaneous""Terrible and abrupt""Stinging and urgent"I'm not even trying.Along with this limited vocabulary, Ms. Hamilton writes very much in passive voice.  Is, was, were, has, had, be, been, etc.  Dialogue is also stilted and awkward, with normal diction sometimes ignored to give a character an opportunity to say something "witty."Characterization isn't a strong suit either.  Meredith is a little dull, but most heroines are.  Her sex partners all have nearly identical personalities, and I wish there had been some variety in the way Ms. Hamilton chose to describe them, rather than a run-down of features and attributes.So why did I read it?  If I knew all this in advance, why did I even drop a dime on it?I enjoy erotica, and, as previously mentioned, I'm a faerie fan.  I expected the writing to be terrible, but bearable enough for a few moments of shallow enjoyment.  Then I expected to come here, slap down a single star, and go on my merry way.If at all possible, I am even more offended by the fact the most of Ms. Hamilton's ideas were good, but she blew it by not following through, or by failing to explore character emotion, or by making the plot secondary to the sex.  To have ideas that are actually interesting and then to drop the ball is even worse than having no good ideas at all (Anne Rice's "Beauty" series, *cough*cough).But I can't give Ms. Hamilton one star, because the ideas were there, shining just below the surface.  The idea of fairies as celebrities in the mortal world . . . the concept of a fairie exodus to the United States . . . old gods becoming fairies . . . etc, etc . . .So the book gets two stars, and it could have garnered more if Ms. Hamilton had her priorities straight.1. Ms. Hamilton, you are a grown woman.  Mention the business parts of the male chracters by name please.  Obscuring gential terms with "him" and "himself" makes you look sqeamish and unsure of yourself.  If you want to write something with a little heat and intensity, clarify the act, please.2. Thesaurus.3. If you want all the sex, make the non-sexual parts longer so that they represent a plot.4. Why is everyone so rampantly heterosexual, and horrified at the idea of homosexuality?  These are fairies, not humans.  Why would they possess our prejudices?5. Let Meredith sleep with unattractive characters now and again.  Refusing to do so makes her seem like an elitist snob.Enough complaining.   Look at the reviews and see if this is a mess you want to wade into.  I've started the second book, but after the first "sharp and immediate" there, I've set it aside until my annoyance ends.If you want a modern fairy tale, try "Tithe."  It's considered YA, but it's far more satisfying than Merry Gentry's world.
Avoid at all costs. This is by far the worst action/adventure book I have ever read.  I'm surprised that aliens didn't show up at the end to fight against everybody else...  How this book ever got a top review is beyond me.  Please do not waist your tim
Long and drawn out. This seemed too long and too drawn out
Dissapointed!. I was very dissapointed by this book, but maybe it's because I love bright, vibrant colors...... Traci uses "dirty", muddy colors, and I think this book looks like it came out years ago......It's too messy for me
Prescient but dated. Although I can certainly understand the appeal of this groudbreaking precambrian cyberpunk novel, the story and language are hopelessly dated to a modern reader. In a way the book reminded me of an Ayn Rand novel; good ideas stuck between pages upon pages of confusing and ridiculous dialog spewed by one-dimensional characters
This will BORE you to death!. Im a regular reader of Forbes Magazine, and theres nothing i love more then reading about inspirational stories of entrepreneurs, businessmen, tycoons etc so i picked up this book thinking its by "Forbes" so it must have some great stories. I also rely on Amazon.com reviews for my purchases, so everything i say is from the bottom of my heart...But im sorry you would not believe how BORING this Book actually turned out to be. The writing style of Daniel Gross, is well "Grossly Boring", Unispirational, unmoving and generally a waste of your money and time.As far as im concerned:This Book will NOT inspire you, It will not motivate you, it wont even make you appreciate the Great accomplishments of the very people it writes about.It is a diservice to the personalities it talks about, and is a diservice to Forbes. Very disapointed, im just hoping to flog it for whatever i can get.Finally i would advise anyone who is genuinely interested in the personalities this Book writes about to do a GOOGLE search and read about them from there, because you will probably learn and appreciate more that way.
a story about ideals versus self protection; fear versus identity. In this novel, Ha Jin writes like a Chinese Michel Houllebecq- the language is simple and direct, and the ultimate outlook for humanity is grim. The protagonist is also a shy young male on the outer rim of the mainstream community.Like a lot of the modern Chinese fiction, the novel is preoccupied with the psychological damage inflicted by China's Communist years, and the paranoia and self-censorship that occurs to this day. The year is 1989, and the narrator's teacher, Wang, has just had a severe stroke. The narrator, Jian, is studying for the PhD candidacy exams; he is a student of classical Chinese poetry and hopes to be granted a PhD so that he can move to Beijing to live with his fiancee Meimei, who is his teacher's daughter.Wang's stroke has left him raving and mad. Jian is assigned by the university secretary to care for Wang while he is in hospital. During Jian's afternoons spent in the hospital room, he is audience to his teacher's ravings, which begin to reveal all sorts of disturbing truths that had managed to stay hidden until that point.The story is set against the backdrop of the student activism leading up to the demonstrations in Tiananmen Square. Toward the end of the novel, Jian becomes so disillusioned by his teacher's revelations that he decides to forfeit the PhD exams, resulting in Meimei's breaking up with him. Aimless, he travels to Beijing and takes part briefly in the student demonstrations. Amid the violence, he is lucky enough to find his way back to the train station to return to his university in Shanning. Upon return he is informed that he is about to be taken away for his role in the Beijing demonstrations, and the novel ends with him on the run, having been forced by circumstances to abandon his belongings, his friends, and his identity.The stark language with which the ending is rendered makes it all the more appalling. The matter-of-factness with which Jian takes the steps to erase himself from his previous life suggests the ordinariness of his actions in such extraordinary times.
All is Lost, Indeed. I ordered this on the faith of the title, but reached the last pages (at least I reached them) rather... lost.Often spiteful, occasionally prurient, more often than not off topic, it is a poor catalogue of gripes and complaints. We are treated, amongst other things, to an exhaustive list of the author's gadgets (only the ones he can see, mind you, one assumes there are more, stuffed in closets) and an alphabetical arrangment of griefs with annoying cross-refernces in pure hyper-link style.(Doubtlessly to better hide the cobbled-together themes; when in doubt, arrange it all from a to z...) Little effort at sustaining any kind of reflexion on the nature of things lost, just an underlying malcontent.There are some very good pages, he would be well inspired to take the 12 best entries and rewrite the book.Perhaps what the author most regrets losing is his own Childhood Lost. Goodness knows it's never happened to anyone else.John HOW
Probably my last Elaine Flinn book. I too really enjoyed the first two books in this series and was saving this installment as one I was sure to love. But I had to skim the last 100 or so pages because I knew how it was going to turn out and the dialog wasn't fun or enjoyable to me. It may be true that Randall and Emma are true to life, but they're just not people I wanted to spend anymore time with. It's too often that teasing is confused with bulling and I think that Randal in particular was abusive and domineering towards the end, with the excuse of he's the cop so it's Ok.Authority figures are tough to portray well, but authors can write characters as roll models. When there are those ideal authority figures, children can be children and that's very dimensional and rich. For Randal to be the love interest and not be nice to Molly is just un-excusable. And for Emma to be un-parented and friend to Molly is un-healthy
Not that well written. I usually really hate to critize a book like this, but this book was not  what I expected it to be.  This book was to be romantic suspense, but where  was the romance?  This book focused mainly on the mystery(which was solved  by the the time you reached the middle of the book), and then the story  kinda dragged on,  probably to finish the love story.  The love story was  okay, but there was no serious focus on it and it just kinda closed off.   In the end, for my first book by Krentz, it was not the greatest
Be ready to fall asleep. I have previously enjoyed all of Suzanne Brockmann's books but this one is a departure from her usual interesting fiction. I have struggled to finish it but it is so tedious with stupid situations and circumstances, I really hate it. What a yawner and I wouldn't recommend it to anyone unless they like to be bored and frustrated
Author is not very smart. After reading this book you will realize this guy doesnt know what he is talking about. Very close minded and not open to any changes. At the end you will be like whatever
760 Pages of Torture. Would you stand in line at an Applebee's for three hours in order to eat a hamburger when you could get a hamburger just as good---maybe better---at a dozen other nearby places where the wait was only fifteen minutes?  Of course not!  Why, then, would you spend countless hours plowing through this 760 page monstrosity when you could spend the same amount of time reading two James Patterson books, or a Patterson and a Connelly, or two Thomas Harris books...my apologies, Greg Iles, but for a simple, formulaic serial killer book, Blood Memory was just WAY too long.  The book has two co-plots; one involves a serial killer who murders older men, the second involves the mysterious childhood abuse suffered by the female lead.  The serial killer plot is actually the more interesting, but at least two-thirds of the novel dwells on the abuse instead and unfortunately the "secret" is painfully obvious to any seasoned reader from the first few pages of the book.  All in all this would have been a halfway decent novel if Iles---or his editor---had chopped out about 300 pages of unneccesary text.  Iles just LOVES to have two characters sit and talk for 3o, 40 or even 50 pages, but since most of his dialogue is what I call "soap opera" speak, meaning you know what the characters will say before the words are even out of their mouths, these chapters dragged on and on and on.  Iles also wastes pages by writing lengthy descriptions of people eating ice cream, taking showers, and doing other mundane things that should have been glossed over or chopped out entirely.  Come on, Greg; why describe a character savoring the taste of vanilla ice cream as if it's some strange, exotic treat that no one's ever heard of before?  Just as some people love to hear themselves talk, I think Iles loves to see himself write...and although some of his books have been quite good, Blood Memory misses the mark by a long shot
Not much better than astrology. While this book may give some basic ideas that are useful to keep in mind while you are trying to understand your relationships with others, in the end it is just another attempt to give people answers they want even though such answers don't exist.  I'll admit that being a first or second born might have a general effect on your personality, but just how far can we take this kind of analysis?  The author of this book goes so far to offer that by knowing your own birth order and that of your same-sex parent, he can determine the birth order of your ideal match.  My father was 3rd and I was 2nd, thus I should pair with a 4th born.  Anyone who thinks about that for five seconds should realize that it is totally bogus pseudo-science.  There are too many factors involved to be able to make such predictions.  Not every Nth born is the same, and no relationship between Nth and Mth borns can be analysed this way.  As with astrology, the only thing this book can do is unnecessarily deter you from pursuing relationships with people just because they are the wrong "sign".  Who's to say I won't get along with a 2nd born?  Rather than relying on voodoo like this, we are better off just paying attention to how we actually get along with other individuals
Why continue to be deceived... Tim LaHaye, Jerry Jenkins, and others in the Pre-Trib circle, such as Ed Hindson, Tommy Ice, Chuck Missler, etc., continue to put forth the same deceptions that Hal Lindsey popularized decades ago.  The notion of a pre-tribulation rapture is foreign to scripture, it is foreign to the teachings of the early Church, and it is grooming the Church for destruction through ignorance and lack of preparation for what is really coming.  These men are novices and not prophecy "experts" or "scholars" by any stretch of the imagination; they are those who tickle the ears of gullible Christians.  Why continue to be deceived?  Tim Cohen, in his excellent book, "The AntiChrist and a Cup of Tea," provides biblically sound and testable evidence to show that the coming AntiChrist is known NOW.  Not only that, the same author (Tim Cohen) has now put out the strongest presentation on the whole issue of the rapture EVER offered to the saints of God in Christ: "The REAL Rapture".  If you really want to know the truth about the timing of the coming rapture, then you need to hear Tim Cohen's "The REAL Rapture" (based on a volume in his forthcoming "Messiah, History, and the Tribulation Period" series (see Prophecy House's web site, prophecyhouse dot com, for details on these items)
I don't care what critics say...this book was horrific. While it may have been well written, this book is disturbing and disgusting to put it mildly. If you or anyone you know are pregnant, or contemplating or trying to have children, do not read this book! This is one book I can honestly say in retrospect, I would rather have failed the test on than ever have read
Skip this book and go to the source... Dr. Cutler barely mentions the acupuncurist from whom she learned her methods, but it was probably Dr. Devi Nambudripad or someone trained by her. So skip the copier and get your information from the woman who discovered a way to truly eliminate all allergies, not just food sensitivities. Her book, Say Goodbye To Illness, is packed full of testimonials, some which include phone numbers and email addresses, which are truly miraculous. She also has a research foundation which has verified the effectiveness of her method, which is called NAET. Nambudripad's materials are much more comprehensive, and there are a lot more NAET practitioners around the country than there are BioSet practitioners. Dr. Cutler does talk more about diet and enzymes than NAET does, but it is also old info you could get in any natural healing book. I am disappointed I wasted my time on this book and will stick with  NAET
unfinished. Seemed like a good start, however pages 25 - 57 were missing and I had to return it, Am waiting for you to send it to me and I will be happy to review it the
Worst book on FX that I have ever read. I would agree with the prior review that states that author has not even tested whether what he advises works or not. This appears, in my opinion, to an amateur trader writing a trading book. In my opinion, a total waste of money. If minus stars were allowed, this one be the right candidate. Truly believe it is garbage. This of course, is my opinion, after comparing this books to all the other books on the subject that I have read
Not sure what the fuss is about... I just didn't enjoy this book. I don't mind so much that a book isn't plot driven if the language is beautiful and the ideas stimulating. With this book, however, I didn't even find the language poetic or evocative. And the ideas were so repetitive and expressed so turgidly that I stopped reading half-way through. I really thought this book could do with a whole lot of editing. It was unsubtle, self-indulgent and dull. Perhaps something got lost in the translation? So disappointed. I had been eager to read this book for ages and when it was finally available at the library I was very excited. Oh well
What exactly is of the essence here?. &quot;Everything is an echo,&quot; Ilan Stavans wrote in the essay Lost in Translation. &quot;To live is to plagiarize, to imitate, to steal.&quot; And so he does. The editorial gimmick of putting together anthologies of well-known authors under the common title 'the essential...' is usually reserved to creative writers of fiction and poetry, whose work can be somehow distilled, but Ilan Stavans is an author who has made his reputation primarily by writing about others and the editorial gimmick feels exactly like one because there is no 'essential' Stavans, only the 'echo.' I always found it disturbing to realize how ruthless and brutal Stavans has been against Latina writers, such as Ana Castillo and Sandra Cisneros (see 'Form over Content', p. 41). Stavans has been particularly dismissive of the styles conjured by Chicana writers to create their own respective worlds. The reason for such pathological fear of the language of women may be discerned in this book. Stavans' heroes are usually male writers who loom large above him--Octavio Paz, Walter Benjamin, Elias Canetti, Lionel Trilling--writers Stavans has invoked to 'explore' his own identity as a Latino-Jewish male. By his own admission, Stavans exists in the hyphen of his identity, rather than in the assertion of a self-created identity. This is why he writes so brutally against Chicana writers: because they have destroyed the paradise of hypenations, they have asserted their own identities through the difficult task of creating and molding new identities and a new language to go with it. The short stories in this book, particularly, show Stavans at his most derivative, imitating Kafka while alluding to him
Big disappointment. Sorry to be a naysayer, but I wish I could have seen this bookbefore I purchased it. It has many pages devoted to nothing (littlewords and big cartoon pictures) talking to the kid about whatmight make them upset and spectulating on how upset it mightmake them. The Dear Teachers and Parents at the beginning of thebook contains the only potentially useful information - in myopinion. It describes an exercise for the Relaxed Body - a littledifferent then some other deep exercises - though not necessarilybetter.  I felt this book had mostly wasted space.  Well, I knowthat the others reviewers felt differently but that's my take
Avoid this book like the plague that it is. This book is horrible, plain and simple. It is repetitive, there is no  point to it, and it has almost nothing to do with baseball. Kinsella, a  genius that wrote SHOELESS JOE, let me and you down with this horrible  (should i even say) effort. If you read this book, you are wasting your  time. I wish I hadn't wasted my money on it. Maybe Mr. Kinsella will refund  the cover price? I sure hope so
What?. The writing was very disjointed in my opinion.  I had to read and re-read many sentences to figure out what the author was trying to say.  It was a struggle to read. No likeable characters.  I made it to the part where it was introduced that Madeline slept with the ex-husband and current wife.  Give me a break!  I moved on immediately.  Too many good books waiting for me to waste time on this absurd tale
Underwhelmed. I, too kicked myself for falling for the marketing hype that surrounds this mediocre book. As others have noted, the text is uneven, hints a multiple authors, and is based on little more than repetitions of various ideas from pop psychology and the current interest in law of attraction systems. Feel-good platitudes abound, but little else of any depth. The book has, unfortunately, about the same level of subject depth as an average website.On a related topic, this book is an example of a very damaging trend in the publishing industry. Publishers can be wooed into printing a book entirely on the strength of the author's "platform" rather than any qualitative judgement of quality. If you have a big enough mailing list, and you can get a bunch of friends to write good Amazon reviews (see the early reviews of this book), you can get a book published no matter how poorly written.The bright side of this is that I now recognize the techniques used to activate this so-called platform. In the future I will not fall for it
Stephen King Was My Teen Years. I'd read most of King's stuff during the uh decade of  my UTe.  Salem's  Lot and Pet Cemetery being  the hook on the line and     The Stand, Shining, Christine  and   IT reeling me in.I thought he'd never come out with a book  that I didn't want to read cept anything of or related to his wife's stuff and the Gunslinger series.Then one day I started to read Insomnia and I couldn't make it to the halfway point, the antiChristian Proabortion garbage was too thick for me to ignore and I found myself throwing Insomnia away, I did that with Cider House Rules by John Irving too.Even Needful things with it's anti evangelical stuff could be ignored cause there is some truth to the anti Catholism and hypocrisy  but Insomnia was just plain mean spirited.
What good there is undermined by bigotry. Though Mr. Steyn does have strong opinions and some good observations, his judgements are tainted by an anti-gay bias (he titles one chapter "The Fags", and it's not meant affectionately).  His readings of stories such as the reaction of Lorenz Hart upon hearing "Oklahoma" in a blackout could have been better informed by further research, and he repeats Lerner's silly comment about Lorenz Hart being to short to be heterosexual so he had to turn to men.  The book is also dated in many respects including the waning influence of British Operettas and the public's acceptance of Stephen Sondheim.  Rather than this book I would reccommend anything by Ethan Mordden or Martin Gottfried
One star for being short ... ... but one star is all it gets.  It lacks sufficient depth for such an interesting topic and drags needlessly over obvious arguments.  Those attracted to teaching superficial philosophy might enjoy it, but if you've thought about the subject already save your time and money.  You've read it all before
READ THE BOOK, SKIP THE AUDIO VERSION!. I am reviewing the audio version of the book.  I would give this zero stars if I could, only because of the narration.  As usualy, Dave Barry is very funny, but it doesn't come through in this version because it's impossible to get past the narrator's reading.  In a word, he is AWFUL.  He sounds like a combination between a bad Paul Harvey impersonator and the adult voice of Ralphie in &quot;A Christmas Story.&quot;  His timing and inflection are totally wrong for the material and he completely ruins the whole book.  I couldn't get through one of the five CDs before I wanted to throw the thing out the window.  It would have been great if they had used someone like Harry Anderson (who played a fictionalized version of Dave on TV a few years ago) to read this, and then perhaps Barry's humor would have come through.  If you like Dave Barry, skip the audio book and read the paper version
A waste of money. This ghetto dude glorifies a life of pimpin,druggin,and other illicit business's he spends about 2 pages in the book talking about his so called new profession as a life coach and mentor.  I saw him on the news show fox thing in the morning in chicago and from the title of the book and his so called conversion from being a thug to being an honest businessman made me want to support the brother, but after reading this book I wished I had saved my money!I get the impression he is still probebly doing stuff that is illegal and his story is not one I would want my children or anyone I know imulating!  Life Coach?  Pulezze!  There are alot of hardworking folks who grew up poor and made it without all of the activities he is glorifying in this book.  This book is a waste of money!art
Stop killing trees. I am always interested in the intellectual history of science, particularly the Faustian dilemma.  Often we want to sell our souls to the devil for an article or a grant.  For scientists in Nazi Germany, the Faustian dilemma was to sacrifice their Jewish friends and colleagues on the altar of Nazism. Hundreds of careers were made this way.Overall, I was very disappointed with this book.  First, to fill the first hundred pages, Cornwell spends way too much time discussing WWI without any real connection to the ideological development on Nazi science and the danger of scientists who embraced Nazism fully.Second, Cornwell deals rather efficiently, without finesse or surprises for that matter, with the usual array of popularized accomplishments of Nazi science during the war.  The book reads as a companion guide to a documentary on the History channel.  Stories of V1 and V2, zyklon B, radio navigation, and the A-bomb have been told better before.Third, the book avoids the "big" moral and scientific dilemma in Nazi science: Lebensraum.  When the Third Reich occupied Poland, it relied heavily on economic analysis on the economic viability of the occupation.  Economists and sociologists walked hand in hand to analyze the most efficient way to occupy that country and to extract its human, capital, industrial, and agricultural resources.  Cornwell mentions the economic analysis of the viability of concentration camps, but that is only a small proportion on how social sciences supported the Nazi ideology.Fourth, it was hardly surprised then that genetic experiments in the concentration camps are glossed over in the book.  Benno Muller-Hill is reduced to being a reference.Fifth, the most glaring omission is the role of social sciences, which I tangentially mentioned earlier.  During the 1930s an entire generation of new academic social scientists were "manufactured" to benefit, polish, improve, and offer scientific backing to the emerging Nazi ideology.  In less than 15 years, history, sociology, economics, linguistics, geography, and political science were rewritten and reanalyzed by this committed cadre of bright, young Nazis.  Following the end of the war, these still young academics were not removed.  Although many of them wholeheartedly embraced Nazism, they were able to keep their academic appointments, except for a few of the older guard.  They sold their soul as much as the younger group; few of them were removed and some became marginalized not because they were Nazis.  Those who kept their academic positions served as teachers, professors, and advisors to a new class of students. Few of these academics retired before the 1970s and they dominated the German intellectual contribution in social sciences for over 50 years from Nazism to social democracy.
Terrible!  Don't buy it!. The box looks like the calender is in color , but it is black and white. The jokes are not funny and the pictures are poor quality. Not only that , the cats aren't doing anything bad like the calender suggests. They are just regular house cat pictures doing practically nothing but sitting around with stupid captions below. This calender I would not recommend. I got it as a gift and was so disappointed I had to write a review right away to say Don't Buy It! This suck
disappointed. I have twin 5-year olds and we travel every chance we get, from local treats, National Parks, and campouts, to the Smithsonian, old forts, and amusement parks, but I found it hard to take this book seriously when Disney World is actually not one of the 500 places to take your kids before they grow up but the Museo del in Prado in Spain is (recommended for ages 6 and over...having been there, the 7,000 paintings, although lovely, will not hold the attention of a 6-year old...unless he was born in a leap year).  You can add the Louvre, or Borobudur, or the Huntington Library for that matter.  I have been to 212 of the places in this book -- many of them worth mentioning for older people.  I am a fan of educational trips and stops, but a little fun is also necessary for the young ones, and this book makes it near impossible to actually plan a trip that drifts along from the locations in this book.  And really, Disney is the happiest place on Earth (I swear I don't work for them....but ask your kid -- Disney or the Hermitage?)
Didn't Hold Up Over the Years. What was an exciting adventure novel back in the 1970's for a young pre-teen (was I ever so young?) on re-reading now turns out to be a silly James Bond knock-off/Summer beach book. The most grating conceit is the author's habit of giving every *single* female charactor a "clever" name (Anna Bidet - French, Randi Knickers-English, Jemima Brown-African American, etc...). It hasn't aged well
Book of Reprints. Be forwarned, this book merely reprint articles from past (and some may say ancient) issues of Model Railroader magazine.  An expert model-railroader could probably create some of them, however, for a novice this provides little more than ideas for layouts.  Also, many of the plans are for HO and N scale, with very few O scale layouts.Overall, I'd say there are better layout books out there for you to spend your money on
Mixed feelings. I would be the first to praise Alice Walker's skill as a story teller, and her prose always entertains me and makes me think. That's why I gave this book the stars I gave it. I don't mind the 'out there' spirituality. I don't buy it, but I have no deep gripe against it either. What I find depressing and surprisingly childish about this book is the implied contention that if women of color ran the world, everything would be good and just. The simple truth of humanity is that it is power that corrupts, not whiteness or gender. If women of color ruled the world instead of white men, they would simply become the newest oppressors, in my opinion. I keep trying to enjoy Alice Walker's books for more than their style and skillful prose, but the message of reverse racism is still there. I am white, but I am not evil/privileged/pathetic/racist/oppressive/smug/whatever. If I were, I would not keep trying to read Alice Walker. I wish she would open her mind to that possibility
House of Kolor Advertisement. Overall the book didn't flow well.  For instance, there were pictures on pages that the text didn't relate to.  It did have some good tips but it probable should have been titled "How To Paint With House Of Kolor" than anything else.  It definitely would have been better if he had used generic materials instead of House Of Kolor this and House of Kolor that
Rip-Off. This book is a joke.  For a beginner looking for a comprehensive guide for investing, don't buy this book, unless you want a lesson in being ripped off.  This book is the size of a coaster, the kind you find next to the checkout at the pharmacy about how to get various stains out of your argyle socks.  It's made up to look cute; a two inch hardcover tomb, complete with dustjacket.  Misspellings and grammatical errors abound in this nugget.  Aspects of investing are listed, but not explained to any extent that might help someone actually pick stocks.  "A Fool And His Money Are Soon Parted," by Peter Lynch.  Buy another one of his books (a "big kid" book), but not this one
BORING!. I was able to finish this book, unlike Gilead but this author is soooo boring!  Will not read another by her, no matter what the reviews
Oh , Do Enlighten Us John. Yeah, I happen to agree that the Bush administration is incompetent. Bush spends like a drunken democrat (Teddy K.?) and he's even slower than Democrat John Conyers. Watching grass grow is more exciting than listening to Conyers string out a simple sentence for five minutes. I do give Bush credit for nominating Roberts and Alito to the Supreme Court. Maybe they can marginalize the ACLU witch Ginsberg who was foisted on us by the pathetic, zipper-challenged Clintoon. Dean comes across like a jailhouse snitch. So sneaky, the way he ratted out Nixon for glory. Let's face it - a little break-in to the dem headquarters to snoop around is nothing compared to Marxist Hillary hiring the hapless Livingstone to secretly peruse hundreds of confidential FBI files on Hill's "enemies. And they said Nixon was paranoid? Then there's Bill Clintoon selling secrets to China and pardoning drug runners like Dan Lassiter and neer-do-wells like Mark Rich and on and on ad infinitum. Dean is just insipid the way he lurks on the fringes waiting to capitalize on the misfortunes and screwups of others. The recycled title sounds so self serving - Hey, somebody look at me! I'm the selfless, heroic sneak who exposed Nixon and I need attention. Buy my book and line my pockets. So blatantly opportunistic-- all IMHO
Too old fashioned. This book provides an interesting framework but lacks the modern thinking of the Third Wave by Smith and Fingar and contains more of the old Business Process Reengineering stuf
Don't buy me!. Listen to all the other reviewers. It's THAT bad. I was at the airport facing a nice relaxing trip & saw the book & bought it despite the bad reviews on here, thinking: it can't be THAT horrible. It is. Oh, how beautiful is Jason. Oh, how beautiful is Halle. Oh, how dumb & boring could a story be? I only finished the book because of my long love of CC's books. I SHOULD HAVE FOUND OTHER THINGS TO DO.
Sophie's Choice Gone Wrong. This is the story of Stingo, a 22 y/o aspiring writer in NYC in 1947 who meets a pair of lovers, Sophie and Nathan, at his boarding house and is drawn into their dysfunctional relationship, falling in love with both and witnessing their self-destruction.  Nathan is a mentally deranged and drug-addicted genius.  Sophie is a haunted Polish survivor of Auschwitz.  Her story unfolds as she confides to Nathan the awful truths of her unwillingness to join the Polish resistance, her eventual capture over a small infraction and her heart-destroying choice when she arrives in the camp--she must decide which of her children will live and which will be sent immediately to the gas chamber.While Nathan and Sophie are both fascinating, fully-realized characters with terrible obstacles, Stingo, the narrator, is about as imbecilic a person as ever an author has entrusted his narrative to.  Despite his thirty or so years of perspective on the events of '47 which he is relating, he seems to possess little or no wisdom about them, no intriguing viewpoints about his life or his friends' tragedies, and his actions and attitudes at the age of 22 are so immature and superficial as to be almost unbearable.  The novel is far too long--it could be nearly cut in half and only benefit.  The narrative style is foolishly ponderous, far over-written, especially in the first half.  And in the end while the structure of narrator/observer seems like a fine choice in the abstract, the specific narrator and his terrible lack of wisdom only interferes with the heartbreaking story of Nathan and Sophie.In the end, the narrator never even approaches the key question in my mind:  why did Sophie so quickly choose Eva to die rather than Jan?  A lack of true understanding of what would happen to the girl?  A blind panic?  A preference for her son, the sort of harmless preference many parents may harbor that is never important because we are never asked to choose?  It is this having chosen which seems more than the other tragedies to have really destroyed Sophie, and yet it's glossed over in the narrative.  In fact, it's followed by Sophie and Stingo having an endless night of 'fu---ng' as the novel would put it.  Really?  Almost hard to believe Sophie could get it together to have peremptory sex after her drinking and her terrible revelations.  She uses sex to escape with her lover Nathan, but it's hard to imagine this all-night sexcapade Stingo relates.  Could it be that Styron only knows how to connect people through sex?How this could be considered one of the greatest American novels of all time is a mystery to me.  The potential is there, but only a truly talented, dedicated editor could have rescued the book from itsmany structural and linguistic failures
For Jabber's sake, what a disappointment!. China Mieville's first two novels set in the world of Bas-Lag gave him a well-deserved reputation as the most important young writer working in the sci fi/fantasy genres today. In Perdido Street Station and The Scar, Mieville created a neo-Dickensian milieu of bizarre, terrible, but deeply compelling grotequeries inhabited by complex, often-conflicted characters. Both narratives gained momentum over hundreds of pages, even as each sprawled further into and then away from the teeming city of New Crubozon, and  all of it was illuminated by Mieville's powerfully intelligent, pleasingly baroque prose style.So, what happened with Iron Council? Mieville's third Bas-Lag book is confusing, meandering, and populated by shallow, underdeveloped, highly unlikeable characters. His writing style is choppy throughout and routinely defies the most basic rules of grammar and usage; perhaps he was aiming for profundity (think David Foster Wallace), but he achieved only preciousness at best, and tedium more often. The narrative-such as it was, given his penchant herein for flashbacks, deus ex machinas, and withheld information-had holes in it one could (pardon the pun) drive a train through. The plot progressed as if he didn't know where it was going when he was writing it. Above all, Iron Council was agonizingly dull-I could hardly wait for the book to be over with and finished.Many have correctly noted that this is Mieville's most explicitly political novel. Since his politics are Euro-socialist in character, perhaps you might think I was put off by that-but no. I am myself that rara avis, an American social-democrat of long standing, and I have little but sympathy for tales of community-level collectives (a la the Paris Commune) or worker oppression (a la the transcontinental railroad)-and both themes and their thinly veiled historical antecedents are prominent in Iron Council. But largely because of Mieville's failure to draw fuller, more sympathetic characters (Cutter is a whiny jackass; Judah Low is a cipher) or to sustain a believable and interesting narrative (the Council itself is an irritating community prone to sudden, inexplicable shifts of opinion as to its raison d'etre-but never mind, as it doesn't finally appear until hundreds of pointless pages have passed following the interminable wanderings of Cutter & Co. and the similarly unlikeable Ori back in New Crobuzon), and with it all undermined by his annoying staccato voice and sometimes incoherent descriptions of events, whatever merits Mieville's radically politicized story may have had get thoroughly lost in the shuffle.In his previous novels, nothing felt like a "set piece"; everything that happened usually played a crucial role in why subsequent events turned out as they did. In Iron Council, by contrast, one senses more a rote succession of staged novelty acts, as if Mieville were making use of every half-developed idea he'd ever had. (Take the attack of the "inchmen," for one instance.) In a similar vein, the major characters in his earlier Bas-Lag were sometimes morally ambiguous, but that just made them consistently interesting and complicated. As many have commented, the most noteworthy thing about two of the major characters in Iron Council is their homo- or bisexuality, and yet while this is a promising and perhaps vaguely daring premise in the usually hyper-heterosexual world of fantasy fiction, it seems a choice made more for shock effect than anything essential to them or the plot. Their sexuality is clearly intended to be-but is very poorly realized as-vital to these characters' "being-ness," and thus it contributes almost nothing to our understanding of them. In fact, Cutter's passionate possessiveness toward Low makes him seem, more than anything, one-dimensional and frequently grating-hence, Cutter's sexuality becomes more of a negative trait, which seems rather incongruous with Mieville's anti-intolerance politics.SPOILER ALERT-Just a few plot objections concerning the end of the book (though there were plenty of others throughout): Why wouldn't the militia have destroyed or booby-trapped the tracks just outside of New Crobuzon? Why hadn't they sought out and found their cohorts and the Council in the weeks prior to the train's approach, just as Cutter had? Why can't any of the refugees from the city give the Council a reasonably straight answer as to whether or not the Collective had already been vanquished? (It had.) And most of all, how does the "time golem" manage to continue in existence even after Judah Low has been killed? Finally, and in a completely different vein, why does Mieville use the word "career" as a verb over and over again?But enough already. I have never before had my expectations so shattered by an author. I am astounded that anyone would think that this book is on a par with-or even better than-Mieville's previous Bas-Lag novels (though the wider consensus seems to be one of disappointment, more or less). Unfortunately, though, Mieville received some of the best and widest mainsteam-media reviews of his career with Iron Council, and if he believes his clippings, I'm afraid we may in for more outings like this. But his earlier works provide a far better indication of his prodigious talents, and so  I will fervently hope that he can still return to that form with his next novel.
Creed of Iron needs sources and better artwork. Do not get me wrong... The book is  an interesting read and should at least help wake the millions of slumbering folk by at least making people think about something other than coffee, SUV's and work.  It is even a pleasurable read, but come on... No sources???? It would be nice to know where the author got some of his claims and "facts" if not only for the purpose of chasing down further reading.  With no sources the entire book is weakened and really is just the opinions of 14 words press.  Therefore, it comes off as a little too much like a sermon, rather than serious philosophical thought.  A further problem is the simplistic childish artwork.  I felt like I was reading a childrens book at times.  One would do much better to read something historical or by Thorsson.
Prosy or clunky, and not as faithful as it might be. First, it ought to said that, as poetry in English, this translation of Rimbaud fails utterly. Mason indicates in the introduction that he attempts to walk the line between literal and 'poetic' translation. If by this he means that he neither resorts to the kind of inanity with which Paul Schmidt destroyed Rimbaud for late 20th-century Americans, nor to the faithful but poetically unsatisfying Fowlie edition, then he's telling at least a version of the truth. But who could not, with fluent French and enough time, translate French works faithfully into prose? And yet because he is comparatively a novice writer in English of the analogous sort of poetry to that which Rimbaud wrote in French, the concessions and compromises he must make are just terrible as regards both the literal and technical aspects of the poems. Concerning the early (verse) poems, it becomes quickly clear that the translator has no skill as a versifier. Translating requires a resourcefulness bred of technical experience. I don't know if Mason writes original poems, but if so they must be of a very modern sort, which is to say contemporary (as opposed to Modernist) free verse. Of course few people now have good ears for versification, but to those who do--to those who wish a translation to convey something of the greatness, at least, of the original--the technical performance sounds woefully like that of a beginner. His rhymes are forced, his syntax is wrenched for rhymes that aren't particularly good in the first place, and his meter is extremely slack if it exists at all. This is particularly a problem as the greatness of Rimbaud's 40-some-odd early poems derives in large part from his technical genius. To take at random only one of many examples, in his translation of "Les Corbeaux," Mason translates what in English means roughly "Strange army with [your] harsh cries,/Cold winds are ravaging your nests" as "Strange armies with cries that crack/ Cold nests that winds attack." This contains the sort of forcing of rhymes that an adept poet would know to avoid. Mason has added highly unnatural demonstrative pronouns to these two very short phrases in order to get a rhyme whose first element "crack" is way off. The result is an ugly fragment. Of course crows' cries might be described as cracking, but not in this poem. The same translation ends with "Alas" which is no where in the original, and is again inserted for rhyme's sake. Falling as it does at the end of the last line, it makes the poem sound glib and world-weary. In French, the poem is certainly not glib and not exactly world-weary in the way that "Alas," as the poem's final word, makes it sound. I could go on for a page with problems I find in just this one poem. The text is filled--filled--with such clunkiness, and it makes for bad poetry _and_ bad translation of meaning. If Mason were a good, resourceful poetic translator, he would not be quite so baffled by the formal constraints. Perhaps he should have rendered a prose translation. Surely he should have worked harder at it. But I guess few are the people who know how to translate poems, and even fewer are those who can spy a bad translation
Don't waste your time. This book belongs to the George Steiner school of writing - extremely pretentious, aggressively obscure, frustratingly allusive, barely grammatical. (How can Cambridge, home of Russell and Moore, I. A. Richards and Wittgenstein, tolerate, let alone produce, this kind of pseudo-erudite claptrap?) Here is how Derrida would write if he wrote in English. Fortunately the virtues of clarity and solid, plain-spoken prose are more celebrated among English speakers than French, so Dunn is hardly likely to assume the mantle of public intellectual he so evidently craves. Move on: you're not missing anything here
Turgid and slow. Researching the history of race relations between Korean Americans and other groups, I purchased this book because of its subject matter.  Although it describes some key events in the LA riots of the early '90's, the writing leaves a great deal to be desired and the authors' thesis is not well-argued
Don't waste your time and money !!!. This book is neither good contents nor sharp predicts. What is this book?I think it is just garbage. If you want get more information for your future life and your future business, it is better that you need to read Toefler's work, The Revolutionary Wealth. Naisbitt is not present man any more. He is the past man!!!
How to Start and Manage a Coin-Operated Laundries Business. This poorly bound, poorly written book is practically stealing from people who buy it.  It is a pre-fab mess.  There is very little information that pertains to the business.  Avoid it
A real farse. I read the other reviews and thought wow, a good source of knowledge. Instead I got a book full of ridiculous "so called tools" to help in defining the data model. Meta Data Bingo? If I sent mail out as suggested in the book to play this sort of game I think I would lose all credibility with my peers. This book just does not add any value unless you are a complete idiot. Actually the only value add is $54 to the author. A real waste
Dull and Plotless. While comedian Al Franken is normally quite humorous, this novel was a bit dull. There's very little plot and after awhile every page seems like the one before it. Sure, there's the occasional funny part, but overall this book is not worth reading. Quite frankly, it's just stupid. If it didn't have Al's name on the cover it is very doubtful anyone would pick this up. If you're looking for something humorous read The Idiot Girl's Guide to Action and Adventure or The Bear Went Over the Mountain
Advice from a ghost. Don't the reader/reviewers of this book realize that Charles Givens settled numerous fraud lawsuits against him and his orginization in the early 1990's? And, oh yeah.....he died in 1998, three years before the book came out. This is just his family/publishers cashing in on outdated advice
Bait &amp; Switch. As a raw foodist, I hoped this book would help me sort out fact from fiction about cooked vs. raw, providing me with ammo for the many food critics I encounter. But Joe Alexander, in an extremely clumsy writing style, not only made the book a challenge to finish but often diverted from the subject at hand. I'm sure Tibetan rejuvenation exercise rites are valuable as are rebirthing breathing techniques, but that's not what the book title suggests
The book is a joke and a rip-off. The book is very poor. The technical part is useless. The author is either totaly confused or he's doing this on purpose trying to bluff people and get their money.  I really do not understand how McGraw Hill has accepted to publish such a ridiculous book, I beleive they should hire stronger technical advisers in the future
Novel has obvious flaws in plot and structure. The Murder Book is one in a long series featuring Alex Delaware, and only the second I've read, and most likely the last.  Kellerman does a good job characterizing Alex and gay friend Milo, but the plot is so full of contrivances and holes that it made this book very dissapointing.The book opens with Alex receiving a book with pictures of crime scenes in it dating 20 to 40 years old.  Alex calls Milo over to look at it and Milo instantly recognizes one of the pictures in there.  It is of Janie Ingalls, a case he never solved.  Milo then recalls the case and the investigation with his partner Schwinn in flashback style.  Milo and Schwinn are pulled off the case just as they gather some clues and Milo has been bothered by it ever since.Schwinn has a source who says the Ingalls girl may have been at a party thrown by a bunch of rich kids.  In the present day, Milo and Alex begin investingating the rich kids the Cossacks and their friends Michael Larner and Vance Coury.  It seems like for 200 pages they investigate the rich kids befor the dead Ingalls girl is mentioned again.The link between the murder of the Ingalls girl and then the long drawn out investigation of the Cossacks and Larners and everything that stems from that is tenious at best.  The book kind of glances over this part at the beginning, indicating Schwinn had a source who said there was a wild party at a house owned by the Cossacks.  Alex and Milo believe Ingalls and her friend may have attended the party but have no proof or real reason to believe this.  My problem is that every step that Alex and Milo take in their investigation is circumstancial, not confirmed by any hard facts.Milo and Alex do a lot of investigating, but none of their suspicions are ever confirmed by hard evidence.  The trail of crime from the Cossacks is so drawn out its hard to remember at times what the original investigation was.  Also, there is never really any contact with the bad guys at all in the book.  Then, the book ends with the horrible method of long explanation.  Milo talks with a man who basically explains everything to him about what really happened.  Milo knew some of it through his tedious investigations, but the rest is confirmed in the end.I haven't read much of this series, so I don't know much about the Bert Harrison character.  But it seems to be far fetched that a fatherly figure to Alex could be the psychiatrist to so many main characters in this book.  It seems like a cheap plot device to hand Alex the answers he is looking for.In the end I was very disappointed because Kellerman is obviously a good writer.  I just don't know what he was thinking when he threw this plot together.
Too much preaching. There really should be a disclaimer on the back of this book; the description given doesn't prepare the reader for the incessant preaching.  What could have been a decent mystery is totally ruined by the insertion of religion in nearly every sentence. If Ms. Blackstock wants her books to reach a wider audience then she needs to tone it down a lot.  If she's satisfied with "preaching to the choir" then she's done the job well because these books will never be successful out in the real world
not for me. Tsukiyama knows hwo to write beautifully, BUT her metaphors and poeticisms feel too contrived. This novel is for lonely, flighty housewives. If you enjoy daytime soaps and/or exoticized perversions of the Asian culture, you'll love Dreaming Water
Eyeless in Gaza. Hey! I gave Elizbeth Royte's book 5 stars (not 2)! The secret wonders she works in this book! Elizabeth Royte is a transformative writer, an unassuming genius who wings hers way over the jellied mundane, putrefyingly prosaic, definitively overlooked, commonly rejected stuff on earth, your dear garbage. She takes us on a grand reverse journey to rejected digesters and backs up to smelly sodden transfer stations, and we are magically rewound, swathed in strange new currents. I was surprised by my own puddled reflection, puzzling in an oily rainbow shimmer. When she asked, What can we recover? What can be reclaimed? Who will redeem the Land? I wanted to answer her Powerful questions.
Unendurable. This book was on somebody's Amazon.com LISTMANIA for Sea Turtles, so I hunted it down.  It is only vaguely about sea turtles, in that it is set on an island in Georgia where sea turtles nest.  There is a sea turtle biologist introduced at the very beginning of the book, and then he disappears, so it's obvious that he was involved in the crime.There are way too many characters in this book to keep track of and most of them are not believable or likable.  I wish this book had at least been fun to read but it was tedious and I ended up skimming the whole thing, looking for any sign of sea turtle interaction.  Skip this book and send your $6.99 to a sea turtle hospital instead.
Risque designs with little instruction. Most of the t-shirt designs in this book are just plain bizarre...  A lot of large holes cut out of the t-shirt or jagged edges cut through it.  Not something I would ever, ever wear (ok, I would maybe wear three of the 99, honestly...).  A previous reviewer had it right when she commented the designs are made for skinny women who like to show off.  This targeted demographic isn't a problem, but this is definitely not a book for every woman, and (if I had children) I wouldn't give it to my daughters as inspiration for art projects.Also, there are zero actual pictures in the book and relatively little instruction.  There is one color drawing of each design (so of course it looks great) and a cursory explanation of how it was created.I think this book might be more appropriate for someone who has some creative sewing juices but needs a little extra help thinking of unique designs to create and someone who is not afraid to show off
Waste of time, waste of paper, waste of money. This book does have one merit. The thermodynamic tables in the back are extensive and easy to read. There is a wealth of information there that makes this a worthwhile reference book.However, this book is first and foremost a textbook, and as a learning instrument it is an utter failure.The book is littered with errors. Some are trivial, such as misspelled words or incorrect references. However, many are serious errors such as incorrect formulas or errors in the answer key and can leave you dumbfounded as you try to figure out how a seemingly impossible miracle of mathematics can take place.I remember one incident where I spent almost two hours working on one problem, trying everything I could think of to get my answer to line up with the answer in the back of the book. I eventually gave up and asked my professor the next day. He worked it out and it turned out that my original answer was correct and the book was wrong! This was an all-too-frequent experience for me as I used this book, and if I had a nickel for every minute I wasted finding errors in this book I would have an easy time paying for my other textbooks.Second, the book is incredibly confusing. I had over a 3.7 GPA going into Thermo I and was in my university's honors program. I don't typically have problems with comprehending textbooks, even poorly written ones. However, this book is totally incomprehensible to a student who has never taken a course in thermodynamics. The logic meanders to and fro apparently lacking any direction. The main points of each chapter are often hidden and poorly outlined. The explanations sometimes get sidetracked by pointless trains of thought, making it rather hard to pay attention. It might as well be in Greek.Third, the book makes almost no connection between theory and practice. If you are a visual learner, you are completely out of luck. I can't remember one single picture in the book. Most textbooks utilize pictures just for the sake of having pictures or to give the author an excuse to write a new revision. This book is in dire need of a few well-chosen pictures, but all you will get are a plethora of vague and boring diagrams. An appropriate picture can help a student make the transition from theory (in this case, the text and discussion of the book) to practice (the problems). I found that I could (with great difficulty) translate the unintelligible babble of the text into an understanding of the fundamental concepts, but when I needed to use this understanding to solve a complicated problem, the connection between theory and practice wasn't there.The sad thing is that, if your professor uses this book and assigns problems from it, you'll probably have to buy it anyway. It's a total waste and I hope your professor is a good one because you won't be learning anything in these pages
Old woman rambling. I think the Annie Dillard name is the sole reason for this "book" being published.  I write the word "book" in quotes because to call this a book is more than a bit of a stretch.  To me it reads like an old, senile person rambling nearly incoherently about things her mind has lost the ability to grasp for longer than a sentence or two.  I can see only one very general theme come out of this - that people are a product of the earth.  Why does it take 200+ pages to relate that no-longer-new theme?  And relating the theme is all the book does - no explanation, no analysis of the theme, nothing beyond merely stating it in a very long-winded and oblique way.  I hate to be so critical of this work, but I hope to save others the trouble of buying and reading this incoherent mess.
Let's reinforce gender differences from the start. It's great that little girls who are being potty trained are learning that they have a 'pee pee' and all, but what the heck is a 'pee pee' anyway? I always thought that 'pee pee' comes out of a 'wee wee' and not the other way around.I was originally intrigued that there were both 'boy' and 'girl' books...is their anatomy so different that they need different books? Apparently not, as the 'once upon a potty-girl' book also says that girls have 'pee pee's'...So I guess the only difference is the color of the flowers...not sure why you need separate books. It's nice though that they have a spanish version of this volume too so our espanol speaking friends can teach their children the value of gender differences too...blue for boys, pink and purple for girls. Maybe the chamber pot style toilets in the book actually exist in a spanish speaking country somewhere...maybe...
Confusing but amusing. My 1 1/2 yr old laughs but I don't think it's bc the airplane is inside the airport. This RS I would not buy along w/ the bedtime stories one.  The ULTIMATE RICHARD SCARRY is the Splish Splash Sounds book. Please and Thank You is really good too. There's some RS author controversy out there -something about the books not all being truly written by the RS author..
Blah Blah Blah Blah....too much talk, not enough action. This book is putting me to sleep! I bought it a few days ago and have spent that ENTIRE time reading. I'm more of a visual learner, usually the TYI21D books are very hands-on. So far, this one is harshly hands-off! How can I be expected to remember all this information? I need examples, not just charts. It doesn't look like its going to get any better later in the text, I've scanned-through the book several times wondering when this terribly detailed nonsense will end and from what I've seen, it continues through the entire book. -yawn
Interesting Tests, Not Insightful Results. This book has some interesting tests to take-- how romantic are you?  How much do you know about Sex?  How aggressive are you?I was hoping to learn more about myself by taking these tests.  The results on some tests are difficult to calculate.  But once you muddle through and find your score - you are not really given a good explanation of what your results mean.  It tells me very little about myself that I scored with the top 10 percent of those taking the test.  I was hoping for explanations of what my answers say about me.  This book lacks any deep thought-provoking explanations about your answers.  I was hoping for it to say something about my personality.  I was looking for more explanation into who I am based on the results of the tests.  This book lacks the "that's interesting" factor from your test results. I was a bit disappointed by that. I took the tests and it seemed to reveal very little about the real me.
Short-Changed. I was excited when I saw this book at my local book store and after flipping throught it made an immediate decision to purchase.  I wish now I had looked at it a little longer before buying.  There are parts of this book that I just loved and parts that I hated... because they were not there.  While I feel that this has the potential to be a wonderful reference overall, I feel short-changed because of the sections missing which dealt with some important bikes.  This is in spite of the advertising on the back cover which clearly states that it contains information on every American motorcycle made in the relevent time frame.  For example, this book divides the Excelsior chapter into two parts.  It covers Excelsior from 1907 to 1924 and states on the bottom of page 105 that "The Super-X is treated as a seperate marque later in the book."  Well, it's not there.  The 15 page section they did on the big Excelsior is wonderful, but Excelsior's Super-X is nowhere to be found.  I felt cheated. If they had done half as good covering the "Super-X" as they had done with the earlier Excelsiors, I would have been very happy.  Also missing is the section covering the Yale motorcyle.  Page 25 says "Yale data are contained within the Yale section."  Well, once again there is no Yale section.  Overall, an important work.... fatally flawed by omissions.
The Audio book of this title sent me to sleep!. First of all, I want to make this clear that the two stars I give to this title has nothing to do with the content of the book. It has everything to do with the Author's reading of this book!I bought the CD version of this book and found that the Author's reading of the content of this book was not impressive at all. He delivered the speech in a dragging and delibrately slow fashion.His voice was tense and unnatural. This gave me the feeling that he was not confident during the recording of this CD version in the studio.I was greatly dissappointed with this CD version. He did not deliver as I would expect from an expert negotiator. I almost fall into a sleep 20 mins into listening his CD!  I thought "what happened to him? He does not speak like respectable negotiator. Why would an negotiator speak in such a boring & weak tone, almost dragging every single words he speaks. I wouldn't want to listen to a slow speaker. He bores me to death! I going to stop playing this CD!"Believe me, I am not exegerating. I would advice you to buy his book. Save your money, don't buy the CD version! It's not worth it.By contrast, Brian Tracy is more competent in this area. I have listened to Brian Tracy's Audio Book. You won't regret buying any  of his Audio CD; I can assure you!  His deliverance in the Audio books is commendable. He speaks with a clear voice, not too fast, not too slow, very natural and this reveals his self confidence.He does not only read from scripts, he speaks from it.
Not helpful. This book looks good only at first sight. However, try and solve the exercises and you see there is more to VaR than the author wants us to believe. This book is too incoherent to be of any use. Just take a look at the index: A lot of things are introduced but are never used again later in the book. This makes me wonder why they were introduced at all. Some examples from the index: Hessian, GARCH, Markov process, etc.The biggest fault however in my opinion is the treatment of Monte Carlo, the most essential tool for VaR calculation: Condensed in roughly 30 pages compared to roughly 110 pages for mathematical preliminaries and probability cannot cater to the same audience
Living in a bubble. I read this book with absolutely no knowledge of Barna, his revolution, or any biases in relation to it.  I would like to make the comment that this book is seriously flawed in the superficial and short-sightedness that it demonstrates.Thankfully, the author does not claim to have pulled any of his data that he uses to support his theory from anywhere other than the American churches.  However, he then uses it to apply to the Church, which is global in nature, and that is the book's serious flaw.  It is short-sighted in that he does not seem to apply anything about the global Church and local churches to his theories other than what is happening, according to his observations, in the US.  While there may be some value to these insights, I resent that he is equating what he observes in American churches as what is happening and will happen in the global Church.I'd like to see him ask the question why while American churches, in his opinion, are failing, are so many churches globally flowering and prospering?  What makes him think that American churches, which make up a MINORITY of all churches worldwide, should be the sole trendsetter.  From the perspective of what is presented in this book, it seems the author is living in a bubble and is making a superficial and overly generalized prediction for the Church.Sure, this book is easy to read and understand.  Sadly, I believe it is actually the poorer for these qualities.  If it weren't, I could at least try to believe that his writing is not as superficial as it is.
incoherant and inconcise. Using this book as a required text for a brush up/seminar course for an MBA program, I've found this book did not do enough reviewing for me with regards to creating financial reports-- income statement, statement of cash flows, balance sheet, etc. I had managerial accounting, financial accounting and financial management in undergrad, however, this book still lacks the concrete basics of "what goes where on a financial report and why". Speaking to my undergrad accounting department chair, I found my opinion agreed with her's-- Kimmel is verbose and lacks clarity/simplicity for those without an accounting focus or background
The  mystical magical wonderful book. The book was about a girl named Jennifer and a toad that she bought from a magic shop for a school  project about pets.   The only thing she did not know about the toad was that the toad,bufo, could talk.   I would recomend this book to people who like Fairy tales , or books with  magic. The characters in this story are Jennifer ,Ellen, Mr Elives, Sharra, Skippy, Brandon,Mrs.Murdley, and Bufo the toad.   My opinion of this story was that it was not so good but ok. I thought the book was boring
For the rich and dedicated. Deals mostly with higher demominations of chips.  Many people like myself collect as we travel and only collect $1 chips
Katz does have a problem but it isn't a midlife crisis. Jon Katz does have a problem but it isn't a midlife crisis.  This is a book about an unemployed New Jersey writer who deserts his family for a couple of months to &quot;find himself&quot; by embarking on an odyssey to a local Vermont vacation home only to find that he's bored and runs back to his family for entertainment and a cure for his own shallowness.  The &quot;mountain&quot; is a hill off a local Vermont highway.  The &quot;spiritual transformation&quot; is analogous to that of a couch potato who feels hungry during Monday night football and heads back to the fridge to discover  replenishment.  The man has no insight.  His thoughts and observations are as shallow as Howard Stern.  He attempts to lend some credibility and substance to his ramblings by comparing himself with Thomas Merton and dragging Merton anecdotes in to pad the book where Katz clearly has nothing substantive to offer.  Save a tree and avoid this book at all costs.  Better yet, write your own and offer the rest of us something worthwhile to ponder rather than this drivel.  If you read this book you will understand why Katz was unemployed when he wrote it
This probably isn't the book you're looking for. If you're looking for the text of the Gospel of Judas, you want the one edited by Rudolphe Kasser, Marvin Meyer, and Gregor Wurst and published by National Geographic, under ISBN 1426200420.Robinson's book is a narrative that was written without seeing the manuscript of the Gospel.  Apparently, he tried to jump on the Judas bandwagon with very little to go on.  So don't be deceived by the title...
"The Bell Curve" in new clothes -- empirical lies and logical fallacies included. I jotted down more than 200 words of notes on just the first 10 pages of this book, so egregious are its wrongs.That includes lies told from within his own scientific field of expertise by anthropologist Vincent Sarich.An example?On page 9, Sarich claims that the Out-of-Africa hypothesis of modern Homo sapiens dates that to about 50,000 BCE.This is not incontrovertible. To the point, anthropology shows modern Homo sapiens outside Africa long before that date. And, even if 50,0000 BCE is taken as the point for some final "breakout" beyond Africa and the neighboring edge of the Middle East, Sarich's idea deliberately glosses over "backwash" -- migration back into Africa, primarily from neighboring parts of the Middle East, but also from elsewhere. (Witness the colonization of Madagascar by people from south India in the last few thousand years.)Besides, how can Sarich fit those "smart as a whip" Jews, living oh so close to "Darkest Africa," into this hypothesis?More seriously, the Jebel Qafzeh skull from Israel is the most commonly known candidate for the oldest modern Homo sapiens skull ever found. It dates to between 92,000-115,000 years of age.On page 1, the authors misinterpret a Lincoln quote about the difference between races, and infer that, rather than talking about the sociologocial fallouts from a clearly perceived difference in skin colors, Lincoln was talking about deeper differences in physical attributes.The last paragraph of page 3 has a logically fallacious appeal to authority, which the authors continue throughout the first chapter of the book.At the bottom of page 4, the authors appear to make a logically and empirically unwarranted jump, from all humans distinguishing other humans and classifying/chunking them into certain groups, to an almost Platonic-ideal concept called "race."Page 9 - Going with their unproven -- and logically fallacious idea-generating -- 50,000 year date for the evolution of modern Homo sapiens, Miele and Sarich then use this to bootstrap their own arguments about the degree of difference between races, claiming this shows how rapidly human evolution can progress. It's clear circular reasoning based on an already assumed point of view.Pages 9-10 have a laughably racist "genetic" rather than sociological assumption of evidence for various types of athletic prowess. (I await every new world-class African swimmer or hockey player to refute "athetics of the gaps" thoughts like this.)More seriously, here's a sociological counterexample. Chinese children, and adults, are known from research to have an above-average percentage of musical perfect pitch. Genes?And, the piece de resistance on page 10 -- the "mean sub-Saharan African IQ of 70." All together, now, can we say Bell Curve?How ironic that coauthor Miele is a senior editor of Skeptic magazine, because this book warrants incredible amounts of skepticism
Don't waste your money. After spending a lot of money to buy the book and the ingredients for recipes in this book, everything I tried was a tasteless flop.  You'll be better off to use regular recipes and just leave off the salt
Confusing Nervous with Dishonest. This man obviously knows nothing about human behavior. Most people know that just because someone can't hold your eye contact does not mean that they are being dishonest. In more cases than not, they simply have low self-esteem are very self-conscious, and are thinking about themselves constantly in social interactions just like you or I might do when asked to do improv. This man himself is a manipulator, and a liar. He's manipulating you to get this book,  taking advantage of those who refuse to learn how to read people from experience. Lying and "hypnotizing" people in order to get the truth out of them, is far less effective than being honest yourself. If you are honest you will recognize honesty and you will recognize liars. You will start to have an understanding of people's energies if you just pay attention
Digressive is right. The cover of the book calls it wildly digressive. Too true! I want to read this book but I find myself becoming infuriated with the writing style. In addition, there are four people who &quot;speak&quot; in the novel. But they all sound alike. They are incapable of saying anything without going off into multitudes of tangents full of literary illusions. This takes more patience than I have
Don't waste your time. Fontane's examination of upper class Germany in the nineteenth century ultimately proves to be a scathing indictment of the &quot;me first&quot; mentality, but, and this is important:  NOTHING HAPPENS.  For about 200 pages Fontane wastes the readers' time by doing what could be done in about 30 pages:  He shows how messed up the whole aristocratic scene was.  Yeah, so they commit adultery an lie to each others face, you don't have to drag it out for so damn long.  All in all, it makes me feel good to NOT be a rich upper class waster.  And once the hammer drops (about 35 pages before the book ends) it still doesn't matter that Fontane has built these characters up:  They are all the same exact characters in different bodies.  I didn't feel anything for Effi or Instetten or anyone else except Roswitha, and her only because her dad chased her aroudn with a red-hot poker when she was a young girl
Very Hard to Replicate. Beautiful pictures, but the dishes were nearly impossible to replicate and some were overly arranged.  Food as art.  Some of the ingredients are unavailable or overly expensive.  But the pictures in the book are fabulous
Pompous wannabe adventurer doctor. Kamler, makes me want to puke. this pompous, arrogant wannabe adventurer writes like he is gods gift to high adventure. Maybe being the onsite doctor is an excuse for not summiting. Perhaps a more noble pursuit would be to help innocent people that are injured without being self-destructive. In my opinion there is nothing more dangerous than a pompous arrogant doctor that fancies himself the guru of high adventure medical treatment. Go back to being a hand surgeon you [...]
A very credible book, except......... It was interesting to read a review that commented " It is still true, you can not find any study in those countries about Christianity".That statement is absolute fiction of course - especially in the 33 Jesuit schools in Syria. Perhaps in the west, it has slipped our minds that Jesus was born in the middle east, and we adopted this middle east religion from them.... The eastern Churches very much study Christianity, and many Muslims around them in the Levant, since Jesus is reverred in Islam. John the Baptist's head is maintained in a memorial monument in the middle of the Ommayad Mosque in Damascus.The most noted manuscripts used for our common bibles today, were discovered in Alleppo (Syria).Cursory research reveals Lewis's connections to Intelligence, and that speaks for itself. This book should be read, to balance it, in conjunction with 'Hostage to Khomeini' and 'Venice's War Against Western Civilization', unless one wishes to be taken for a very sophisticated ride. Better still, one could reside in the middle east for a while and see for one's self instead of amplifying other people's writings without the slightest ability, credential or experience to determine whether or not they might be accurate. But be ready for shock - it has little in common to the Psy-Ops portraits we have been spoon-fed with by western media, moronic television porgammes (suchas Fox), and artful books such as this.It's still a fine read, and awfully convincing - it hit it's mark in that respect. Much knowledge on Christianity - one wonders of the author hails from Christian ancestors ?Continuing the other review - that people in the middle east would supposedly benefit greatly from reading this book was also amusing, to say the least. People from the Middle East would benefit best from a good lawyer and a truth serum, given the looting and plunder of their resources..
My First Koontz Reading. For the first 15 or 16 chapters of Sole Survivor, I was intrigued and interested.  I found myself, as I usually do, trying to visualize where the story was going and continuing to read to confirm what I was feeling.  When the story finally got to the point of enlightening the reader about the engineered children at Technologik, I found myself thinking, "I didn't think of that one."  The main part of the story that disappointed me was the last couple of chapters.  The story just ended when I felt the was more that needed to be explained.  There were too many gaps from being chased out of the cabin through the woods and then all of a sudden on the beach when the story ended.  It left me wanting to know more....
A Big Disapointment. This book is a big disapointment. The begining chapters have some useful information, but much of it can easily be found on the web. The 220 franchises they list have no supporting information on why they're the best. The information they provide seem like condensed versions of the franchisor's flyers
A total disappointment and very depressing. I've always been a huge fan of Nicholas Sparks, and I couldn't wait to read Dear John. Well, there was no reason to rush. It starts out okay, but then just gets more and more depressing. The main girl character is annoying and you hope that John will find someone who deserves him, instead of just pouting over her for most the book.I cannot wait for another Nicholas Sparks book, but only because I want to know that he hasn't lost his touch, and that this novel was just a fluck
The PC Version of the End of the World. Max Brooks has written a must-have history for Romero (or just Zombie) fans every where.  Unfortunately, while the story starts off strong, it soon dribbles into a series of disjointed and, occasionally, pointless vignettes.It would be a difficult tale for anyone to carry, given the format that Brooks has chosen to use: a large number of first person accounts of the near take over of the world by the stumbling zombie hordes.  There's no single narrative string for the audience to follow and no heroes with which the reader can identify.  I found myself eventually becoming bored with the different ways that Max's characters described the zombies - there's only so many ways to say "undead."To make up for the essential sameness of the story line in every individual short story, Max begins to increasingly rely on overblown rhetoric.  For example, a chain-smoking military veteran, recovering in a psychiatric ward, breaks out of semi-literate street-slang to describe zombie heads popping like "Kristal corks." Far from being effectively descriptive, it becomes a distraction that made me start looking for more examples of excessive hyperbole.I think the book would have held up better if, in addition to the large number of independent accounts, Max had found a way to weave a single unifying thread, giving his audience some one to root for and a reason to keep reading. A difficult, but not impossible task and Max Brooks appears to have the talent needed to pull such a task off; but the lack of heroes, or even characters most readers can identify with, makes this a book with no compelling reason to finish.  You can stop on one page, flip at random through the book, start reading again and never feel like you've lost your place.And speaking of heroes - this is really a minor complaint, but once you've figured it out it begins to annoy - Max's characters are all of a type: a PC type.That is, such heroes as the various stories allow, are divided into sympathetic and non-sympathetic groupings.  The sympathetic, most effective, characters are all minorities, women, or handicapped.  The non-sympathetic, least effective, characters are all white and male.  His bias goes so far that there's not a single heroic cop, survivalist NRA member, or even effective military unit.  The president of the United States (sympathetic-minority) is contrasted against the vice-president (unsympathetic-white) by citing many instances of the great president's wise guidance, while the vice president is simply described as "the wacko."I'm not saying that it's impossible for the world to be saved by any particular group.  It's Max's book and he can take the tale where ever he wants.  But it's so transparently obvious a bias that, once you figure it out, you find yourself mentally forecasting the characters entirely independently of their stories.  It's a stretch and distracts from what could have been a more balanced (and more interesting) tale as a result.All that said, I started out by saying that tome is a "must-have" for Romero loving Dead-heads like me and I stand by that statement. For all it's rambling plot and hyper-kinetic speech, it's still the best new installment in the zombie pantheon for many a day.  I predict great success in it's admittedly limited demographic.
My kids won't eat this stuff... This might work for families with older teenagers, but my kids (10 and 13) just won't eat things like baked fish or squash or eggplant. They're not picky kids; we travel extensively and they'll eat all kids of food, but I'd say four out of five of the recipes in this book were failures at my dinner table. It's a good place to start if you have no idea how to cook for a family, but I've had much more success with Cooking Light
Utterly Average. I was scouting around for a new British crime series to start and heard good things about Peter Robinson. So, when I came across this second in the Inspector Banks series, it seemed like fate was telling me to dive in. However, I and my wife both found it a severely disappointing, utterly unimpressive procedural. I can only surmise the series gets better over subsequent volumes, because this is utterly average stuff.Inspector Banks has recently relocated form London to sleepy rural Yorkshire and is still getting a feel for the lay of the land (following his first case in Gallows View). One day a retired historian turns up dead in a field near the village of Helmthorpe, leaving Banks with an old-fashioned whodunit. Pretty quickly, the stable of suspects is established: his widow (who inherits a nice legacy), his old friend and publisher, his mystery-writing drinking pal, his local GP and drinking pal, a local entrepreneur developer drinking pal, or the local folk singer he may have had a fling with a decade ago?Like a latter-day Miss Marple, Banks and his plod underlings go back and forth from house to house, interviewing suspects and trying to tease a semblance of motive and opportunity from their statements. Of course, like the old-fashioned constructions of Christie, we are left with lots of semi-plausible motives and seemingly few opportunities. Banks is convinced the answer lies in a fateful summer ten years ago. Meanwhile, a local teenage girl brags about seeing something the night of the murder, placing herself in danger. Will Banks be able to get to the bottom of things before the killer strikes again?!?!?It's all pretty bland stuff, and gimmick by which the murderer masks themselves is a bit of a groaner. The clues dovetail nicely, and Robinson's done a capable job of constructing a puzzler, but the story and characters are instantly forgettable. The writing is utterly without style or distinction and the Yorkshire setting never really came alive for me. It seemed a kind of generic green and pastoral land with insular people and cure stone cottages. All in all, very little to recommend here.
questionable claims and an impractical way to eat. If your body has no problems with insulin insenstitivity and you have terrific will power, then maybe this plan is right for you. but i whole heartedly disagree with his claims that certain foods with high fat content are unhealthy. ie nuts, avocados, fish oil, even butter (gasp!) he also says that eating meat in excess will cause it to rot in your intestines causing your skin and breath to smell! I've never heard of this phenomenon, I refuse to believe it, and physiologically it doesn't make sense. the only reason I gave this book one star is because of his advocation to "whole foods" which are unprocessed. contrary to what one "anti ornish" reviewer said, it's in my opinion that a huge part of the obviously unhealthy average american diet lies in the fact that heavily processed foods are bombarded with partially hydrogenated oils and preservatives. Many people in Europe eat daily by riding their bike to a local market, and preparing food that would otherwise spoil in a day or two. AND THAT IS A GOOD THING! the less a food is injected with man made hormones and chemical preservatives, the better off you are eating it. Long story short, if your protein needs aren't large and you don't have an insulin sensitivity problem, then you may lose fat  and become a bit healthier on this diet. otherwise, just make an effort to eat foods in moderation. it's as simple as that! cut out as much sugar and trans fats as possible. (no one ever needs those and in my opinion they aren't hard to live without.)and don't eat any more than you need to, to reach satiety
some of you guys are being ridiculous here!. Sure this book is interesting, but it is biased and out of date with modern day psychiatry. Yeah they *used* to as in past tense do electric shock therapy on patients with severe mental illness.But that kind of thing is pretty unusual these days. Yes, I agree that psychiatric medications is part of a multi-million dollar business in our country. But it still does help tons of people with chemical-imbalances in their brain live a otherwise fairly normal life that they couldn't without treatment of their illness. Sure psych meds have side effects that can cause other health problems. But once the medication is taken at low doses, the side effects can be minimized or even eliminated. Usually the health problems is a temporarily result of the side effects and is treatable.Im sure *some* psychiatric care hospitals may have abused their patients in the past, but it proably happens less now with all the mental-health advocates out there prototecting the mentally ill. Also there are more patient rights now than what there used to be in past times. We are not in the dark age anymore people. Paitents do have rights, even the mentally ill! I think some of you watch too many horror movies..
not too good... maybe it's because i didn't read avengers disassembled, but i just didn't buy into the house of m and its story. felt more like an elsewhere alternate reality non-continuity story than anything else. you won't miss much by passing on this one
A Long, Depressing Journey. When our book club selected this novel, I was enthusiastic ~ the premise appeared to leave so much room for the development of great characters and a great story.  However, after the first chapter or so, I kept waiting for the big "wow" factor...and it never came.  I found most of the characters unsympathetic and not very well-developed.  Like other readers, I finished it out of obligation, but never gleaned any enjoyment from reading it.
Overindulgent Narrative. Anyone hoping to encounter the same unflinching brilliance found in "Everything is Illuminated" will be sorely disappointed.  The narrative is tedious, overindulgent, and, at times, utter nonsense.  Maybe that was the point, in trying to make sense out of something senseless, the 9/11 attacks, but the book, all of its seemingly infinite arrangement of words and more words, fails miserably.  I can't help but wonder what a gifted and brave editor could have made of this book.  As it is, it's length and self indulgence made me not trust the narrative about midway through the book.  It became obvious to me that Foer is enraptured with his own method of storytelling, and thereby has no sense of when to leave a point that has been made, or excise a character that is superfluous.  Instead, it gets belabored, drawn out to the point where you feel as if he's chasing the horizon.  Which, of course, just retreats at the same pace at which you pursue
THIS BOOK IS HORRIBLE. Okay, now, for all of you who are expecting a book that teaches interesting morals and cool things in it, put this book away right now!!! Put it into a dusty corner and whenever you may catch a glimpse of it, laugh in a malicious tone because you haven't feasted your eyes on the most stupid book ever written!! This book ends with such a melancholy abruption that I thought I might be witnessing the severe chopping of a movie gone over far too many minutes. This book...is horrendous.-ANGRY READER
Faster: A List of Facts and Speculations. I obviously did not conducting enough research before buying this book.  I am seventeen and this was an easy read, but I was hoping for and expecting a philosophical examination of our speedy lives.  Instead I was bombarded by semi-interesting, useless facts about how our world has been struck by "hurry-sickness" and how everything has been accelerated (a fairly obvious fact).If you are consious enough of our world to buy this book (because of its title) for yourself, it will not raise you conciousness with any deep philosophical questions or with any solutions.  The only people who will benefit from this book are the ones who will never buy it for themselves.  Therefore I believe this book is basically useless and slightly boring
Uninteresting. While the concept was certainly revolutionary at the time this book was written, I found the story itself uninteresting and sexist.  I would not recommend this book.
Not the best... I would have to say that I don't particularly agree with this book.  I mean, in my opinion, the most important thing about an apple is that it is food, not that it is round.  Regardless, it did provide for an interesting conversation in my 2nd grade class, as well as a fun get-to-know-you activity.  After reading the book, disucssing differing view points, each student created a page about "The most important thing about me is_____".
There is a problem. The problem is:  If you are not familiar with 20th Century Irish history, you will be lost reading this book when Part 1 ends. Doyle provides the reader with no historical background and writes the book assuming that the reader is all ready well-versed in Irish history.  I also had trouble visualizing Ireland, the places, buildings, streets, and the battle scenes, which I attribute to Doyle's lack of description and to my lack of Irish knowledge
The title says it all... I'm a business planning consultant and a client just gave me a copy of this book. Way too basic, not enough help on the most important part of any business plan: the financials. If you want to get funded, look for a better book
Disappointed: Lacks practical application. This was my first Kay Arthur book.  I am comparing it to the impact Philip Yancey's and Max Lucado's books had on me.  I even listened 2-3 times through to make sure I wasn't missing something.  I gained no deeper  perspective of covenant with God, nor was I able to glean anything from the  tapes to make 'practical application' in my life.   Most disturbing was her  reference to Jesus Christ going to hell after the crucifixion.  This is  just not true.  Christ did not 'descend to Hell' to pay any 'debt' we owed.   It was all finished on the cross, thusly He proclaimed, &quot;Father, into  thy hands I commit my spirit!&quot;.  Also, the gospel of John records  Jesus as saying, &quot;It is finished&quot;.   I cannot recommend this  book
Worst Book Of 2004 - 2005. Recently I got into a conversation with the guy next to me on the plane about some of the memorable books we had each read in the past few years.  Unfortunately, I had to recall `Confidence'-easily the worst book I've read in years.To describe it as disappointing is to go easy on Ms. Kanter.  It is far beyond that, and altogether abominable and embarrassing.  That such a prestigious business school like Harvard can tenure a professor who writes such insipid pablum boggles the mind.Let's start with the central (and only) idea of the book--that winning begets winning and losing begets losing.  This of course strikes most people as fairly straightforward and unworthy of a book's worth of elaboration.  Yet Ms. Kanter tumbles all over herself to spell out the details: why this is the case (as if someone with an ounce of inferential ability couldn't figure it out in a couple of minutes), how it affects team morale, how it self-perpetuates, etc...  And worst of all, endless, endless, endless examples that do nothing or very little to elucidate; rather, they simply restate what has just been said.  And they restate and restate and restate.Tautological (I think the word was invented in anticipation of this book), boring, tedious, insipid, stupid, unthoughtful, unenergetic, disengaged, disrespectful.  All these adjectives apply forcefully to the book.  Most of all, though, it is utterly uninventive and cliched.Turn to any page and you'll find such gems of penetrating insight as (forgive me, but these are so funny I have to quote at length):"Winning feels good, and good moods are contagious.  Success makes it easier to view events in a positive light, to generate optimism.  It produces energy and promotes morale.  It is easier to aim high and expect to reach the target."  (P. 29)"Overcoming obstacles, leaping over hurdles, and recovering from fumbles can strengthen a team that has the discipline not to panic under pressure." (P. 71)"Once the 'loser' label gets slapped on, those suffering losses are set up to fail.  They find it harder to get support, harder to get opportunities." (P. 115)"Various turnaround tasks operate on different clocks.  Bold strokes are fast and can be done by one powerful person; long marches to change culture and behavior take more time and the commitment of many people.  Execution is play by play, game by game, while strategy is season by season..." (P. 178)"People embodying the pathologies of the past can always be replaced, but eliminating the bad does not automatically produce the good.  It takes a major effort on the part of leaders to foster confidence that a demoralized company or group is capable of working together and succeeding at it.  Restoring people's (sic) confidence in one another requires four kinds of action..." (P. 241)"Confidence is an expectation of a positive outcome, but what happens when outcomes are negative?  The dividing line between winning streaks and losing streaks is the choice of behavior in response to setbacks...That decision to build rather than retreat, to rally rather than get discouraged, involves viewing setbacks through an optimistic lens, as an opportunity to learn and move on." (P. 357)And it just goes on and on, mercilessly and cluelessly.The wisest, most incisive business people read, study and think about far more than just sports and business.  I would recommend Ms. Kanter first enroll in a decent freshman-level literature or history seminar.  There she can learn to write and, with some effort on her part and perhaps a bit of luck, to formulate some imaginative approaches to problem-solving.Beyond this bilge, I have had the good fortune to come across many books that have helped address confidence.  These are: selected essays by Montaigne and Emerson, `Hamlet', Whitman's "Song Of Myself", David Herbert Donald's biography `Lincoln', `Emotional Intelligence', `Flow', and Jack Welch's `Winning'.`Confidence' inspires confidence only in the realization that you (no matter who you are) are at least intelligent enough to be the "Ernest L. Arbuckle Professor" at Harvard Business School
Cosmo Style of Writing - very basic info. This was a painful read.  The writer writes as though she's writing for Cosmo magazine, almost patronizing style of writing in a joking manner. At least I find very annoying. Very basic signals anyone should already know - no secret to me at least?  I don't understand anyone being happy with buying and reading this book.  Have to wonder who it is really writing all these positive reviews.  I found other books such as The Lay Guide, Stumbling Naked in the Dark and The System so much better I can't even compare them against this book that is headed for the trash since it's too late to return. Would give it 1/10 of a star if I could.
Too abstract. This book is full of excellent information with tools and methodologies for future systems analyst work BUT the information is so abstract.  There are no real practical examples in any of the chapters which would make it easier for me to grasp it (not to mention help with the assigned homework).  Unlike most college subjects and textbooks that have three or more examples at the beginning of a chapter, this book has little if any at all
What's with all the kvelling?. So far I've seen 67 out of 68 positive reviews for this book, and I say "Hurrah" for Richard Russo for all his positive praise. However, I disagree. The book has a flimsy to nonexistent foundation, that being backstory which takes circuitous twists and turns, and those turns take further turns.. So far I'm averaging 3 to 4 pages a night, and I'm a prolific reader. Why is Russo so fearful of forwarding the plot? Why the back and forth, the past histories upon past histories of every minor character? Just too much "muchiness" as the Brits would say
A Big Blowhard. This guy may be a good gin player, but he's really full of himself.His advice is excessively basic.Also, he admits that he cheats at cards for money.Finally, reading this book will not make you a good gin player
not the well rounded book you would expect from the title. This book is part of the "Everything" series of books, so you would expect it to have a little bit of "everything" about potty training in it.  Unfortunately, I had to read the entire book to find out that the author's clear bias towards infant potty training continues into the sections on toddler training.  I was hoping for a less opinionated book, one with more general information.
Ultimately a Dreary Read. This is the only one of Myers' book that I read.  I disliked it early on - but I was determined to see it through.  The novel has some wit, some mystery, some cleverness - but oh what an unsatisfying mish-mash.The writing style is skittish - from page one to the finish - so nothing is developed to any extent that you start caring about anything.  I just yearned for release at the last page.  The lack of focus was grating - but I appreciated the author's gumption of sticking to her style.This is a light distraction - all froth and little substance
hard to grasp. I love to read christian fiction but this was a bit disapointing.  For the first time I actually wished that the main character, Jessica, would just go away.  I mean I actually wanted to throw this book out a window a couple of times.  I didn't even bother to finish it.  And I don't think I would call this a christian faith based book.  In fact it said in very broad terms that all you need to do is go to church and pray and everything will work out in the end.  Not a single mention of the plan of Salvation, which christian faith is based on.
Disappointing but readable. Two-and-a-half stars.  In Requiem, Faulkner pens a sequel to his sensational novel Sanctuary, attempting to navigate the troubled marriage of Gowan and Temple Stevens. He delves deep into Temple's psyche, revealing a woman unable (or unwilling) to escape her troubled, violent past in Memphis. Just as her marriage is spiralling to destruction, Gowan and Temple's daughter dies at the hands of their nurse, Nancy. Faulkner seems to be trying to lend some serious philosophical weight to the otherwise lightweight Sanctuary. Two problems. First, Sanctuary was fine as it was; a sequel was unnecessary. Second, the narrative structure of Requiem--half prose, half play--while initially intriguing, ultimately hinders Faulkner is his attempt to probe psychological depths. (There's only so much of that you can do when you're limited to dialogue.) Oh, and of course that annoying ubiquitous allknowing lawyer Gavin Stevens has to put his $.02 in. I recommend this book only for true Faulkner lovers
The Marketing of Evil. The only thing I have to say, is that it should have been listed as pure fiction
not for bread makers. I bought this book doing a search with two phrases, whole grain and bread machine. The book promises to easily convert her recipies from oven to bredmachine. She only gives a few pages that vaguely tell to modify the recipies, but not ecactly how. Judging from previous reviews, this book must have some merit. It is not for a bread machine owner that likes simple and direct instructions
Not very simple!. Great Book for domains with child domains but for simple starters it is not what I thought it would be.  Limited detail in the migration and even more limited in basic tasks.  The book is good just not for starters.  I recommend something else
Imitation scholarship. Yes, Rifkin's descriptions of the cultural differences between Americans and Europeans make interesting reading, but the vast majority of what he says is anecdotal, if not inaccurate.  I found it amusing to read his praise of Europe's assimilation of immigrants when riots were occurring all over France.  And the idea that the popularity of subscription services and auto leasing means companies are now in the business of selling "time" rather than material products is absurd
this is hard to write... but not as hard to read as this book. I ordered this and The Favorite Game, taking advantage of Amazons buy two and get a deal policy.I didn't like this book at all. It doesn't feel as natural as Favorite Game, it doesn't flow like FG and doesn't delieve like FG.I don't know what Mister Cohen was trying to accomplish... James Joyce or Henry Miller lost generation of Montreal?The only reason I gave this two stars instead of one is solely on my adoration of the author
Bill''s AssKissZone. Read Andrea Makris' law suit at www.thesmokinggun.com all the dirty details are there, and should be required reading for anyone who reads O'Reilly or takes him seriously. He SETTLED the case after smearing her and threatening her, he's a little wimp and a coward and a "loofa" loving creep. Keep him away from your children! I Know the guy. from WashingtonJeff Gannon
Couldn't stand it. This is the first book I have tried to read by Kingsolver, and I couldn't finish it.  The first 100 pages (as far as I could get) read like a romance novel, with all the smelling of pheromones and aching pubic bones.  I just couldn't stand it.  This is a character driven novel, and I did not like any of the characters.  For a story about a woman's sense of place (and insects, for that matter), I liked Margaret Drabble's "The Peppered Moth" a whole lot better
Who wrote this?  Surely not Hillerman. If Tony Hillerman wrote this novel (novella actually), I sure can't tell. I have been a Chee/Leaphorn fan for many years, but this novel is not in the same league with Hillerman's other work. It is reminiscent of a 'B' movie. Instead of building suspense, the plot is laid out all too plainly, the characters are unreal, and the Chee/Bernie romance doesn't ring true.  I am amazed that it was published
a good story presented in an awkward format. Although I enjoyed the story itself, this deluxe edition really didn't do anything for me. The book is 9.5 x 13 which makes it awkward to handle, hard to read and difficult to store. Fernando Duval did the illustrations and are alright at best. Supposed to be limited to 1000 copies. The book is autographed by Duval but not numbered. Not that it would make any difference. Overpriced, stick to the regular hardbound edition unless you are into odd-sized books.
Warning!!!!. This review is for the audio edition. No stars is the true rating of a silly conversation with an old guy who cannot talk. The level of the meanings and ideas it is less than of a child in the first classes of elementary school. I feel very stupid i paid money for this garbage
Oh, How This Book Doesn't Work for Its Market. If you can endure Franken's cycle of hilarious writing to crap to writing about how crappy it is before finally getting back to the good stuff, go for it."Oh, the Things I Know" takes great pains to steer clear of incindiary comments so that lots and lots of people who don't know a college graduate well enough to get them something they really want will buy this book as a graduation gift.Unfortunately for Franken, he's playing to the right audience - the over 35 buyer of the gift for a college graduate - who will likely flip through a few pages and chuckle before setting it back down. Because the book isn't comforting, uplifting or even really that funny for the market.[...
Boring. What a waste of time.  This book is good for one thing.  It reminded of something I need to work on.  My stubbornness.  Sometimes I can be just too stubborn for my own good.  When I was reading this I just wouldn't quit and had to go all the way to the end.  This will teach me.  Thank you Mr. Baldacci!Here is a synopsis of the book:  "A" is the biggest strongest man in the world.  No way!  "B" is the biggest strongest.  How can they be if "C" was in the most awesome group of men in the world?  Then they try to catch a bad guy who thinks he is the biggest, strongest and smartest of them all.  Thank you again David!This would have received a 1 star except I was reminded of the lesson I needed
Quality of the delivered product. While the reason for buying the book was met (required text book for university study) the condition of the delivered item was very substandard. When the book arrived it was bent and creased and the front cover had been "pushed" in such a way that it was starting to come away from the spine. The book was not secure in its packaging and was able to slide around inside the box scuffing both front and back covers. I would not be happy if this happened to a $20 book let alone a book that cost me AUS $135.I will seriously consider next time I need a book whether I will get it from Amazon.com . The amount of money I saved was not worth the damage that occured to the item.Not Happy!!!
Quite a surprise!. I went to the library with my 4 year old son and just grabbed the book. We have read Pinkerton stories and have always loved them and I didn't even look through the book or even much at the cover until that night when we settled in for night time stories. I then realized that there was a &quot;robber&quot; with a gun on the cover. I thought to myself, &quot;How did I not see this before?&quot; and by then it was too late. My son saw it and had a zillion questions so we read it. I was shocked by the content! We are very open with our son about anything he asks and I explained that yes, there are &quot;robbers&quot; and yes, people do get into dangerous situations like that. I felt very uncomfortable having to almost outright lie to him and tell him that, &quot;No, noone will break into our house because we lock our doors, etc...&quot; How else do you explain this to a 4 yo at bedtime?! We got through it and son loved the book. I thought it was very cute that Pinkerton was confused but could have done without the break in part. I feel it could have been as cute without that. Very irresponsible in a child's book, but I guess I learned a lesson to read the books before we check them out even when they are written by someone you consider &quot;safe&quot;
Love Me Daddy. A killer for a local mob boss, who is also the goon's surrogate daddy, kills his way through a long tedious book.  There is time out for a little love interest with a woman who understands and aids his need to sow lethal mayhem whenever his "daddy" tells him to. Bloody meaningless shootouts (not fully explained), continue as the Miami mob trys to take over "dad's" Orlando territory.  Our hero starts looking for "dad", who has gone missing, with lethal results for scores of unknown and meaningless characters.  Its a one dimentional tale that never caught my interest.  Unless you enjoy keeping track on your abacus of an ever rising body count with no interesting tale attached, give this one a bye for your own good.  Life is too short to waste your time on books like this
Thinly Disguised Demagoguery. By title, this book claims to be a "how to" guide.  The first section, however, belies this by explaining that you should leave it to professionals.  Having thus disposed of the technical aspects, the author fills the remainder of the product with self-righteous, ultra-greenie, anti-capitalist claptrap, unsupported by fact or even verifiable cites.  Not even well written propaganda, and most certainly not useful to anyone wishing to learn anything useful about installing a PV system.
Slow paced. I recently read "I", "K", and "L" in succession.  Compared to "Innocent" and "Killer", I found Lawless to be slow paced (even though this edition finds Kinsey spontaneously traveling across the country) and the plot twists less surprising.  With others I've read in the series, I am usually hooked relatively early in the story line.  I was 1/3 of the way through this iteration before becoming mildly interested in the outcome.  Even the subplots were not overly attention grabbing (Kinsey has little contact with immediate family, ergo she substitutes others in her life--Henry, Rosie, Pitt family, the criminal elements in this book--as her family...).  I also found it hard to believe that some of the characters that appear in "L" could be so dim-witted on one page, and great possessors of vast knowledge with incredible powers of deduction on the next.  Anyway, there are others in this series I would recommend more highly ("M" being one of them)
Disappointing and Unconvincing. I thoroughly enjoyed the author's earlier work on how the Irish saved civilization.  But this book was a disappointing compendium of Greek myths, legends and history that never reveals a plan behind the book.  Taken in its subparts, many sections are engagingly informative in an elegant if sometimes pretentious prose.  Yet the author ambles from here to there in a disjointed narrative with interesting nuggets but little insight.  Where's the big picture?  The author attempts to wrap it up at the end with a sentence about the Greeks' "variety of human response, lightening quick transmutations, resourcefulness, and inexhaustible creativity."A subtitle like "A Greek Treasury of Personal Vignettes" might have been more descriptive and merited another star. But it falls short as a "hinge of history" with impoverished and even maladaptive connections (FDR as Solon - really?) to the modern world. I am sorry to not recommend it.
The Three Pigs. I would not buy this version of the old classic for very young children.  In this version two of the pigs get eaten by the wolf, and the wolf gets eaten in the end by the last pig. When the pigs ask for the materials to  build their houses, they do not offer to pay, trade or work for the straw,  sticks or bricks, they are given the materials. What kind of message does  that give our youth
Not the most useful. As a student of many books, I can safely say that this offered less information on the subject title of any book I have read. It has made me a little hesitant of new books unless I specifically know the author. Spend your money elsewhere
This book was far to outdated to be helpful. I was disapointed when I saw the cover but figured the information would still be helpful.  I was wrong.  The list of toxins covers things not manufactured since the 1970's!  It also has very minimal modern knowledge of PCOS and other fertility complications.Skip this book it needs to be retired.Try The Girlfriend's Guide to Pregnancy
Just Plain Bad. David Guterson weaves a tale of religious mystery in his novel "Our Lady of the Forest." Ann Holmes, a 16-year-old runaway, claims to have seen the Virgin Mary in the forest where she was picking mushrooms. Mary continues to appear to Ann over the course of several days. Ann develops a following of people who hope to share in her visions.Eventually the Catholic Church becomes involved. An investigator is sent to gather evidence of Ann's visions and confirm or deny their validity. Is Ann really see the mother of Jesus? or is she a disturbed girl clammoring for attention?I read "Snow Falling on Cedars" earlier this year and I really enjoyed the novel. I decided I would check out Guterson's other works. Thankfully, I got this book from the library and didn't spend any actual money on it. It was just bad. The story moved so slowly that I was bored most of the time. The characters weren't that compelling. The narrative structure, the same used in "Cedars," did not work for this book at all. I felt that I couldn't connect with the characters, that I really didn't care what happened to them, and the plot was very dull.I wouldn't really recommend this novel. Definitely check it out from the library if you feel compelled to read it
Pretty bad... Why did I think a book about a blue shoe was going to be an interesting read??? I can hardly give this book a one star. I've read some pretty awful books, but this is the only one thus far which has compelled me to write a review.First of all, where does Mattie live? I live in Seattle and it doesn't rain as much as it does at the Ryder house. Why is it always raining and why is it so important to tell about? Every time the author wrote about the weather it was, ho-hum, here we go again. It pulled me right out of the story. There were other times too, that I was painfully aware of the writing, like with some of the author's bad analogies. The one about the cats being like Secret Service agents was definitely one of them. I am a cat lover and owner and don't get where Lamott came up with some of her descriptions and actions of the cats. While some of the analogies were very cutesy, they certainly didn't have any ring of truth to them.Overall, Lamott's characters were only two-dimensional at best and I found none of them to have any redeeming qualities. Lamott's descriptions throughout the book , were awkward and redundant. How many times can you use the description "nuzzling"? It came to be that every time I saw that word I had to laugh. When Mattie isn't "nuzzling" her children or smelling the back of their necks she's totally neglecting them, or wanting to peel them off her like starfish, or whatever that other bad analogy was.  Mattie is a horrible person and a horrible mother. Sorry, I just couldn't relate and didn't want to. I haven't always had a perfect life or the best moral judgment myself, but, my God, get over it Mattie. Grow up and quit your whining!I do have to confess, that this book wasn't so bad that I had to put it down midway through, like some readers, though I easily could have. Yes, the writing was bad and the story and characters lacked substance, but it was plain and simple enough that at least it was an "easy" read. One you could pick up at random if you had 5 or 10 minutes to spare.  Maybe I only read the book in its entirety, so I could justify writing a review about it. Halfway through, it was making me so crazy that I went on-line to read some reviews...I'd heard amazing things about this author and I had to know, "Is it just me?" It was reassuring to find that many others felt the same way that I did, kind of a support group for the mundane journey Lamott was trying to take me on.Like many other reviewers, I read Lamott's Bird by Bird. A friend who is an avid fan of Anne's gave me the book as a gift and I fell in love. I wanted to read everything by Anne Lamott, now I'm not so sure. I will most likely give her another shot, sticking only to her non-fiction. There is so much truth and humor in her non-fiction that just doesn't seem to translate well into a novel.I feel like this book never should have made it to print. With a lot more work, it might have earned a full one star rating.
Propaganda. I have never read such bull**** in my life.  As an educator with her recent Masters in Education, I debunk Greene's theories.  I suggest reading actual research done by Phd's and educators such as: A.R. Sadovnik; H. Kohl; R.P. McDermott; J. Bettie, M.A. Gibson; M. Polluck; Fine, Weis, & Powell; R. Rist; J. O'Neil .....to name a few.    When Jay Greene has read from all of the experts above, spent a few years in schools doing the work of an innovative, caring, open-minded teacher, and interviewed students from underpriviledged back grounds, then he can write a book about schools. Our students are not sick patients and our schools are not hospitals, yet Greene sticks to this metaphor in order to make his reader's think that education is something as simple as a broken toy.  In fact, education is about teaching our children to become critical thinkers: something Greene does not want his readers to do.
Tiresome, tiresome, tiresome . . . Though I was intrigued by the novel after reading Eco's The Name of the Rose, I found the book unbearably dull. It took me about six months to finish it, just because I kept picking up other more interesting books to read. I eventually suffered through it. I have seen this book numerous times on bargains shelves in various stores, and I always have to fight the urge to complain to management about having the nerve to sell such a laborious read.The Name of the Rose receives high marks from me. Baudolino -- not so much
Not a smooth read. Maybe it redeemed itself eventually but this was one of the few books that I quit reading 3/4 of the way through. For whatever reason, the historical counterpoint was more distracting than engaging.  I was also puzzled by the lengthy focus on the gender issues surrounding the volunteer light house keepers and wonder what compelled the author to make such an issue of every movement and vocal inflection.  To each their own but it is not something I would recommend
With whom has he been interviewing?. I did not count, but it did not seem as though I read 201 answers, but fewer. In many years of working and interviewing, more lately than formerly, I encountered perhaps 3 of the questions.  In today's market, it seems interviewers are looking for evidence of directly applicable and detailed skills, especially technical and hard ones, for comfort with the candidate, for evidence of being quick, adapting well, and for initiative and solid achievement.  The questions are mildly contrived, and I have not been asked more than about 3 at any time in my longish career. Possibly because he covers so many which are illegal or too personally probing in this litigous era
A Little Dry. I found the book informative while reading it, but also a bit confusing and a little dry, best used for a college course and not for recreational reading.  (Which is no doubt why we even had it in our house, someone had  to use it and it's equally boring companion for some college course, I'm  certain of it...
More Disinformation, good for fireplace. More garbage that subtly steers the reader away from the idea that Washington had "No Idea" about the 911 attacks and that they merely screwed up. This book is for cowards that are afraid to look at the hundreds of glaring pieces of evidence that point to Washington pre-knowledge; actually,I think Mossad did the dirty work. I get sick of reading junk like this that serves to only mellow out and support insecure people that cling to the phoney American Dream while they wave their stupid little flags that are made in Red China. The complicity of the American sheeple is beyond belief! Every body is willing to become a suck up like Stalins Yezhov or Beria believing everything that is said to them, then Bang, right in the head. What will you Sensible, moderate sheeple say when the North American Union 2010 and Shafta steal your job and corporations steal your retirement. Another similiar piece of garbage that advances the "Innocent view of the CIA and Washington" isE. Howard Hunt's Book "American Spy: My Secret History in the CIA" Completely sanitized of any useful information. If a book has any truth to it, it will be either "Out of Print", Extremely expensive or the Author will have died of lead poisining ( Gary Webb, Gurudas, David Allen
Totally pointless. The essays were moderately amusing, but not a good use of my time. If you want short amusing essays, go for something like Gig or I Thought My Father Was God instead.  The advice given is often too general or too pointless to be useful (e.g., To Keep Warm -- eat right, keep your body in shape, have the right equipment; To Conduct a Background Investigation -- hire a private detective).Maybe two of the essays were valuable if you really don't know how to tie a Winsor knot or a bow tie, but this isn't really the best way to find out because you'll never remember that the information is here and that's what the internet is for anyway
have a hot plate. This slender paperback has a lot to offer in the food category, which is the main point.  The recipes were more gourmet and ethnic than I expected, with a lot of new dishes.  Even if you choose not to cook them in a tabletop/toastr oven, they're nice to have around for only 1-4 servings.  As for the books toaster-friendly side, I'm not so sure.  The authors give few special techniques or safety tips, a must for an appliance notorious for being a fire hazard.  Also, most small toaster ovens are hell to clean, making it questionable whether you'd want to broil a lot of greasey things like hamburgers in them
Why continue to be deceived... Tim LaHaye, Jerry Jenkins, and others in the Pre-Trib circle, such as Ed Hindson, Tommy Ice, Chuck Missler, etc., continue to put forth the same deceptions that Hal Lindsey popularized decades ago.  The notion of a pre-tribulation rapture is foreign to scripture, it is foreign to the teachings of the early Church, and it is grooming the Church for destruction through ignorance and lack of preparation for what is really coming.  These men are novices and not prophecy "experts" or "scholars" by any stretch of the imagination; they are those who tickle the ears of gullible Christians.  Why continue to be deceived?  Tim Cohen, in his excellent book, "The AntiChrist and a Cup of Tea," provides biblically sound and testable evidence to show that the coming AntiChrist is known NOW.  Not only that, the same author (Tim Cohen) has now put out the strongest presentation on the whole issue of the rapture EVER offered to the saints of God in Christ: "The REAL Rapture".  If you really want to know the truth about the timing of the coming rapture, then you need to hear Tim Cohen's "The REAL Rapture" (based on a volume in his forthcoming "Messiah, History, and the Tribulation Period" series (see Prophecy House's web site, prophecyhouse dot com, for details on these items)
Great story but poor edition screen play. Heads Up-This is not a novel or book.  It is a small paperback, stapled-together screen play edition. Print is very small and difficult to read. I do not recommend this edition, even though it is a wonderful story  and movie
Giving Up on Steel. Danielle Steel used to be one of my favorite authors. However, Wanderlust was the last book of hers that I really liked. I bought The House hoping maybe she had found her "style" again, but alas it was not to be. I do not understand how a bestselling author can get away with combining points-of-view within one paragraph, "telling" not "showing" the story, and repeating the same things over and over and over until I just want to scream! It seems that perhaps because she is such a big name, her work is not copyread anymore. I think it might be time for her to put away her pen, or get back to the basics of good writing. I will not be buying another of her books anytime soon. I chose to rate this book with one star, because no stars wasn't a choice
Strange book. I too was required to read this book in the 6th grade.  I couldn't understand how this book could be an award then or now.  I'm a huge Eckert fan, but this story just doesn't cut the mustard.  For a better Eckert book, check out Johnny Logan
One more in a series of ... books. What is with these British anthologizers? How perverse a talent it is to find short, comedic stories which are not funny. Sweet merciful heavens this guy found a John Cleese story that was tedious. Imagine how hard you must work to find a tedious John Cleese anything. At least in this volume you can tell that most of the authors were trying to be at least a little funny
piece of ... Those other reviewers are probably people that helped write the book. I had to search all over to find the right instructions to each exercise. Some of them were so complicated I couldn't even do them. I'm in pretty good shape but how can you sit on a bench holding a five pound weight with your feet and lift your legs up without falling backward? Plus there were too many exercises for one workout. I think you could spend much less time and get better results. Joyce says that these workouts take thirty minutes but it took me an hour to get one workout completed. (That's how long they are) The only good thing about this book were the pictures. But that's a given that in a weightlifting book that you need pictures. The other thing that I didn't like about this particular fitness book was the eating plan the author had set up in the book. Come on guys! We all finally know that pasta and starches are not going to make you thin! They'll just add more insulin to your body which will turn into fat and therefore make it much harder for you to to burn the fat you already have!...But back to the book. Joyce should have done her research more carefully and made the instructions  easier for us readers...
I haven't drunk the Kool-Aid... ...Meaning, I am not enamored of this book.  It was overlong, silly, poorly written, repetitive, it had cardboard characters, and was nothing but a soap opera which happened to be set in early 20th-century Japan.  To top it off, the sex scenes were gruesome and boring.I was hoping this book was better than the movie (which I saw first), but it wasn't.  Also, why glorify the lives of women who were basically just high-priced prostitutes, who sold their virginity and selves to the highest bidder?Real Japanese culture could never be as dull as this book.
Terrible. This book starts of interesting however the book goes on and on and on about scenarios involving people over the phone,it rarely mentions person to person or online scams.The book suggested solutions to preventing social engineering attacks is really poor,I enjoyed the book for a few days but its really same old all the way through,many of the stories read like Hack Philes you can find on the net,full of lies and waffle.You will find your self bored of the book,there are plenty of copies of it on e-bay for a reason,buy it for sentiment only and because its black.I can't believe its by Mitnic
Don't buy anything by this guy. This guy is a convicted felon and crook.Note: all positive reviews only have one review in the history.
Voodoo Physics. Gary Zukav states in his introduction "I had never studied physics. In fact I didn't like science and I had no mathematical aptitude.On Opra (TV) he admitted that he does not have a TV which may explain his lack of contemporary physics let alone any depth.I noticed that some reviewers refer to the "New Physics" is that like "New Age" or voodoo physics?90% of the matter must be missing from this book. Or else how can he take physics out of context and make such fantastic leaps to religions parallels that he knows little of. He even twists the religion around to serve some unknown purpose.Many people say they did not understand physics until this book; Surprises, you still do not. You now know what Zukav wished physics was. Take anti-mater for instants that does not mean the opposite of mater. And the relationship between particles has no correlation with the relationship of dogs and cats.At least get it straight before mixing it up. Try reading some of these:"The Ascent of Man by Jacob Bronowski". The book available everywhere the DVD's available from the UK."The Upanishads" by Eknath Easwaran (Editor), Michael N. Nagler (Photographer)Or just about any mainstream material on physics and religion.Then if you still want to mix worlds into one read someone saner:"The Tao of Physics: An Exploration of the Parallels between Modern Physics and Eastern Mysticism" by Fritjof Capra.Also on the fringe but not as radical as Zukav is a series called "What the Bleep." (both in books and on video)
Hug Away Your Homosexuality???. [...] This book is absolutely NOT about science. The book completely ignores or dismisses a number of studies that have been done by Christian and secular therapists, most of them straight, who have shown that most homosexuals are happy, and that many are very capable, in spite of society's inability, still,  to fully accept them, to form lasting and loving relationships.  This book also doesn't mention the number of studies done very recently that show that the children of homosexuals grow up no better OR worse than those of heterosexual couples - although I think it's important to mention these things.  This book IS about a sect of Christianity that truly believes it is immoral, not to be gay mind you, but for homosexuals to seek romantic love with each other.  This idea of immorality is the mindset that Doctors Nicolosi and Socarides (a co-founder of NARTH who has a gay son) start with when they perform their research, and this is the mindset of almost all who are involved with the Ex-Gay movement.In this book Chad uses a list of numbers and percentages in an effort to show that most gay men have problems in their relationships with their fathers.  One problem here, if you look close enough, is that he offers no comparable numbers for straight men.  The most glaring error with this conclusion however, is that nowhere in this list of numbers are we told exactly WHEN the gay men developed these poor relationships with their fathers.  This is important, because most therapists agree that sexual orientation is set in the very early years of life, some say by the age of 3.  HOWEVER, most gay men don't develop poor relationships with their fathers until much later in life - in their teens or even later.    These kinds of things happen frequently in Chad's book though.  He appears so eager to spread his message of change, that the search for Truth gets lost in the process.The only real disturbing thing about Chad's message/book, is that he maintains change is open to *anyone* who wants it.  This statement however flies in the face of all available evidence from mainstream psychologists AND NARTH.  The success rate for Reparative Therapy varies anywhere from 20% - 70%, depending on who you talk to.  Some recent evidence suggests that the success rate is well below 40%.  This means that a vast majority of individuals who seek this type of therapy, and who I assume really want to change, are NOT able to.  This has also led to the Ex-Ex Gay movement, which is interesting in its own right.  The advocates of Reparative Therapy see these failures and put the blame on the patient, saying that they just didn't try hard enough - which seems really sad to me.Most psychologists worth their salt would admit that they  don't fully understand sexuality yet.  Scientists are pretty sure, as Chad says, that it is formed by a combination of genes and environmental factors:  this applies to hetero- as well as homo-sexual orientations.  The difference between all mainstream doctors and therapists and those who belong to NARTH, is that NARTH claims it DOES know the reason for homosexuality - or rather REASONS - and Chad's book gives us a laundry list of those things that NARTH's proponents claim cause homosexuality - none of which are backed up by peer studies.  I will never go so far as to claim that Chad hasn't changed - I believe at the very least that he believes he has changed - the mind is a very powerful thing when we want something badly enough.  Another aspect of sexual orientation that is not discussed in this book, is that orientations seem to be more fluid than they are static - some people lead straight lives for awhile then realize they are really gay, or at least they are more attracted to men than women.  This happens in reverse as well.  Some men begin dating other men, and find out later in life that they are really more attracted to the opposite sex.  All of this can and does happen without prayer or the intervention of a few Christian therapists and evangelists with a  political/moral agenda to push - not that Chad has a political agenda - I think his message is well-intentioned and free of politics - BUT, the people who frequently sponsor Chad and the rest of the Ex-Gay movement, DO have a political agenda, and they are serious and determined to undermine gay people and their search for equal rights.Chad's overview of the APA's 1973 decision to remove homosexuality from the list of psychological diseases is far too simplistic, and doesn't take into account a number of things going on at the time like the very anti-gay atmosphere that existed in the group, or the fact that it took the group a full year of discussing the issue before it was pulled from the DSM.I would like to write more but I only hope that people will appreciate and respect Chad's message, but not take everything he has to say as "gospel".
Same Sh** Different Day. Clearly this book was written to shock and disgust the reader.  It largely succeeeds.The overriding weakness of the book is that all the characters basically act, sound and view life in the same way. After reading a couple dozen pages I noiticed that you could simply insert the name of one male charater into the place of another and not really notice any difference.All the men are ignorant, physically abusive and shiftless drunks (of somewhat varying degrees).  (...)I wonder if this work would have been more interesting if Selby took one of the stories in LEB (...say..."Strike"...) and provided more depth about the character's history and motivations.This work suffesrs from the same fatal flaw as Richard Wright's "Native Son" (although a much different work): the main character(s) is (are) simply unlikeable and repellant; the reader has no reason to care what happens to them.
Torture is Good for the Commonweal. Noted civil libertarian Alan Dershowitz joins forces with noted civil libertarian Dick Cheney in "Why Terrorism Works" and calls for the "judicious" use of torture when dealing with our enemies. According to the Dershowitz/Cheyney school of interrogation, if a foe's testicles are crushed in a vice- a "sterile" vice-then he will tell all. What he will tell is whatever the testicle mashers want to hear so that they will stop mashing his testicles.  The good professor has evidently forgotten the hoary old legal chestnut about one drop of ink polluting the whole bottle of milk, usually cited by the trial lawyer asking for a mistrial because a witness has blurted out inadmissable evidence in front of a jury. Torture is wrong, morally and constitutionally. A wee bit of it applied to really bad people is still wrong.
Important story, poor book. I give James Bradley much credit for making this important, though unpalatable, story better known.  We need to realize that as human beings, Americans are not significantly better or worse than most others, especially when tested by the extremes of war.However, Bradley's basic writing skills, as evidenced in this book, are not appropriate to an important historical volume.  He jumps back and forth between between ordinary colloquialisms and formal historical style.  He uses the first names of historical figures ("Curtis" for LeMay).  Some of his descriptions of firestorm effects are much overdrawn and unrealistic. There are internal contradictions.  He frequently uses sarcasm, which is completely inappropriate for a serious work of history.  It is most unfortunate that his poor writing has much diminished the contribution that this book could have made.Further, a great annoyance is the word "Flyboys".  I lived through WWII, and my older brothers were in the Pacific theater throughout. One was a naval air crewman, who flew many missions over Japan.  In those days, I do not recall ever hearing the word "flyboys" used to describe any of our own or the enemy's air personnel.  I find the word sarcastic and derogatory
Why continue to be deceived... Tim LaHaye, Jerry Jenkins, and others in the Pre-Trib circle, such as Ed Hindson, Tommy Ice, Chuck Missler, etc., continue to put forth the same deceptions that Hal Lindsey popularized decades ago.  The notion of a pre-tribulation rapture is foreign to scripture, it is foreign to the teachings of the early Church, and it is grooming the Church for destruction through ignorance and lack of preparation for what is really coming.  These men are novices and not prophecy "experts" or "scholars" by any stretch of the imagination; they are those who tickle the ears of gullible Christians.  Why continue to be deceived?  Tim Cohen, in his excellent book, "The AntiChrist and a Cup of Tea," provides biblically sound and testable evidence to show that the coming AntiChrist is known NOW.  Not only that, the same author (Tim Cohen) has now put out the strongest presentation on the whole issue of the rapture EVER offered to the saints of God in Christ: "The REAL Rapture".  If you really want to know the truth about the timing of the coming rapture, then you need to hear Tim Cohen's "The REAL Rapture" (based on a volume in his forthcoming "Messiah, History, and the Tribulation Period" series (see Prophecy House's web site, prophecyhouse dot com, for details on these items)
Worst Vampire book of 2006. Story had potential, but the heroine was totally unlikeable.She continually made what were supposed to be smart and sassy comments, but came across as snarky and foul mouthed.  The hero was terminally patient and nice.  Why anyone would want to spend 5 minutes with this woman nevermind eternity baffled me
2.5 stars for this one... probably the most over-hyped book I've ever read. No SpoilersWhere to start. This could easily turn into a long review, but I don't want it to be so I'll try to keep it short. Also, I'll stay away from the religious views regarding this book and focus on the writing because religion is subjective and everyone can (and should) think whatever they want about their religion) Having said that, the one recurring thought I had about this book while reading it (and while thinking about it after completing it for this review) was that it is without a doubt the most esoteric and pedantic book I have ever read.Now I'm not stupid, and I can appreciate the beauty of words and the importance of diction, but so much of this book was Rushdie writing in such a way to make sure that you had no idea what the hell he was talking about. There are times when you can be extremely metaphorical and lofty and times when you should just be blunt, but for Rushdie, there is no bluntness, and everything must be doused in the most stringy and free-formed words he can think of. Why? In some cases it adds to the story... in this, it doesn't. While there are some very good parts in this book, they are all surrounded by a lot of words that don't really say anything.Bottom line: you can skip this book. However, those interested in religion and questioning said relgion will probably read it anyway. I would suggest you get a durable copy because you will want to throw it against the wall a few times.PS: The best part of the whole book for me was towards the end in the scenes between Saladin and his father. If the whole book had been written like that, it would've been a pleasure
revelation stretch. A Christian Fundamentalist interpretation of Islam as the Beast of Revelation. There are better sources for an understanding of the relationship between Christianity and Islam
Zen Reflections not Tea Parties. I purchased this book while planning a Tea Party.  The statement "15 seasonal Tea Parties" on the front of the book is misrepresentative of the actual contents.  This book is focused more on the art of Tea drinking and Relaxation techniques and suggestions than directions on how to conduct a Tea Party.  The back cover of the book is more properly representative when it states "you'll find the perfect way to enjoy the moment".  It is a Zen Tea focus, not serve 20 people Tea and Crumpets for your mother's birthday focus
souls of black folk. was worthless...was not the correct match for my class book requirement.  Never used it...if someone wants it you can have it for free
See the movie instead. Good Eastwood-Streep movie, but terrible book. The plot itself is fine, but the manner in which the book is written is amateurish and just plain sappy. Skip the book and watch the movie. If you want to read a well-written love story that doesn't insult your intelligence, then may I suggest Jane Austen's Pride and Prejudice? Now that's good writing and an entertaining yarn to boot
Blaming the victims. Andrew Mango is a well-known denier of the Armenian Genocide and this book is unfortunately predictable both in the facts it highlights or suppresses and in its conclusions. He glorifies the Ottoman past of the country and (at best) denies without any evidence documented instances of suppression of non-Turkish ethnicities. The most disturbing feature of the author's approach is the indifference to human suffering he exhibits throughout the book. For example, deniers of the Armenian genocide typically make sure to stress what a terrible tragedy the death of so many thousands of people was, even though they deny the characterization 'genocide'. Not A. Mango. He barely mentions the events of 1915, but he spends pages and pages condemning "Armenian Terrorists", Armenian conspiracies etc. Any qualities of the book are unfortunately dwarfed by such exhibits of callousness and blaming of the victims
Missing content. This is a little fun thing to read, but it provides too little content in my mind
Not for everybody.... If you are looking for a book, where you can read and enjoy the stories... this is not for you. The way it is written, is so difficult to understand and there is no continuos flow in the book, which will make you so bored that you just want to stop reading.
Beautiful Beginning / Painful (illogical) Ending. I hope the ending is illogical at least and is fiction. If thoughts are that powerful, they need to be resrained earlier. I don't know who survivied but he might feel very guilty about the others earlier and question if he had to survive. Logic can be quite painful when left alone, but sometimes it has to be
I don't get it!. It's TM for golfers with a Scotish accent.  Can't believe this book has a following
2 stars for content, 0 stars for poor writting. Absolutely terrible.  So many good points all jumbled up.  It felt like it was written, by a grade 8 English student trying to impress a University crowd.  The flow was difficult to grasp and the book lacked that finished up.  Maybe she should have spent more time in editing.  There were so many grammatical errors.Shira, really you can convey your message without vulgarity.  Your book tries to cross the lines of financial insight and a smut paperback.  Through a little sex in there and you got a Daniel Steel novel.Really people, there are so many better books out there with the same information in them.  Try, Total Money Makeover by Dave Ramsey, or Your Money or Your life by Joe Dominguez.  Save your hardback dollars for something a little more professional, and hey Shira please do another revision after you have spent about 6 months cleaning this SH!^ up as you would have put it...
Don't expect much~. This book is the first one you will reach for if it is your first pregnancy. Save your cash and get it from the library. Then read something that expects you to be a thinking woman, not a child taking orders or information without question. If you want to go through pregnancy, labor and birth, and have no say at all or learn anything useful, then stick with this book; i.e., go to the hospital, have an epidural, episiotomy, then finally the c-section that 'must' have been necessary, this is it.Beyond that, read Ina May Gaskins, Henci Goer, the Sears' books, and "Childbirth Without Fear." Read a broader selection - many of which you can also get from a library or spend a night thumbing through at a bookstore.  I am a mother of 4; have had healthier, more positive birth experiences than anyone I know. This book is misleading and negative.Make it the joyful event you deserve
only adds to the madness. Gary Demar's dumbed down book says every thing occured in 70 A.D. Demar claims that Matthew 24 word for word describes everything that was to happen and come &quot;shortly to pass&quot; in the book of Revelation. Also the confused preterist like to say that Revelation is a past event because it says shortly to pass and Daniel says for many days but what DUMBMAR FORGETS IS THAT THEY BOTH SPEAK OF THE RESURRECTION SO BASED ON THAT THE RESURRECTION OCCURED IN 70 A.D. SATAN ON ALL UNBELIEVERS SHOULD BE IN THE LAKE OF FIRE NEW JERUSALEM SHOULD BE ON EARTH RIGHT NOW AND NOW. ETC. ASK YOURSELF THESE QUESTIONS WHAT ABOUT REV.21:4 REV.21:22 REV.22:5 I COULD GO ON AND ON.!!!!!!So based on this strict logic everything occured in 70 A.D. Yet the insane preterist do not seem to apply strict interpertation of Revelation 20:7 you can not have it both ways.  Also he claims that Nero was the Beast and 666 was a spiritual number this is obviously not true.  If he knew his bible he would know that one of the judgements of wrath would be sores on anyone who recieves the mark of the Beast. REV.16:2!!!!!!!! Dosent sound spiritual to me!!!!!! Nowhere do you find any body saying that Nero and the false prophet were cast alive into the lake of fire Rev. 19:20 Not only that but if Jesus did return in 70 A.D. then WE SHOULD BE IN ETERNITY NOW BECAUSE 70 A.D. WAS ALMOST TWO THOUSAND YEARS AGO!!!!!!!!  OBVIOUSLY THIS IS NOT THE CASE!!!!!!!!!
a waste of money. We are simply told how the truth has been sold to us. I don't see why a historian should write a book to tell us what we already knew from the movies although any American will agree with his sentiments
Something interesting about the other reviews. I read the glowing reviews listed for Dr. Katz's book, but noticed that all the reviewers seem to come from just two places--Salisbury, MD and the New Haven,CT area.  Katz, of course, teaches at Yale which is located in New Haven.  Maybe he is from Salisbury or has a lot of friends there.  In any case, it is very suspicious that in a huge country such as the USA the reviews for a book come from only two locations.  Statistically it is possible--but then it is also possible for a monkey to write Hamlet
Writing is good - but the stories awful. I agree on the following points:Great concept.Great writing style.Good command of language.But for the rest - the stories were too bizzare.  They were too warped and ugly to fall into a category of good reading.They were neither original or imaginative.  Dasgupta's formula seems to be - take a well known fable/fairy tale like "Rapunzel" and "Bluebeard" - set it in one of the world's well-known capitals (Paris, Tokyo, Delhi)- and then throw in some sci-fi events, make a series of progressively darker and bizzare events happen and then either provide a sadistic ending or a nice "happily ever after" ending.  In one case he has twisted the story of the sailor and the albatross - to convert it into the story of a wingless bird that unites two lovers.There is too much of gross descriptions and stuff in the book as well
boring. This book was extremely short, relying on large type and large margins to fill the book. It was devoid of any real plot and left me with a bitter taste. It was typical of "Oprah Book Club" books in that it is very depressing. I think this could have been a great book had the author expanded on the topics and built out the characters more fully. You did get a sense of the main character, but with such a short book, the rest were very weak.
Rambling Text, No Meat. Reading this book is like running in sand - much effort is expended with little progress. Generalizations and qualitative rather than quantitative facts abound. A chapter on crusting and scaling dermatoses provides vague descriptions and procedures; if you didn't know how to interpret a skin scraping or impression smear before you read this chapter you wouldn't know after reading it either. The chapters on rickettsial disease do not include the most quantitative and pivotal clinical and experimental references. Canine Rocky Mountan spotted fever for example is a fascinating, unique syndrome, but this text provides neither a clear clinical description nor an explanation of the pathophysiologic basis of this infection.  The book greatly underestimates the knowledge and skill level of the graduate veterinarian
Certainly a book for idiots. This book was a waste of time and money.  The author spends nearly 350 pages revealing things that are obvious to absolutely anyone.  He tell us how smiles usually mean happiness, crying usually means you're sad, and faces that look angry.....CONVEY ANGER!  The writing style is painful to read.  I assume the writer is in his late 70's but trying to be "hip and with it."  There are aweful jokes through out.  He also likes lists and bullets that outline painfully obvious body language rules to follow.  How do you tell if someone doesn't like how you're touching them?  Are they wincing and flinching?  Telling you to stop?  Crying?  It really goes like this.  I couldn't finish this book, you shouldn't start it
Sophmoric nonsense. This is a horrible example of sophmoric "witty" commentary paired with the idiocy of stat-based evaluation. If irrelevant asides were not enough, they are mostly wrong as regards players from the team I follow closely, the Oakland A's. Take the notes on Houston Street ("never will be in the Lidge/Rivera class"), Zito ("overrated"), minor leaguer Travis Buck (stupid comments on his name, totally inappropriate), Ander Ethier (overmatached in the big leagues). Where their prognastications are reasonable, a simple extrapolation from previous years (anyone could do it in their head) would suffice, not some pseudo sophisticated computer program. I hate this book
Hatred begets hatred; i.e. reap what you sow. Phyllis Chesler shares what she perceives as an alarming new trend among leftwing groups. However, the groups that merit alarm for becoming newly, or in reality more visibly anti-Semitic, have always relied on antagonism and violence for motivation. Workers should hate their bosses, women should hate men, blacks should hate whites, etc. We're not talking about hatred in the abstract, but deep-bred hatred that calls for action, strife and turmoil. Someone please correct me, but it sounds as though the author was all for the "movement" as long as the hatreds were directed the way she prefers. Now that the beast has unleashed a little fury towards her group, she doesn't appear to have second thoughts about the worthiness of her causes, but rather she sounds as though she wishes that she could direct the hate back to where she would prefer it to go. Also, I found the writing extremely flawed in many places. And, there don't appear to be references to back-up all the allegations of "terrorism", i.e. many acts appear to be random criminal violence that just happened to involve Jews. My sympathies to those people, but all of us are faced with such incidents
They Shaved an Ape and Called Him Sean. Sean Hannity's rise to fame proves that an ignorant illiterate can rise well beyond the level of incompetence in this country, especially when their audience consists of like-minded organ banks.  Hannity is stupid, hypocritical and loud.  His sole redeeming quality is as a mechanism for carbon-oxygen exchange.Hannity is well-coiffed, well dressed  and well short of thorazine on his overhyped comedy duo called the Hannity and Combs report.  This bozo is so uptight he must wear a chastity belt 2 sizes too small.  Get a real job, you poser
What is prerequisite before reading this book?. I bought this book a week ago and spent one and half hour for quick overview.I'm studying intermediate Calculus with linear algebra.Well, my impression was it's very difficult to read.There are very few examples with solution, all the context written without diagrams.
Another Bogus Book from Coren. Do dogs understand language?  Do they have their own syntax and grammar?  Stanley Coren thinks so.  Or maybe, as with many of his other books, he's only pretending to believe what he says in order to pique people's interest and sell more copies...The words we use in dog training are actually irrelevant.  Since I train dogs in Manhattan, I often find myself on an elevator with one or more dogs.  When the door closes I'll say, "What do we do on an elevator?" and they'll all sit.  This often charms and surprises the other elevator occupants who may say something like, "Look!  They understand every word you say!"Not really.  I trained the dogs to do this by first saying "What do we do on an elevator?-we sit."  Once that pattern was established, the dogs were able to make the leap from "What do we do on an elevator?" to "Sit" quite easily.  In fact, I could have as easily trained them to do this by using nonsense words, gobbledygook, ridiculous sounds that have no meaning at all.  So it isn't my words or syntax the dogs are responding to, it's my intent, my body language, my tone of voice (all carrying emotional information), and a previously established pattern of behavior.Stanley Coren should know this better than anyone since one of his dogs is deaf, yet still obeys him.  Why?  Because of his body language and a previously established pattern of behavior, not because the dog "understands" his words.  Coren would say that the dog understands his hand signals the same way the hearing-impaired understand sign language.  But looked at objectively it's far more likely that the dog's response to hand signals is still just part of a previously established pattern of behavior, not a linguistic or cognitive process.Coren would still disagree.  He claims that certain vocalizations made by dogs can be grouped together, which he takes to mean that there's a kind of syntax or grammar at work.  I'm sorry, Stan, but real language doesn't operate on such a simplistic level.  And while it may seem brave and controversial of Coren (who has a degree in psychology, not linguisics or animal behavior) to disagree with Noam Chomsky about the nature of language, at this stage in the development of linguistic science that's a bit like a high school sophmore disagreeing with Sir Isaac Newton about gravity.Look, it's fairly obvious to anyone who really understands dogs that the reason certain yips, barks, growls, etc. are sometimes used together and others aren't (which isn't always true, by the way -- it depends on the dog), is that each vocalization comes from an emotional, not a cognitive state.  In other words, certain emotions -- like fear and aggression -- may be felt by the animal simultaneously, while others -- calmness and fear -- can't be.  It's not grammar or syntax, it's emotion, pure and simple.Even if Coren hadn't thought this through from an emotional point of view, if he'd spent any time at all studying comparative neuroanatomy he'd know that a dog's brain has no Broca's area, which makes linguistic ability totally impossible.  But as with other books he's written (his LEFT-HANDER SYNDROME was notorious for being based on false data), Coren doesn't seem to care much about the truth.Still, I have to admit that it's hard not to buy into this myth because as human beings we're constantly explaining our feelings and experiences to ourselves through our thoughts and inner monologues, or to others through conversations, letters, etc.  As a result we're almost forced, by the way our brains work, to supply a similar linguistic medium for a dog's feelings and behaviors when no such medium or ability exists.I trained my dog to respond in a certain way whenever I ask him a certain question.  And I have to admit, I like the way it feels when I say to him, "Do you love me?" and he wags his tail, comes over, puts his paws on my chest, and licks my nose.  Does he understand the meaning of that sentence when I say it to him?  Of course not.  But I know he understands the emotion.It's a shame that Coren doesn't get this fundamental difference between real linguistic understanding and pure emotion, particularly when the misinformation he disseminates in this book can be detrimental to the relationship between you and your dog, a relationship that SHOULD be based on real and, quite often, wonderful emotions, not on any imaginary ability to use and understand language.If I could I'd give this book no stars at all
A Horrible Book with Lots of Terminologies. This is a horrible book with lots of un-popular terminologies and using abbreviated words, I believe that we can live with &quot;it is likely to&quot; instead of &quot;it is prone that&quot;. Furthermore, lack of descriptive volcabulary, eg, &quot;inevitably&quot; had been used more than 10 times in just one single chapter, and countlessly in total
A Disappointment. I have enjoyed almost all her other works but this one was a waste of money and time.  I couldn't force myself to get to the end.  Continually I turned the page in hopes it would get better but it didn't.  The way she moves the point of view from Katharine back to the story is not enjoyable.  I would hate not to enjoy Philippa Gregory again but this one will make me think twice before paying full price again
The Most Boaring Book Alive. The book is called The Circuit. This book is about a boy named Francisco Jimenez who wants to be another person. He had a hard time in school because he almost knew no English. He couldn't understand her. He had 3 brothers and 1 sister and a mom and dad. The worst thing to him was getting deported.In school he had a problem with 2 kids named Curtis and his friend. They were the bullies. Once Francisco had wore a sweater that belonged to Curtis. Of course he didn't know. He was lucky they didn't beat him up. Later they became friends.His brother that was born after him had a rare disease, but he made it through. I think that people who would like this book are people who have boring lives. After every chapter he wanted you to put the book down. He didn't leave any suspense. I hated the book so much.
Seaside Atmosphere. The only good thing about this book is the seaside atmosphere. The seaside restaurants were enjoyable. The storyline was acceptable but not my favorite
Not that great. This book is not very good. It basically repetes the same information many times. For example, it gives the species descriptions twice, but only has about five sentances on a proper cage for a conure. Even w/ the descriptions, it didn't talk about the specific conures traits and personality, only how big it is and where it can be found in the wild. Not even if it is readily available as a pet or if that species is on the verge of extinction, therefor you can not make any judgement at all, wheather that bird will make a good pet. I have read many parrot books and the is nothing specificly on conures in this one. In my opinion, the author just wrote about parrots in general, replacing the word &quot;parrot&quot; with the word &quot;conure&quot;. The only interesting thing in this book was the pictures which gave it the extra star, otherwise it would have only gotten one
some weird choices. It's always easy to criticize somebody's personal choises when it comes to the movies and the stars, but this book is dedicated to the most unforgettable ACTRESSES and not STARS of the studio era. So it comes pretty natural to ask : Is Esther Williams such an unforgettable actress that the author had to overlook Margaret Sullavan? Was Grace Kelly's talent so overwhelming to forget that Miriam Hopkins had such an individuality in the acting process that she kept on working with such directors as Lubitsch, Wyler, Mamoulian, Hawks and Vidor to stunning results? What was wrong with Mary Astor's acting  and what is right with Kim Novak's ?Actress to me means Patricia Neal or Shelley Winters - Norma Shearer or Natalie Wood were stars....think about it
Something old, something used. Two of the short stories in this book, "Running out of Dog" and "Gone down to Corpus" are not new stories.  Running out of Dog is a spelendid example of what we expect from Mr. L. writing about ironies and tragedies of average people.  But, it should have been noted that 40% of this book is not original.The others are average reads, over before we have any understganding of the characters Mr. Lehane writes so well about.  None of the others are full of tension, irony, comedy, tragedy, and suspense we've all come to expect. They are mediocre stores meant to sell on the author's excellent reputation.We waited a long time for another Lehane.  This book certainly does not showcase his talents
Large book with complex and boring language. I am studying for an M.S in software construction in Denmark and this textbook was assigned to a course covering Software Engineering this last semester. The semester at the same time was focusing on teaching the theory of compilers and computation complexity.Being from Denmark, english is not my native language and I must say that the verbose language used in this book sometimes had me pulling my hair. It seems I am not alone when i say that. Most of the reviews here tell about problems with the overcomplex language used.I am not sure why the outher finds this necessary. There is also much use of references to other (somewhat outdated) books about the subject. I am not sure how many several authors I have read when i finish this one - it must be several. The left-margin is used for key-points, little advices, web-references which is a great idea. But they do take away the focus of the main text.I cannot say whether or not it presents the material correctly or if something is missing or the information is outdated or whatnot - I just do not like this book. It seems it was written for software engineers already in the field (it is the practitioner's approach) and the only thing they really need is a (grown up) presentation of the methods used in modern software engineering. And this book does contain that - indeed. Atleast it seems like it.This book is not for students which at the same studies technical courses like compilers and complexity theory. The intended reader for this book was perhaps never meant to produce source code but instead do the management of these chaotic projects. Though, this I am not sure of, since I an not a practitioner - but a hardworking student seeing myself reading this while coping with the immense culture shock it is for me to realize that I do not know anything about developing software.The book does manage to give away information (if read carefully) and from one perspective it is not just a waste of money. One usefull feature are the examples of dialogs between members working on a fictive software project. They are very informative.But to use it like is has been done in my situation is just a clear misconception of the reality which lies in the study of the conceptually hard areas of this kind of education.Bottom-lines:- You like programming, mathematics, theoretical studies and understand that careful planning and execution of software projects is a requirement - get another book on software engineering. Perhaps the one by Sommerville or McConnels's Rapid Development are good bets.- You have been working in the field of software engineering for several years but haven't really gotten the touch of programming or have had ups and downs managing software projects, buy this book indeed, you'll cope with it just fine
Don't be mislead. The book is like an ocean, poorly organised. No pictorial representations (which I think is very important when we discuss data modeling). I bought this book to refresh my data modeling knowledge-- disappointing. May be useful for some students to clear some papers, for pros - please find something else.
Difficult Read. I am an avid reader, and I will finish a book no matter how difficult it is, or how boring it is, and I couldn't finish this one. It was so dry - and I couldn't connect with any of the characters. I was really disappointed
One star is as low as I could rate it, really it should be less. Had this book been the work of a novice Sci-Fi author it would have never seen print.The story follows the life of one Lazarus Long, a character who is easy to see is only a thinly veiled cover for the author himself.  Lazarus is a character who is so convinced of his own personal superiority that late in his very long life he travels back in time so that he can father himself.  As further example of his self superiority he had himself cloned into twins of the opposite sex.  Twins that he later has sexual relations with.  Even the conscience mind of the artificially intelligent computer that controlled his space craft transferred itself into the engineered body of a woman so that it too could have sexual relations with Lazarus.  To make it further insulting the sexual advances of those characters is not of Lazarus' choosing but rather of their free will.  Indeed Lazarus fends off the sexual advances of his cloned twins until they reach the age of consent.  This reveals how shallow the author feels the drives and motives of others to be.The story follows the life of Lazarus Long through a series of 'flashbacks' as the character struggles to find a reason to continue his existence.  Most of the flashbacks deal with how the character traveled about the Universe starting colonies on untamed worlds.  Each of these mini-stories is an equally self aggrandizing yarn about how Lazarus fathered virtually every child on the planet while single handedly delivering the worlds he founded from lawlessness, ignorance, and barbarism.  Among these 'gems' are such classic lines as 'there is only one way to comfort a widow' implying that the answer was sex.  Yes, among these stories there are a few meaningful bits of wisdom such as Heinlein's list of what things a man should be able to do.  To save you the grief of reading the book just to get to it I'll quote it for you below. . ."A Man should be able to change a diaper, plan an invasion, butcher a hog, conn a ship, design a building, write a sonnet, balance accounts, build a wall, set a bone, comfort the dying, take orders, give orders, cooperate, act alone, solve equations, analyze a new problem, pitch manure, program a computer, cook a tasty meal, fight efficiently and die gallantly. Specialization is for insects."- Robert A. HeinleinCertainly I can agree with that.  These are abilities that every man should endevour to have to make himself complete.  But they are not the exclusive domain of men. Unfortunately this bit of wisdom is so embedded in mounds of garbage that reveal Heinlein's low esteem for women it is not otherwise worth excavating.  One comes away from this book knowing that the Author felt that women are worth nothing beyond serving as receptacles for a man's sexual needs.  Throughout the book examples are given of how a man should be able to do all of the above while women, conversely, are scarcely credited with the ability to do any of those things.  That this book was ever nominated for an award is a blemish on human history
CF.Adams: Homicide Investigator. This Color Book is a disgrace to every African American. As a Homicide Investigator who has worked many murders of young Black teenager males this coloring book doesn't help to stop the problem on "Black on Black Murders" involving juvenile males. I am outrage by the images of weaponry and killing and prison and thing of that nature. I don't see this coloring book to be a fitting image for our young people. Maybe the Author of this coloring book should come and spend a day with me during an autopsy of a 15 year Black male who was killed by gang violence.
inaccurate in its review of at least one country. I can only judge the article on the the government failure in Tajikistan, as it is a country I both lived in and studied for many years.  The author, Nasrin Dadmehr, explains the weakness of the current state by examining its historical background, but that background, as he presents it, is full of omissions and inaccuracies.For instance, the word &#34;basmachi&#34; used to describe the armed rebel groups in 1920's Central Asia, does not mean &#34;bandits&#34; in Russian, as he claims. It means nothing in Russian because it is not of Russian origin but was adopted from one of the local languages, Tajik or Uzbek.Another example is that the author keeps referring to the two factions fighting for control over government as &#34;Communists&#34; and &#34;Islamists&#34;. It is true that these labels have been exploited by both sides in order to attract foreign aid from countries where those things matter (such as Iran, Saudi Arabia, or Russia).  However, the actual division is based entirely on people's ethnic/regional affiliations. So unless you accept the idea that everyone born in Kulab is a Communist and a Gharmi accent automatically makes one a devout Muslim, those labels mean as much as the logos of two opposing teams in a football field.  Chicago Bears are not really bears, the &#34;Islamist opposition forces&#34; are not united by Islam, and there has not been any Communists in Tajikistan for many years, apart from perhaps a few senior citizens nostalgic for the times when they had something to eat. So whenever anyone describes the conflict in Tajikistan as a struggle between Communists and Islamists it is a good indication that they have very little knowledge or understanding of the political situation in that country.There are plenty of other inaccuracies as well, like the description of May 1992 events. According to the author, this is when &#34;backed by popular support and two months of non-stop demonstrations &#60;the opposition forces&#62; succeeded in imposing a coalition government on the communists.&#34; In reality, the &#34;imposing&#34; part involved an ambush of the city airport by a heavily armed group of militants who proceeded to capture President Nabiyev as he was trying to flee the country and forced him, at a gunpoint, to sign his resignation. There was no &#34;coalition government&#34; created, and the following few months of the opposition's rule were filled with as much oppression and extreme violence towards Kulabis as was later directed at Gharmis when the power switched back around.The two-month long non-stop demonstrations that had led to this incident included one for the opposition and one supporting the government. Both were heavily organized, with people being recruited and bussed in from remote villages to be fed, clothed, and financially compensated for the two months of camping in the middle of the city. No information about who was paying for all that &#34;expression of popular will&#34; on either side was ever publicly released.Even if these omissions in the article seem minor or irrelevant, they reduce the complexity of the war in Tajikistan to a &#34;goodies vs. baddies&#34; comic-book type scaffle that incidentally brings about the collapse of the government. The collapse itself and the resulting chaos is described quite well. But glancing over so many important aspects of what had led to it makes the resulting analysis somewhat skewed and one-sided
Could be so much better than it is!. Although the book, with its illustrations, sidebars and accompanying cd, seemed so promising, in the end this is a disappointing compilation.  The book and cd waste a lot of space with some of the most commonplace forms of poetry - Mother Goose rhymes and limericks - to which many parents will have already introduced their children. The book veers from nursery rhymes to multiple poems involving death to Shakespearean sonnets. The choices of poems within each form introduced could have been improved upon - many are downright uninteresting.  Finally, I reached for the CD, hoping the purchase could be saved by the careful, luscious reading of selected excellent examples on it.  Alas, alack.  Two "professional" actors read - neither, unfortunately, possessing either the gravitas or the tonal depth to make the poems ring.  And again, the cd is littered with limericks and nursery rhymes
Misleading, generalized, and distorted. These authors take the reader through a journey in time as well as history to set a foundation for the use of permanent magnets.  Included are case studies, testimonials, wild assumptions, and generalities.  This reader  felt like he was being conned by a very poor salesman.  Some of the  information may have been correct in it's original context.  However, the  authors chose to present only part of the information in a general format  and discount other research which may have contrary information.  This is a  scary book, it has been a major seller and propaganda machine for companies  and individuals to promote sales of magnetic products at the risk of the  individual.   	This book has provided two sets of information for this  reader.  First is that medical degrees and bibliographical citations do not  always make a credible book.  Second, is this book provides a list of  possible references with actual research information.  I do not feel that  all of the information contained in this book is wrong, just misleading,  incomplete and distorted.  	A more complete analysis with both  indications and contraindications for use can be found in &quot;Magnetism  and its effects on the living system&quot;. by Davis and Rawls
If you like books about unicorns, read this. I'll put my opinion first, so there won't be any doubt in your mind.  I don't believe that you can write useful books about national character.  Is there really such a thing as &quot;national character&quot;? People are  just too different, too unpredictable. How well can you predict the  behavior of the people closest to you ?  How well can you predict what  people in your own country will do ?  Would every Italian, if they could  write well, have written the same book as Mr. Barzini ?  I seriously doubt  it.  So what we have in THE ITALIANS is one man's views on the conglomerate  nature of 50 million Italians.  After reading it, I felt even more strongly  that such books, though possibly entertaining, are a waste of time.  An  informative book about unicorns--but do they exist ?   Anthropologists have  been concerned, for many years, in getting the &quot;inside view&quot;--the  view of a culture as seen by the person within it.  While Barzini is  indisputable Italian, he tries to visualize Italians as seen by foreign  visitors, then explain to those of us not lucky enough to travel there, why  they are as visitors see them, or why they are not as foreigners may think.   This is not a successful gambit.  Cultures are based on many general  factors--like history, socio-economic patterns, religion, family,  etc.---but the specific results are just that, specific.  Barzini covers  many topics--the importance of spectacle and giving an illusion of  something rather than actually having that quality; the family vs. the  state; Italian modes of achieving success; the north-south split; Sicily  and the Mafia; and last, the tragedy of Italy's long domination by  foreigners.  But nothing really connects.  There are only superficial,  scattered impressions, nothing very concrete to grasp.  The reader is left  with a handful of stereotypes.  Barzini is at his best when describing the  lives and modus operandi of particular characters in Italian history.   These sections were well-written and interesting.  But his portrayal of  Italian &quot;character&quot; is fuzzy, contradictory, and ultimately,  unconvincing.  Finally, if you are a lover of lists, you will thrill to  this book, because there is a list on nearly every single page.  Myself, I  got pretty tired of those lists.  If you want to know something useful  about Italy, read another book.  If you just want entertainment, which  might support any stereotypes you have about Italians, then this book could  be for you
Not Good. This book is disappointing. I don't think Broderick understands the technology or its social impact, which is a major problem considering the book is an attempt to explain the causes, and effect on our lives, of "the spike." He quotes a lot of people who are smarter than he is and basically regurgitates their ideas without interesting analysis. And it's a lazy author who quotes paragraphs and long passages from articles and lectures instead of writing his own description and citing the source. Also, the author seems strangely arrogant for someone who almost gets it. He explains that everyone else calls nanotechnology "nanotechnology or nano-tech, but I call it minting." Hunh? Maybe everyone else calls this book good or interesting, but I call it boring (which, given the subject matter, it shouldn't be) and a waste of time for anyone who has thought about this stuff for more than a nanosecond. Or a minto-second. Or what I call speck-time
Not recommended. Yet another historical novel into which a lot of research and work was clearly put, but the result is dissatisfying largely because the author doesn't know how to write.My single biggest objection to this book is the constant and annoying use of the author's alternative grammatical rules.  Comma splices and run-on sentences are not, and never will be, acceptable to me.  Occasional use can be overlooked, but Shaara peppers every page with them, tacking four or five or more predicates on to the same subject.  The effect is so glaringly obvious that it becomes difficult to continue reading.The following example is made-up, but it is a good imitation of how Shaara writes:"He turned in the saddle, rode toward his headquarters over the ridge, refused to look back toward the man receding in the distance, focused instead on the day ahead, forced himself to confront the bigger problems at hand."One often finds whole paragraphs composed of several run-on sentences in a row like this.  The result is a book that reads like a rough draft, or maybe not even that;  it reads like a collection of notes preparatory to writing a rough draft.  I don't understand how authors get away with publishing such half-finished work, and I don't understand why readers put up with it.Another problem is the lack of convincing characterization.  Everyone is vaguely noble here, with the exception of a few complete cads.  Washington loves his wife and longs for peace and home.  Cornwallis loves his wife and longs for peace and home.  Greene loves his wife and longs for peace and home.  I think you get the picture.  Few characters stand out on their own.  Even Lafayette is just another young officer.  The author assumes that we already carry our own perceptions about the major characters and will plug them in at the start of the book.  And Shaara's attempts at making his characters witty never work.  The result is a cast of characters that is tedious and dull.Beyond that, I'm doubtful about the author's device of switching focus among the various characters in each chapter.  It's fine when we leap across the Atlantic and jump into Franklin's mind.  But the rest of the time, it doesn't work well.  I find that I sometimes have to flip back to the start of the chapter to remind myself who has the focus.  Either I'm a lazy reader (and I'm not), or the device isn't working well.  In addition, this device constrains the author to keep the narrative focused almost entirely on Franklin in France, and Washington, Green, Cornwallis and Howe in America.  That means that we get only glimmers of the happenings in Parliament and the royal court in England, and the continental congress in America.  In effect, this novel is really about Washington's military camp and Howe's dinner table, which makes the narrative unbalanced.Some aspects of the story are interesting.  I enjoy reading about Washington's maneuvers, and the repeated frustration at coming up with an empty bag and finding that the British have eluded him.  I learned a fair amount about just where the various forces were, and when.  But I wish now that I'd just bought a decent beginner's history on the war.  Most of the book, as literary fiction, left me cold
Not her best, or even close. The sad thing is, I am a major Andre Norton fan, and I didn't enjoy this book very much.  I trudged through it out of loyalty, but I sure don't recommend it.The triplets take turns talking, which would be fine if in any way Norton had given them "different voices".  Unlike, say, Terry Goodkind, who can have many characters voice and they are all truly unique, the triplets have nothing distinguishing them.  Therefore its distracting, too much going on, and frankly you just don't much care.  The strange man they meet has so little of him that , well.. its just a poorly written book and quite a disappointment
Nothing Insightful. Just plain common sense. There wasn't profound thought through out the whole book.  I finished in thirty minutes
Not A Mention Of Islamic-Arabic Art? Wow Sombody's Biased. The Global Art book barely mentions an Iraqi and Iranian piece of art however it chooses to limit the children's scope from Islamic art. I view this as another biased piece of work that is keen on dividing the world rather than a simple tool for educating children about the world or so called &quot;GLOBAL ART&quot;
Inadequate. I acquired this book as a referesher subsequent to completing my MBA program.  It is a suprising disappointment, and I do NOT believe it is an "MBA in a BOX" by any stretch of the imagination.     I am somewhat reluctant and uncomfortable to speak negatively about any book I have read, and I have read plenty of books and review a fraction of them on Amazon.com.   Nevertheless, I have a sense of obligation to tell people that this book will most-likely not provide them the information they are perhaps looking for in terms of MBA material.  To try to be perhaps fair, I am going to highlight some important aspects in this book.Innovation--The concept, from Clayton M. Christensen's THE INNOVATOR'S DILEMMA, "that companies fail not because managers are dumb but because the system doesn't allow them to succeed" is very important as it touches on empowerment, organizational learning, and team building (and learning).Strategy--Yes, I agree that strategic thinking involves intuition and creativity.  I am very happy that the balanced scorecard was covered in this book, which is an excellent tool for organizations to measure performance.Management--Encourage entrepreneurial behavior and thinking.  Ensure your team is actually empowered to make decisions, take action.  Otherwise, how can you possibly encourage entrepreneurial behavior and thinking in an organization?Human Resources--The importance of retaining and motivating the "knowledge worker" is covered, which is a concept from Peter Drucker.  Organizations must appreciate, recognize, and understand a knowledge worker's extensive knowledge.  Further, an organization must also provide opportunities for the knowledge worker to expand her/his knowledge, thereby adding value for the organization.Marketing--I enjoyed reading about customer relationships management (CRP), allowing the customer to frame and shape the relationship between the organization and her/himself.CONCLUSION--As I mentioned, this book did not meet my expectations and was somewhat disappointing.  I think the title is not appropriate and perhaps even misleading.  Nevertheless, if you want to obtain some highlights on certain subjects and prominent business personalities, this book can be useful.
horrible. Kevin knows how to SELL a book, and he knows how to keep the money. He doesn't know anything about the subject he supposedly is writing about, but he knows what is most important to him: If he can trick you into buying this book with a money-back guarantee, you will tend not to return the book no matter how bad it is. And it is
Cute concept, bad book. Title says it all, "play to your strengths".  No need to read the "book", or if you must, simply skim at your nearest Borders, Barnes & Noble, or fave store with a reputable coffeehouse.  My quibble is less with the authors' philosophy and more with their writing.  This is simply not a very well written book--no chapters, bold headings every five sentences, and endless laundry lists (43 at last count) of things to do, ways to manage, etc.  Although I agree with the need to appreciate the talents of each unique individual and not dwell so much on a  person's need-for-improvement areas, I did not think the authors proved their points.  They were content to slap down some famous names, rehash a few entrepreneurial successes, and quote the Gallup polls (which were self-serving anyways in light of Clifton's ownership of Gallup).  Please try to waste your money on something better written
Shallow, simple-minded, and ultimately dangerous. This man should have never appeared on Oprah.  He's not an AIDS activist but a slick businessman making a quick buck by fanning the flames of black homophobia.  It is unconsciousable to use HIV as a means to sell books and make money.  I read an issue of the Atlanta Journal Constitution that did an article of JL's luxury home and I wanted to vomit.  Lives, both male and female, are dying and this loser wants the world to know that he's living large?  Who cares?  If you buy this book, it means you're naive, and who can respect you if you're naive
Slow start set the pace . . . This book started off slow and I read about 1/3 of the book until I was interested in the story at all.  While the writing is very descriptive, the author does not engage the reader by  developing empathy for the characters.  Not recommended
Just a bunch of chess articles. I am rather disappointed after buying this book. It contains just a bunch of articles about different chess topics, illustrated (mainly) with the author games. The articles are rather interesting and well written, games well annotated but ...  it is hard to find the idea behind the book as a whole.I would rate it higher if it had title like 'Alex Yermolinsky selected chess articles'. But this book does not offer any organized plan of work towards reader chess improvement (ohh, there is suggestion to study own games on the beginning). So I am just disappointed after buying it
Less Than Expected. Some very basic information provided regarding natural hair. Not what I expected from the book
1300 pages are too many. Quigley was a Georgetown professor who was permitted access for two years in the early 1960's to the private archives of the Committee on Foreign Relations, a Rockefeller internationalist organization that compliments the work of the Trilateral Commission and the Royal Institute of International Affairs.It is difficult to determine what the author is trying to communicate.  There is no continuity to the book; nothing ties together Quigley's version of the past and of the future.  It's like reading about the solar system and finding out that the conclusion of the matter is that the sun will expand and burn everything up.  You are left wondering, what is the point?We are left with the suggestion that the elite should continue to guide us in the same direction that we are traveling, but avoiding some of the monumental blunders that they have made in the past.Quigley's version of history consists mostly of unquestioning repetition of propaganda.  Quigley did a superficial job of analyzing history, and he is even worse at sociology.  He touts Inclusive Diversity as our great strength and greatest gift.  Perhaps he should have considered the aphorism, "Divide and conquer."  The West, or any other empire, can only flourish when it concentrates on matters of common concern, not divisivnessQuigley does slightly better with economics and foreign policy, which are more in his area of expertise.  He correctly observes that British and American "victories" in WWI and WWII resulted in the almost total destruction of international law.  Quigley is in favor of the idea of continental blocs replacing national states.  As globalization unfolds, Quigley exposes some of the hypocrisy and bungling, yet  he inexplicably remains committed to the overall plan.So, what is the point of all of this costly meddling?  Quigley predicts success...and then failure.  "We shall undoubtedly get a Universal Empire in which the U.S. will rule most of Western Civilization.  This will be followed by a period of decay and ultimately by invasions and the total destruction of Western culture."  Couldn't we save ourselves the trouble and just mind our own business?Minding our own business is a concept based on the idea that the electorate is in control of the government, and that we have a choice.  However, Quigley admits that international financiers influence and control governments.  Quigley says that the internationalists, who prefer to remain in the background, should be known for their "valuable" contributions.  What these contributions amount to is that they want world government, and they intend to cram it down everyone's throats.As we slouch toward financial, industrial, and government monopoly the author reminds us of some of the casualties.  "As economic enterprises have become larger and more tightly integrated into one another, the freedom, individualism, and initiative traditionally associated with the modern economy have to be sacrificed." Quigley acknowledges that in our future, "In general, there will be a very considerable modification of the areas and objectives of freedom in all societies of the world, with gradual reduction of numerous personal freedoms of the past."To add to this loss of freedom, Quigley bemoans our loss of a spiritual mooring and suggests a return to the values of Christianity!   His version of Christianity, of course.  Still full of contradictions, Quigley cleaves to relativism rather than absolutes, approximations rather than final answers-not realizing that the adoption of these mindsets are what weakened the appeal of Christianity.Finally, as we follow our present course, Quigley predicts an age of conflict characterized by class struggle, war, irrationality, and declining progress. Obviously, we're there now.Rather than attack his sponsors, who are bringing us this New World Order, Quigley vents his frustration on the middle class.  Quigley touts the moral superiority of both the rich and poor, but he asserts that the middle class consists of poorly-informed, neurotic, bourgeois, radical-right Republicans. Worst of all, they have Puritanical attitudes toward sex.The many internal contradictions in this book indicate a confused mind or a shallow thinker.  The author's history is mostly stale propaganda, spiced up with occasional pro-government cheerleading or tales of government boondoggles.Maybe if Quigley had broken this monstrosity into several different books, he would have had something coherent to say.  In this book, Quigley's  conclusion is almost totally divorced from the rest of the book.  This effort spanned 20 years, and possibly senility was sneaking up on the author.
The book travels well-worn trails. I've read O'Conner, Stone and Sinclair's biographies of London, plus big swaths of others, including his daughter Joan; additionally, I've read many articles. [ Seeing a video interview of his youngest daughter Becky was also interesting.] And now I've read Kershaw's biography.  It covers, really, no new ground, though it does expand a bit on the voyage of the &quot;Snark&quot;.  Yet, if one wants to get into that voyage specifically, there are Johnson, Charmain London and Jack himself to fall back on, re. journals and articles of that voyage.  I'm afraid I agree with the &quot;Kirkus Review&quot; writer concerning Kershaw's biography, [included on this site]. There was just too much rehash--crib note stuff--of his stories and books.  Kershaw wasted time.  He got into works of fiction, at length, that are bad--amongst London's most agonizingly blatant hack work, (&quot;Burning Daylight&quot;).  And more than anything, he did not try and plumb the depths of his wildly contradictory acts and words, not the least of which was London's addled racism. Lastly, he did not thrust London and his fame into proper context--he began to do it, then backed off.  A reader gets too little social context, and with London--that's really necessary.  Still, I found the book worth reading, and if this work was the reader's first biographical exposure to London--I can see where it would work far better
You Can't Trust Relatives!!!!!!!. Karen was a girl who had been to no exotic places so when her so-called &quot;cousin&quot; Blanch nvites her to England saying her dad gave permission, Karen is extremely happy. The story is sizzling and exciting,  the plot is unique, the escape is strategically planned.  I was kept in  suspense till the last page
Could have been better, I think. Well, the fact that I'm writing a review about this book, while it's sitting open on my desk next to my computer, open and not being read, might be some evidence of how I'm enjoying this book. This book just goes on and on in complex an unclear language about a subject which shouldn't be so difficult. This book is not clear or easy to understand at all. Every sentence is awkward and followed by a footnote, and the masses of footnotes together take up half of EACH page (!), making this work look like a research project for a PhD publication. I have the casebook in this series, and sometimes it seems reading the cases alone will bring more clarity. And it turns to be true! This book might be good if you're advanted-contracts and want to know every little detail, or as an advanced reference later on, to look something up like in an encyclopedia. Some concepts, which should be pretty clear just get too in-depth coverage in this book. It's too complex for a first-year student. Sometimes it starts describing the different views out there, and then there's a jumble in your head as to what the law really is. I wish the author used his own knowledge and fluid language more than footnoted ideas from other authors.
Just wondering. If anyone realizes that if Koreans in North Korea at the time before the Russians came that if you were Korean in North Korea that you needed to speak Japanese or you would be extremely Punished.
Not Very Good... This book would be for any girl that hasn't been on a date... I've been on many dates, so this wasn't helpful to me at all
A tepid polemic. This book uses a canon to kill a flea.  Sympathetic as I am to the rhetorical and discursive analysis of cultural formations, such a project requires depth and context to be intelligible:  this book lacks both.  It provides quick parachute drops into various aspects of discursively mediated marketeering strategies touching on discourse touching on the body, and then hurries on to another example or arena without working through the consequences of the argument.  Morever, the style is ponderous enough to kill a child with lead poisoning.  Since the author never bothers to ask who reads (let alone who is persuaded by) the discursive constructs that she so rapidly catalogues, one wonders why she has devoted all this energy to debunking notions that are probably believed by virtually no one
Very Slow Story!. I was absolutely bored to tears while reading this book.  I think that a lot of the suggestions towards better leadership are very well intentioned and are good ideas, but it is very heavy in religion.  If you are a strong believer in JC then this book might appeal to you.  I was sick of the many religious references by page 30.  The story was also poorly written.  I found myself having to re-read portions of the book to understand the point.  The only thing I will remember from this book is EGO (you'll get it once you've read it)
The worst book I've read this year. I have read a lot of DS books and this is the worst one yet.  It was repetitive; the story was totally mundane, not even a little bit intriguing and the ending predictable.  I read it to the end hoping it was going to get better but it never did.  For a writer of her caliber and reputation she ought to know better.  The only good point - it didn't take long to read.  This is the last DS book I'll ever buy
Disappointment. I'm not sure who's writing these reviews, but I read repitition after repitition after repitition, with a lot of confusing fluff. Asking hard questions to solve complex or simple issues. What's "fierce" about that?The writing style and content just didn't flow. Wasn't real. I mean, in one section, she actually uses the term "bucko," as in, "Let me tell you something, bucko." What are we in "Happy Days?" Couldn't take the book seriously after that. Very bad.
souls of black folk. was worthless...was not the correct match for my class book requirement.  Never used it...if someone wants it you can have it for free
Success Secrets of the Online Marketing Superstars. I bought this book for my wife but after having looked at it I should have bought some flowers instead.The book was bilge water but for those who watch the gurus of e-marketing the classic formula for e-book selling has been followed to the letter.Really great ad copy to move the book (sell the sizzle not the steak) and use the book as a thinly veiled advertisement pushing the products of all the gurus who "generously" supplied content.For the unititiated I would suggest this. Go to each of the websites of those marketers mentioned in the book or the teaser copy. What you will find is the same names popping up on all of the different websites. This is because they each act as an endorsement for the others product.Go to Mitch's website and you will see the "usual suspects" endorsing this book as the greatest thing since sliced bread. Then go to one of their's and you will find Mitch endorsing their product as the greatest thing since sliced bread. It takes a while to spot the mechanics but before to long you to will learn the secrect too cross-plugging and expert endorsements for fame and fortune.It reminds me a little of the old Shakesperian acting troupes where the same five or six actors toured together. In each play it was the same actors only playing different parts.I also suspect that those who have provided glowing reviews are either new to this game or are schmoozing for an endorsement of their own product by one of the big fish.Bottom line- save your money. And remember how this game works the next time you get one of those "You've just got to see this" emails touting a new product from one of the "usual suspects".This is how you take dishwater and turn it into an overnight best seller. Which ever one of these guys who's turn it is to shear the sheep this month simply has the other guys who are waiting their turn at bat blast their mail list with a glowing revue and a "to good to resist" offer. The groupies and the newbies fork out the shekels enmasse while the gurus begin work on their sheep shearing best seller
Did I miss something?. This book started off very good, but as I read on the reading became ardious.  I found it hard work to finish this book.  I don't know why I had such a hard time enjoying the book while all the other reviewser thought it was the best thing since sliced bread, but I would read another shark book, such as Shark Trouble or Close to Shore rather than waste my time on this book
Only if you can sew... While this book does have a few pictures, they seem quite old.  The one or two items I liked didn't have any instructions for.   If you are not a sewer, than this book is not for you.  I found the book very confusing - definitely written for the person with sewing background. Sorry
Slow. Melissa was just an average gossip reporter for a NYC newspaper looking for love in all the wrong places.  Fortunately her elderly next door neighbor was attacked in her home and left for Mel to find unconscious and barely breathing.  Mel, being the kind, neighborly girl she is, took to taking care of the woman's pets and set to getting in contact with her only living relative.  Her heinous, photographer nephew, Max.  After hearing of his aunt's accident, Max decided it was more important to spend a few weeks in Florida with a supermodel.  In his place, he sent an old college friend who owed him a favor.  John Trent, a trust fund millionaire, was called in to stay at Max's house and pretend to be Max.  After spending time together Mel and "Max" begin to fall i love, creating quite a mix up.  All in all it's a cute book, but I hate that the entire book consists of correspondance through emails
The Face is Ugly. I`m trying to remember what made me pick up this book. I know I wanted some light reading for the summer days sitting on the beach but the Face was so bad it took me a month to finish it. I literally had to force myself to read it. The writing is vintage Koontz to the extreme. Koontz likes to describe things that not many people really care about and this book is yet another example. I call it diarrhea.(Spell check)I respect Koontz, for example, Odd Thomas is really good but the face is a story of a boy who is the target of a sick, demented killer. Thanks to some spirit who led a disgraceful life while alive, the boy lives in the end.A good 200 pages could have been deleted from this book and maybe then we would have had something decent. My advice is skip this one.I would love to know if Mr. Koontz is being paid by the page? The face makes me wonder..
Imitation Bat. Abandoning the reinterpretation of the initial epoch of Batman, like the previous writings of THE LONG HALLOWEEN and DARK VICTORY, HUSH instead is a tale set in the modern era. The plot concerns the arrival of a new villain and the supposed control of the insane criminal base of Gotham City. The Dark Knight must work to end the transgression that seems to be rapidly spiralling out of control.The story begins as a simple kidnap and ransom story, that appears to be only a fraction of a greater crisis playing out behind the scenes, eventually turning into a mass profusion of ideas and set pieces without proper relevance or connection.The denouement is inauthentic, where it's fragmented and composed of distracting slack subplots largely unnecessary to the thematic undercurrent. Rather than follow through on the normal writing design of problem - reaction - resolution, the plot advancement has Batman continually reacting. A villain is introduced, generating the requisite fight scene that unfolds over an entire issue. This technique carries on until all the A list villains appear. It keeps the readers' mind disengaged from the "mystery" with its barrage of moments that provoke the certain, predictable appeal from the readership. HUSH ultimately becomes out of control throughout the plot development in its intent on being an epic, all defining book with its features of shocking moments and revelations. That trick has an overall numbing experience as the writing never recovers from the numerous blows to its credibility from the revisionist writing method.The obvious mystery at the core is a simple pretext to affix a lingering, indulgent plot to the city's criminal element, ensuring that numerous revered characters are on display, the narrative never addresses or justifies the illogical, unexplained behavior of the characters. Rather than constructing a contemplative mystery worthy of Batman's abilities, the character is rewritten without the strong awareness and detective instinct, his character arc severely undermined as a result.Overall, Hush never feels like a sincere attempt at storytelling. Where it differs from Halloween and Victory timewise, the revisionism and borrowed themes that characterized past writings are conspicuously promoted throughout the work with the same undisciplined methods. The book labors beneath redundancy and re-examination of ideas and passages already demonstrated, following the similar formula of those aforementioned works. It lacks inner consistency of the recent treatment of the world, and it fails to reconfigure its limited concept to place well within the current framework of the character. It doesn't attempt to explore the limits of the medium, but one entirely content to reside within its past conventions. Barely acceptable as an entertaining diversion
Not nice. I fell in the pond once, and it really wasn't very nice, and this book brought back horrible memories for me, especially with its overly descriptive passages on pondweed and quacking ducks. I was too traumatised to carry on reading. Not a book for sensitive people
I would rate it ZERO STARS. Not to be disrespectful but are you people for real? I can't believe this book is getting 4 and 5 stars. There was nothing good about this book. A bunch of people in the book did not even matter, Bill Kendall's wife, the new anchor man Pete whatever his last name was, the boss Yelena, Eliza's boyfriend, the priest, even the soon-to-be-president and his wife, I mean what's the point in even mentioning them? They were not involved in the main events. She didn't even talk about what happened to them at the end. The judge is the only one that matters, and she didn't even write about him all that much. Really disappointing. As I said I don't mean to be disrespectful, but to give this book 5stars, you must have read either bedtime stories all your life, or not have read anything.DON"T WASTE YOUR MONEY that's all i have to say. sorr
A real letdown. What a disappointment this is, after the superb Pitt and Monk detective novels set in Victorian times.  Someone at the publishing house should have had the courage to point out some problems to the writer:  (1) She repeats information not once but many times, apparently having forgotten that she had already said that; (2) The plot and denouement are not likely and are hard to follow.  For example, the police supposedly look everywhere for the gun that killed Sebastian, and eventually it is deduced that the one place they didn't look was in the drain funnel on the roof of the master's abode.  And lo, there it was, wrapped in a cloth and stuck, barrel down.  To prove(?) that it was the fatal gun, the cistern barrel for that downpipe is dry.  What?  Say that again?In short, the characters, the dialogue, the atmosphere just don't measure up to the plunges the reader takes into the drawing rooms and rookeries of London, circa 1880+.  Rather than go into this series, the reader would do well to go back and read the Victorian books.  That's a sorry suggestion, and I'm sorry to have to make it.
Longitude. This is without a doubt one of the most boring books I have ever read.  You need to take notes to understand it.  It is very disjointed; it feels like a bunch of different chapter articles bound together in book form. It deals with a fascinating subject; it is a pity that it was not better written because it could have been an excelent book.  This may be the fault of the editor rather than the writer; she certainly needed some expert help with making her chapters fit together in a cohesive manner
Let's at least give a. I'm getting a little concerned about this review system because people are clearly misusing it and reports of abuse have gone ignored.  I am no fan of Bill O'Reilly and this novel is not the greatest, but there is no excuse for intentionally misstating the content of a book or using this space as a soapbox for irrelevant opinions...especially if, from the looks of some of these reviews, a reviewer have not actually read this book.We need to set our opinions and agendas about the author aside and review the book on its own merits.RE: a previous reviewer's statement that "under aged kids are being molested in this book by sicko [...]".  The character in question was a villain who briefly appeared -- a young ghetto dealer who was having sex with a 15-year-old when the hero/vice cop apprehended him.  In fact, O'Reilly is so busy preaching and pontificating in this scene that he forgets he is supposed to be telling a story: "Obviously, he preferred oral sex to oral hygiene."That's the main problem with the novel.  He doesn't understand how a story is told, and it doesn't appear that his editor exercised too much control over easily correctable gaffes.  He interrupts an arrest scene with a comment in parentheses: "Homicide detectives are required to wear suits on duty".  You get the picture.  The details are not horribly original, but nothing is stolen outright that I can pinpoint.  And some scenes and subplots were actually funny.  I have a feeling it could have been a good novel with a decent amount of editing and advice.There is nothing gratuitous, [...], or intentionally [...] in this book.  It is just mediocre -- but I did stick with it to the very end.  If you like media-related mysteries or O'Reilly, check it out of the library like I did.  Fulfilling my curiosity about what kind of story someone with his background would tell was worth a few hours of my time.
Bloody Awful. Please save your money! The so called "Heroine" was so annoying I sided with the bad guy. Enough said.
Average romance novel. i'm a nora roberts fan, so picking up a book of hers to read is something i look forward to. after reading "born in fire", i was eager to find out what kind of romance the cool and collected brianna would find in "born in ice".brianna is a young woman who is uncomfortable with conflict, and because she grew up in a household where her fiery sister maggie and embittered mom maeve were always battling, she developed the ability to keep a calm facade in the face of a storm. she has done a good job of disciplining her emotions to the point where they can't create further conflict, even if she burns with anger inside. she's very family oriented and longs for a husband and family of her own. after being jilted weeks before her wedding a decade before the timing of the story, she thinks she'll never have what she dreams of.she owns a bed and breakfast in a small town in ireland where she is the perfect hostess. she's always hospitable to her guests. she's a gifted artist in both the kitchen and garden, two places she loves to be. although she's surrounded by folks who love her, she's still lonely.and then comes grayson, the american writer who pops in for a couple of months to write a novel as inspired by the scenery and ambience of ireland. he's one who lives in the moment, ignoring his past and unwilling to plan the future because of the commitment and responsibilities such an action would create.the characters compliment each other well. they're both generous and both suffering from childhoods where they didn't feel loved. she's comfortable with the idea of laying down roots but he's not. that's where the conflict comes to play.and that's kinda where i've got a problem with the book. this is supposed to be a guy who doesn't want emotional ties, yet early in the book he's already willingly becoming emotionally attached to her. there simply wasn't enough resistance from him for me to believe he was really afraid of settling down. there was very little if any sexual tension here, and not enough situations to warrant sexual tension. a couple of encounters of kissing and then they were in bed. and even then, it seemed like he wasn't really fighting himself for being there. there simply wasn't enough of an inner conflict within him. it all seemed like lukewarm resistance.and brianna was simply a saint. i would have liked to see her emote a little more. i understand that she was written to be an ice princess of sorts, but i don't think roberts did a good job of depicting her as a character who was a carefully contained boiler. at times i found it difficult to believe brianna could exhibit any kind of real passion with grayson.there were alot of slow moments in the book that made me wishing i was already near the end. i will say that the ending was sweet. also, it was great seeing how the relationship of maggie and rogan progressed from "born in fire".i'd recommend this book to anyone who likes reading about the vividness of a writer's imagination, as roberts did a great job with grayson in that respect. however, if you're looking for a "can't put down" romance novel, this ain't it
Misleading. I have been a huge fan of Michael Crichton for about 25 years.  However, this book is misleading and dangerous.  Almost every respectable scientist in the world now agrees that global warming is real and that we are greatly accelerating this problem (except some scientists affiliated with the petroleum and automobile industries).Writing a book that disputes global warming would be like writing a book that disputes the holocaust - Mr. Crichton could just as easily have written a book about how the holocaust did not really happen, and provide plenty of "references" to support this premise.  Tragically, in the long term, global warming could be far more destructive than even the holocaust.I hope that someday Mr. Crichton recognizes that, in addition to his enormous talent for entertaining, he has enormous influence on people's thoughts and actions through his books.  There is a quote: "With great power comes great responsibility."  But in this case it would seem: "With great power comes great profit at the expense of the planet.
Can't Get Started. I'd read all of David Baldacci's novels and anticipated settling down for a good long read, however, that wasn't the case. This is my second time starting this book and I just can't get past the first few chapters. It just doesn't hold my attention like his previous titles. For those of you reading Baldacci for the first time please don't let this novel turn you off to his other titles. I started reading his books after seeing the movie Absolute Power with Clint Eastwood. Absolute Power was his first novel and after reading that I was hooked. Several of his novels have reached number 1 on the NY Times bestseller list. I'm hoping that his next book will restore my faith in him
bad, bad, bad. Who published these weak translations?  Yup, they are on newsprint and get smudged immediately.  How about using real paper?  B&N needs to stop thinking opportunistically and start thinking about quality
UGH. I loved Girl's Guide and have to agree with most of the reviewers below.  I was so looking forward to another fun, interesting read and for once could not actually finish a book, unusual for me as I will stick with anything unless it's terrible.  This book is just so boring, no spunk or humor; it just fell flat.  I am also finding the Jewish thing to be getting a bit old and overdone in novels these days...aren't there any other ethnic groups to be written about
Meh. Been there, read that for the most part. Not a bad book per se, but the least helpful I have read
Enough!. So annoying to be told again and again how the British treat dogs better than the locals... and all the rest! Even complaining about the food he gets (for free). I would like one day to walk up to his house in Scotland, smelly and with a mangy dog, and see what kind of food I get
Informative and Deeply Flawed. I realize that all the previous reviewers are from other parts of the world and I am from the part of the world so peculiarly described by Mr. Meredith --- and maybe I know better, and maybe I am biased. But I think Mr. Meredith has decided to do a powerful portrait in black (if I may say so) of the whole of Africa, and given that his book is almost entirely descriptive, the portrait is powerful enough indeed. The review from the gentleman from Bangladesh states the ultimate conclusion that one might have if one ignores the fact that Africa is still pretty much colonized, and that it is not so much that the Whites are gone as that they are hidden (only their helping hand is made visible). In any case, my overall impression is that the book is very informative on many of the crimes and horrors that have plagued Africa since the inception of the colonial era (with a concentration on the post-colonial period) but totally neglects the best programs of social and political emancipation which, by the way, can be symbolized by Mandela and Senghor only from a Western point of view. From an African point of view, Mandela has not had the chance to be a real leader and Senghor was a puppet of French neo-colonialism. The real leaders were people like Modibo Keita, Thomas Sankara, Seyni Kountche, in the Francophone countries that I know best. The author also ignores the economic structure of today's Africa, which is only beginning to shift from the colonial polarization to the emergence of an internal market, not without success in some cases, and tragedies in others. I think if the author had been less the journalist that he is by profession, in order to illuminate his narrative with structural analyses, he would have given a more complete vision of the continent, and one that would have made more sense of its evolution. Furthemore, living in Africa, one does not necessarily have the sense of violent decline that is described here. I am from a country which didn't know a single year of civil war, or ethnic brawl. There have been three coups d'etat, which on the whole I think were beneficial to the country. We now have a democratic system. I don't like our politicians: I don't think they have intelligent designs for the country, and they aren't at all above corruption. We have dire economic problems. But life there is peaceful, a bit drowsy and has its many charms. I should add that I am from the better-off section of society and that might taint my vision. But really, I do not have the impression of living in the hell pit of bloody feuds and utter corruption (I am 35, and have so far never had the occasion to bribe a civil servant in my country, although I know very well that corruption exists) that emerges from this book, and I'd venture to say that many Africans out of the warring areas will think that the book is a bit much. My general experience is that countries differ a lot, despite the kind of uniformity that Mr. Meredith sought to impose on us in this book. I won't be happy in Nigeria for instance. I liked Ghana. I am not desperate. I think we need peace and time, and the kind of help that works on structures (education and health) not on symptoms (corruption and poverty). Mr. Meredith book isn't helpful in that sense, and that's why although I found it informative, I never recommend it.
One star is too many. I read "My Side of the Mountain" as a child.  It remained one of the few children's books that I reread once a decade or so.  Then I read the second book.  Not as good, but sequels seldom are.  Then I read this piece of excrement.  Thankfully, I borrowed it from the library and didn't pay any money for it.Mrs. George takes her wonderful tale and turns it into this tiresome ham-fisted tirade against business and government.  There's an awkward screed against one group or another in every chapter - with only a few of the "enlightened" not tarred and feathered.I used to be a fan.  Now, I doubt I'll give my niece and nephew any of her books for fear they might read this one.
Disappointing.  I was not enchanted. With such an ambitious title, I expected a more lively and fulfilling  work.  Instead, I was left waiting for Moore to take ideas to a greater  spiritual and intellectual level; unfortunately, this never happened.  For  those who want more substance, I suggest looking elsewhere
It's All About Me and the Booty. I just had to read and write a review about this book based on my niece's meeting with Sean. But first, the review.In order not to diminish the previous reviews, I will just focus on the whole war talk. On page 4--no messing around here--Sean states, "[w]e must take the war to them, rooting them out of their swamps and destroying the despotic regimes that furnish their lifeblood." Wow, bring it on dude. Oh, you mean let's send somebody else's kid to fight, right? On page 247 he drills that point in with, "[i]'d like to see the good governor [Dean] present a case that there's any higher moral cause than defending one's innocent countrymen against terrorist attack." If it's such a great "moral cause," Sean, why oh why ain't you out there with the rest of my family? Does this, by the way, mean you are immoral since you punked out? I never thought of myself as "moral" just because I volunteered and served as a paratrooper in Vietnam. Is military service only for Democrats and brown people? Should we have a new draft catagory such as "1R" for "Republican," which means you don't have to serve?To paraphrase Frank Purdue, it takes a tender man to spout tough talk. Page 108 puts down Democrats (I'm a Democrat who served in Vietnam, or am I repeating myself?) with, "[w]hen it comes to the Hitlers, the Brezhnevs, the Saddams, pussyfooting is the order of the day." Yeah, Sean, tell me what you really think. Well, Sean, some of us are out there strapping it on every day while you...do....what? And wasn't the Bush family in business with Hitler during WWII?Here is really why this guy is full of himself. My niece, visiting me before heading to the Gulf and her first combat tour, spotted him in DC. She introduced herself and told him she was a fan. When she told him she was in the military he offered her a free book, saying he would ship it to her. She is very polite, and told him he didn't have to. Sean insisted. She wrote her address down. Before heading overseas, I asked her if Sean had sent the book as promised. No (and no surprise for me). So, me being me, I contacted Sean by email twice but got not reply. Too busy impressing all those other servicewomen, I guess.Sean Hannity, not just by this book but by his actions, is a coward, blowhard, and more interested in putting the make on cute servicewomen. His book dedication to his wife means about as much as the rest of the book. You should be ashamed of yourself, Sean, but that would mean taking a "moral" position, wouldn't it?
Dreadful Mishmash. I have to say I truly hated this book. The premise sounded interesting so I decided to give it a try.  I've read all her other books in the series and found the characters to be quirky.  This time I found her usual friends and co-workers to be boring and self involved caricatures. The groundwork was there for an interesting serial killer with complex motivation but it never developed that way. The constant head hopping was annoying and the ending came out of nowhere.  Cromwell has obviously gotten bored with her characters and it shows.  This is my last Cromwell
Yuch - one of the worst. I'm am writing this from Palawan in the Philippines where a friend arrived a few days ago, somewhat confused, with this guide in hand.  I have lived in the Philippines and traveled here extensively, and have used the other guidebooks.  This one, well, sucks, IMHO.Several issues.  Firstly, the book is unbearably surly.  It's tiring.  Conscientious criticism is OK, but we're here to enjoy our trip, OK?  If the authors hate the Philippines so much they should not be writing a guidebook.  Strange how this British publication seems so bent on trashing our American colony....Secondly, the travel information is just plain unreliable.  We tried to use the book's step by step travel information but many times found that the details were lacking - intermediate travel steps were sometimes not there at all.  Confusion!  Distances noted seem to be right out of the Twilight Zone.  How three cities significantly farther along the same route can all be the same distance from Manila is a mystery to me.  Beyond that, many of the most desireable and prominent tourist destinations just are not listed at all.  Palawan is a prime example, there's not that much here, and the excellent butterfly farm is not listed.   Actually, virtually nothing is.  And true to form they mention the ones they do only as an excuse to gripe about them, even the most beautiful.Seedy aspects of some of the Philippines are not mentioned, or glossed over.  This is unfortunate.  There are many resort areas that are basically brothel towns, which is not pointed out in the narrative.  Someone heading to these on a family vacation would be sorely disappointed.  In regards to these resort areas, it's like writing a guide about Las Vegas and not mentioning gambling.  People need to know what's there, so they can avoid it if nothing else.I am also surpised - and I found this in the RG for Thailand recently as well - important phone numbers are often not listed.  Several times a Filipino had offered to help us call a hotel or bus station and hoped to get the numner from our copy of of RG, to no avail.  Seems they had gotten the number from LP before and assumed this guide book would list them as well.Did I mention the guide is just plain mean-spirited?They also do not seem to know their audience.  I see the "Lonely Planet" crowd as budget travellers with some sense of travel conscience.  Yet the guide exclusively recommends a very expensive handicrafts market in Manila that is known for exploiting local artists.  There are numerous small shops that are reasonably priced that support local artisans, which don't seem to exist for the Rough Guide folks.  Neiman Marcus seems to be the preferred mode.I find little about this book to like.  I have liked other Rough Guides, but for me this one... well, don't bother..
A bit slanted. I have to say that of all the books I've read on the Romanovs, this one just plain made me angry because it's not very impartial. I was under the impression that a historian would want to be as impartial & objective as possible in order to demonstrate "the truth." In this case, the author cakes the text with so much subjectivity, I couldn't even finish it. I'm as open as the next person when it comes to putting forth new ideas, but the book doesn't even do that. For anyone who's read anything about the dynasty, the author seems to have deliberately forgotten about anything else that's been written about it - including historical files and information already well known in history. His opinion is so prominent that it became more annoying  the more I read. I got the distinct impression he was actually "siding" w/ particular family members - rather than looking from the outside in. NOT a good read for people who love the rich history of the Romanovs.
had to force myself to read. I really wanted to read this book.  I've read a lot about the Nazi persecution of Jews, as well as their persecution of Russians, Slavs, homosexuals, anarchists, Jehovah's Witnesses, and so on.  But I hadn't read much about their persecution of the Roma, or Gypsies, and I wanted to learn about it. But the book is extraordinarily dry.  The author did not bring the events to life at all. It's pretty hard to make a subject as inherently dramatic as the systematic persecution of an entire people not very interesting, but the author succeeded.  What's worse, really, was that as other reviewers suggested, there was a powerful theme of underplaying the importance of what happened to the Roma. I was very disturbed by this. I give the book two stars instead of one because I did learn a few things. But I will be looking for another book on the subject, because I didn't learn enough
NOT A VERY GOOD BOOK!. I guess this wasnt the type of book for me... it was boring, not surprising, and it felt like 3 months had gone by since i started the book (took me 2 weeks to read)! If i hadn't had to read this for school I would've never finished it
Pretentious. Self-indulgent. Don't bother. This book has to be one of the most pretentious and self-indulgent books I have ever read. The author seems to care very little for her reader and just tries to show off her supposed skill with language. In the hands of Nabokov or Rushdie such experimentalism is genius and beautiful. In the hands of Ali Smith it is clumsy and self-indulgent. In fact, this book made me angry. Whatever happened to telling a good story or developing characters? It is as though Ms Smith just spewed up whatever was in her head on to the page with very little thought into how to make her characters complex, give the themes any depth or subtlety, or advance the narrative. And to think she received critical acclaim for this book. Ugh. Bring back Nabokov! I weep at the thought that this is the future of "good" literature
Don't Bother - No Value Added. I read two-third of the book and I feel less intelligent for it.  Mr. Hoque used the letter &quot;e&quot; in front of every big word and never illustrated how &quot;e&quot; or internet would actually change the business environment.  The Internet allows information to flow to almost anyone, and in a business environment, this can add tremendous value, yet, Mr. Hoque never explained or showed how this would occur.  Also, his analysis on the supplier value chain was so superficial, that no value could be gained from reading that section
"Pop" psychology at its worse... ...Mr. Jensen and his wife have developed a veritable cottage industry replete with workshops, seminars, presentations, publications, certifications -- if you've got the money then they have something to sell you...and all of it is centered around what is termed "brain-based learning"...but what this book presents is little more than 400 pages of scientifically unsubstantiated claims and recommendations...for example, it claims that the color yellow somehow enhances intellectual performance and, hence, classrooms should be painted yellow...however, he doesn't offer a shred of evidence to back that claim up...it's all just ridiculous...how does this stuff ever make it into print
A book of little inherent value. I have to disagree with every review written about this book thusfar.  It is not well written, for one.  The style is amateurish, and it has little substance.But that's not what really bothers me about this book.  What really bothers me is that he writes about soliciting a prostitute that he describes as having a "twelve-year-old's body."  Another thing that bothered me was that George Packer dropped out of the Peace Corps without even telling his so-called friends in the village that he was leaving.  He wasted the opportunity that was given to him, wrote a mediocre book about it, and yet reviewers come on Amazon.com and laud it.Want some free advice?  Read any other book about Africa, Togo, or the Peace Corps instead.  This one is not very good
Hate Monger Preaching More Hate, Devisiveness. This book, not unlike, Mr. Robertson's other views and preachings, tries to polarize Americans to not be respective and inclusive of each other.  Of course one would not expect anything less from the man who suggested that 9/11 occurred because of the feminists, gays and other folks who do not 100% share Robertson's beliefs.  My folks always taught me to be understanding, compassionate and respectful of others even if they have different beliefs, are of a different race/sexual orientation/religion et al.  Maybe in the Medieval Times where Mr. Robertson's views obviously come from, the opposite was acceptable.  In 2003, it is simply not
Disappointed, but what else can you expect?. I'm really disappointed in this book, because the author seems to imply that you can have ANYTHING you want, but that is just not the case.  It's a deceptive title.I can honestly say that this book is worthless and is not going to help you; you're better off practising Feng Shui and hanging little crystals in your house than reading this book (and I'm not knocking Feng Shui, I practise it myself).  People like the author of this book just want to make a quick buck at your expense.  In the end, you'll just feel worse off, looking for the "next big thing" to promise you some more snake oil.Another fact I'd like to point out is that this author sells this book in CD format for around $60.00 (I got a flyer in the mail).  If he is truly living life according to his principles why would he even charge for these so-called "secrets," doesn't that go against his own moral values?  One of the gimmicks of the CDs is that you can learn the secret sound of "creation," as if chanting "Ahhhh" is going to make everything alright.  Thanks to Dyer and others like him, I am completely against any sort of "positive thinking" Guru.  They are only after YOUR money (while you keep wishing you had more).*Btw, you might be interested to know that after reading this book, you're only going to find out that the BIG CATCH is that Manifesting Your Destiny, according to the author, ONLY applies to spiritual matters.  Huh?  Yes.  The entire book promises you can have anything you want, but it has absolutely nothing to do with material prosperity.  The author also wants you to know that if your desire is not in accordance with "God's" plan, you don't have a chance either.  Thought I'd mention that before you read this book and end up feeling cheated!
Interesting information but poor commentary... I'm the type of person who is interested in the story after the story.  So I was anxious to read Gettysburg: Memory, Market and an American Shrine by Jim Weeks.  While the facts that he presents are quite interesting, the book bogged down with his sometimes totally inappropriate social commentary.Weeks begins before the Civil War when genteel society spent their leisure time in parks and cemeteries.  When 160,000 Confederate and Union troops converge on Gettysburg in what became the battle that changed the course of the war, Gettysburg would never be the same.  Within days, hordes of people traveled to Gettysburg for a number of reasons.  Some came to assist the injured and dying or to seek out missing loved ones.  Others came to see the battlefield and to search for relics.  This became the beginning of the evolution of Gettysburg as a national shrine.Weeks does intensive research on how this little hamlet of 2500 people became the most visited National Park Service battlefield.  The process was not without some growing pains as different groups vied for control and locals tried to cash in on the tourist trade.  The author details how the face of tourism changed from visiting veterans to black groups celebrating emancipation to family vacationers and finally, to reenactors.  The means of traveling also changed from trains to cars.  But this book would have been much better if Weeks had just stuck to the facts.I do agree with some of Weeks' criticisms.  After just returning from a trip to Gettysburg, I believe there is just a little too much tourist trap honky-tonk to be found there.  I also believe that the Battle of Gettysburg should not be celebrated as much as honored.  And after looking at my fellow tourists, it does appear that Gettysburg appeals to mainly white men.  Unfortunately, I feel the author goes way overboard.  He claims that Gettysburg has actually become worse than Disney World for sanitized entertainment. Actually, the National Park Service has done much in recent decades to make the battlefields more authentic.  Weeks heaps criticism on almost every group of visitors and is especially unrelenting about the recent reenactment trend.  He claims white males have taken up this pastime because of the male-dominated society lost to them since "Feminism brought women into the male world of work" and because of "the competing minority culture."  Weeks is especially stuck on the class system, and seems to lament the loss of "genteel society."  In fact, he uses the word genteel ad nauseam.  On page 58, genteel appears 13 times!  Just to provide a brief example of part of the first paragraph:"Thanks in part to the railroad, the genteel resort of the immediate postwar years gave way to one that included a broad cross-section of America, genteel and plebeian, black and white.  Separate spaces catered to both genteel and working-class tastes, yet the genteel accommodated the plebeian.  While the genteel agenda for constructing a park much like a rural cemetery..."So if you're a hardcore history fan and you're interested in Gettysburg, you might find some use for Gettysburg: Memory, Market and an American Shrine.  If not, I don't think it's worth the read.
That's it I'm done with her. I used to love Iris Johansen's books esp. her Eve Duncan books. The last few though have been terrible. On the Run was the final straw, she's lost me as a reader. I read about 100pgs and gave up. The plot was so dumb I can't believe she got someone to publish it.
Not very professional. I agree with the first review (one star...). However, the book could be  useful for someone who is starting to make his way in learning in strategic  games. I would also mention that 3'5 floppy comes with the book (C code for  DOS platform) so the fact that 80% of the book is a source listing is  annoying. Begginers would find first couple of chapters interesting though
Too Complicated. Thau over complicates her points.  The book is too difficult to understand.  I am an attorney who has been investing in stocks and bonds for over 10 years.  This book is not appropriate for any level investor
I kept turning the pages, but was ultimately disappointed. I am a John Case fan - and I had high hopes for this novel.  I enjoy novels that take the reader to different geographical places, and that is one of the big things that kept me turning the pages.Unfortunately, a disappointing ending and a main character that kept doing things that would have me close to pulling out my hair force me to not recommend this book to my friends
A Complete Waste. Did anyone bother to check any of the recipes in this book? I think not. Not only are some of the ingredients difficult to get a hold of, the end product is a disaster. How difficult is it to compile recipes that have actually been made? Not very. But apparently it's much easier to just make them up. Like many have posted here, it is not the occasional recipe but a substantial proportion of them. I think Martha owes us all a hefty refund, if not for the time, money and effort wasted, as least for the book! For now, this one goes in the fire kindling pile
i dont think so. In the bokk Space Station Seventh grade by Jerry Spinelli a kid named jason wants to build a space station.Ididnt really like this book because the author made the main idea hard to present.I thought that the author jumped around from one subject to another.For example one chapter was talking about football then the next was about halloween.The author focuses on other subjects and doesn't realizes theres not enought infiormation about the main idea
Boycott Robert G. Allen!!!. Robert G. Allen is a notorious and relentless internet spammer.  If you should happen to somehow end up on one of his email lists like I did, he will send you several junk emails a day.  Unsubscribing doesn't work, and trying to block the sender's domain is useless because the emails are sent from a different domain every time.  The funny part is that the emails aren't even coded properly.  They always show up as just a bunch of html code.  Would you really take internet money-making advice from a guy who can't even code html properly?  Anyway, his spamming practices are completely illegal and it's only a matter of time before the law catches up with him.  But that shouldn't come as any surprise considering that mister Allen has been in trouble with the law before.  He's had several run-ins with the IRS, lawsuits against him, and a chapter 7 bankruptcy.  I would also stay away from his Nothing Down real estate methods.  Many of those practices are illegal, and the president of the Nothing Down club in Atlanta wound up in federal prison because of it.  For more info on Allen, visit johntreed dottcomm, click on Real Estate Investing, then click Real Estate Guru Ratings.  Bottom line, don't trust this guy and don't buy his books. And if you're reading this Mr. Allen, take me off your @%#&*$ mailing list!!
The complete Greek Cookbook. Boring recipes, but the history of cooking in Greece  makes the book a worthwhile purchase.
For Long Time Readers Only. Another enjoyable read, quicker than most because you don't have to think. It's not much of a mystery, and the Siamese cats really have little to do with its solution but provide a clever title. Mostly they give Braun a chance to ooh and ahh over the inexplicable ways of cats. It was many books ago that Koko actually provided a useful clue to his host, Mr. Q, the genial bachelor billionaire who is every tame girl's wish. Mostly this is a tale from Moose County, 400 miles north of anywhere. If you don't know what I'm talking about, this is certainly not right place for you to pick up this series.Brrr is celebrating its 200th anniversary with Scots, a giant cake, bland good will from everyone, and Qwilleran's second historical disaster radio show up on stage. That's pretty exciting, too, when we get to hear the whole script. Oh, sure, there's a bad happening or two in town, but don't let that put you off for they occur well out of view. There's also good times with Q's good friends, and a subplot about an old lady, her fabulous antiques, and her mercenary granddaughter. There's no significant development in the relationships among any of Braun's stock characters--you know who I mean. To top off a pleasantly fluffy read, Braun appends two of Q's favorite delicious recipes. A quintessential summer beach read, guaranteed to pass a few hours pleasantly.
Revisionist history at its worst. This is a work that pretends at objectivity, but is written with a clear agenda in mind. Pappe totally identifies with the Palestian  Arab cause, and places the major onus for the conflict on the Jews of Israel. Thus he slants the major historical and political realities, in which the Jews have five times agreed to a peace plan based on partition while the Arabs have insistently refused to accept the Jews right to a state of their own. Pappe underplays the persistent and systematic Arab violence and terror which have been at the heart of the conflict from its beginning. He mistells the story of the 1947-1948 war minimizing the Arab agression, the calls of the leaders of Arab states for Palestinians to temporarily abandon their homes , so that invading Arab armies would be able to kill Jews more freely. He underplays the countless initiatives made by Israelis from all walks of life to live in peaceful relations with the Arabs. And does not really put the conflict into the  context of the pan- Arabic, Islamic fundamentalist, and Arab nationalist processes which perpetuate the conflict even today.This is Revisionist History at its worst, a distorting and ignoring of the factual and objective reality in order to promote a ' cause' . That cause is disguised and misrepresented in the work.For Pappe as anyone who reads carefully will see  is calling for a Jewish state which ceases to be Jewish in any meaningful way, and eventually becomes an Arab dominated one , in which its Arab minority will eventually become its majority. Pappe's analysis is one which aims to help bring about the destruction of Israel.Is it surprising then that most Israelis consider him to be both a hypocrite and a traitor?
the chicken soup for the writing-it-down souls. This book may be as well called "the chicken soup for the writing-it-down souls".  The author illustrates her points by telling many uplifting stories.  However, if you are a self-help reader like me who is used to David Allen's "Getting Things Done", you may find that storytelling is distracting and not as convincing as it can
super disappointed. let me give you a word of advice about some genuine self help you can put to use in your life immediately: don't buy this book. i had expected or at least hoped for an explanation of where self help breaks down and whether or not it works, and what i got instead was a long overly philosophical text that reminded me of my reading for college sociology. this book is a case of how many angels can dance on the head of a pin, in spades
Regret. Ever read a newspaper article to find half of it is taken up by useless information? e.g. &quot;Dr Kenith E. Browner (MBA, BAS, winner of the 2002 SoandSo award, local Environmentalist, Graduated from Northern SS University with honors) says to bundle up this weekend.&quot;      ...     You just can't help to skim past it all.. Which brings me to Death Valley by Keith William Nolan. Half of this book is filled with useless info! Once in a while you get a little hint of a story, but then it jumps back into naming so many battalions, sergeants, lieutenants, soldiers, weapons, equipment, points...etc   You just can't visualize anything happening with all of this... well.... I don't know what it is. One thing I'm sure of is that I totally regret setting eyes on this boo
Better off playing outside. I did not find this workbook relevant to 7th/8th grade curriculm for science or social studies and overall way too basic for math or english at 7th/8th grade. More for elementary school 3,4,5 grade.As far as a "summer bridge" I would suggest that you encourage your kids to playing games and activities outside or board games on rainy days than this book
Good writing, good idea. The writing is good from a technical standpoint (I don't have to jump literary hurdles to get through a paragraph because the words flow very well).  The idea is a good one too.  What I can't get past is the character Robert Langdon.  Langdon is supposed to be a sharp academic but he seems to lack foresight in his cogitations and things always dawn on him at the last second.  Another thing I have trouble with is Dan Brown's knack for slowing the pace of the story.  Things will be running strong for a moment and then the author tries just a little too much to build suspense.  The problem is the reader already knows where the particular scene is headed and this attempt to build up for a critical moment leaves me wanting to skip ahead to the payoff.  Like playing fetch with a dog, you can only tease him for so long before he loses interest, especially when the dog has a pretty good idea where the ball will land after it's finally tossed.This book is an easy read but I think it is a bit over-rated.
What a disappointment. I have been reading the Anita books and loved it ever since Guilty Pleasures. That is why I'm thoroughly disappointed with this book. I'm halfway through the book already and still there's not even a hint of a big bad. After the scene at the club, it's like 200 pages of repetative sex scene nonsense. I found myself glossing through paragraphs just to get to the end of the chapter. It feels like LKH ran out of things to write and stretched a scene into 5 chapters. I mean the curing Gregory part was just wayyyyyy tooooooo loooonnngggg... If the remaining books are like this, I think I'm going to pass it. AND Anita is getting to be so annoying. Whatever happened to her raising the dead or her police work or hell does she even works at her office anymore
Forget the racism argument....what about the drownings, executions, burnings at the stake, suffocations..... Racism is not the problem with this book - sure...5 Chinese brothers look alike -maybe they look alike because they are brothers, not because they are Chinese.  I bought this book because generally I love the books written in earlier times - they have a quaintness about their stories and illustrations that can transport you and your child to another time.  This book does have engaging illustrations.  What I find disturbing is the fact that this is a book for children yet:(1)	a little boy drowns, never to be seen again(2)	one brother is tried, arrested and sentenced to have his head cut off(3)	the people of the village assemble in the village to witness the execution where the "executioner took his sword and struck a mighty blow"(4)	the next brother was sentenced to be drowned and was thrown overboard from a boat(5)	the next brother is sentenced to be burned alive - he was tied up to a stake and set fire(6)	the next brother is sentenced to be suffocated - he's shovelled into an ovenThis is no more appropriate for a child (or adult for that matter) in 1936 than it is in 2005.  Now, a lot of you are probably thinking I'm one of those mothers who just needs to get a sense of humour and lighten up.  I'm not...I love the Giving Tree, and can put naughty Eloise (and the smoking nanny) in context, as I can many other books that polarise readers.  I really wanted to like this book but trust me....if you buy it, you will have lots of uncomfortable explaining to do to a young child.  An eight year old may be able to put it in context, but there is no way you should read this to a four year old.   If you want a great book written in the 1930s, buy Ferdinand the Bull instead.  It's a fantastic book.
gross. &quot;Everyone Poops' is a tasteful classic. &quot;The Holes In Your Nose&quot; is not. We were given it as a gift, but I put it aside after only one reading, saying my kid could read it to himself once he got old enough, but I didn't have to suffer through reading it aloud ever again. We don't need to read about someone picking his nose and eating it! Disgusting, and not worthy of being promoted alongside 'Everyone Poops', as it so often is
Different world. I bought the book thinking that it would be accurate and helpful in everyday conversation.   I feel that most of what I read is simply not factual.  As a person, I feel strongly that I would not want to tell anyone that I knew the author or was his friend.  maybe it is just that we come from different backgrounds and experience.
Not worth the tree to make the paper. I must say, selling a dated book like this when you're talking about Websites is a shame.  Sure some ideas might be timeless but this book uses poor example after poor example to make its point.  I read another web book called "Don't make me Think" just before this one.  I guess it would be like following Elvis with a kindergarden play.  Save your money.  Need I say more.
Deliberate Misuse of Data. One example will illustrate how this author knowingly misuses data to mislead his audience.  He points to the statistical density of Los Angeles as evidence that density does not provide the benefits typically associated with it (less gas use, etc.).  In doing so, he ignores tha fact that LA is built to its perimeter, and thus has a high AVERAGE density compared to many other cities, since those cities contain a much denser core surrounded by vast undeveloped areas.  LA's high average density bears little relationship to its lack of localized high densities, which are what confer benefits like less gas use.  Breugmann knows this, but he chooses to misuse the data to support his own contrarian enterprise, and in so doing, he gives the sprawl juggernaut one more foot up.  I personally know sprawl developers who use this intellectually bankrupt book to fight grassroots citizen opposition.  As Apu on the Simpsons would say, "Breugmann very bad man."  He is the no-global-warming scientist for the sprawl set
The "Innocents Abroad" live!. Talk about a typically clueless American. I threw this book away after reading about half in exasperation
the most boring book i read in a really interesting class. Getting Married in Korea was one of the 3 books my Cultural Antro professor mandated us to read.  The book is excruciatingly boring.  Unlike his other reading assignments, I couldnt see myself pass the first chapter (or even the first page!).  Fortunately, I finished the book in a month.  (woohooo).  The content was in detail and the book with only few graphics.  i thought it could have been better if the author stuck more pictures in their to at least entertain the reader while reading
Great material flawed by credibililty questions. A subject of eternal fascination especially for basketball &quot;nuts&quot; who grew up in New York.   We idolized the terribly tarnished CCNY &quot;Wonder Five&quot; who set an unbreakable record by winning both the NIT and NCAA titles in 1950 (it can never be repeated because of the way the tournaments are now scheduled). This book is a fictional addendum to Rosen's non-fiction treatment of the original basketball &quot;scandals&quot;, as he outlines in his NPR interview. Unfortunately there are glaring albeit minor errors -- Broadway and 43rd Street cannot be on the east side of Manhattan; Madison Square Garden has been on 23rd Street, and is now above Penn Station; in between it occupied the block bounded by 49th and 50th Streets and Eighth and Ninth Avenues.  These errors are particularly galling in a book by a New Yorker who played at Hunter College, and they undermine the author's credibility and care in writing. Since this is a fictionalized account of a real occurrence, the game of who is this really is inescapable.  Hence it is most unfortunate that Rosen in his interview avers that some players who were not prosecuted went on to pro careers, and &quot;a couple are in the Hall of Fame.&quot;  This tarnishes by inclusiveness such stalwarts as Bob Cousy (Holy Cross, '49), Dick McGuire (St. Johns, '48), Bobby Wanzer (Seton Hall, '46), and Frank McGuire, the legendary coach at St. John's, North Carolina and South Carolina
The Same Old Lies, Repackaged. This one's easy.  The lies start showing up even in the book description."The Zionists established a sovereign Jewish state in 1948. Had they been content with that, peace might have followed the 1967 war, when Israel could have backed the creation of a Palestinian state in the occupied territories."Actually the Zionists were willing to accept the tiny country that was initially Israel, but the surrounding Arab nations attackeed immediately.  After the 1967 war, Israel offered virtually all the so-called West Bank, but without East Jerusalem, back to Jordan.  They offered Gaza back to Egypt.  They did not offer the Golan Heights back to Syria, because they no longer wanted to be sitting ducks for Syria's artillery.  Israel's offer of the West Bank and Gaza back to Jordan and Egypt was offered at a price: recognition, peace and negotiation.  At the 1967 Arab summit in Kartoum, the Arabs responded to Israel's offer with No, No and No.  Israel had every right at this point to annex the territories won in a defensive war, but under pressure from the U.S. and elsewhere, Israel did not.After the war, in 1967, there was no talk of a Palestinian state in the territories.  For 19 years Jordan occupied the West Bank, and there was no Arab or Palestinian clamor for a Palestinian state.  For 19 years Egypt occupied Gaza, and there was similar silence.  There was no reason for Israel to talk about yet another Arab state when even the Arabs hadn't talked about it.The whole idea of a Palestinian state was a concept invented by the surrounding Arab nations to make war against Israel by a new method: public relations.  If they could make the world believe that Israel was an occupier of lands not theirs, they hoped world opinion could defeat Israel where Arab armies could not.  Nevertheless, in 1973 the Arab nations tried yet again, but were trounced, and the war by public relations started to ramp up.In my opinion, Neuman's solution, "The only solution is for Israel to withdraw, unilaterally, to its 1948 borders.", shows real impoverishment of thought.  For almost 60 years the Middle East's Arab and Muslim nations have been trying, unsuccessfully, to destroy a nation that was recognized by the United Nations and which was purchased totally and legitimately from recognized landowners, but it is Israel which must surrender?  At the time of Israel's creation, Arabs who were residents and who had not decided to flee (at the request of the attacking Arab nations) were to be given full political rights, unlike, for example, Jordan (Transjordan at the time), in which Jews were not allowed to live.  In fact, although there is racism on the part of individuals in Israel, Israel itself is not a racist state.  It is the surrounding Muslim and Arab nations who are the racists.In my opinion, Neumann's book, even if you consider only its Book Description, is trash in the spirit of the anti-Semitc Czarist forgery, Protocols of the Elders of Zion
Tedious academic compilation. There were a few good nuggets of information in the varied chapters; however, most of the content of this book is hopelessly dry and academic.  Seemingly written by professors and wonks for other professors and wonks, I cannot raise the appraisal of Culture Matters above two stars.  Yes culture most certainly matters.  The value sets of peoples around the world determine if they develop and thrive, or collapse into mediocrity.
Master of Mixed Metaphors. Don't believe the hype.  This book is not a masterpiece, but if you are able to stick through the piles of metaphorical images that are at moments beautiful but most often don't quite make sense together and make it to the end of this novel you'll be pleased to find some actual action and true emotion in Justine.  It took me a very long time to read through the first half of this book.  The narrator is irritatingly affected and the writing drags with a myriad of descriptions that are uneffective at creating a cohesive picture.  But what kept me going were Durrell's secondary characters.  He has a nack for capturing and creating quirkiness that borders on bizarre and his stories of the more minor men and women in Justine are striking, emotional, and entertaining.  I am glad that I was able to make it to the end of the novel (there is a hospital scene that made it all worth while), but I do regret that I recommended this novel to my bookgroup and I do not plan to complete the quartet
Not useful for day-to-day calorie counting. I bought this book so that I could easily figure my caloric and nutritional intake with a pocket-sized book that would be easy to carry around. Unfortunately, the lists in here are unwieldy and overloaded with burdonsome amounts of data on pre-packaged foods. Why would I need this information from a book when it is listed on the package itself? Because of the pages and pages of info on frozen entrees and chain restaurant food, it is difficult to impossible to find out, say, how many calories are in 3 oz of sirloin steak.I recommend instead Lavon J. Dunne's Nutrition Almanac, 5th ed. It gives charts of basic foods and their nutritional content, including vitamins and minerals, in far more detail, as well as a glycemic index chart, chapters on nutrition and health without bombarding a person with the latest diet fads, and charts on daily nutritional requirements. Plus, it is fully indexed, so you can look things up more easily.The only plus I can give to The Complete Book of Food Counts is that is might be useful for people who eat out at chain restaurants, since it has menus for some of them.
Semi-BORING. This book seemed politically written.  The &quot;right&quot; word took center-stage over the substance
Truly Horrendous. This is a poorly-reasoned, simplistic screed of a book.  It reads more like a fundraising letter than an actual piece of analysis or reporting regarding what is a very interesting subject and one worthy of a decent book.  This one is not it.  At best, it is the type of book written purely to gain entry onto cable news programs as an &quot;expert&quot; -- no one really cares what is in it or whether it makes sense or not.  One thing is for certain:  the book does not advance the ball on this topic one iota
attention to detail sometimes a distraction. As far as crime dramas go, this is firmly mediocre.  The story is okay and requires suspension of disbelief only sporadically, but the author's writing style is sometimes a distraction.  Why do the African-American suspects always ask for Slice soda to drink?  And they repeatedly make a point of asking for Slice.  (Do they even make it anymore?  I thought it was replaced by Sierra Mist).   And another distracting detail is the author's way of giving so many people nicknames.  You don't need to tell me that a guy's name is Ed "Smiley" Jones if you never mention "Smiley" again or there's not something significant from a story perspective about that nickname.  That said, I liked the use of DC as the backdrop and if I was going on a plane ride, I would probably pick up another book by Pelecanos (but I wouldn't let anyone see what I was reading and then I'd leave it in the seatback when I deplaned)
Nearly useless, very abstract and badly edited. Audition apparently seems to be some kind of unwanted stepchild of Adobe, based on the scarcity of resources Adobe seems to have dedicated to it. I bought this book based on other positive experiences with the "Visual Quickstart Guide" series, but as another reviewer states, this book barely covers what should essentially be in a basic user's manual. There is little if any detail, very few case-study example, and some significant holes in the instructions.Example: in the "Using Cues" section - there is a section "to list and edit your cues," to "move cues" and to "delete cues"...but it says nothing about creating a cue to start with. These types of omissions can drive beginners insane, and signals some pretty bad editing.Further, abstract explanations of sounds (or worse, how sounds work) are nearly useless. This book badly needs an accompanying cd. Five seconds of actual audio can teach more that fifty pages of words. Avoid this book
Not recommended. The premise, the title, and even the cover art are all misleading - this book does not really explore the world of Internet dating beyond 3 or 4 `dates.' The main character, Jess, is 34, single, and envious of her sister Olivia, and Olivia's perfect marriage and children. As a birthday gift, Jess receives a subscription to an online dating site and manages to go on about 4 dates during the course of a year. Not stunning odds, and not very interesting reading either. Maybe it's just me, but I really thought this book was going to focus more on the dates and less on Jess and her sister. In the midst of the book, the story takes a drastic turn and becomes very `deep' in terms of the storyline; the storyline, which involves Olivia, just didn't gel with the rest of the book and its upbeat attitude. It was as if a large cloud came over the book midway through and it was hard to get the spirit of the book back. Jess does change throughout the course of the year, but with only 4 dates as a frame of reference, her changes are not that believable and neither is her eventual romance. I just thought this book was poorly written (which, aside from its poor storyline, is illustrated by all the swearing). Waste of your time
Disappointment!. This book starts out telling of the sack of Rome and grabbing the reader's attention. It's all down hill from there. The next third of the book is a long drawn out build up with very little of the book actually dedicated to the finale of the build up. The there is this a bit of drawn out rambling that leads into a sudden ending of the book. It was almost as if the writer either got tired of writing and gave up, or she just didn't know how to end it, so she just ended it. I was highly disappointed.
bad bad bad bad bad. SAVE YOUR HARD EARNED MONEY!!!One of the worst books, i have ever read. I will never ever buy another omar poopre book ever again.
made a mistake i can't forgive. In his Authentic Buffalo Hot Sauce recipe he says to use Tobasco. He either has stock in Tabasco sauce or honestly doesn't know what's in real Buffalo Wing sauce. A lot of rub recipes and sauce recipes that are good, but how can he make that mistake? Tabasco
Total Fiction!. It simply scares me to think that some who read this book will believe that what it says is true. While this theory of economic imperialism isn't technically impossible, it's the kind of idea better left to an ideological blog somewhere instead of a book purporting to be a true account. Books like this make the left look as naive and stupid as Ann Coulter books make the right look bigoted and, well, stupid. This is an incredibly implausible account, and books like this, claiming to be nonfiction, undermine good writing and reporting everywhere. Shame on the author and the publisher. The only redeeming quality of this book was that it contained a list of other books published by Berrett-Koehler, the contents of which make it obvious that BK is simly a peddler of 4th rate crackpot theories, all of which appear to be of the nonfiction variety.
Disappointed. I was disappointed like many of the previous readers, mostly having to do with non-existent character development (all clones of each other), insipid dialogue and no real suspense because the mission was done by superhumans (all of whom seemed to be "ruggedly handsome"). However, I was also irked by some of the technical inconsistencies. For example, if one can actually believe that non-musicians can air-guitar their way through a live performance, it doesn't explain how the drummer managed to fool everyone. Also, I find it hard to believe that their GPS was working in the depths of the sewers. Also, the cops' plan to pour dye into the sewers didn't seem like it should have worried the corporation; with a couple of hours head start, wouldn't their raft pop out into the harbour long before the dye? Also, the CIA head was 33 years old in 1959, and supposedly was some kind of intelligence officer in WWII; pretty responsible job for someone who was 19-years old at the end of the war
Living to tell the tail by Gabriel Garcia Marquez. This is the weakest book Mr. Marquez ever wrote-a living proof that autobiographies written by the writers are sentimental drag. His usual style of fantastic truth and romatic albeit very sad fantasy is nowhere to be found. If you love Marquez, do not read this book
&quot;POOR  SPIRITUAL  KNOWLEDGE  BY  THE  AUTHOR&quot;. In John Coleman`s book The Committee of 300, his publisher has book advertisements for some  occultic topics; the worst being Nostradamus. Nostradamus constantly used astrology,as verified in his book preface in  &quot;The Centuries&quot;.               If a reader wants to know more  about whats going on,by a Christian source,might I recomend Dennis L.  Cuddy`s book&quot; Secret Records Revealed &quot;,or Joan Veon books.Both  very strong Christian authors
DOUBLE TAP. This was the first audio book I ever listened to. Perhaps that is why I found it rather boring and unexciting. Maybe I would have enjoyed it more if I had read it myself instead of listening to Joe Mantegna reading it. I hate to criticize Mr. Mantegna because I really liked him when I used to watch the show, "Joan of Arcadia." But there were many places where I would have accented certain words differently and I found myself getting upset at the way he read it in some parts. I love "lawyer books" but have certainly read better.  At any rate, this audio book was not worth the money I paid for it ... even though I bought it on sale. Maybe I am just not a "candidate" for audio books. I thought it would amuse me while driving to and from work and to my house at the shore ... and it did up to a point. I am now looking for audio books that are cheaper because they just go too quickly for me. I am now trying to find someone to give it to and I am also trying to find more audio books to try that are not so expensive. I guess I should re-join the library if I want to continue listening to audio books
Another self-indulgent Heinlein novel. Heinlein loads this book up with hooks in the early pages to catch your attention.  Unfortunately, these hooks turn out to be superfluous and lead nowhere.  This shoddy technique is found in all four of Hienlein's final books.  We are also treated to some of Heinlein's stock characters, dirty old men, horny female computers, naked adolescent girls, and dominant beauties who would be right at home in leather and whips.  Without these archetype characters most Heinlein novels written after 1970 would have a sparse population indeed.  As if this isn't enough, Heinlein drags in his usual cast of characters from his other novels as he is so prone to doing.  In spite of all their cameo appearances, this group remains dull and one dimensional throughout.  Heinlein's earlier novels written prior to 1960 are still fine fare for young people, especially boys.  This novel, as well as most of Heinlein's later work will be enjoyed primarily by a group of die hard fans and is definitely not for general consumption
Not a book for those curious about Asia. One question that might come to mind while reading this book is "Why?" Why in the world would one bother to travel all the way across Asia and back, restricting that journey almost exclusively to sitting in trains? Like P.J. O'Rourke, Theroux seems to be interested only in drinking and describing what a horrible time he is having in horrible places. He rarely stops to see anything, and even when he does those stops are very brief. Even the few genuinely beautiful places he bothers to see are often described in rather deprecatory terms (see, for example, his description of the Sikh Golden Temple in Amritsar as "a copper-gilt gazebo in the center of a tank"). The only places he seems to have liked at all were Istanbul, Peshawar, the Ashau Valley in Vietnam, and Kyoto (incidentally, one of the few bits of the book worth reading is his account of his meeting with the great Turkish novelist Yasar Kemal in Istanbul). Indeed, the attitudes he expresses about the people in the countries he visits are so appallingly and consistently contemptuous, with absolutely no attempt at understanding, that they border on the racist. The reviewers who refer to Theroux as a curmudgeon and a misanthrope are expressing mild judgments, in my opinion. The stars I am giving this are for the interesting descriptions of Vietnam (the one place where he seems to have tried to practise some empathy with the locals) and the underbelly of the Japanese soul. But I recently picked up a copy of Michael Palin's book "Himalaya" and am looking forward to what I hope will be an approach refreshingly different from that of Theroux
The idea is good, but... The idea is good. The characters are really good, with a few exceptions. BUT.1) This book's plot is extremely repetetive. "Oh my gosh, she's committed the unpardonable; they have not choice but to curse her with death." OVER and OVER again. Ayla breaking the "most sacred-est rule ever" and then mysteriously NOT getting in serious trouble for it consumes the entire plot. Well, not the entire plot. The other 1/4 involves how Brun likes his son, now he doesn't, now he does. Ad nauseum.2) In addition to the repetitious plot, there is so much redundant text that one must wonder if ANYONE read the manuscript before it went to print. The author will write, for instance, about how the Clan was confused by Ayla's tears (since they don't cry), and then 10 pages later, she writes the same thing. I don't know how many times she wrote about Ayla's tears, Brun's worry about Broud, how intercourse is strictly a natural function, how they think she's ugly. Etc. Etc. (Etc. Etc.)3. The "Be sure and purchase the next installment" ending in infuriating.I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone. I see now why there are 5 copies of it in every used book store. That said, I read the whole thing in 5 days, so that must say something good about it
This series is getting old now. Just finished reading this novel this morning and I think it is probably the weakest one of the lot.  Like a lot of reviewers, I didn't find this one anywhere near as gripping or well-developed plotwise as a number of the earlier ones in the Stephanie Plum series.  As well, the supposed sexual tension- love triangle between Stephanie, Joe and Ranger is approaching its use-by date.  It is definitely becoming boring and I think Ms Evanovich needs to resolve Stephanie's romantic situation once and for all.  I still enjoy characters like Lula and Grandma Mazur but a lot of the situations Stephanie found herself in fell flat with me.  There are only so many times she can have her car blown up, handbag destroyed, apartment broken into, etc, before it becomes tiresome and repetitive.  I still think there is a spark of life in the Stephanie Plum series, but I hope the next novel is a better effort and not so much by-the-numbers as this one
contains intriguing ideas concerning apocalyptic events. This is a presentation of the possible events that will usher in the reign of the Antichrist.  Key event is a worldwide financial crisis and desperate people in need of a solution.  The solution will be offered by a group of  conspirators, or &quot;money masters.&quot;  Countries will no longer have  individual currencies, but a one-world currency will be initiated.       Some of the theories presented involve timelines which have about expired,  there is repetition in thought and ideas, and some of the ideas presented  seem extreme.  Still, it is not possible to dismiss all of the book as  lunacy, and a few of the ideas stick in the mind and raise questions about  what is happening in the world of today and in the United States
From the Same Minds That Brought You Joel Osteen. I purchased Eldredge's "Wild at Heart", and I didn't think it was scripturally sound. I was given "Waking the Dead" as a present, so I tried to read it as well. I finally gave it up.John Eldredge's writing is typical of today's movement to bring the world into the church. Trying to show a young Christian the religious aspects of movies like "The Matrix" may work, but to my 48 year old ears it rings very hollow. Perhaps it boils down to how much you will dilute Christ's message to get people to listen. For better or worse, I have little patience for it.The author also presents the image of God as "my friend". To me this is nothing but another watering down of the Gospel message to get the world to accept it. Giving the Creator human attributes brings Him down to a level where we can work things out between us. I can't find that kind of relationship in any legitimate Bible translation. After all, my friend wouldn't let my saintly mother die, and save a worthless drug addict now would he? God my friend probably wouldn't have sent His Son to die for my worthless self anyway.This is exactly the same theology as building the largest "Christian" church in the United States, and not putting any crosses in it so as not to "offend anyone". It's the same as getting on a nationally televised program, and stuttering about whether you believe those who don't accept Christ are doomed to hell. When you profess to be a Christian minister or author and you can't speak correctly of what Christianity teaches, it's time to examine just what you really believe. God's word is not always easy to swallow. Either it's the truth or it isn't.Mr. Eldredge also speaks often of "setting hearts free". While I do believe hearts are free when released from sin, a Christian is bought and paid for with Christ's blood and not "free" at all. Titus 1 (KJ) begins, "Paul, a servant of God,and an apostle of Jesus Christ"...Christians ARE freed, but to begin a life of service.For a more accurate and fulfilling study, I recommend "The Way of the Master" books and videos by Ray Comfort/Kirk Cameron.
So Bad I Don't Own It Anymore. What really turned my off on the book was the online examples of animation work the authors had done.  A lot of the most celebrated works were satanic in nature (seriously) or otherwise too prepusbescent homoerotic.  I feel, as a serious artist, the intentions spewing forth from their work was a mental block and I could not read another word.  Still trying to blot the horrible imagery from my memory.Thank god I have seen other flash animation because if all I had to go on with what the authors have done, I think I would need to see a therapist.I wouldn't let these guys teach me to tie my shoes, I wouldn't trust them for fear that they'd be at least be thinking about molesting me, mentally.Besides, flash aint easy either.  It's laborious and it's interface does not lend itself to unique character drawing, just regular blobs that are easily regocnized as flash generated.  Keep your day job
Changing minds deviates from the topic. Harvard psychologist Howard Gardner's book on the art of changing minds and affecting opinions has an appealing pull. Written by a qualified professional in the field, the book is another output of the impressive Harvard Business School Press. The book advances the view that there are seven, what it calls, "layers" or "levers" that affect a change of opinion. These factors, whose titles all begin with `re' are:-Reason-Research-Resonance-Resistances-Real World Events-Resources And Rewards and-Representational RedescriptionsGardner subsequently proceeds to elaborate on each of the factors within contexts such as an institution, among a population, up close or as relate's to one's own mind.So far, so good, many would say; alas the reader is compelled to add `so what?' to the phrase. Changing Minds is indeed the work of a qualified professional, but the reader is neither provided evidence nor shown the techniques and history behind the author's conclusions. Furthermore, being the work of a researcher in an academic setting, readers should not expect practical instructions or employable techniques. Rather, Changing Minds concentrates on the mechanics and psychological hypothesis. In this manner, the book is very much a scholastic paper. Finally, there is scant evidence that the author employs his own teachings. Little proof, research or reason is offered here to be convincing or allay any of the readers' resistances. Similarly dismissed is the need for charts, sub-titles, illustrations, indented or highlighted points or synopses.Furthermore, and more ominously, the author makes several practical mistakes in the way he reads or interprets the world rendering some of his data and experiences suspect. He claims that schools are agents of change and serve to instill different opinions in youngsters. Those are his opinions and not supported by any empirical data. He does not provide any supporting data either. In fact, the contrary is true. Schools are designed to breed uniformity and teach adherence, obedience and group activity. Barely a student will pass physics class were he to challenge a prevalent theory. A law student will probably find himself choosing a new major should he differ with prescribed laws. Similarly, imagine a student disagreeing with the outcome of World War II, an astrology student disputing the form of nova stars or, at an elementary level, a high school student butting heads with his classmates and instructors.Another error is the assumption that events have lead to fundamental change even in thought process of political leaders. Let me quote from the book.While Gardner cites the example of George W Bush following September 11, 2001, many scholars and historians have shown that far from changing his mind, the US president instead leveraged the event to more resolutely drive his pre-existing agenda. Much of what transpired following the events of the day were the accelerations of the American president and his officials' overt and covert ideas and strategies. Gardner terms the new Bush, a "multilateralist"! Uncomfortably, 132 sovereign countries and a lack of support from the United Nations would disagree. Moreover, despite such fierce opposition, Bush proceeded with his plans nonetheless. Further down the pages, the author condemns Stalin's pact with Hitler as "cronyism." He conveniently forgets or omits the allies' earlier pact with Hitler or the West's subsequent treaty with the "extremely paranoid" Stalin. In short, being a tenured academic Gardner himself seems most susceptible to institutional tunnel vision and in need of constructive cognitive dissonance.Lacking the appeal of practicality, the burden of proof or applicable relevance set in actual events Changing Minds: The Art And Science Of Changing Our Own And Other People's Minds is solely of interest to researchers in need of alternate sources on the topic.Gardner does not provide any empirical basis for his opinions, which also deviate from the title and stated scope of the book
Don't Be Fooled!. Don't be fooled. This book has a title very similar to The Ultimate Book of Kid Concocitons book I saw on PBS. I bought this book thinking it was the PBS book and was very upset. I'm sure I am not the only one making this mistake. The projects in this book are out dated and seem to be the same old things that have been around for years, Buyer beware! I would bet the publisher did this to trick people into buying there book
Pass On This One. I was very disappointed in the overall content of the book.  Very little insight into the game of football.  The author's view of race, religion, and politics added nothing but a few pages to the length of the book
Hypocrisy Writ Large. Describing the Democratic Party as the "party of death" is classic phony-con propaganda designed to attract attention without engaging in intelligent debate.  The notion that the Republican Party is "pro-life" is one of the greatest scams ever perpetrated on the American public.  Republicans support the death penalty, and the Iraq war which has caused the deaths of thousands of Americans and thousands of non-combatant Iraqi civilians.  As governor of Texas, George W. Bush presided over more state-sponsored executions than any governor in the history of the United States.  This included people who were determined by medical experts, unanimously, to be mentally retarded and incapable of understanding their actions or the punishment that awaited them.  So much for respecting life.It is also a blatant lie to claim that abortion is the central theme of the Democratic Party.  Democrats stand for freedom of choice in all aspects of life.  They stand for the rights of individuals to live their lives without interference from an unchecked government and religious zealots.  That is the fundamental premise on which the United States was founded.Anyone who wants to understand the true impact of legalized abortion, without a lot of hateful name-calling, should read Freakonomics by Levitt & Dubner.  Let thinking, feeling, Americans consign Ponnuru to the garbage-can where he belongs
Highly disappointing. If you are a fan of Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice, and Mr. Darcy in particular, do not buy Mr. Darcy's Daughters.  I had to force myself to finish the book, even while trying to keep an open mind and not expect it to be of the same caliber of Pride and Prejudice.  The story is weak, the characters forgettable.  If I'd read the reviews here first I wouldn't have bothered with the book.  There were many extraneous characters in the novel, love interests develop late and with little or nothing to support them.  There are more references to sex than I think is in line with a sequel to a Jane Austen novel.  I also found it strange that any children of Mr. Darcy (let alone five of them) would choose to show little regard for how their behavior affected their standing in good London society.  At least Mr. and Mrs. Darcy are out of the country for the duration of the novel and are spared the humiliation of making an appearance in such a second-rate piece of work.
Very Disappointed. Wow, I hate to go against the tide but I felt very strongly about this book and unfortunately, not positively. I read this book aloud to my 13 year old daughter as part of our homeschool curriculum and both of our general impressions of this book were similarly negative to the point that we were glad to reach the last page and be done with it. We both found the book to be poorly written, the plot to be extremely predictable, the character development to be lacking, the dialog of the characters and the plot line to be unrealistic,the character motivations to be unclear and the historical inaccuracies to be glaring. The plot was clearly contrived from the very beginning to the end. At the final page we were relieved to be through but frustrated that we wasted our time and confused as to all the loose ends left by the author. I certainly would not personally recommend this book.
STUPID. Stupid review of a woman (Hillary) who has allowed women's rights to be lowered, so much for Chelsea and her future
Boring!!!!!!!!!. This book is considerably boring!!  It provided me information that I already know.  I definitely recommend this book to amateurs only!
It tastes very bland. Why did they not republish the first edition that tasted of strawberries  and cheese. This new version, with it's claims of a &quot;lighter  nuttier&quot; taste, is plain awfu
One Star for this incredible "mathematical" disinformation. This book (and volume no.1) deserves no any star, however because the incredible lies it contains makes it get 1 star as an example for those who still are confused; to proof how many people can be trapped in this idiotic but genious fabricated disinformation.It's amazing and incredible how easy people can be getting catched by this secret government "setup theories" with false mathematical and wrong explanations and incorrect applications of the so called mathematical laws herein. Just think for example about the spiral case drawings made by halfway circles instead of an projection of the exponential function characteristics.People must think for themselves. If they don't check the so called refered mathematical "explanations" for themselves, or they accept anything because it looks "mathematical beautiful", be very aware. Thus, the population wants beautifully fabricated images instead of a written truth.Be aware ! I do not say the aliens do not exist. I do not state the old civilizations and original ancient sciences named here are incorrect or never did exist. I don not deny the spiritual and paranormal phenomena.I state the suggestions and conclusions in this book are fabricated by a writer who has an AGENDA that fits to get confused people starving for truth and knowledge in his "New Agey" web by a dirty way of spreading disinformation and false hints.BTW: every serious researcher of spiritual stuff and conspiracies would already have to know, the so called writer of this book is a PATSY for the New World Order Agenda.The name Melchizedek suggests some integrity, well he isn't !Using this aftername or synonym is a hot spot signal for the better would-be critical reader.I know a lot of readers will dislike my review. I know people first shoot the messenger before they get grounded and finally wake up. That's the way how life is all about.Sorry guys, I don't have a more comfortable message which maybe fits in your "Flower Life" expectations or "End of Time" philosophy with the availability of more of the so called "vibrational dimensions" given by Drunvalo
What?!?. OK, 72 pages of cliff notes for a 144 page book?  That is absurd!  Night is a classic work, filled with vivid metaphor and intensely emotional characters.  You could get a third of the way through it in the time it would take to BUY the cliff notes
Worst of all Laymon's novels. I've read about 20 of Laymon's novels, and they were always at least entertaining. But this book goes so far into the ridiculous, that it didn't even pass as entertainment. The characters are just too stupid to believe. At one point the main heroine (a 25 y/o school teacher) is nearly raped, and runs into a fast food bathroom instead of calling the cops because she's embarrassed to tell anyone her boyfriend has gone missing when he went out to buy condoms. No kidding. There's another scene were two teenage boys find what they believe is a dead woman's body, and instead of calling the police have a ten minute debate over whether to call for help or rape the dead body. This might be mildly amusing if it were meant to be over the top tongue in cheek horror, but Laymon's playing this straight. Not only the worst of his books, but one of the worst books I've ever endured.
I have been diagnosed with PDD NOS. And I find this book to have the same problem as all those other autism spectrum books. Discrimination.They talk about PDD NOS as meaning something is "not quite right". Well, perfectly normal isn't. NT is not the "right" way to be, just one way. There is no right way to be, we must learn to value diversity. Yes, even if the person can't talk. If they can't talk, look at other ways of communicating, but they are still wonderful people with beautiful minds.And regarding the label PDD NOS, I dislike it too, but for different reasons. It is pervasive, because it affects the basic way my mind works, how I form concepts, how I mentally represent things, how my emotions interact with my reasoning, and so many other things I can't quantify it. It is developmental, because it causes a different pattern of development - whereas developmental delay is also developmental but affects the rate instead. But I dislike the term for two reasons a) it's vague, as there are piles of conditions not on the autistic spectrum which are both pervasive and developmental, and b) the word disorder. Disorder, in Anglo-Saxon times, meant evil, whereas order meant good. Also, my thought processes are orderly, just have a different organization than most people. It reminds me of how I always respond to questionnaires with questions about "unpredicatable" behavior - I can predict my behavior, but others often can't because they can't see all the internal stuff leading to it. I think the idea of people as machines with one right way to work sort of works a bit with organs like the heart and lungs but definately *not* with the brain
Power of trivial writing. It takes indeed some real power to get so many five-star reviews for such shallow writing.  This book is a very poor way of handling thw well-known concept of paradigms and paradigm shifts.  If you are at all familiar with these concepts simply forget buying this book as (just because you paid money for it) you will naturally be inclined to read it and this will be a total waste of time and energy.  There are so many books on creativity, innovative thinking and innovation; look for them.  This is a book on nothing: was it a busines book on business models?  Was it a cookbook for personal development?  What was this for god's sake, apart from being an insult on iltelligence
I was coerced into buying this. What sort of psycho would ever buy a book like this if they weren't forced to, and where do these sadists get off charging this much for this load of crap? You can buy a handsome boxed set of the Iliad and Odyssey, Don Quixote, The Tain and Penguin's collection of the Norse sagas and still pay less than you would for the Bedford reader . Do you think the bedford reader comes close to being a fraction as significant, worthwhile, enlightening or entertaining as any of those books? Neither do I, but the ego-maniacal swine who publish this would apparently beg to differ with you.About the book's contents? It's a bunch of watery, PC, multiculti crap. Do you think your fatuous, lefty professor would assign you anything that wasn't? I didn't learn a friggin thing from it, and I resent every second I had to spend skimming through it. The only reason I resold it instead of burning it at the end of the course (which I got an A in) was that the company that publishes it made one less sale thereby.In summary, I assume that if you're looking at this book it's because it's been assigned to you. Poor you
Freud must perish. I was hoping to gain insight into the repercussions of incest.  I couldn't get past the beginning of the book, as it was filled with Freudian pseudoscience.Perhaps another revision is in order
Arrogant and Annoying. I recently purchased this book on the advice from a fellow photographer that critiqued my work as an amatuer photographer.  He said that this book helped him personally in his photography.  I'm half way down with this book and find Fielder unappreciative of his ability.  I agree that he is a good photographer, but the way he explains his photos is annoying.  On a decent photo he will go into detail about the composition and how you eye flows across the picture.  Sorry, but some of the photos he describes are not as good as he thinks.  If you are looking for a &quot;how-to&quot; book, don't pick this one.  Try John Shaw's Nature photography and you will get your moneies worth
First Grade Takes a Test. I bought this book because I read other customers' good review comments.  I have to say "Don't buy it"!  The book is only introduce you some simple procedures on how to take a test.  With your common sense, you will be able to tell your child all about it.  Plus, the price is really a rob.  ...  I was fooled.  I hope you won't
Good Zeal, BAD Science. This book is revealing a Typical Young Earth Creationism (YEC).  These people have a good and great zeal to defend the Christian Faith.  I commend them for that.  But I must say in a loving way that their method is UNSCIENTIFIC.  It is misleading and untruthful.  We cannot defend truth by using part-truth.  Either way, this is still lying!  How can anyone defend a good cause with bad tools?  This will destroy the Christian witness of the gospel.As a theologian and Scientist I must refute the young earth creationist movement.  Many Christian Leaders and Theologians are opposing young earth creationism because of their lies.  The scientist community (including Christian scientists) rejects the kind of pseudoscience promoted and distributed by YEC.Today, the evidence against Young Earth Creationism (YEC) continues to accumulate. This leads inevitably to a general conclusion against all Christianity. I am so grieved when I see atheists laughing at the kind of science that is propagated by YEC. Christ's name is being hurt. Why do young earth creationists have to twist facts and lie so much? Well the answer is simple. They do NOT have ANY evidence in science whatsoever! Then, they have to invent it somehow.This is how they do it. They Say God created the universe (this is right). By using Usher's Genealogy they believe the Bible says the earth is young. (The Bible does NOT say that) Then they say: "We have to prove what we believe by means of science (after all God created science)". But the Science is not helping them. Then they are forced to dig around to find any flaws in science that they can use and abuse. They continue by accumulating anything they can find to make a case (bits and pieces of unresolved issues, like little discrepancies in scientific data and so on). By using scientific language (and their degrees in science) they go out of their fields of expertise and continue their propaganda by misinterpreting and manipulating scientific data, twisting and ignoring facts, misquoting various writers, using the wrong tools for different kinds of measurements, etc. This is lying. If they find one discrepancy out of, lets say one hundred, they choose to ignore the 99 in order to stress the one that fits their theory. This is NOT integrity. Do you call this science?By doing sound apologetics we need to bring the unbelieving scientists to faith in Christ.  Unfortunately this kind of YEC propaganda is doing exactly the opposite.  One day they will be held responsible before God.  Zeal is not enough; you need wisdom too.  YEC do not have any!  This is SAD.
A Superficially Selective Journalistic Survey of the Church. Written by the same author as Cults, New Religions Movements, and Your Family, as well as Defending the Faith: A Beginner's Guide to Cults and New Religions, gives a sense where the author is headed with this prodigious "history" of the Church.  Although not an actual history of Mormonism, but more of a superficially selective journalistic survey of the Church, (its people, dealings and influences) the book offers the reader an enormous panoramic overview at the entire 170 year span of its existence.  Yes, the volume is anti-Mormon, it is negative and has no balanced view or viewpoint.  Abanes uses enflamed and sensualistic language from the start and propagates the same misjudgments as previous anti-Mormon writers (confusing the action of members with the doctrines of the institution, using enflamed and unreliable anti-Mormon sources as well as regurgitating old anti-Mormon arguments that have been dealt-with in scholarly journals and balanced histories) yes, he mostly uses only secondary materials and relies on the Tanner's as an authoritative source, and yes, the author has no clue what historical perspective is, but, one must give the author his due for the broad scope of the work.  He not only covers all the standard anti-Mormon fare (the Danites, blood atonement, polygamy, money digging, etc.); but current subjects as well (including the Osmond's, Steve Benson, the 2002 Olympics, Paul Dunn, Thomas Ferguson, and racism).I enjoyed the author's journalistic and creative approach to chapter and sub-chapter headings as well (i.e., "Bloody Brigham," "Big Trouble in Little Missouri," "Pride and Prejudice" and "Thinking is a Sin").  I like that Abanes uses the internet and listed URL's for reference and resource, I liked his use of charts (First Vision, Book of Mormon, failed prophecies), and even though this book would not be published by an academic press or a large well-known publisher, it was published by a distinguished independent publisher that was since bought by the Avalon Publishing Group.  Although the work cannot be recommend as a studious publication or an important work on Mormonism, the author does show that the Church as an institution does have a long way to go in answering questions about its past, its "official" vs. its "actual" history, and currently about its political activities, treatment of its "academic" members (versus the coddling it shows towards its more notable members (including general authorities) as well as its suppression of its own history that includes the closing-off of its records and library.  The volume has 436 pages of text, five appendices (one containing a helpful glossary of "Mormon terms"), 152 pages of notes, a small bibliography and a 22 page index
Can you predict what I am going to say about this book?. I love to people watch.  I adore the human body and appreciate all the different forms and characters it comes in.  I bought the book because of it's promise to help show me How to Understand People And Predict Their Behavior.  I work with parents of young children (this ranges from beauty to the beast in character kingdom).  Parents come to me for help and I know that every person has a story behind him/her that presents itself as raw and unfriendly behavior at times.  I wanted to learn to be more empathetic to them.  Everything I learned about people, I learned on the job just by being attentive to people.  You probably know more than you think about reading people.  For example, a tanned face may reveal that the person's job or hobbies put him outdoors for considerable periods.  And people whose skin is very pale generally have few outdoor hobbies.  See, you probably can predict people already!  But if you want to see it put into lots and lots of words then this book will do that.   It could be fun to use the formulas to your advantage, you can derail the people-reader into thinking that you're happy just by humming!
A disappointment. It is distressing to see how many people are fooled into believing that one can awaken consciousness in a healthy way through lust and desire.  This method clearly contradicts the teachings of Buddha, Krishna, Jesus, Tsong Khapa, the current Dalai Lama, etc.  I encourage anyone who is seeking positive spiritual enlightenment to look at the teachings of these Masters, along with others who proved the virtuous sincerity of their hearts: Eliphas Levi, Swami Sivananda, Dion Fortune, Rudolf Steiner, H.P. Blavatsky, and Samael Aun Weor.  Do not be misled by the tempting serpent; to awaken positively, you must CONQUER him
Pass on it. Catchy title, but you'd do better without it. The only thing hidden in this book is the information. Try finding, for instance, the Garden of the Gods using this book; you'll be hopelessly lost and lucky to find your way  back to the hotel. Same for several of the beaches, waterfalls, and so  forth. One has to wonder whether the author actually visited the places  he's written about or just looked them up in other books. There are some  good guidebooks for Hawaii out there, but, unhappily, this is not one of  them. I'd pass on it
Oh boy, more "lets understand the terrorist" garbage. The religion of peace is at it again!  In response to the popes words, muslims all over the world respond with violence, destruction, rage, hatred, burning down buildings, burning papal effigies, issuing fatwas against the pope, and even shooting a 70 year old nun in the back.  Wow, such peace from a religion of "peace".  If Islam is a religion of peace, then all the guns in the world are pink flowers, and every nuclear bomb, a soft feathery pillow.  Violence for words.  Destruction for speech.  PLEASE!  This is a religion of war, and bereft mindless 70 year old bags like Noam have begun to lose a lot of mental function with age.  This old bag of a man gives Muslims free passes and blames America.Question:  When will the world start holding to account the actions of Muslims, and stop blaming others, such as Bush, America, the Pope, or God knows who else? How many more innocent people will die at the hand of Muslims before the western world finally, and for the first time, holds the Muslims accountable for their own actions, rather than someone else?Well Im sick of the left defending this vile cesspool of Islamofacism.  Im tired of the leftist media beating up on Israel and coming to the side of middle-eastern tyrants who shoot 70 year old nuns in the back in response to spoken words.  And then these radical leftists have the audacity blame the pope!  Can you believe it?!!  Yes, idiots all over the western world actually blame the pope for the mindless violence and destruction that followed from a spoken word.  Its unreal!  A grown man got a gun, deliberately aimed it at a 70 year old woman's backside, and deliberately pulled the trigger, purposefully killing her in cold blood....and yet according to socialist America-hating leftists, he couldn't help it.  Its not his fault...its the Pope's fault guys!    Respond to words with violence, and then blame the speaker, absolving the person who actually commits the violence of responsibility.  As absurd as that sounds, I'm sad to say there are actually people all over the world who think that.  And they are idiots (like Noam)
medical ageism is extermination of the weak. Callahan's arguments for healthcare rationing based on age are neither valid, nor logical.  More importantly they are not consistent with the United States Federal Civil Rights laws that are enforced by the Office for Civil Rights (OCR) of the U. S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS), nor are they moral in the international community by review of the United Nation's Universal Declaration of Human Rights. http://www.un.org/Overview/rights.html
Dont waste your  kids' time!. I recently read this book for a ELAN class @ UGA. I thought it was terrible and pointless. The characters lack depth and the theme of the book is not developmentally appropriate for 7th or 8th graders. The book was around 100 pages and leaves the reader wishing he had done something better with his time. My professor scolded me for not wanting to read this book to my future classes. She claimed I was scared to read books to my kids. (I guess she is refering to the religious implications in the book) She is absolutely right. I am terrified to read bad books to my students.
I'm done with Baldacci. Since the reviews printed on the inside cover of the book all are blurbs, here are my blurbs:"Really hard to get into ... tough to follow who's who ...""Opens strong, but fizzles out early ...""I literally feel asleep while reading this book one night ...""You'll finally give up without really wondering who did it ...
Badly written. I did not like this book. At all.Lyanka and Gitana were both disgustingly perfect. Beautiful, talented, fantastic fighters . . . Mary Sues. Both of them. Ick.The story was interesting, but I found that I just could not get into the book. The writing style seemed amateurish. It was a slog. I was on vacation, and I had nothing to do but relax and read. This is the sort of situation in which I go through a day. This one was so boring that I read it between other, much better books. I finished it mostly because it was a birthday present.The only good thing about this book is the fact that there are many, many lines about Angel shoving Spike up against walls, which makes us slashers happy.I've read better fanfiction. Don't waste your money
A big let down. I was very disappointed by this novel. Roth is a talented writer, and I had hoped that he would be able to create a truly compelling novel out of such a promising idea. However, the novel just didn't work for me. The characters felt something like cardboard cut outs and seemed inconsistent in their behavior. The plot spun out of control and became completely fantastic and quite unbelievable. Read something else by Roth - I think you'll enjoy one of his earlier works more than this
Interesting theory, but it didn't work for us. When my husband and I decided to start a family, we agreed that we would be happy with either gender, but we both preferred to have a girl.  I had read the book 2 years prior, and decided to read it again before we attempted to conceive.  I began charting my cycles as instructed, and even purchased expensive ovulation test kits to make sure our timing was right.  After 4 months of calculated attempts, I found out I was pregnant.  We were sure it was a girl, since we followed the instructions from the book EXACTLY.  Well my ultrasound was last week, and we discovered we're having a boy!  After seeing his little body wiggling around on the screen, we quickly realized that this baby is the love of our lives, and that the gender never really mattered.  Mother nature knows best!
Too verbose. The insights Jean Liedloff gained while spending more than two years living in the jungle with Stone Age Indians are fascinating -- if you can discern them through her diffuse writing style. It's a really difficult book to get through because of the author's "Why use five words when twenty-five will do?" writing style. I opened my copy to a random page and found one sentence with 68 words. It's dense stuff. The good news is that the wonderful book Our Babies, Ourselves by Meredith Small has many of the same ideas but is a much more pleasant read
You Will Learn Basic Crockpot Skills. Hoffman's recipes sound delicious, but in fact are often flavorless. If you use her recipes, you WILL learn slow cooking tecniques (stacking meat in the pot, thickening sauces, etc). But after 7 years of using this book, my notes on the recipes have a continual refrain: "Needs more pizzaz"; "Add vegetables"; "Flavors need more depth".
Do not recommend. I purchase books online based on the reviews so lets be honest.  Debby DuBay's book Antique Limoges at Home is the book to purchase.  Gaston's book has terrible photographs & just can not compare to DuBay's books
Go to church-- you'll learn more. I bought this book hoping for a Christian perspective on the Christian-themed The DaVinci Code by Dan Brown.  What I paid for is unabashed preaching on how the Gospel can be spread through never re-interpretting or revisiting the collection of stories called the Bible.These two theological scholars don't add any additional light to Brown's story nor do they actually show proof that the DaVinci Code couldn't have been true (which, in fact, I agree that most of Brown's work is fictional interpretation.)It seems like another opportunity for Christians to talk to themselves and reinforce a narrow viewpoint through villianizing the "mass media" and the general population.  Pure back-patting fluff
Borderland?. Unfortunately the author did not get the basic premise correct. Ukraine does not mean borderland. The oldest use of the word found in written text is in the 10th century chronicle of Slava o Polke Ihoria. The term Ukraine is used as meaning within the kingdom, at the heart of the kingdom. The opposite of what the author writes. Borderland would mean Okraina, this is the difference between in and out. She also missed that Ukraine has the oldest calendar on the planet now dating to 7039. Another significant fact.Maybe the next book could be an new history based on  archives from Lutsk and Kyiv that the author did not read. Missing such a basic premise clouds the rest of the book
Not good. I thought the title was interesting so I bought this book.  Wow, what a disappointment.  This is sappy and poorly written.  How does Mitch Albom keep  getting on the best sellers list
Not as helpful as I hoped. At a risk of offending Joseph Campbell cultists and fantatics, please know that I am both an admirer of Joseph Campbell and James Joyce. It was through Campbell's praise of Joyce's work, that help muster the discipline it takes to read Joyce. I'll give credit where credits due--thanks Joe!Now here's my beef. I suspect that it's takes a man with a healthy ego and a sense of academic competitiveness to want to incorporate Joyce's work into a grand blanket scheme, such as Joseph Campbell did with many of Joyce's work. I believe Ulysses is appropriate enough to enter into a conversation of mythology, but Finnegans Wake? No, I am not buying it.So what is this Skeleton's Key anyway? Basically it's a fleshed out version of the Outline of Chapter Contents already provided in the Penguin edition of FW, which in truth, is helpful as a "key". Seamus Deane offers an introduction that is as helpful (and unhelpful) as Campbell's. So over the 70-odd years since Finnegans Wake first appeared and not much is known about it--perhaps Joyce intended just that--an enigmatic mystery. Why try to dismantle a good thing
Neither "organizing" nor "simplicity". I was disappointed with this book.  There were a few worthwile tips (such as going to bed early to take advantage of the more productive morning hours) but mostly the author solved her problems by throwing money at them.  If I could pick anywhere in the country I wanted to live, buy $700 coats and hire people to run all my errands, hey, I'd be organized too!  As for "simplicity"....there is nothing here that anyone with even a passing familiarity with the simplicity movement would recognize
An unwieldy translation. In a nutshell: Don't waste your money on this version.The original version of this translation dates to just after the turn of the century, but the introduction and further editing by Anatol Rapaport (a biologist and a musician, not a political scientist or historian), make this a clumsy read at best and downright misleading at worst.Rapaport, for being an editor of Clausewitz, was not a believer in the trinitarian system (primordial violence, non-rational actions, and rationality)- probably not a good choice for a work which owes as much as it does to the first and second Trinities (army, people, and government).If this is the only one you can get, then live with it.  The first chance you get, get the much clearer, much more straightforward Paret/Howard translation, which is the one that's actually taught at most service schools as well as in universities in their courses that use it
Misleading Waste of Time. This guy thinks collectors want to see his own creations of what rare prototypes are. What a complete waste of time. Collectors want to see the real thing. Most of the &quot;rare&quot; prototypes in this book are fakes that Santelmo forgets to tell the reader. This book would be useful if you are interested in conterfeit items
Not the great book people seem to think it is. This is a book that could (should?) have faded into history without being a great loss to the world. Yes, there are a few interesting bits of political philosophy, but they're far and few between, and mainly either just thrown out as Montesquieu's personal opinions with little to no evidence or examination, or flimsily based on historical examples. As a reader, I didn't find most of his arguments (where he didn't seem to be contradicting himself, which happens frequently) very convincing. This was obviously written with the 18th century French salon crowd in mind, and reads as such. I'm sure it provided a lot of aristocrats with conversation fodder to make them appear intelligent and educated at the time, but these days it just seems like an antiquated bit of history.He claims the book has to be read as a whole to see the structure and his overall goal; well, I did read the whole book and at the end couldn't see an overarching structure at all. The work just seemed like a long, rambling, unorganized mess. The only people I might really recommend this to are people interested in Greek, Roman, and French history (especially legal history), but not to people interested in political science or philosophy.Bump this one to the bottom of your list of classics on historical thought, there are much more interesting reads out there
Beware of Book. Beware of this book.  I opened it up and read through it and packed it up to return the same day.  Rather than offering practical activities to help teens learn to deal with their anger, it seemed to be a group workbook.  Perhaps it just was not what I was expecting.  Whatever the case 50+ dollars worth of book it was NOT
Out of date!. I didn't realize how out of date this book was, or I would not have bought it.  The book makes 80s-era references when it comes to diet, nutrition, and other books about fitness.  He suggests that you'd better plan to spend a whole $45 dollars on a good pair of running shoes!The author is readable, and his personal experiences are somewhat interesting.  But although he is an M.D., there seems to be no scientific basis for his recommendations - it is all based on his personal experience
Home Winemaking Step-by-Step. The book contains some interesting winemaking tips.  Unfortunately, the quality of said information gets lost in the twisted tangle of grammatically challenged pages.  Two stars for the information and zero stars for the presentation
Probably your best option for now, but . . . Having just returned from three weeks in China and Taiwan, I can report that the Lonely Planet Guide to Taiwan is generally helpful and reliable, but it's hardly the ideal guide and often is entirely counter-intuitive.  For instance, there is a section on p. 31 consiting of five paragraphs on the topic of population.  And yet nowhere in that section do the authors tell us what the population of Taiwan actually is.  For that bit of information, we have to look at a sidebar on p. 19 entitled "Fast Facts."  There seems to be a presumption that the traveller will read through the entire guide from front to back, rather than use the book as a reference guide.  Similarly, the maps are less than ideal, and the spare use of color plates does little to provide any real information (color maps of Taipei would have been far more useful).  Given that the authors judge the National Palace Museum as a "must-see" (and they're right about that), it would have been nice if they had mentioned that the museum will be undergoing major renovations from 2004-2006 (providing a website address for the museum also would've been helpful).Unfortunately, this seems to be the best option at present, and one could do worse.  If you're going to Taiwan, I would encourage you to buy a copy, but be warned: it will not be one of the better guides you've ever used
Does Not Deliver What It Promises. I would not recommend this book for people who are trying to get their life together after a diagnosis of diabetes. I bought this book because its subtitle is "A Complete Guide to Planning, Shopping, Cooking, and Eating". It is none of those things.I was particularly interested in the SHOPPING promise because I find that to be the most difficult part of managing my diet. Other books didn't have anything helpful, and despite its promise, this book doesn't either. One has to read through every single recipe, write down the ingredients of what you want to make, and then go out and get it. Just like every other book. So tell me: how does this help with "shopping"? I expected lists of basic staples in a diabetic's diet. There should be lists of "must-haves" for your pantry. This book lies about what it contains, and is sadly lacking in what it needs.An expensive mistake, don't buy it
Not recommended as primary LSAT study guide... If you'd really like to learn about how the LSAT questions are structured and if you have time to "memorize" the techniques suggested by the book, then "LSAT Workout" could be helpful you.  However, if you just want to practice and to get comfortable with the exam, so to speak, I'd recommend getting the study guides with actual previous LSATs instead (try checking them out at the LSAC.org website).  (Note: I started studying for the LSAT with this book and then switched to the Official practice tests.)"LSAT Workout" exaggerates the difficulty of the material.   Using the book, I noticed I had to keep re-reading the passages before being able to decide on an answer and then would consequently keep exceeding time limits (not to mention getting frustrated).  But I later found that the questions on the actual LSAT were easier for me to work with.  In fact, I ran out of time only once and I did better on the Exam than I expected!So if you're looking to do less reading and more practicing and only want one study guide, opt for the Official LSAT Preptests instead.  I have no way of showing whether my use of "LSAT Workout" had any effect on my score but I will say that discontinuing it's use had a lot to do with my calm confidence in taking the test
Don't pay for advertising. A very dissapointing title from Taunton.  Basically a series of near-advertisements for systems you can buy and simply install.  The few do-it-yourself projects look like summer-camp woodshop material.
Mailing it in. I've been following the Alex Cross series from its beginning, and after reading Cat & Mouse, I'm wondering if Patterson has taken these characters as far as they can go... Given the fact that there are 7 or 8 more Cross books written subsequently to this one, I can only hope that the series gets better.My complains are similar to those of other reviewers:1. I'm getting sick of the perfection of Alex Cross.  The man's a saintly father, saintly grandson, saintly lover, saintly charity worker, and saintly detective.  These traits hooked the reader and made Cross an intriguing character, but he's fast becoming too one-dimensional.2. The Cross/Sampson relationship.  As if we weren't sick enough of this already.  Every few chapters, we're reminded of the man-crush Cross and Sampson have on each other.  Sampson is so perfect in Cross's eyes that it becomes tiresome to hear about it every time Sampson enters a scene.3. The Cross/Christine Johnson relationship moves WAY too fast.  One moment Christine is still mourning the loss of her husband (who was viciously murdered 6 months prior in Jack & Jill) and freaks out over an innocent dinner date, and the next she and Cross are madly in love.  No development whatsoever, no line from Point A to Point B.4. I'm not sure Patterson could have written the dialogue between Cross and his children any more unrealistically.  Aren't these 7- and 9-year-old children?  He has more intelligent conversations with his kids than he does with Sampson or Kyle Craig.5. The entire novel is a series of pseudo-climaxes which are ultimately resolved by plot twists that seemingly arrive from left field.  The Soneji resolution was anti-climactic at best, and the Mr. Smith conclusion was unfulfilling
These Bleachers are HARD!. I was very disappointed in this selection.  Maybe a MALE football fanatic would find something appealing, but I was VERY bored!  Take me back to court, to the lawyer's office, to the judge's chambers,...just about anywhere but these bleachers!!
Too Graphic-Too Long to get somewhere. This book was so different from the usual NR story.  The burn scenes were too graphic and the rape scene was too graphic.  If you want romance, skip this.  It also seemed to take forever to get the book set up
Sigh. Hung in there through page 89, then realized I'm not immortal and don't have time to deal with this. Am willing to start a charitable foundation to provide Ms. Pessl a lifetime supply of Ritalin and a scholarship to the Iowa Writers Workshop. Care to join me
Unreadable. This is not meant to serve as a useful review but as a warning that the positive reviews here at amazon are not reflective of the actual quality of the book. This book, in my opinion, is unreadable and listlessly and discursively meanders. A complete waste of time that lacks depth and resonance. Take time researching this book before you buy it because it's the worst book I've ever purchased.
Disappointed. I was very disappointed with this book. The author continually tells the reader to be kind and gentle with children, and then recommends "alternatives to spanking" that are simply other types of punishments: time out, removal of privileges, and the like. She simply doesn't get it that children are human beings who behave as well as they are treated, and who will behave well when treated with love and respect. Would the author respond well if her partner tried to control her in these ways? There are many better choices - see the book titles listed at The Natural Child Project  and La Leche League websites
Not the best fantasy novel ever.... I read this (after reading Karen Hancock's Christy Award-winning series Legends of the Guardian-King) and enjoyed it at first. After reading the second book, DragonQuest, I realized that these books were influencing me wrongly. The wizardry is cloaked in Christianity, so it makes it seem ok at first. But once I'd read the second book, I saw that where it was going was somewhere I didn't want to go.I would recommend many other books before recommending this book
not worth the paper it is printed on. I did not like the book, which is fundamentally flawed from the concept and proposition. Sorry to have wasted my time going through it
not  a page turner. This was my first Carlotta Carlyle book, and I thought it was boring. I will not read another one. I love murder/mystery books and this was not a page turner. The ending was very disappointing
Antidotal History that Morphs into an ETA Apologist Tract. For the first two thirds of this book is basically an antidotal cultural history of the Basque.  The light style and treatment of the subject are engaging.However, slowly and by degrees the book spawns a naive ETA apologist essay of sorts  that smoothly threads its way through the continuing cultural discussions of the Basque.The author blames the victims of ETA for the violence by implying that Spain is bringing ETA violence down on itself by insisting that total independence for the Basque regions of Spain is not negotiable and insisting ETA renounce violence.The author indulges in hand wringing and whining about anti-terrorist Spanish legislation that allows the authorities to hold a terrorist suspect ten days incommunicado without charges.  The book was written pre 9/11 (and pre 3/11) and consequently the author's arguments come across as rather limp in view of current events.He also believes that if Spain negotiates or grants more autonomy that ETA will simply "disappear."  I can't tell whether the author is a dupe or just unbelievably naive.  Since this book was written in 1999 Spain has granted more autonomy and guess what?  ETA hasn't gone anywhere and is still murdering people.This author also talks about ETA and the Catalonia aspirations for more autonomy in the same breath.  Gee I don't remember the Catalans murdering 800+ people.He also implies that the 40 odd Basques killed are somehow no more reprehensible than the 800+ Spaniards murdered by ETA.  If you follow his logic you arrive at moral equations like 1 ETA terrorist killed in a gunfight = 20 civilians killed with a car bomb.He also adroitly avoids pesky topics like-Who exactly are the ETA terrorists?If they share the same aspiration as the Catalans why did they plant a bomb in a supermarket in Catalonia and kill Catalan women and children?What about ETA internal violence?  ETA has purged some of his own over the years.  Why avoid that potentially interesting topic?How is ETA financed?Is it extortion you think?Why detail alleged police abuse of ETA suspects and not the ETA war tax?Why do successful Basques in the Basque provinces avoid any outward show of wealth?  They are afraid of being kidnapped for ransom or having their war tax increased that's why.  The author apparently didn't deign to talk to any of these people or any of the family members of Basque entrepreneurs who were brutalized for not paying their war tax.Following a line of inquiry like this might force the author to examine inconvenient questions like, what is ETA's overall economic impact on the region?With so many capable motivated and well educated workers, is ETA why international investors and companies avoid the Basque provinces like the plague?The author talks at length about the Guggenheim in Bilbo, how it was paid for, it's relative architectural value, the local support it had, etc. without mentioning that ETA tried to bomb it when it opened and shot and killed a policeman near the entrance.  How did this further the goals of ETA?No wonder no one in Spain or anywhere else is crazy to visit it.Why talk about GAL's mercenary nature and international component and not about ETA's international operations and links?Like the seamy links with the IRA and the old un-rehabilitated Gadaffii.And what about the contract hit they did (unsuccessfully) for the Sandinistas on Eden Pastora?What about the huge ETA arsenal that accidentally blew up in Panama?An ETA operative there had acquired the largest arsenal in non-governmental hands ever discovered according to press reports.Has the author nothing to say about the worldwide network of ETA (often using a Basque restaurant as a front) that funnels arms and money back to their compatriots in Spain?With an international organization and extensive infrastructure like this it seems to me like they are planning to hang around awhile and have no more intention of "disappearing" than Al Qaeda.So what is the future of ETA if you reach the wild conclusion that they may not just simply "disappear"?In the unlikely event an independent Basque country came about might ETA try to install themselves in power by force?  The author admits they are Marxist in nature and only a small minority of Basques support their actions, so it seems contrived that this topic is never broached.These topics, despite their interesting nature and many sides, might make ETA appear less noble and more like a greedy band of blood thirsty thugs so the author simply ignores them.Anyone who has even a cursory knowledge of ETA knows that they are about as altruistic as the mafia.  The author takes great care in contorting his little history to hide this fact.  To me, this is totally unacceptable reporting.  I will not buy another of his books.
Fast paced but predictable. While Edgar winner Walters' psychological thrillers (in the Ruth Rendell vein) are among my favorites, this is her weakest effort to date.  British war correspondent Connie Burns recognizes a sadistic mercenary while on assignment in Iraq. She had met the man while in Sierra Leone two years earlier and, based on his reputation for brutality towards the native prostitutes, suspected him of the vicious murders of five women.Though nothing came of her suspicions, she immediately resumes her digging when she spots him in Iraq under a different name. His employers stonewall her investigation and shortly thereafter she is abducted, then released after three days. Though she refuses to discuss her ordeal we know who grabbed her and as the book proceeds nothing about her horrible experience comes as a surprise.Traumatized, she holes up in an old house in Dorset (where Walters lives), suffers panic attacks and edgily befriends a taciturn local woman who as a teenager lost her family in a car crash.  The predictable stalking by the kidnapper overshadows the subplot concerning this woman and the elderly owner of the Dorset house, while the protracted ending is first, not credible, and second, way too talky. A major disappointment.-- Portsmouth Heral
It doesn't get any more predictable than this... The concept of this book could've worked, but Sparks didn't develop any other characters to throw the reader off track. It's painfully obvious who is driving the car. The dialogue between Miles and Sarah when they are first getting to know each other is extremely annoying, as is their relationship. Interesting how she breezes into their family and is accepted by Jonah with open arms. And the ending to the story is laughable. I won't give it away, but I'm sure you can figure it out within the first 10 pages. I doubt I can read another Sparks novel again.
Only for suckers. Who would read all these reviews, and then actually buy this book? This book is an unfair attempt at pandering to the doddling whims of a major portion of our population...the suckers...of which I am obviously one, because I did read the stupid book! It took me almost a year to get through it - one half paragraph at a time before I would fall asleep each night. If it wasn't for Jordan, I'd have a hard time going to sleep at all. It doesn't even deserve 1 star
just ok. although there is an intense void in the subject of trans and gender queer writings this book does little to fill it.  there are occational glimering voices of truth and clarity most notably the essay by the transman with MS, but overall there was too much youthful exuberance and not enough thoughful, mature writing.  i would much rather read a personal account of someone's reality than someone perched on a soapbox telling about how they live outside the gender binary.  although i believe gender is something worth deconstructing, to not acknowledge that it exists in this world, or to say you live outside of it without giving examples of how you make this possible shows to me a lack of maturity on the part of the writer.I know mr. diamond to be a very prolific artist, but in this case i simply felt the quality was lacking.
Too fast!  Non-stop reading of scripts!. The content is full of valuable information on selling. But this Audio CD is not my favourite.Ziglar speaks so rapidly and non-stop! I guess nobody speaks in this mannner.  I mean, if you want listeners to enjoy your speech, it is better to  speak in a more natural pace, occassionally there should be a pause.Ziglar is rushing the scripts when you listen to this CD. Choking the brain of the listeners with no respite whatsoever! Slow down Slow down......... Ziglar!  Give me some space to absorb your message!I wish I can listen to your CD comfortably, but I can't.  You Read the scripts in such a rapid manner that it does not help your listeners to relax and enjoy your works. Ziglar!I am sorry, I have to give you 2 stars based on your unsatisfactory presentation in this CD
Would not recommend. Not what I expected, studying Angels in Bible Study, this book too vague and not all backed up by scriptur
Very pedantic tomb about two worthless pieces of ice. The author and New Horizons Principal Investigator, Alan Stern, is obviously excited (i.e. worse than a creationist zealot) about Pluto and Charon. But he doesn't fairly tackle the other side of the debate: who really cares? Yes, scientists can make up reasons why the American government should waste millions of dollars to send a spacecraft to Pluto, Charon, and the Kuiper Belt, but what startling science will be advanced by two pieces of ice that we already have a pretty good understanding of after Voyager 2's trip past Neptune's moon Triton in 1989? Even if we lack a fundamental understanding of so-called ice dwarf class planets, is the extraordinary cost really worth the benefit? Any scientist will admit that it is extremely unlikely that we will find life on Pluto or Charon. Can we finally solve the debate about whether Pluto is a planet or a KBO? Wow. What a great use of over $700 million. I think that Stern and other Planetary Society members need to focus on more important, and less selfish, world problems, such as genocide and starvation in Somalia or Al Qaeda.  Or at the very least, spend the money on a worthy objective, such as sending another craft to Jupiter's moon Europa, a place where we might actually find life
WHERE WAS THE EDITOR?. That Robert Coles' heart is in the right place and that his experience working with children is extensive, no one can dispute.  But his writing is characterized by wordiness - even chattiness - and it undermines the serious nature of his topic. Perhaps the loose writing style is an attempt to make the book appeal to &quot;every parent,&quot; - and not just educators - but instead it renders the whole work laborious and permeated with a condescending, patronizing tone. In the current political culture, a book on the moral life of children written by an educator of Coles' calibre would be expected to nail a spot on the N.Y. Times bestseller list for weeks, if not years.  The fact that less than two years after publication I picked up a hard cover copy at a book clearance for 75% off is a testimony to lazy editorship more than anything else. What a huge loss for our society
Too much hyp for an "okay" book. I have heard that this is a children's book (and perhaps there are abridged versions), but I have no idea how a middle schooler could read this dense, verbose novel and understand the subtle, underlying themes Swift portrays. I have heard many positive reviews concerning this book, and although there are many insightful points, perhaps the material was not presented in a interesting fashion, for very often I got lost in the words and nonending references to English politics. On the other hand, it's important to note that in the early 18th century, English satire was probably extremely dry (very different from today, huh :) ) and hard to follow. All in all, this book is an exploration into man's true nature and, despite the sometimes clumsy manipulation of langauge, expresses a mature intellect that reflects Swift's intelligence.
Great title, but dissapointing content. The book grabs the reader with an interesting title then immediately starts off with a look at a boring movie and then reviews of even more boring competing therories. Finally the authors reveal the information ecology therory. Unfortuanately, the don't offer much to back up their view and paint a picture of it being another feel good PC therory. Too bad since they have a valid point that will sadly be lost as another PC mistake..
Weak and disappointing. The description sounded promising, but in fact this is one of the least well-written books I've read in a long time.  The prose iss stilted.  Sentence fragments abound.  The style is that of a 16 year old writing a travelogue, complete with irrelevant details about every aspect of the author's daily routine.  Harold Truman has an unusual fondness for italics, and puts quotation marks around the title of each chapter.  Don't waste your time or your money on this book
I'd return it, if I wanted to waste more time because of it. A 350-page book of which the last 238 pages are appendices, a glossary, and an index.  125 pages of the appendices are nothing but a listing of NASDAQ stocks, symbols, and sectors. Buy IBD instead for $1.00.  Including the first 112 pages, you will find much info, but very, very  little substance and discussion. It's but a compendium of data. Don't buy  this book, if you are seeking knowledge about how to trade
It's Not THAT Bad...Then Again, It's Not Too Good Either. If this is your first Barbara Taylor Bradford book, you may never pick up another one.  I, on the other hand, like to give an author the three strikes rule, so won't hesitate to try something else, but it won't be very soon.  If you want to read one of her novels, do NOT start with this one like I did.  This is very boring--like snails serving as soap stars--not to mention slow and predictable.  I listened to the entire thing on cd, but think it was mostly because I liked Ms. O'Karma's narration--she has an appealingly smokey voice like Carolyn Jones from the Adams Family.  It still couldn't save this story with its endless self-serving "what-about-ME!" mantras and Valentine's overly moralistic attitude.  I'm the same way, and I bore myself!You knew from page one where this story was going, and the dialog was as insufferable as the descriptions of everything from food and clothing to moths reproducing on peeling wallpaper.  "I was a war photographer and my mommy was mean to me" resounds every other page, yet she wants to get away from all of that.  Nothing's worse than a character or real person who brags, then turns around and screams "Look at me, look at me...How DARE you look at me?!"
Lack of detail. What can I say, this book lacked all the details I wanted to read, and was pretty darn predictable to boot. I could tell that it was written by a foreigner because it never contained any "advanced" vocabulary. Always just kept mentioning the same food and the same feelings and the same blah blah blah...Enough. I'm done with this thing
Wait for the Cliffs Notes. This book was recommended by someone a lot more financially successful than I am.  But while I was reading, I kept asking myself, "When's he going to get to the point?"  The first part of the book is all about why it's good to be rich--something I thought was unnecessary.  The bulk of the book is filled with anecdotes that try to illustrate the different mindset of rich people as compared to middle-class and poor.  Finally, in the last part of the book, he gives some practical examples of what he considers to be good investment strategy.   This was the only part of the book I was interested in.  To me, it was like his publicist told him that no one is going to buy a 30-page book on investing and so Kiyosaki wrote what he knew about making money and filled the rest with "fluff".  However, even his advice is considered questionable by many experts.  I would say that the main idea I got from this book was to try to look at investing from different angles and not to just follow the crowd.  I just wish I hadn't invested so much time in a book that could have been a lot more concise
Don't  waste your money. After reading this book, I still haven't decided whether the author is a genius or a nutcase.Most of the main characters ultimately die a particularly useless and gruesome death, and the book never seems to arrive at a particular point.  Even the prologue drags on endlessly.
Brutal Trip to the Arctic. This is a first person account of a trip to the arctic in the 1860's narrated by a Civil War deserter.  Within the first few pages, our hero enlists, pilfers letters off battlefield corpses, deserts, is injured in NYC draft riots, ends up in New Bedford, MA and signs up on a sailing ship without ryhme or reason or knowing where it was going.  The book was downhill from there.Page after page described ice and the crew's interminable struggles to get through.  Getting through the book was nearly as interminable.The reader never gets to know the narrator enough to empathize with him, or really understand him at all.  Thus, his struggles ring hollow and he evokes no sympathy during his struggles.There are elements of fantasy in the book.  Not enough to make it a fantasy, but enough to steer a reader off course.  The scientist on the mission is after a warm Garden of Eden in the middle of the Arctic.  He is mad or it's fantasy, it is hard to know until the end.  There is a fantasy interlude when a character who has three hands (the most likeable character in the book) describes how he got his third hand.  From that yarn comes the title "Rope Eater".  The title really has nothing to do with the book, other than rope eaters and the crew members suffered pain.Besides the tedious turning of the plot, the characters lack any development.  Only the three handed man and the captain, both tangential characters, had any depth whatsoever.This book seemed to be an attempt at adventure, but not enough happened between the interminable accounts of ice to build much tension.  It never developed the aspect of the deterioration of the characters - mentally and physically - it just happened.  Although the reader knew the characters must be suffering, it never came through the over-writing.As one might expect, the crew's mission to find the warm Garden of Eden in the arctic was pointless.  So was this book.  It was a disappointment.
I don't think so. If you think every man thinks the same way, does the same thing, has the same desires, and is just lumped into one cateogry, then this book will show you that. Peresonally, I like women that are real, without all of the games that we men see through anyway.Yeah, men are visual. So are women! Men like intimacy just as much as women do. The title says more than the book does.
A hurried and uninformed look at an important film. There is something for everybody in this book because it seems to have been mainly a cut-and-paste editing project without any basis of understanding by the author.When appearing stuck on a physics issue, Bruce deferred to an "anonymous physics guru" who checked the facts and made the determination of good or bad science.As a college research project, the glossary does provide a nice definition of terms that is useful.On the plus side, it did prompt me to read "The Yoga of Time Travel" by respected physicist Fred Alan Wolf.  Now there's a provocative read
dangerous information. I really liked the book, the drawings are great and the words are fun. I was rappeling not too long ago using the prusik to make me safe like they do on the cover of the book. The prusik tightened onto the rope just at the end of my reach, and I was hanging from the one loop around my leg. It was really uncomfortable and it took me a long time to get free. I asked a guide friend and he showed me two much safer ways to do the setup. Now I have to wonder if the book has more dangerous mistakes, because this one was on the front cover
How the mighty are fallen. I'm afraid, very afraid for the Preston/Child team. I loved their early books and recommended them to countless friends. But their latest offerings (specifically, Brimstone and its sequel, The Book of the Dead) show signs of too much fame and too much formula. They're writing less well and they're trying to write "blockbusters," hoping, I imagine, for that booty call from Hollywood. Significant portions of both Brimstone and BotD are set in Italy - and we know what that means, don't we? It means, "We've caved in to pressure from agents/publishers/Satan and decided to try to shove our way onto Dan Brown's overcrowded coattails." It's a little bit sickening, really. In books like Thunderhead and Mount Dragon, you felt you were in the hands of someone who knew the territory he was describing--knew it inside and out, and could take you there. P & C's Italy is generic, google-search, Lonely Planet Italy. Sure, they've been there. Who hasn't? But it isn't what they really know well, and the result is a warmed-over hash of Italian sterotypes and shibboleths that make you shake your head in disappointment. Doug, Lincoln: Why'd you do it? Brimstone isn't a terrible book, though there are at least a half dozen particulars of the central mystery that the authors never explain or wrap up. What's terrible is that it's like 50 other assembly-line thrillers, and their books, once upon a time, were unique. Now that the Wal-Martization of the Preston/Child franchise is nearly complete, I worry that there's going to be less and less reason to keep shopping here
zzzzZZZZZzzzzzzZZZZZZzzzzz. Cynical AND boring - quite a combination!Quick question:  you are interested in power, male-female relationships and female friendships in the Big Apple.  Yet somehow, work gets screwed up, relationships go badly and you end up lamenting the sad state of affairs loudly and often in print to your female friends.  Do you:a) realize that "insanity is doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results" and get therapy or find comfort in family or religion?orb) write a tedious, boring book about how hard successful women have it, in which the same few complaints are recycled over and over and over and over.......this author is too cynical for me, and her penchant for irritating characters who repeat themselves endlessly is bothersome.  I don't recommend this except to those not bothered by a quite cynical POV
What happened?. How utterly disapointing... I had no idea that there was a non-musical version of Jack The Giant Killer.Terrible acting, awful costumes, lame plot,  without the songs this movie is a drabby bore.  The goofy songs are the key to this otherwise DULL movie.
absolutely worthless. I have had this book for many years, and never actually found any useful information, not one time. Granted, there is a lot of material in there, but there isn't enough space to properly cover any individual topic (it doesn't even have enough tables, or quick-reference data), so the user would do well to look for the info elsewhere (in a proper book).As a general rule, I now stay away from all of Mr. Whitaker's "books", he seems to have better editorial skills than technical ones, and he always manages to get a lot of garbage published (with catchy titles). Speaking of garbage, a couple of weeks ago I took this (heavy) book to its final resting place (the dumpster), I did not even want to sell it. I don't mean to be vicious, I have seen the good reviews, but I don't think they are warranted
Interesting read, but not realistic... This book either needs a re-write, a re-vamp, or a recall.  So much of the information seems out of date.For example, Whitney gives a pretty amusing example of how to get $5k of credit fairly quickly:  Basically he advises you to open a savings account at a small bank with $1k.  (If you don't have $1k, he advises you borrow it from someone).  Then a week or so later he suggests you ask for a $1k loan (a signature loan) against your $1k in the bank and use that money to open another account at another bank and do the process over again. Use the money that you borrowed from the second bank to repay the first loan, and then do it again at a third bank.This *could* work, but he never really adresses the fact that it's going to cost you $1k plus interest to do this (if you borrow a your first thousand, you're always going to have to pay back $2k and where are you going to get that money?)Then he focuses on renting out rooming houses or buying dumps and fixing them up into something a little nicer.  Basically, you'll be providing housing for transient types or welfare recipients, as he seems to only advise buying cheap, run-down properties.  That's great if you have plenty of fire insurance for when the tenants' meth lab explodes and burns down your investment, but otherwise, it's not to attractive a proposition.Another tactic discussed is to find a "motivated seller", which usually means someone under stress or financial hardship.  Then you take advantage of them and pay them far less than their property is worth.  You may be able to get a good deal shortchanging old ladies out of their house once their husband dies and and the kids move away, but personally I'd have a hard time sleeping at night.Bottom line, you might get something out of this book, but I wouldn't recommend it.  It's not really realistic and Whitney comes across as kind of a sleeze.
Corporate co-optation of the Constitution. The problem with the Supreme Court is the same problem with virtually every U.S. institution, it is being coopted by corporate interests.  The watershed decision that started this process was the 1886 case of Santa Clara Country vs. the Southern Pacific Railroad, in which corporations were granted "personhood."  Since that time, the Fourteenth Amendment, among others, has been perverted by corporate lawyers to extend additional rights to Big Business, and we the people have been losing the legal structure to control these private tyrannies.  Founding fathers like Thomas Jefferson warned of this growing menace when he said, "I hope we shall crush in its birth the aristocracy of our monied corporations which dare already to challenge our government to a trial of strength, and bid defiance to the laws of our country."  And President Grover Cleveland warned in 1888 that, "As we view the achievements of aggregated capital, we discover the existence of trusts, combinations, and monopolies, while the citizen is struggling far in the rear or is trampled to death beneath an iron heel.  Corporations, which should be the carefully restrained creatures of the law and the servants of the people, are fast becoming the people's masters."A much more interesting book on Constitutional matters is Thom Hartmann's "Unequal Protection: The Rise of Corporate Dominance and the Theft of Human Rights."  Hartmann also hosts a daily radio program that inspires the most thought provoking dialogue in radio.  I can't say the same for Levin's book or his show.In fact, I think Levin is consciously avoiding the more profound issues that people like Hartmann raise.  These more pressing issues are also raised in the award-winning documentary "The Corporation" - which is available on Amazon in DVD format.
Bah, humbug! Caramba! Mein Gott! Baka da na! Sacre bleu!. Ever wonder for which bipolar monomaniac the Sorcerer's Apprentice worked? Now you know. Drier than Dryden, boot-licking admirer of the thief of his childhood, humorless bookworm of a dusty aristocrat, protonerd ex machina in extremis. When Continent-lazing navel-gazers concern themselves with improving society, oil your firearms. I'd rather a deep belly laugh than Mill's musings, any day
not what was promised by the seller. The book was advertised with CD, i received no CD in it. When i contacted abebook, they send me e-mail that i have to complain to amazon
Sadly, this is a message that further divides the world. I heard an interview with Dr. Kushner on NPR today.  He explained how the comfort in the 23rd Psalm lies in the realization that, for example, God is not on the side of the terrorists, or the hurricanes; he is on our side.Why define the world as divided so in the first place?  Terrorists are people too.  Nature is people too.  Until we accept the fact that God is in all of us, we will continue to place things in "good" and "evil" bins and only strengthen the hatred and suffering in the world.  Our comfort and relief from Psalm 23 will only revitalize us to more intensely resist those things that we (WE, not God or some divine law of the universe) label as evil.I rate the book 2 stars instead of 1 because it is clear the author means well and has a heart of gold, full of compassion.  Unfortunately his wonderful intentions are sorely misguided.
She's supposed to be a bright cop, but she does dumb things ... just to make the plot work.  Not very realistic.  If you want a realist cop character, try Michael Connelly's Harry Bosch.
Not geared for the CCNA exam. This book is good as a primer if you want consider achieving a CCNA.  This book is not good as a study guide for the exam, due to its lack of granularity on most CCNA subjects
Patterson readers beware of this dog. The only explanation is that James Paterson churned this dog out to make a buck. I've read a number of James Patterson books and while I'm not a hard core fan, I've enjoyed most of them. I know this will outrage some Patterson readers but I'm not much of a fan of Alex Cross who frankly I find boring as hell.As mediocre as Patterson often is as an author, readers should beware, London Bridges is especially bad. The novel reads like an abridgement, moving at a frantic pace without ever generating any suspense. The premise is ridiculous - super criminals with silly names join forces to blackmail world leaders (sounds like the plot for an Austin Powers movie - without any of the humour).Patterson is not remotely qualified to enter the international terrorist thriller market. An author who churns out 3 or 4 novels a year doesn't have time to do the kind of research that is needed to produce a plausible terrorist thriller.The twists at the end - "he's the wolf - no, he's the wolf - no, she's the wolf - no...." by the end, I just didn't care.James Patterson has written some decent crime novels but his fans should beware. Quantity, not quality seems to be Patterson's priority these days. London Bridges is a mess from beginning to end.
This story has been proven totally false. Do a search on the true story.  Find out what really happened and how her "therapist" actually created and named the personalities.  Also, you will discover that this author KNEW the TRUTH about this case and simply hid it away in an effort to sell more books
A doctrinaire view of biology. Most books that set out to explain why organisms behave as they do describe observations of behaviour on almost every page. The books of Richard Dawkins, whom Rose selects as his special target, illustrate this well: readers can reject all of his interpretations while remaining fascinated by the purely factual information that they contain. How one can hope to convince anyone of the truth of a theory without supporting it with abundant facts? Yet hard biological information is extremely sparse in Rose's book. There is a great deal about what he thinks of other biologists' opinions, but almost no observations from behavioural biology. Nonetheless, in his preface he aligns himself with the practising biologists "who spend a significant part of every working day thinking about and designing experiments", dismissing Dawkins and Daniel Dennett as "people who either no longer do science or never did it." What a pity, therefore, that he chose to include so little of the experimental basis of his ideas in his book. There are a few vague remarks about how chicks behave, and that's about it.
The Canterbury Tales by a modern hack poet. This set of CDs is a fraud!  Nowhere does it say in the ads that it is not Chaucer that is being read but a "translation" by some hack poet.  So, if you are only interested in the stories but have no sensitivity to the sound and rhythm of the second best poet in the English language, then this is the stuff for you.  But it is definitely not Chaucer
almost unreadable. The text is thoroughly unorganized, it has almost no coherent linear progression. The author often repeats himself, uttering the "Final Solution" of the "Jewish question" over and over without giving an studied analysis of what that means. The book is a pistache of accusations and anecdotes about people's involvement in the "final solution" without offering any studied analysis of any one particular group or person. For example, we are introduced to a commander Wohlauf--an office of Battalion 101---and his wife. We are told that he killed Jews and his pregnant wife watched, but thats about it. The author also infuses his writing with pedantry: rather that presenting the facts as they are, he is compelled to make the reader feel shocked by using exclamation points to drive home how we should feel.Undoubtedly antisemitism was endemic not only in Germany, but throughout Europe, but one gets the feeling that the author is cherry picking throughout history  to bolster his outlandish thesis that the Germans were predicated to mass murder of Jews.
"Writers" get some help!  PLEASE!. If it's true that everything is good for something, even if it is a bad example, this book might by used accordingly, otherwise, don't waste your time.Each chapter of this book is written by a different professional writer, each with a story to tell about her particular life, relationships, etc.  I found it to be a disturbing and even appalling read on many levels.  For one, these women are not "typical" in that they do not represent the rank and file of American women, wives and mothers, at least not the ones that I know!  They are professional writers who are urban, educated, liberal, and comparitively affluent.  These women live and work primarily in academia.  The book is a compilation of chapters in which these writers rant, whine, confess and obsess about their relationships, careers, etc. It misses the point of getting views from women of all walks of life and social status.I found this book offensive in that because they have, as writers, the platform to flaunt their deviance and dysfunction (sexually, morally, politically, etc. ), they play it off as normal and representative of the rest of us.  Perhaps in their literary or academic worlds, they are the norm, but for the vast majority of us wives and moms out here in the real world, I don't think so!I got the impression that many of these women thought it was somehow a display of their writing prowess if they divulged more dark, freaky, wacko secrets and shocking confessions than their sister in the previous chapter, be it on their affair with another woman, a married man, or their open marriage.The Hannah Pine piece is particularly disturbing and I can see why she uses a pseudonym; had her real name been used there would be no reason why this pitiful woman would not be carted off to the mental health ward.  She writes of the affairs she and her husband have had with other people and her obviously unsuccessful, yet frighteningly denied, attempt to justify the affairs as anything negative or unhealthy, even priding herself on chosing to not be angry over her husbands habit of sleeping with other women.   Afterall, that could put a damper on his lust and we wouldn't want to restrict him in such an negative and oppressive manner...  PUH-LEEZE!!!!!
little powerful thoughts, lots of non sense. There are about 20% power thoughts in this CD/Book and rest are unpractical nonsense.  Nonsense like:"I love every cell of my body""Let the universe's solution come to you""I am decisive in my decisions.  If I make a poor one, I'll just make another one."I guess if you are completely foolish or just ignorant, this book will not help you much.  Your mother probably gave you much more and better advise than this book.
Lousy little yoga book. Not expensive, but not worth much either.  Ultimately, IMHO, doing asanas in bed is a bad idea--much better to do poses on a firm surface, i.e., the floor
NO, NO,NO -TOO MANY ERRORS AND MISINFORMATION. Masquerading as a text on correctly using infrared, I found this book very poorly written, loaded with errors and containing amatuerish photographs. I felt ripped off. I will look for better written books on the subject. If I could have looked the book over ahead of time, I never would have purchased it
Too Much Detail. The book contained too much detail on manufacturing.  I would have preferred the book to cover less ground.  The review entitled &quot;Words, words, words&quot;, encompasses my view exactly.  Unfortunately I did not read all the reviews first.  I will not make that mistake again
Not worth more than 9 USD. This book gives some basic information, but 75% of the text refers to the PMBOK, which you also have to buy to read it. It gives a few tips...like you may have problems with your scope because there is a multiple ownership...All in all there are about 30 pages of information, so, in my opinion it is worth about 6 USD. If you are a public project manager it brings you no insite into how to do your job better
Useless unless. This bool from the evil russian is useless if you already own" naked warrior " .Good techniques  and informations nevertheless
the lerning process. as a loan officer in training this book has been a great tool in my lerning ,it explain in detail and clear how to do your job step by step, and how to avoid mistakes,i am glad that i found this book and recommended to any one interested in lerning about the mortgage business
Not much help. Don't waste your money on this one.  It was recommended by "Rich Dad" advisors, but doesn't tell you how to get going.  And unless you live in or want to travel to one of the 29 "lien states" there's nothing in for you.  The other states are not mentioned
Don't choose this book if currently in a life crisis. An extremely convoluted read. Another reader mentioned "dizzying" and I concur. Chock full of psyco-babble and others' personal stories that I found uninspiring.  The numerous exercises Myss requires of you to dissect past emotional events, felt somehow unhealthy and too self-absorbing. How can one be objective about the dynamics of past painful events since our perspective of them can change dramatically with time?The author's voice was to me that of a least favorite professor in college. You know, the one class you would nod off on occasion? I took alot of effort for me to get through the first lengthy chapter, which I did, indeed, fall asleep around page 83.However, the bottom line for me was the lack of joy in the authors words. I found Myss overcomplicating, and over intellectualizing too many fundamental Spiritual practicalities and principles. This book would seem better off in "general psychology" and not in the "Self-help/improvement" section of the bookstore. The over-analytical process could be enough to send someone in crisis over the edge.
Some Good Ideas But Mostly Gobbleygook. TAFTP has its moments, but I dont think this book was the godsend others make it out to be.An example of a good point is the author's notion of optimizing the cycle length to find the best %D to use for a particular security.  That's a good read.   The next chapter suggests drawing oodles of trendlines on a chart and looking for intersections.  If you draw enough lines on a chart you are bound to find one that supports what you believe.  I just ddnt buy her premise at all.Some concepts that can be described quickly are laboriously drawn out.  5 pages dedicated to the dangers of looking at small charts where data can be compressed is 5 pages too much.Other commentators have talked about "sophistication" and "complexity" as virtues of the book.  I disagree.   Complex doesnt mean better.  Simplicity breeds success remember.  This book gets wordy and its ideas are sometimes hard to understand.  That doesnt make it a better book nor does it make its ideas more credible.The CMT has put this on their required reading list but I wouldnt give that too much weight.  They have been criticized that their syllabus isnt quantitative enough so they needed to incorporate something like this.  Besides, half the book isnt tested for CMT.Lastly, like far too many technical analysis books, there is a lot of, "this makes total sense looking backwards," about this book.   Had you bought in 1994 at this signal (which became obvious in 1998) you would have made a lot of money!Rather than shlep through TAFTP, there are better books out there.   Trading Sytems and Methods by Kaufman comes to mind
Not much I would cook.... I returned this book as I did not see that much that I would cook
This book tries too hard. I was really looking forward to settling in with this book and having a good laugh.  Instead, what I found was a pretentious book where the author tried way too hard to be funny . . . and very little of it actually was.  The author definitely has a way of turning a phrase in an original way, but you cannot hang an entire chapter on one cute phrase.  Reading this book was just way too much effort and not nearly fun enough.  Yuck
Opportunity Lost. I found this book rhetorical and in some areas misleading. While I can sympathise with the authors' attempts in trying to make sense of the management problem that afflicts industry and government, their resort to claiming that all problems will be fixed through the application of six change forces is pure technique drivel.To be fair the concepts in the book are now becoming old (1997 reprint) but this does not distance it from deserved criticism. The last thing that the world needs is a dialectic that is predicated upon the Cult of the Leader(Leader Power) and a reverence to the ability of Information Technology to provide a managerial communications fix. Their concentration upon investor power is correct but for the wrong reasons.Investors are not good at judging customer value and their influence in redirecting customer-centric corporate direction through a compliant CEO has to be viewed with scepticism. Do not misunderstand me, I am not a managerial apologist.In concurrence with the authors I also believe that bureaucratic managerialism is inefficient and needs reduction. However the methods by which I would achieve this goal is not as socially disruptive as those endorsed by the authors i.e through rampant dismissals. I can understand why the authors state: ' We do not have the abswers' (p.215) to the unemployment dilemma.The authors focus upon the Customer and upon Simpliicity are some of this book's redeeming features, until the authors start espousing the merits of outsourcing and the tired neo-conservative polemic that privatisation is a better economic model than public ownership. Outsourcing is only advantageous when core-competencies are not lost. The book's tenet revolves around the non-managerialism so would it not make sense to outsource management. Nowhere in the book is this stated.The latter privatisation/public ownership debate only has currency because we have been and still are existing in a flawed Neoclassical economic milieu that, by historical circumstances, has ruled Western Society since the time of Adam Smith. It is a philosophy that professes a primacy of the individual over community.Perhaps it is time to review this economic underpinning and start questioning the Neoclassical Economic ceteris paribus assumptions (see page 211) inherent in Neoclassical static economic models, especially in these times when Sustainability issues (ISO900, ISO 14001, etc.) have become paramount.This latter exercise I think should provide the authors with a better avenue along which to proceed. I am convinced that the Chapter 3 heading is prophetic. I do not believe that this book is sufficiently detailed to provide the world with a blueprint that promises a 'Revolution that has not Happened
Good information - but watch out for the bad. I found most of the information OK. But there was stuff in this book that made me wary. Prozac for PMS? Hysterectomy good idea for fibroids? Who would seriously consider these options? Natural progesterone and studies on  it dismissed in one paragraph. These things left me rather unimpressed. I  would not rely on this book as my main source of information
Sort of like Shag Carpet. It's really sort of a trip back in time reading this book...so much of it probably worked pretty well in 1985 when this was written but the translation in 2004 doesn't quite make it. Trendy young Dr. Delaware, age 33, drives a Cadillac Seville and when it's disabled he rents a "boxy Japanese car". Lot's of amusing things crop up like that in this book which actually made me sort of nostalgic. I had to go listen to old Hall & Oates LP's to re-visit "Say It Isn't So" and "Maneater" again! It also has a central convention of the 80's that I'm currently sick to death of...struggling,impoverished minorities-Good Guys, White, affluent successful Christian Men who conspire-Bad Guys. Honestly, this formula is more stereotypical than "The Butler Did It" used to be. If you spot a successful white guy early in a story, especially if it's suggested that he's a Christian, he's probably the bad guy. If Kellerman wrote this book in 2004 it probably couldn't get published...it's way too formulaic! Consequenly a big part of my dislike of this book is because of this. It doesn't stop there however...many reviews here suggest that Jonathan Kellerman is a great writer. I think he's marginal at best. I think these characters are really pretty shallow and the whole idea of this psychologist single handedly solving crimes and beating up bad guys twice his size is goofy. Delaware points a gun at central villians on 2 separate occasions in the story and they admit to everything but their shoe size. Try to imagine Patrick Kenzie or Harry Bosch pointing a gun at a bad guy and having said bad guy collapse and outline every last element of the crime in great detail. It reminded me of those old Perry Mason shows where Perry always seems to get a witness to break down in open court and admit to his or her crime in front of a packed court room. Here's a suggestion: if you want to read a good mystery with child abuse as a theme read Dennis Lehane's "Gone Baby, Gone". Jonathan Kellerman should be writing scripts for TV detective shows...like Barnaby Jone
Out of stock. After weeks of delaying my shipment I was told Amazon could not get the book for me ..
Outdated and not very informative. I was hoping to learn things I hadn't seen in other books, but I didn't.  Not only is the book outdated, but it's also quite limited in what it offers.  I was not happy with it at all
A little dated. I really don't understand what all the fuss is about this book. I once  took a class called &quot;Meat Analysis&quot; when I was at Southern  Houston Community Collge in the early 1970's-even though I was an Art  major, it was a required course needed for graduation (an educational  reform dating from the Connolly administration.) At the time I was living  at the ValMar appartments, about 2 miles from school, and I used to have to  take the freeway to get there. This was way before they started building  all the skyscrapers, and Houston seemed much more like a &quot;cow  town&quot; than the city it is now. There was this pool in the courtyard,  and most days there was a little get-together in the backyard, just some  people from the building who would go to mixers and get to know other folks  and neighbors. It was mostly single people who lived there, and although I  had a girlfriend at the time (Sammy Sue - we went to High School together,  although we didn't know each other well enough to go to the prom together)  I would still attend on occasion. There used to be cookouts, this way I  could hang out with my neighbors and maybe flirt a little and at the same  time study for my mid-terms in Meat Analysis. Ribs was the favorite dish  one summer for some reason...I remember that was the year that &quot;Billy,  Don't Be A Hero&quot; came out, and whenever that song came on the radio  we'd all get real quiet; we didn't like to think about Vietnam all that  much, we were more into socializing. Anyhow, there was this guy that used  to come by for our barbecues, this guy George, who just came from living in  Vermont or Delaware or something, I always get those small Northern states  with Ivy League schools mixed up! He used to like to drink a lot, and boy  did he ever love his barbecue!!! I'm not sure what he was doing there,  since he lived over in the really *fancy* apartment building, the Chateaux  Dijon, and we were a little lower rent. Some people think this rich kid  went there because the women at the ValMar would be more easily impressed  by his money. It was so weird, he would swagger in and within an hour he'd  get so blotto that he'd slump into a lawn chair and start mumbling  something about oil or terepin turtles or something, it changed from minute  to minute
Anti-Western new age nonsense. Zukav has a decidedly anti-Western tone and is obviously biased in favor of oriental thinking.  This is new age gobbledegook passed off as a bare bones reader on physics.  Rather than writing a laconic outline of physics, Zukav spends the majority of his time praising Eastern thought and toying with the idea that everything is subjective.The reader is referred to any college physics textbook or Isaac Asimov's History of Physics or a good set of encylopedias.
Too Drawn Out. Normally I don't take the time to write a review, but this book just bugged me.  When I finished I felt like I had run a marathon.  The book was just too drawn out and I felt the descriptions were long winded.  Faith was a little too unbelieveable even though she was abused and had little self esteem.  The plot was good, but moved slowly.  I am typically not drawn to Danielle Steel books and probably with good reason that I never seem to like them very much.  I am glad that this book was in a box of 30+ books that I paid $15 for at a used book store.  I would have felt like I wasted my money had I actually paid full price for it
A sinister plot, worthy of Dr. Evil. The book starts out well enough when banker Ben Hartman, in Switzerland on business, runs into an old college buddy who tries to kill him.  Then through a series of accidental discoveries, narrow escapes, and unbelievable coincidences, Hartman learns that practically everybody he knows, and everyone new he meets, is involved in an evil cabal bent on world domination.When you finally find out who the criminal mastermind is, it seems like something only Austin Powers' nemesis Dr. Evil could have pulled off.  Without giving too much away - I have to say that the ending involves the hero attempting a daring rescue from the villain's heavily-guarded, secret mountain lair.  And of course there is a scene where the villain feels the need to carry on a long monologue to explain his evil plot to the hero.  Yeah baby, yeah
Disappointing. I really loved The Fall of a Sparrow and greatly looked forward to another beautiful novel by the same author.  Unfortunately this one fell apart about halfway through.  Unlike the characters in The Fall of a Sparrow, too many of the characters in this book didn't sound or feel like real people, especially the grown-up Cory.  The girl who painted an obscenity on the Appleton water tower was an intriguing character of few words seen mostly through the adoring eyes of the book's narrator:  the grown-up woman just never took life on the page, despite the many long conversations in which she took part.  The story of an American white boy's attraction to a black girl and his (surely realated) lifelong devotion to black music could have been a fascinating and far-reaching one: unfortunately this time the author fails to bring any satisfying insight to the subject
Super basic. I'm an ACE-certified personal trainer and was looking for some good information and new exercises to use with my client who is in their 60s.  This book took basic strength training exercises and had a picture of a senior doing the exercise.  Nothing in this book was new to me.  If you are a physically active senior, this book may be all right for you.  If you are a senior who has been sedentary or who is looking to improve upon daily activities of living, this book may not be right for you
The Epitome of Depressing Eighties "Writing". This is going to be short, but sweet. This book was by far one of the most bothersome collections of short stories I have had the misfortune to come across. With authors such as Robert Lipsyte, Diane Duane, and Richard Peck, this is hardly what I would call a "selection of great work from great writers." For that matter, It isn't a collection of anything but chronologically trapped short stories featuring such characters as "Craig the Cat" the rock-star who dressed like a cat and held a bottle of spilling milk while posing atop a garbage can for magazine shoots. The biggest problem with this book is that the stories are oriented for pre-teens but to find any value or worthwhile messages in the book, you would have to be at least sixteen. Oh the sweet irony. As a young teenager, I feel that this book was a complete was of time. G'day
A Disappointment. When I read a review of this book, I was interested and checked it out of the library. It was a quick and easy read, and, unfortunately, also a disappointment.In author Shellenbarger's favor, it must be said that the book is literate, well-organized and based on a reasonable methodology of data collection. It even has footnotes. It categorizes female midlife crisis into specific types, and gives defining examples of each.However, _The Breaking Point_ is also quite superficial, despite a few offhand references to Jungian psychology. After awhile, the collected personal stories which are used as examples start to sound like a litany of airheaded people who made bad decisions (dropped out of college to get married, married emotionally remote men, tried to mold themselves according to other people's expectations) and eventually wound up paying the price. The book also has virtually no perspectives that are not rooted in the last 50 years of human experience, which makes it difficult to take seriously.I am a 52-year-old woman, recently retired, and I find it impossible to identify with these people. I also find it absolutely astonishing that anyone should find the notion of continued personal growth a radical solution to any problem.This book may possibly be of assistance to women who are like those the author interviewed. There is at least one piece of sensible advice herein: throwing yourself into a series of sexual or romantic affairs may be dangerous to your mental health and your marriage.Sorry, Sue, nice concept, weak execution.
Interesting theory...circular logic. I ran across this book at a local library and it picqued my interest.  Tipler's theory of immortality, in a nutshell, is the following: 1) the planet earth...and all its living creatures are doomed as the sun will engulf the earth in ~1 billion years. 2) Man will make self-learning and self-replicating machines (can Windows XP do that?) that will colonize, over millions of years, our galaxay and, eventually, the entire universe. 3) These machines will be capable of individual thoughts, emotions, etc and are essentially "alive." 4) As the universe begins to collapse, the machines will be able to manipulate this collapse and prevent total destruction of the universe. 5) All the knowledge possessed by these machines will eventually coalesce into one "super being" at the center of the collapsing universe...this super being is the "omega point." 6) The omega point, via its "all knowledge of all things" will be able make emulations (exact duplicates) of all biospheres, including earth.  Within these emulations, individual humans (you and me!) will be emulated.  Thus we will again be "alive" as these "beings" in these emulations will be unable to tell if they're real or virtual....PRESTO...immortality for all.  The book (theory) reeks of circular logic and assumptions.  It's an interesting theory, but it's just that, an interesting theory by a theoretical physicist.  PS: Tipler denies the resurection of Christ and in  the last chapter admits to being an aetheist.  (I wonder if he's a God-fearing aetheist?
A Disillusioning Waste Of Time. Nicely drawn characters; good writing; different and compelling story. Why don't I like it, then? Because of what the author did with these things. It ends in disaster and proves nothing. Afterwards, I find that this novel lingers in the mind like a bad taste in the mouth. I wish to God I'd never read it
Okay. For some reason I don't believe this book.  The whole book seems like some kind of hoax - a planned event.  There are several wonderful places a man going through a mid-life crisis can explore on a motorcycle to find himself; Glen seems begging for all of these horrible things to happen to him.  The author is a bit full of himself and his uncultured descriptions of the places and faces he encounters are a complete bore.  I admit that when I purchased this book I was searching for the innocent escape I reaped by reading "Jupiter's Travels" by Ted Simon, not an ego charged, made for t.v. action adventure
History  or Fiction ?. Reynolds attempts to anchor the development of Dzogchen in history rather than myth and he fails.  His style reminds me of a Christian fundamentalist - and I would bet that is his background - trying to prove the historical accuracy of Genesis.  He has an answer for every issue critics and objective historians have raised regarding the origins of Dzogchen, its early documents and their authors, but almost all of those answers are unsupported by anything but conjecture and the pronouncements of lamas. If you are a true believer, this is probably the book for you.  But if you would like something of substance that trys to separate history from fiction and partisan conjecture, I(...
Really old and outdated techniques. This book turned out to be another release of the original book from the 1980s and it shows.  It is full of seriously outdated information and old style, pushy, boiler-room style telemarketing tactics.  Worst of all, it tells you to always push for the appointment and end the conversation there.  What about qualifying?  I can already set appointments all day if I don't bother to qualify them, but unfortunately those unqualified appointments don't buy.  Save your money and find a more up to date sales book
replacing old stereotypes with new ones. this book is as much about the gypsy communities as it is about confirming the author's own preconceived notion of  what eastern europe is (or what is not): in her own words, "certainly not a melting pot."i will not comment on how the author deals with the main subject of her book, on the gypsy communities, its cultural heritage and its current problems- as a romanian, i am ashamed i know very little about it, and i was hoping to find out some answers by reading this book; i did not. there is one point where i agree on with the autor, when she deplores the absence of this subject from the public debate and modern scholarship.let me now say what this book excels at:A. lack of scholarship.....: the author does a poor job identifying her sources. the 15 century of eastern europe as seen through the eyes of this author is full of surprises; to give just one example, "the princes of the teritories that would become romania made great fortunes of war, supplying food to constantinople". this is quite funny  given the intricate politics among the ottoman empire and the various genoese and venetian principalities that controlled the trade in the area at that time. what is more surprising is the almost random insertion of this statement in the context of the book.B... to donwright plagiarism: one chapter of her book is entitled "temptation to exist" which is the famous title of a book by the romanian author emil cioran. name-dropping cannot replace bibliography (and this is unfortunately one of the more annoying habits of romanian scholars that the author seemed to have taken to).C.... to insulting ignorance: is she aware of the sympathy of young cioran for the iron guard movement in the 30'? is paraphrasing a fascist sympathizer appropriate in a book about opressed minorities?D... to cold war cliches: "to the people of the balkans, [the ursars... gypsies travellers with dancing bears] must have been a wonderful sight in the grueling last years of communism. for some reason, in ceausescu's romania people continue to pay money..."a bit assuming isnt it? well, what else were doing romanians during communism? gymnastics, nastase, sucking their own blood...perhaps, since even even the "literacy of the average romanian" is subject of mockery.E...to selective 20 century history: here again the evil spirit of eastern european chauvinism  is the obvious cause of all the evils of the century, if it weren't for other standard choices: nazy germany, etc... how about mussolini? there is not one mentionabout mussolini and the fate of gypsies in italy...For various reasons (perhaps some or many of them good) the author hates the country i am from. sometimes i do too. but i think a writer, an intellectual, should always be ready to engage in dialogue and thus set an example rather than labelling people (who did not benefit from the same schooling as the author did) as ignorant folk. on the contrary, this author does not permit even her (close?) romanian asisstant so much as a "tentative revelation" on the subject (these are the author's own words!!), not to mention that she misspelled her name (twice) in the acknowledgement.Finally, i have a recommendation if you want to know more about gypsies and eastern europe check out emir kusturica's brilliant movies
Read the "tunnel vision" review - I couldn't have said it better. I was looking for an unbiased factual account of the crusades, and I definitely did not find it in this book.  At first, I found myself thinking that the anti-western bias must be my imagination due to my western heritage.  However, the anti-western slant became so blatent that I found it impossible to continue reading this book due to the author's wreckless disregard for simply stating fact without bias.  I too give it one star for it's only saving grace - the extensive list of references
More Like A Walk Through Boredom. Someone's trying to sabotage the making of a documentary. I thought it might be interesting. I'm sorry, I was wrong. Unfortunately, the book was downright predictable. In some areas, it was just plain contradictory. The characters lacked depth and the plot was extremely weak. When you see this book on the shelf, just keep walking
Beautiful Beginning / Painful (illogical) Ending. I hope the ending is illogical at least and is fiction. If thoughts are that powerful, they need to be resrained earlier. I don't know who survivied but he might feel very guilty about the others earlier and question if he had to survive. Logic can be quite painful when left alone, but sometimes it has to be
Not worth the price - any price. My garage is a mess, and I was hoping this book would give me ideas for getting it organized.  It gets off to a great start, but that's as far as it goes.  For example, it says that when the garage is a mess, you cannot find things and have to go out and buy replacements - all too true.  It also says that you must throw things away - of course.The problem is, when it comes to making the garage nicer, it refers the reader to sources for expensive storage cabinets and floor coverings.  I do not want to spend $10,000 re-doing my garage, nor do I want to install  thousands of dollars worth of cabinets.The "ideas" presented in this book consist mainly of lists of expensive suppliers.  I would have preferred plans and ideas for do-it-yourself storage and shelving
Is James Patterson lending his name to somebody else?. I can't think about any other explanation for this silly, stupid thriller if you want to call it that. I can't believe that the writer is doing so badly. I am most certainly disappointed with this book. In the last couple of years, I think he had lost his steam. Plus, why does he have to come up with 15 books or so a year? Why does he not read his own book before he sends it to the publisher? It's time for me to move on to another writer....I would advice readers to not to read this book
Chuck, Chuck Palahniuk, Wrote a Book and It Did S*ck. July 9Today, the reader from Harrisburg finished Chuck's novel "Diary."  The novel that never really convinced him was a diary, as it never stooped to that convention of writing in the first person.  He read the awkward switching from third person to second person in Chuck's novel.Your novel, Chuck.Apparently, you are in some sort of ironic writer's coma.  He  is.  You are.  See how disconcerting this can be, carried out over 250 plus pages of his novel?Your novel, Chuck?If you removed all the third-to-second person clarification prose, this job drops an easy 50 pages.  Take out all the adipose ramblings of subcutaneous fat and musculataure, which begin cute and end tedious, maybe we're down to a tight novella, Chuck.  You are.  He is.In the middle, his novel picks up something resembling dramatic steam.  He stayed the impulse to throw the book aside, half-read, Chuck.  Your reader, the guy from Harrisburg.  But nothing too awfully surprising happens on Waytansea Island.  He, your reader, just waits and sees that you have some clever almost Nietzschean idea of eternal return and artistic hell.  Did he, I mean you, Chuck, the writer of this poorly executed novel, intend some statement about artistic sacrifice?  Or did he, you, I mean, intend just a good read?  Because on the latter you failed, and on the former, you failed, and about the best I can summon is that you meant well, and you aren't Danielle Steele or that basic ilk.My impression was that in picking up a Palahniuk novel, my first Palahniuk novel, his first Palahniuk novel -- your novel, Chuck -- I'd find crisp writing, challenging plot developments, and a refreshing, even bracing worldview.Instead, he found a tendency to repeat phrases about "What you don't understand you can make mean anything" and suchlike drivel.  Why didn't he simply say "What I couldn't write, maybe you can just go think up and attribute to me?"Why didn't you, Chuck?Because his characters never come alive.  They seem like exercises best left in notebooks.Your characters, Chuck.  Misty, Peter, Tabbi, Grace.  Harrow.  Angel.  Oh, I can name them, but ask me again in a week.  Ask him again, and he'll have forgotten them.  He will.  I will.  Me.  The reader.  Remember the reader, Chuck?  Chuck, that rhymes with "buck," that comes from movie rights to half-hearted attempts to replicate the vigor of "Fight Club?"Caveat emptor.  No more will I read his novels.  Your novels, Chuck.  Even if you awake from your coma to read my diary of your "Diary."  His "Diary."  Your sloppily written, flimsy dreck that should only garner one Amazon star but for the fact that worse writing does exist, sadly.When he finished your book, Chuck, the reader from Harrisburg threw it aside and took a nap.  The nap was good, at least.  Later, he wrote a review on Amazon.  About your book.  I did.  About your book.  Blecch
Diary of a madman. It's not too difficult to understand how "Behold a Pale Horse" has become "the best selling underground book of all time"(according to a blurb on one pro-Cooper website)--after all, people want to(and do) believe in outlandish things. The problem with the late Bill Cooper's book is that it damages any serious attempt to examine the reasonable premise that every aspect of world affairs is controlled by a handful of wealthy, powerful men. Cooper believed this, Cooper was a nut...therefore it follows that everyone who agrees with the basic hypothesis is a nut, too. Rightly or wrongly, this is what people believe. (If you're looking for a serious treatment of this subject, albeit from the POV of someone who thought it was a good thing, take a gander at Carroll Quigley's monumental "Tragedy and Hope".)To all the "if you can't handle the truth, don't read this book!" reviewers who know little to nothing about Bill Cooper: I invite you to do a Google search on the man and acquaint yourselves with another truth, the real truth. Milton William Cooper was a certifiable headcase. Numerous former friends and acquaintances have described him as a hard-drinking, ill-tempered, violent man who was incredibly easy to fool. Cooper's contention that John F. Kennedy was killed by William Greer, the driver of his limo in Dallas, is of course well-known...but he also believed, and told audiences at his lectures, that the aliens on the Fox television show "Alien Nation" were real aliens. He wasn't kidding. Cooper would hear or read an outlandish tidbit of information, then take it--and repeat it!--as gospel. Fellow "fringe" writers and researchers like Bob Lazar shunned Cooper after he accused them of being government agents who were out to discredit him. There was, of course, no need for anyone else to discredit him: he took care of that himself. Nowhere in this rambling patchwork quilt of a book(mostly documents and articles from other sources, really, with a comment here and there by Cooper himself) is there a shred of proof to back up his extraordinary claims. Cooper made no attempt to verify the info he included, and it would have been impossible to do so in almost every instance, anyhow.I'll go on record as saying that I believe the circumstances of Cooper's death were suspicious. I feel badly for the man because he came to such an ignoble end, and because his affection for his wife and daughter is so evident in the foreword to "Pale Horse". This was a human being with real feelings...but he was very, very disturbed. There are countless other books which examine this subject more rationally; so many that "Behold a Pale Horse" should NEVER become any conspiracy theorist's bible.
Trite. I had heard great things about Ram Charan, so perhaps my expectations were set a bit high.  I realy got very little out of this, indeed, I didn't finish it.  This review is of the audio edition.  I have a bias against professional readers who don't understand what they are reading.  While the reading was very professional, it tended to put one to sleep, because the reader didn't know where the important infections were.  Other details like pronouncing DEC (Digital Equipment) as "Dee Eee Cee" added to the impression.
Also Horrified. Like "Horrified" above, I was appalled by the glibness with which this book rationalized Diana's support of fascism (and Nazism). The author treats Diana and Unity's commitment to fascism as an understandable flaw (rather like a tendency to split infinitives or something), even going so far as to try to play down Mosley's politics.As someone who has read Mosley's book, I was simply astonished at Lovell's treatment of him and Diana. Lovell mentions that people have a tendency to fall in love with Diana and forgive her everything; clearly, that's what Lovell did
Art is great, story....not so much - Buy when paperback comes out. The general feeling I had left after reading through this graphic novel was, That was it? Costing anywhere between 17 and 25 bucks this title hardly pays for itself. The book overall has a couple of different stories split up, all set in the Halo Universe. A good way to describe this book is, it's like the Animatrix, short stories based in a specific fictional landscape that are at best, cool and at worst mediocre. The art in every one of these short stories in this book were all top notch but, the shortness of the short stories just left me with again, the feeling of: That's it? My suggestion to Halo fans out there? Wait till this comes out in trade paperback form when it'll be about 10 bucks, then it might be worth buying.
What is the societal impact?. This is a book about our society and yet I am left wondering how "everything bad for us" actually affects our society. I believe the author's underlying presumption is that improving the individual improves our society as a whole. This societal analysis, however, is completely missing.The book can be summed up as follows:1. Games and software are more complex, therefore our problem-solving ability has increased.2. TV is more complex, therefore our emotional intelligence has increased.3. The Internet gives us new ways to connect with others, therefore our communication abilities have increased.The litmus test for all this is increasing IQ scores.Part I of the book goes to great lengths to explain how an individual's "mental muscle" is increased through popular media: games, TV, software, and the Internet. Part II asserts that increased IQ scores are the proof that our mental muscle is increasing.The individual may be benefiting from popular media, but is our society benefiting? Are more technological breakthroughs happening? Are we better able to piece together disparate facts provided by the media and government into a cohesive whole? Is software easier to use so we can more easily accomplish our goals? Are communities and homes being designed better so they improve communication between neighbors and families? Can we better recognize the underlying motives of our politicians? Are we making great strides to decrease global warming, air and water pollution, forest depletion, species extinction, famine, homelessness, cancer and disease, gender and racial inequality, and the distribution of wealth?If our ability to see connections and solve problems has improved, why do a vast number of Americans still believe there is a connection between 911 and Iraq? Why do we not recognize that the diversity of plant and animal species on the planet directly affects our well-being? Why do we seem incapable of understanding that many of the divisive issues we focus upon (e.g., school prayer, flag burning, abortion, gay marriage) are simply manifestations of larger societal problems (e.g., inequality, poverty, domination and control).How is the popular media affecting these societal and technological issues? Is it making them worse? This is the missing part of the book that I hope will be addressed in another edition
Too long. This is a great book, but it is just stretched  way too long. It starts out great and keeps the reader glued to the pages. Then the book starts to end the same things happen over and over again and you just think when id this book going to end. Personaly i think this book could have ended about 50 pages befor it did. I think the book would have had a shot at the Newbery if it didn't go on as long as it di. That just goes to show that you cant hve a super-de-duper start but then your ending just really stinks your book wont be that good. You need to have a good ending and a good begining in order to have a good book
Very muddy reveiw of global violence. Mr. Laqueur fails to adequately distinguish the different types of violence and prefers to lump them all together under the title of terrorism.  Far be  it for me to disagree with the likes of Mr. Cannistraro; but I feel it  necessary to better classify terrorism as being carried out against  individuals or groups not directly associated with the root cause or  disagreement.  The author creates a muddy and very confusing dialog by  placing nearly all violence save that carried out national governments, as  terrorism.  That said, The New Terrorism can provoke serious students to  create and refine their own definitions of terrorism.  I can only recommend  this book to those allready possesing a good grounding in global terrorism,  for it will require the ability to critically analyze what can legitimately  be termed &quot;terrorism&quot;
Premise has potential, but...Disappointing. The premise of people with animal DNA I thought had potential for interesting differences and conflicts.  Having read and enjoyed other paranormal and "romantica" novels, the reviews had me looking forward to this one.  The main characters were attractive enough, and although the plot was fairly predictable the book's biggest disappointment was that the hot encounters between Callan and Merinus was so motivated by an overwhelming chemical dependency (via Callan's pheromones) that the sex was disturbingly and distractingly involuntary--like a drug addiction.  If this sounds like it would bother you, look elsewhere
Not Krentz's best!. I usually really enjoy Jayne Ann Krentz and her alter ego Amanda Quick, but I actually returned this one to the library unfinished. I found it boring and the whole dream reader concept to be unbelievable
Actually manages to take the fun out of reading and texas holdem all in one go. I was hoping the book would be good.  most reviews are.  However the topics are not really covered at all, more introduced.  It was like talking to a drunk bloke about sports, most points are important and relevant but its presented in a way that makes it confusing.  They openly admit they dont want the book to be rated on the quality of the english.  Just as well, long rambling thaughts that don't form conclusions.  Not what I wanted or needed.  It actually manages to take the fun out of reading and texas holdem all in one go
Not a useful book... This book is really not useful.  The idea of "thinking" your way to happiness is interesting and imbues a connotation of a potentially introspective read.  Unfortunately, this book belies its title and focuses on not thinking.  Instead, it explains anything that makes you unhappy should be ignored and things that make you happy are OK.  Materialism is bad, but if shopping for expensive shoes is what makes you happy, go for it!  The author describes how you shouldn't be unhappy if you don't have everything you want, while in the same book detailing his extensive materialistic compilations of houses, etc.  This book is shallow and basically tells you everything is all right, just keep telling yourself everything is all right, everything is all right.  It is a superficial way to seduce happiness for a minute in your life.  The question of happiness is one that has confounded philosophers and thinkers - all humans - for centuries and to think a quickly read, 240 page book could allow you eternal happiness by "thinking" - as the author explains thinking - is preposterous.
I listened, but I couldn't hear an echo!. Having read a few Bosch books already (The Closers and Lost Light), I realized that I should probably start at the beginning to get better insight on how Bosch became the Bosch I was reading in the later series.  However, I was very disappointed with this book.  One of the most irritating aspects of this book was the grammatical errors (mispellings and such).  I found 3 or 4 in the first 50 pages (before I stopped reading)!  I thought it was ironic that Connelly was thanking his editor at the beginning of the book, because it did not seem that anyone was editing this book.  Also, I found the book to be too gritty.  It lacked the emotion and soul that I found in the later books.  It seemed that Connelly was trying too hard to make Bosch fit this certain mold, but then transformed the character to be more likeable in the later books that I read.  So it was disappointing that this book could not hold my interest because I just finished reading The Narrows and loved it, and will probably pick up some other Bosch books and just read it out of order.  Connelly's writing seems to be getting better and better, which should explain why I didn't enjoy this book and couldn't finish it.  I gave it 2 stars because it might have gotten better and maybe I was too impatient.  This is one of those series that seems like it is better to read out of order
TI must have cut Mr. Hornsby a big check. I'm taking a precalc class that uses this text as a refresher before beginning an undergraduate degree in Physics. In the early 90' I'd taken Algebra, Statistics, Precalc, and even a few Calculus classes (over 10 math classes in all). Out of all the math texts I've used, this is by far the worst. The examples are so poorly explained, I ALWAYS end up having to refer to one of my old texts. The book was written to be used with TI calculators, only problem is, no key stokes on how to perform a particular operation are included. Normally this should be the realm of your trusty owners manual, but if a math text is geared for a particular brand of calculator and the faculty at your college are forcing that brand of calculator down the students throats, then the book should offer some instruction on the calculator. I'm actually thinking about finishing my math at another college that does NOT use this text. If you're just looking for a reference book for precalc, look elsewhere
A good, but biased, introduction to globalization. In this work, Bhagwati offers valid arguments for globalization.  He is takes some of the strongest criticisms of globalization and is able to find fault in them, and at the same time, declares the benefits of a globalized economy.However, one need not read the entire book to find out Bhagwati's views.  Bhagwati's stance on globalization is almost so extreme that he instinctively and automatically comes to the defense of globalization without providing a fair analysis.  As a Harvard professor, I would assume him to provide more academic and holistic defenses and criticisms.  However, his book is an easy read and one that opens the reader to arguments for and against globalization whether s/he has previous knowledge of globalization or not
Not her best. I was waiting to get into ths book...then I realized I was halfway thru it.  I always stick with Berg...you never know when you'll get hooked.  But this one did not have it...I was relieved when it ended
a bad book. This book was a reading for my 3rd grade daughter.  I have no idea how or why this book EVER won an award, unless it was for being the most boring yet deppressing book ever written.  And the illustrations were just as sad
Review of non-existent product. I was very disappointed to find that most of chapter 5 "Genetic Engineering" was incomplete. The chapter was cut off (on page 80) and was followed by a repetition of page 49-80. Chapter 6 "Why we should Worry" had been left out and the beginning of chapter 7 "Human Rights" (page 105-113) was missing as well. It was very important for me to work on precisely these (missing) chapters at exactly this moment in time, so I am of course quite dissatisfied with the quality of this particular product.
Yow to Open your Own Restaurant...A Loser of a Guide. This is a very skinny book written by two men who obviously have restaurant experience, but who have very poor writing/communications skills.  This book is not a guide to setting up the spreadsheets necessary  to open a restaurant.  It is doubtful that the authors even know how to  open up Lotus or Excel.  The amount of essential items left out are  humongous.  Watch yourself!  Not a recommendable expenditure of any money  whatsoever on this crummy attempt at producing a useful &quot;book&quot;.   Rating:  eight onions
If i could give it no stars, i would. Maybe i'm not as cultured as some of the people who rated this book, but i have read the likes of Jane Austen and Louisa May Alcott and i think it is safe for this to be a true review. Please, please don't put yourself through the torment of reading this book, it is probably the worst book i have ever read. It goes on and on about the littlest of details which don't have anything to do with the book. I read this when i was 11 and it is safe to say i wasn't too immature to read it. Everyone in my class read it and i'm pretty sure we all had the same opinions, it really sucked. I would tell you the worst part of the book, but that would ruin the story. But let me just tell you a little tip, don't read it. Don't read it, don't read it, don't read it. I tried to read it again last year and i couldn't put myself through the pain and torment of reading the worlds worst book. Don't waste your money or waste a part of your life reading a book about nothing
Disappointing and Insulting. Thomas M. Disch approaches what should be an engaging topic to any SF lover with a holier-than-thou attitude that is both condescending and unappealing. I purchased this book believing it would study the impact of SF on American culture-as the title suggests. Instead, Disch taints his diatribe with his own offensive bias.Perhaps his sourest assertion is that of SF as the ultimate Boy's Club-run for and by the Men. Why, Disch is so enamored of this male-dominated theory, he proceeds to deny Mary Shelley as the true founder of the genre, and instead raises Edgar Allen Poe to the pedestal instead. His weak reason? He asserts that fewer people read Shelley than Poe. Furthermore, he credits Shelley's parents and husband as the reason behind her success at all. Because God forbid a woman might have laid the foundation for Disch's beloved genre.The entire book is tainted with these sort of chauvinistic opinions. What I thought would be a dissertation on SF in American culture is little more than one man's attempts to inflict his bias on the public. Spare yourself the indignation of reading such arrogant and bigoted opinions as this, you'll find nothing but rage at the ignorance of some folk
SKIP THE BOOK,  JUST WATCH THE MOVIE. Need I say more than the above title suggests? Okay, so the upside of this book is that it has important life lessons and epiphanies from the voice of experience. There are some touching moments in this book, but even then there is still something the author is lacking. I saw the movie when it was in theatres and I have just finished reading the book. I liked the movie soooooooooo much better than the book. The movie was funny, entertaining, touching, personal, and sad at times. The book did not captivate me at all. I had trouble staying focused. Considering Beverly Donofrio's credentials--a bachelor's degree in English from Wesleyan University and a master of fine arts in creative writing--her quality of writing is very poor. Her quality of writing is more like someone who has only a highschool education, if even that. And not to go off topic, but since Donofrio has a master of fine arts in creative writing from a top notch school like Columbia U, then why doesn't she write about something else besides her getting pregnant in highschool and how that has changed her life? I mean, after all, the MFA is in creative writing, meaning she should be more creative rather than just write autobiographies all the time. She has only wrote 2 books--Riding in Cars With Boys, and Looking For Mary, both about her getting pregnant at a young age. If you liked the movie, just leave it at that. Don't bother reading the book unless you enjoy getting disappointed. And if you're interested in a novel or autobiography about teen pregnancy, then go to the local library. Don't get this one. There's other novels covering the same subject that are far superior to this one.
I didn't like it. This book goes into the hearts and minds of the ancient Greeks led by Odysseus and Achilles, who are guided by their gods. The Trojan War is brewing for the Greeks and thoughts of slaughtering their enemy, The Trojans are very strong. Can the Trojans survive? Will they all live to tell the tale of the Trojan War or will they all be killed?  On both sides, it's life or death on their minds. Have you ever heard of the Trojan horse and the victory for Odysseus? This book includes the story of Odysseus and why his son set out to find his father. The journey of the ancient Greeks to the Trojan homeland is included. Will they return or will they lie in the blood stained desert of the Trojan homeland? The book also includes Odysseusis treacherous journey home past a six headed serpent and right across an evil king's door step. Will he survive?Personally I didn't like the book at all. The way it was written it didn't really pull the reader in very well and the battle sequences are O.K. but not the best. Personally I don't really enjoy some types of myths and legends. I think if you are just about to branch out and read Greek myths you shouldn't read this book first because it really turns you off to Greek myths in general, so don't think all Greek myth's are like this.
disappointed... This book was suggested to me by a dear friend. Though, the concept of servant leadership is strong, I am sure I don't want to read this book again to understand it..
HORRIBLE!. this book did not define any good portrayal of anything. it is severley overpriced for a paperback and ran me about $30.00!!!! THAT IS REDICULOUS.  I WANT A REFUND!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! THIS BOOK IS A F
Too theoratical. I agreed with Pareto there. Like him, I bought this book because of the review, but I was disappointed with the content of the book. This book might be good for purely academic purposes, i.e. regarding to Brownian motion used to modelling cash flows. Not all of the material are practical for MBA students. Some of the examples and numbers are not well-explained and difficult to grasp what the author was trying to show. For the same price with much more material and case studies, "Applied Mergers & Acquisitions" is a better book if you want to gain more practical insights in this area
This book has a special place in my heart. This is one of those rare treats in the literary world that grab your attention, keep you enthralled, and refuse to let you stop reading.  I read this book and literally did not sleep one night because I was too busy trying to finish the book.  But what makes this book so rare is not because of how good it is, but it's because how good everything is until the very end.  That's right, the incredible cop-out of an ending made me mad enough to hate the entire novel.  This is "deus ex machina" in its finest form.  This is unexcusable in my opinion.  I just don't get it.  I just don't understand how one can (seemingly) work so hard on a work of fiction only to screw everyone in the final pages.  I gave it two stars (as opposed to one) for fooling everyone into reading through this book.  This is by far and away my most dissappointing reading ever
Even if I didn't know this book was a farce... it would be a very irritating and unbelieveable read.  I read this book after knowing it is mostly fiction to see what all the hype was about.  The writing style of this book is annoying and difficult to read.  I ended up skipping over much of the content because it was repeated over and over.  I know this is supposed to be for emphasis, but I just found it indulgent.  The lack of correct punctuation was distracting, too.  Had I read this when the book first came out, before everyone knew he lied, I would have found it hard to believe that most everyone in the book relapsed but he was completely fine without the help of AA.  Although I have not attended AA or any similar support groups, I feel that this book sends a poor message to people with addictions, that they are perfectly capable to handle their recovery on their own, which in most cases I am sure they are not.  I found the other characters in the book to be much more interesting than James Frey, and I can't say that I felt any amount of sympathy or connection to him as a character.  Maybe that is what he wanted since he supposedly feels so horrible about himself....but I am sure that now he has made a pretty penny pimping a fake story he isn't feeling so badly anymore
Sad reality of the cultural revolution. Fast, easy page-turner (I read it in one day) that gives interesting insight into what it may have been like growing up during the Cultural Revolution. Although it is insightful and terribly sad at times, it was way too underdeveloped and never reached its full potential. I wish the writer had gone much more in depth with the charachters and their anguish, love, fear,lives,passions and ambitions.This was the first book I have read by this author and am curious about her other novels, only because of her positive reviews. However, this book wasn't a "must-read" at all- I would recommend it only if you have an interest in Maoist China and the Cultural Revolution, or a few spare hours to read an entire book.
Shallow roots. Based upon other positive reviews I had high hopes for this book being informative, but it bases its data more on speculation than on fact.  When this book was first written at the time of the "revolution" (in 1979), the author wrote that he had heard that Israeli soldiers were part of the Shah's defense forces in attacks against anti-Shah rioters.  But twenty years later by the time of this 2001 re-publication, the author had not been able to ascertain that Israeli units had indeed been part of the Shah's defense forces -- speculation on rumor, but no determinable fact, although the anti-Shah forces had twenty years to comb through Iranian documents.  As the author presents a thin-bone background to the theology of Shi'ism, a reader is left powerfully hungry in looking for some 'meatiness' to the author's explanations.  Although this book is based upon four lectures that the author gave shortly after the 1979 revolution, the author rambles about in trying to make some coherent story. The author explains that the Shiite are split between two schools of thought, the Usuli and the Akhbaris, as to whether or not modern Shiites can "engage in independent reasoning with respect to legal questions" in the absence of the Hidden Imam.  The author examines this issue as it underpins the development of Ayatollah Khomeini's rebellion against the Shah: Khomeini argued that Shiite imams needed to take an active role in fomenting Islamic rebellion against the pro-secular Shah, rather than remaining passive.  The author all too briefly notes one of the imams' complaints against the Shah: that he was taking mosque-controlled lands and selling it to private individuals and thereby curtailing their income from those properties.  The author does not hide his pro-Shiite faith.  In response to one question asked of the author in 1979 as to whether or not he agreed that: "If national boundaries were taken away....the differences between Sunni and Shi'i would disappear in one instant", the author replied back then: "Very definitely."  However, twenty years later, by 2001 the author apparently had had a good dressing down by his Shi'i superiors and had to add a corrective footnote: "the differences themselves are deep-rooted and ultimately irreducible" (pg. 81).  This is not a book to read to learn about Shi'ism.  It is more of a television "talking heads" presentation based from several public lectures; a lot of polemics, but short on fact regarding riot casualties.  It barely rates being worthwhile for reading in understanding how the anti-Shah movement developed.  It is barely worth reading for a background 'feel' as to why religious leaders (imams) should be the only ruling leaders of an Islamic government (mujtahid); the people may vote for only those candidates who have prior approval from the imams and who toe the Shi'i theology.  This isn't a textbook, it is more of a compilation of "off the cuff" extemporaneous remarks in a lecture hall. Okay for a novice just starting to explore this topic, but read it at the library before buying it.
Another MLB authorized rip-off. Another book of pretty pictures from MLB, complete with a sanitized text that mistakes acheivements for moments and re-writes history to sell more t-shirts and other authorized garbage.  The recent spate of MLB books have been particularly embarrassing and this is no better.  If you buy this book you are encouraging MLB to produce more books that seek to re-write the facts of history into a marketble form and that don't respect the intelligence of the audience.  Buy a real book, written by real writers, about a real topic, rather than something sponsored by a credit card company
No Details. This book is a great idea, but is very skimpy with the details.  The interviews consist of two questions (the same for each person) that cover general advice, but nothing specific about what the careers involve.  Some fields don't need this detail (high school education is something most of us are familiar with), but if I want to learn what a policy advisor actually does every day, I'll need to look beyond the "policy" career section of this book.  It was full of advice for success (improve your communication skills, do what you love), but rather short on what tasks you'd actually need to succeed at to make it in a particular career
MEDIOCRE. I read this book, it was okay but the story flashed back to much, and I couldn't folow all of it but I read all of it anyway. I wouldn't recommend it. TOO SLOW MOVING, and BORING because of the flashbacks. The movie was the same way
a fake. if you want to buy this book it's your chioce, but you have to knwo first that the "Sevillian school of edge weapons" is near the bus stop to Kripton...it has NEVER existed. i know what i said becouse ***i've been living in seville more than 12 years...***it's said on the back cover of the book:"in seville, as troughout many parts of spain, one can find training halls whereedge-weapons combats is practiced today as it was 300 years ago"oh, yes...and if you go to central park in new york and look beetwen trees you can find a  native americans'community living as they do 328 years ago...i don't know why loriega decided to create the fantasy about sevillian steel, perhaps he needed an exotic title for his book.if you want to buy this book, it's your money and you can do whattever you want whit it. the book can have interesting techniques but as it's said in spain "te dan gato por liebre" (literally: they give you a cat instead of a rabbit)
Examining a boring life through a high-powered microscope. First, let me state that I have been impressed by all the Canin I have read prior to starting &quot;Blue River.&quot;  The problem with this novel isn't that it follows pattern similar to Canin's other works, most notably &quot;For Kings and Planets,&quot; a far more mature novel, but that the protagonist is very hard to empathize with.  A successful California optimologist, the protagonist spends the too much of the narrative defending his materialism.  When he's not bothering with that, he's repeatly over-describing his less successful brother (After the first few times, I understood that the brother was violent and troubled during high school).  There's a good story here, but it's trapped under a poor, plodding narrative
some people, some other place. I belong to a book club comprised of mostly school teachers and other professional older women.  21 members read this book and not 1! liked it
Biased, outdated, inaccurate, and full of grammatical errors. This book is a big disappointment. Buy this book and you will regret it. First, the writer is biased. Second, the book is outdated. Third, there are MANY things that are inaccurate (short of fiction). Also the book is full of grammatical errors.[...] Whatever privileges they enjoy, they EARNED them through decades of suffering.
Disappointing!. I have read all of the Boscastle series and I was thoroughly disappointed in this book. I loved the other siblings especially Chloe's but this one is dull and uneven. The "orgy" party where Devon and Jocelyn meet isn't the place that they should have been brought together again. I can't fathom how Jocelyn would be at this party when she is an innocent! Jocelyn's brother is "sort of" mentioned but we don't really know him at all nor her father, which could have created more depth to her character and would have given Devon more insight into his relationship.I think it would have been more believeable if Jocelyn met Devon again while he was portraying the highwayman. What was weird is that Jocelyn's father just happened to show up in the tower where they were caught when he wasn't at the party previously. Also, along these lines is that the Boscastle siblings just appear out of nowhere. If I missed how they showed up then it just reinforces my opinion that this book is skim worthy not attention worthy.I have learned from reading this author is that the mystery or villian really takes a back seat in her books in a major way. Usually the plot is wrapped up in a blink and you will miss it way. I expected more from this book especially since I loved Devon in the other books in the series. I hope that the Boscastle's continue on with a story on Gabriel or Charlotte but please make their stories believeable.
Very Weak Entry in the Series. Like many others, I'm a big fan of the Ladies No. 1 Detective Agency series, but this is a really poor entry that barely even bothers to go through the motions. First of all, Mma Ramotswe has only one case to deal with, a wealthy woman who wants her four suitors checked out to eliminate any golddiggers. The first two she checks out are interesting enough, a bible-thumper seeking to reform bar girls, and a slick radio DJ. But Smith doesn't even get around to the other two, and wraps up that storyline in a very abrupt way. Another plotline revolves around Mr. J.L.B. Matakoni and a dishonest competitor garage, but this is small potatoes that doesn't really amount to much. A third plotline involves Mr. J.L.B. Matakoni's getting dragooned into a parachute jump to raise money for the orphanage, again, doesn't amount to much. The last major plotline concerns the marriage between Mma Ramotswe and Mr. J.L.B. Matakoni -- or rather, the lack thereof. The resolution to this is completely anti-climatic and doesn't do justice to the event. One might forgive the weak plotting if there was some really juicy character development, but there isn't. Even worse, some major characters almost totally disappear: Mma Makutsi has very little role, and the two orphan children adopted by Mr. J.L.B. Matakoni appear only once or twice. The book's got the same warmth and humor as the rest of the series, but it's all sort of perfunctory. One doesn't get nearly the same feel for the country and people. The overall is like looking forward to a weekend visit with old friends, only to find them totally distracted and distant. Big bummer of a book.
Way, way below standards. This book is the last straw for me.  I'm an ardent fan of JG's since the Clayborne brides.  Heartbreaker and Mercy were quite good and I expected better stuff from then on.  Instead, we get the same predictable setting and prototype characters.  She seems to want to write a book of all the Buchanan brothers.  Very,very disappointing thus far.  Murder List was excruciating and when I thought that things couldn't get worse, she comes up with Slow Burn.  I'd wish she'd just write Noah Clayborne's book and be done with the whole series.  Hopefully, she'd write a great book for Noah Clayborne
waste of time. Buy &quot;How to draw comics the Marvel Way&quot; instead, as Stan Lee and John Buscema cover all the necessary points in a few pages, as opposed to wasting your money on a book like this. Although kudos to this guy for padding a book this size. He must be close with Scott McCloud
naive, simplistic, and general. Mr. Dietrich, whatever his academic credentials, joins the ranks of many a China scholar that so romantasizes China that careful research and balance are rejected.  This book is so hopelessly simplistic and over-generalized  that its almost useless; documentation is almost non-existent, and his  analysis of the events of modern China are reduced to a 6th grade level  with scant detail and almost no evidence.  The &quot;achievements&quot; of  the communists in China are very romanticized and if one wishes to really  understand the last 50 years of China's history, this book is not the way.   Save your money
caution other reviews. I would give this book 2.5, but you can't give half stars. It had to be 2 rather than 3, because I think all the other reviews are written by the writer's mates. The book has some value, but is poorly structure, spends too much time talking about standard screenwriting form and illustrates points inadequately pointing to only a few films to make each point
Miss Julia Getting Senile?. Wow, for a series which started off with a strong independent older female character, Miss Julia has really really let herself go. I knew it would be the 'kiss of death' for Julia to get married, (this time to 'too good to be true' Sam Murdoch), and I'm sad to say I was right. Miss Julia's problems in this book are all in her head. Her silly dithering about her marriage, her jealous obsession over Sam and other women and her silly worrying about whether she is  married or not, are so unlike the practical sensible widow, I have to sigh.I'm sorry to say it, but if Miss Ross is to revitalize the series, she'd need to do something drastic. Such as A: Dump Sam (sorry, never liked the character. Miss Julia needs a bad boy, not a saint), B: do something about the Mr. Pickens situation, C: and get something *real* for Miss Julia to worry about rather than herself. When I saw the title of this book, I thought Miss Julia *might* be getting herself a new hobby. Unfortunately, the title is misleading.Might be worth picking up at the library, but definitely the worst in the series. I was *so* disappointed
I guess it's the thought that counts.... Catherine Crier and indeed every defense attorney and state district attorney in the country had no doubts that Peterson did it.  Given both the evidence and his odd behavoir trying to flee the country and being caught in the process.  But this book is little more then a retold story of something that was already fully documented by those who took the case to court and won.  Thanks, but no Thanks Ms. Crier
Eat Great, Lose Weight (Miniature Edition). I was very disappointed in this book even though it was a miniature.  Some of the pages were blank, having not even been printed.  I figure the book was a total loss of money spent
Terrible. This book starts of interesting however the book goes on and on and on about scenarios involving people over the phone,it rarely mentions person to person or online scams.The book suggested solutions to preventing social engineering attacks is really poor,I enjoyed the book for a few days but its really same old all the way through,many of the stories read like Hack Philes you can find on the net,full of lies and waffle.You will find your self bored of the book,there are plenty of copies of it on e-bay for a reason,buy it for sentiment only and because its black.I can't believe its by Mitnic
Betty's Not What She Used to Be. Time was when the words Betty Crocker actually stood for something good in cookbooks, although the books' recipes, for better or for worse, were always a product of their times.  The very first "Betty Crocker Picture Cook Book" was published in 1950 (still available), revolutionized how cookbooks were produced, and was an enormous best-seller.  The recipes were the result of much thorough testing in the company's kitchens and in homes across America.  This was cooking from scratch with very little reliance on convenience foods in its pages.  This gradually changed as Betty and her books became more and more of a shill for General Mills' products and her name got plastered on one mix after another to the benefit of the company's bottom line, but to the detriment of good cooking.The two all-purpose cookbooks that came out in 1961 and 1969 were both loaded with recipes and wonderful tips/helps, although you could see the beginnings of sacrificing quality for convenience--especially in the 1969 edition--but this was still relatively minor in proportion to the majority of the recipes.  If you have one of these books, treasure and keep it; you'll never see their likes again.The current 10th edition looks good but, like the past several editions, the number of recipes has been drastically reduced.  Gone are the many variations, which are especially missed in baked goods.  It was wonderful having recipes of many cakes that were sized for two people or small families and having different mixing methods to choose from.  Now way too many recipes are of the "dump and stir" method instead of choosing methods that would insure the best results.  Also gone is the very friendly, assuring, conversationial voice of yesteryear.  Yes, there are recipes covering a wider range of ingredients and styles, but they are mostly stripped-down versions.It's obvious that the folks at Betty Crocker now seem to think that no one really cooks anymore and can't be bothered with proper preparation of dishes, which begs the question of why General Mills even bothers to publish these cookbooks anymore.  The "Better Homes and Gardens New Cookbook" is a better bet for those looking for an all-purpose, everyday guide.  It has a better layout, the recipes and ingredients are generally of a higher quality, and there are more recipes and variations than Betty Crocker's had in some time.  Even better, if you care at all about the quality of the food you eat and serve your family, I highly recommend the cookbooks of Cooks' Illustrated/America's Test Kitchen.  Their comparable, general-purpose cookbook is called "The America's Test Kitchen Family Cookbook."  The recipes are tested and reworked--dozens of times, if necessary--to be the best their staff can make them and you get precise directions in preparing them.  It's a shame that Betty Crocker has abdicated her throne and good name, but there's even better stuff out there now.  Go for it!
Words you don't want to see in your copy. I bought "Words That Sell" and the companion book " Phrases That Sell" based on a recommendation from a new letter published by D H Communications. Both of these books were a major disappointment. These words may work on the dumbed-down consumer market lemmings with an affinity for the Pacific coast, but they are not effective for technical marketing literature aimed at an educated clientele. I would change the titles to "If you find any of these phrases or word in your copy, rewrite it." I stop listening and dismiss the possibility of truth or relevancy of the message when these words are present
Look a little deeper. The subject matter of this book is fascinating, no question about it.  I found myself looking beyond the professional-speak to try to get to the heart of the writing, and to understand the treatment methods he uses & discusses.What really turned me off, though, and caused me to stop reading it completely, was when he relates one instance where, in the name of therapy, he leans over 12 inches from the face of one patient (who by the way he treats on a bed, not a traditional therapist's couch), and ask "do  you want to kiss me?".   (Although he is very careful to say "I don't kiss my patients, but I do permit them to express their feelings verbally.)As if the people he is treating are not confused and troubled enough......I am certainly no professional, but that alone seems like it would be cause for a lawsuit at the least, or professional license revocation at the most.That said, there are many other books on the market with a more practical, readable, and sensible approach to the difficult subject of narcissism
It's the one book I couldn't get through. I read Halldor Laxness' Independent People and loved it so  much that I ordered all the out of print books by him I could find-- and The Atom Station,  conveniently in print and available through Amazon Books.   I hated &quot;Station.&quot;   I put it down 1/3 of the way through and have felt no need to pick it up.  This is the first time I can remember doing this in a lifetime of compulsive reading. Laxness experimented with a new style in this one-- demonstrating that experiments sometimes fail.  I found his parody obnoxious,  his politics overwhelming, the characters unengaging, and the tone of the book irritating.   I gave it a &quot;3&quot; because its not pulp-- it's intelligent. Original.  Unusual.  Maybe someone will like it.  He's really a great writer!!
I wish I read the reviews 1st. I normally don't write reviews, but I wish the authors of this book would have put their selves in the shoes of those who wish to improve their gameplay.The strategy's are very limited.  There is nothing on the best approaches to take in the game sequence.  I'm disappointed that nothing is in depth about unit counters. I wish there was a good explanation on the use of hotkeys, and how best to group units. I also wish there was an easy to use chart showing the attributes of the game units.In a way Company Heroes reminds me of the Age Of Empires series but it is far superior.  However the strategy guide book for Age of Empires is far superior to this book, and was the type of game information I was expecting
VB/VBA developers beware. If you are attracted to this title thinking that this will help you how make the jump from coding in VB/VBA for MS Office apps to coding in VB.NET you are in for a rude surprise.  This book is for programmers wanting to leverage their knowledge of C# to develop solutions for MS Office.The book is okay as far as it goes for C# sharp, I guess.  But the failure in the book title and description to make clear what .NET language is being discussed is misleading.
Difficult to read. I had to read this for Book club and HATED IT!The author writes in a dialect that is barely legible and makes the story less important than the dialogue. Yes, we get the point - now... can you write in English so I can understand each sentence the first time I read it?Thank you!
Just not enough...VERY VERY Basic!. I bought this book, hoping it would go farther than getting into the "front door" of DMing.  I kept reading, telling myself, no it is going to go into depth, it is going to hit on some substance, but it never did.It spends too much of its time, focusing on the "dummy" concept.  It repeats itself over and over again, stating "you are the DM, you are the one that runs the game".  Yes I know that, now get on with the book, I kept saying!If you are a totally new DM, then this book will be helpful.  If you have run a game, a couple of times, then you have probably already figured out all of the concepts mentioned here.
help. I have not  recieved either book yet you ask me to write a review for
Phallic Narcissism at it's finest.... Gary Schwartz writes like a classic Phallic Narcissist, a clinical term used to describe people who elicit his type of behavior.Isn't it curious how he espouses over and over again being a "clinical psychologist", when in fact it is a LIE.  Anyone who would lie about their credentials, would lie about their results in research....don't believe the hype....
Brain Dead Main Character Kills Story. This book was simply not up to Baldacci's usual quality.  The story goes all over the place, but doesn't get anywhere until the last 50 pages.  Even after 200, 300, and even 400 pages we are still chasing dead ends and no closer to figuring out where this thing is going.  I don't mind suspense, but you can stay "suspended" only so long until it becomes boredom.The main character is the worst one Baldacci has ever created.  One minute she is crying her eyes out, and puking her guts out totally paralyzed by fear, and the next minute she is tracking down trained bad guys and saving the lives of the inept FBI agents and police.  This is repeated throughout the story.........I would think she had worn out all the emotional crap by the end of the book.  She makes one blunder after another resulting in the deaths of innocent people, but at the same time comes up with brilliant deductions that help her stay one step ahead of the mastermind killers.  By the end of the book I found myself pulling for the sadistic killer to finally finish this stupid [...] off.This is one of those books to keep next to the bed in case you are having trouble sleeping.
Not as good as the other reviewers think. The Spirit of Laws is a passionate and eloquent statement of liberalism. But it is only that: a statement. It is not a defence. Montesquieu rails against despotism and carefully spells out the separation of government powers. But, unlike Locke or Mill, he gives little argument for why liberalism should be accepted. And those few sketchy comments he does give (e.g. despotism is bad even for the despot) are unconvincing
Not Impressive. I have to strongly disagree with the editorial and reader reviews on this essay, even though it was a national bestseller. The book is touted as possibly the most rational description of a descent into morbid, clinical depression and suicidal despair. I didn't find it so. Styron was descriptive but rather than probing and baring the depths of his mind and emotions during his depression, I felt he only hinted at the tip of the iceberg. I didn't find any riveting, palpable tracing of his depression. It was rather moribund for a subject with such potential. There is a detachment throughout that many attribute to Styron's calculating dismantling of his own emotions to throw light into the abyss. I found the detachment sort of hovering over the pond, unwilling to dive in, which robs the reader. Candor, yes in some aspects. Precision, somewhat missing.He quotes Dante "In the middle of the journey of our life, I found myself in a dark wood, for I had lost the right path." Styron was in the melancholia described by Dante but he never succeeds at identifying why or even how he managed to eventually recover.From what most reviewers have said, this book should have been the definitive treatise on deep depression, written by a survivor. It is not that impressive at all
As if by magic!. Daniel Dennett's excellent book Consciousness Explained extracts a very funny cartoon from Scientific American, in which two professors stare at a blackboard showing a formula full of complex algebra. In the middle of the formula appears the sentence, "THEN A MIRACLE OCCURS". One professor points to the statement and says to the other, "I think you should be more explicit here in step two."Roger Penrose isn't just any old boffin: he is the Emeritus Rouse Ball Professor of Mathematics at Oxford University and has been knighted for his services to Science. The Emperor's New Mind is his attempt to crack that perennial philosophical chestnut, the Consciousness/Artificial Intelligence problem. Penrose's view is that Strong AI is simply wrong and that a computer could never replicate (functionally or actually) what we know as "consciousness".Right. Take a deep breath here. For it's a scary thing for a mere mortal (with a decidedly ordinary bachelor's degree in the humanities) to say something like this about the one of the cleverest men on the planet, but I can't see any way around it: In this book Roger Penrose completely, totally, misses the point. Insofar as it's considered an entry on the Consciousness/AI debate, The Emperor's New Mind - all 583 pages of it - is all but worthless.There. I said it.Then again, nearly 500 of those pages don't even purport to be about consciousness, so perhaps all is not lost. Instead, they contain an extremely dense, at times fascinating, but uniformly (and I use the word deliberately) dazzling overview of the more esoteric parts of modern mathematics, physics and cosmology. While Penrose thinks it is necessary background, it isn't - it amounts to an extremely long winded appeal to authority:One is left with the firm impression that the Rouse Ball Professor of Mathematics at Oxford University is a very, very smart chap, and that one really ought to see that what ever he says goes. This is no small irony, given the title of his book. For if anyone is holding himself out as being a tailor purveying a cloth that only the cleverest people can see, it's Roger Penrose.Here's where I think he goes wrong. Firstly, his attempt to undermine the AI position is founded on purely mathematical reasoning. Pure mathematics is a closed logical system. Its truths aren't falsifiable, so by themselves have no explanatory force. Mathematical statements (such as "1+1=2") are necessarily true for all time and all universes so, ipso facto, they can't - by themselves - tell us anything about any particular universe. Yet that is just what Penrose asks them to do. He invokes Gdel's theorem of undecidability, perhaps to counter the argument I have just made, but it isn't convincing - being logically unable to prove all truths in a particular set (even though you know they are true) is very different from being able to falsify them. Without that power, you have no explanatory traction in the outside world.  Penrose's entire attack on Strong AI is based on an unfalsifiable, and therefore non-content carrying, argument.Another error is to assume an algorithm must have been designed for the purpose for which it is used, and must work perfectly to be of any use. Natural selection illustrates that this is simply not the case. An algorithm may have a number of useful unintended by-products, and an algorithm can be extremely useful even when we know it to be completely misconceived at every level: take Newtonian mechanics as a good example. We've known for a century it isn't correct but in most practical circumstances it works fine.Which brings me to my next point: for all the learning Penrose includes on Mandelbrot sets, phase space, entropy and Hawking Radiation, The Emperor's New Mind is conspicuous for what it leaves out: The bibliography contains no reference to Karl Popper nor the general philosophy of science - which might have helped him on the issue of falsifiability - nor crucially to a number of writers who have been very influential on the modern mind/AI question: Daniel Dennett is barely mentioned (Dennett's writing probably represents the "forefront" of the consciousness debate), nor is Richard Dawkins well-referenced, despite having written compellingly (and, being a zoologist, with a great deal more expertise) on the question of algorithms in natural selection. Indeed, Penrose doesn't clearly present the arguments of any particular supporter of strong AI, but rather chooses to generalise loosely as if he is convinced his mathematical deductions can carry the day, and that AI doesn't present a significant challenge. Douglas Hofstadter is given a little space, and John Searle and his largely discredited Chinese Room Experiment a fair space, but other than that the only philosopher Penrose seems to be aware of is Plato.Another thinker Penrose doesn't seem familiar with is William of Occam. Instead of doing some background reading (and applying a little common sense), Penrose has launched a theory which (as he proudly proclaims) takes us to the ends of time and the universe and back to the smallest subatomic particles to explain (in ways he freely admits he doesn't understand) an everyday, prosaic (but still extremely hard to grasp) phenomenon. In its interstellar journey Penrose's theory drifts very close to dualism, and close (but not quite so close, perhaps) to positing (or needing) some sort of God to work. That will give succour in some quarters, but not the ones Penrose has in mind, I suspect.Occam's Razor would require that such untestable and speculative suppositions be rejected unless no other explanation is available. Penrose would protest there are none; Dennett, Dawkins, Hofstadter and their colleagues and adherents (including me) would beg to differ, and point to a lot of literature that Penrose hasn't read. In any case one would think that Penrose's own intuition (which he claims helps him to see truth despite Gdel undecidability!) ought to help him see his theory is, as Jeremy Bentham would say, "nonsense on stilts".Ultimately, when Penrose says "quantum theory explains consciousness" he is really saying no more than "something magic happens!" or even "THEN A MIRACLE OCCURS".Mr Penrose, I think you should be more explicit here in step two.Olly Buxton
Predictable. I read the back cover of this book and immediately knew most of what would happen.  As soon as I met the character who would turn out to be the driver, I knew the rest of the story.  It was extremely easy to figure out and quite disappointing.  The story's decent.  The text flows nicely, and the suspension of disbelief is strong, but where did Nick's originality go?  Where's the sweet and innocent charm of The Notebook, A Walk to Remember, and Nights in Rodanthe?  It seems like he's run out of steam, or didn't care too much about this one.A decent book to read, but don't expect anything spectacular as you would with his earlier work
Love is not a game. This book did not work for me. I believe that natural chemistry and relating to one another are the hallmarks of a mutual and intimate relationship. In this book, the author, rather than helping readers open themselves up to intimacy and be themselves, presents tricks on how to attract the opposite sex. Personally, I'm not looking to 'trick' anyone into going out with me or fall in love. How I open a car door for a woman or how she should or should not reach over to unlock the door for me as I'm walking around after I've opened the car door for her feels like protocol designed to play 'the game' properly. I don't feel that it's a game. It's about being true to ourselves. It's about relating - being best friends. And we are not peacocks - displaying our feathers at such a time and presenting at a certain time. We are empowered with language. I'm more partial to books that explore the similarities between men and women rather than the differences as Gray does. Authors that I recommend are Charlotte Kasl, John Welwood and John Stoltenberg. Good luck!
Disappointing. I had high hopes for this volume- but like many other reviewers, I was dimayed by the author's profound ignorance or economics, and even more profound ignorance of history. He has the British Left's rabid hatred of Maggie Thatcher, and consequently he is blind to the tremendous economic resurgence of Great Britain under her leadership. Similarly, his analysis of fiscal policies under Reagan consists mainly of reciting old charges of "voodoo economics", and so he blames tax cuts for deficits- instead of actually looking at the record, and discovering that US tax receipts actually increased after the '84 tax reform.The remainder of the book consists in large part of assorted bits of nonsense found in government and academia, most of it of little consequence. There are some gems buried in their as well, but the bulk of the book is so taken with the author's personal predjudices and ignorance that I can't recommend it
Reads like a Junior High History Assignment. I am an avid Michael Crichton fan and have read pretty much everything he has written aside from his nonfiction books.  Crichton's writings are often full of action, complexity, character development, as well as a deeper underlying theme or message about society, technology, and human nature.  The Great Train Robbery was either lacking or painfully deficient of every one of these elements.  As I expressed in the title, it is written more as a historical documentation of an event rather than a traditional novel and is frequently interrupted by lengthy explanations of historical perspective.  The Victorian criminal slang used (although brilliantly) to tell the story makes it a slow, and at times, unintelligible read.  I give it two stars because it is obvious that Crichton has written a well thought out, well researched book; I only wish it didn't feel like I was reading his history report
One step above, or below, pulp fiction. Most of these stories were writen for the Saturday Evening Post and later compiled in book form (the copy I have is a [older]1950s paperback, not the current pricey literary collection).  Captain David Grief, called the Son of the Sun for his body's ability to tan perfectly, is a trader, entrepreneur, and adventurere in the south seas.  In each of the eight episodes which comprise the book, he has a less than spectacular adventure which he solves using the combination of brawn and brain.  There's not enough excitement to be true pulp fiction, and the stories are too slow in developing to interest youthful readers, so it begs the question:  who comprises the intended readership?  I read them because they were writen by London, and as such are well crafted, even if boring.  Unlike many of his other works, I won't be reading this one again
Nothing spectacular. Unfortunately, for all the name brand that this book conveys, I think the cover seems to be the most intriguing part.  There are much better ways for book peddling and the fact that a firm such as McKinsey allowed their name on the title of a book for the sake of a few sales, boggles this readers mind.  The subject matter seems to be along the lines of the bull session with all bull and no session.  No actual quantitative analysis is used throughout the book, and if anything more than an encyclopedic definition is learned from this book, I would be astounded.  Save some money and go search online for some basic books on beginning valuation.  By the way, those giving 5 stars either can't read English very well or are shills for McKinsey
Another waste of money and time. This is another example of someone trying to make money by marketing old ideas in a time when the ethanol industry is on the verge of a major contribution to alternative fuels.  The trouble with this book and so many others like it is that the author has not updated the book to keep up with technological advancements in the alternative fuels field.  This book is totally useless in the 21st cenbtury unless maybe you own a 1955 Edsel with a carburetor.
NOT worth reading. In the begining of this book its was adventursum and kept you on the edge of your seat but I started to get board around the middle and had to put it down. The story line of this story was interesting and exciting in a  mysterious sort of way but really isnt worth reading. If I were you I would  skip the reading of this boo
Rather poor attempt at a Boxing top ten list compilation. Some interesting lists mixed in with a lot of either fanboy or totally confusing lists of top fighters, etc. with little actual merit makes this a very hard book to get into
Stay away!. I've never read any of her other work, so it's actually possible that the author of this book is as awesome as all the reviews posted here say. However, I have read this book. And it's not awesome. In fact, it's achingly far from being so--stupid characters, snail-like plot, and a complete lack of insight into anything. I think reading it may have killed brain cells I can't afford to loose.If you're interested in groupie/musician relationships, I suggest getting yourself a copy of Bye Bye Baby: My Tragic Love Affair with the Bay City Rollers
Same Info Is Easily Available Elsewhere (On web). Somewhat useful book in that it pulls together the info that is readily available on the internet, particularly from state government websites
More Bridget Jones than Debra Messing. The book was okay, but I really loved the movie.  There are major differences in the book that completely change the tone.  First of all, she's British and more closely resembles Bridget Jones than her movie counterpart.  You see a lot more of her friends in the novel.Also, she seems thoroghly preoccupied with her weight.  She is not described to look anything like Debra Messing, but rather an overweight "squishy" girl, which is completely fine, but it is not fun to read abotu her obsessing about her weight while downing a box of chocolate cigarettes.The writer is British, I believe, so it has more of the British slang, which at first is a little confusing.  It's not Thackeray, mind you, but don't expect any American tones.Their relationship is more drawn out, which is fun to read.Still, what I remember most was how we envision all the characters (Domonic included) as a little chunky.  They aren't size 0 models, we get it! Now get over it
Excruciating. "The Zahir" started out well, but about 100 pages into the book my interest level dropped.  It, in no way, mentally stimulated me.  I could not read one more page of the main character's self-indulgent and arrogant thoughts and actions.  I guess, if you are the type of person that needs to love the main character in order to read a novel, then this is not your book.  I couldn't stand him and I really hope that the main character isn't a reflection Paul Coelho.  I almost threw this book away, but I instead donated it.  I loved "The Alchemist."
Predictable, slow. Very slow book, very predictable, oddly written (sometimes I had to reread a sentence a few times just because it sounded so odd).
Warning: Magic Decoder Ring Not Included. As a graduate student in history, I was intrigued by Sahlins subject.  However, Sahlins does his best to hide his subject from any reader not in "the club" -- i.e. anyone who does not speak the jargon of a structuralist (or post-structuralist) anthropologist.  Sahlins is a very inaccessible (and is thus, by most rules of writing, a BAD) writer, whose elitist attitude negates any interest I may have had in his subject matter.
Wonderful book. Very thoughtfully presented material.  The responsibility of carrying a firearm is stressed as well as the opportunity to serve those around us
Elegant but Still Empty. Among the most provocative comments on Heaven is a cartoon that appeared in "The New Yorker" years ago. It showed the pearly gates with a small sign in front: "Welcome to Heaven. Population 8."Heaven is what everyone hopes for, the leading underpinning for faith, yet it has never been shown to exist.  Russell's elegant and intelligent book makes a powerful case for the notion that attacks on the concept of heaven (and by extension, religion) are flawed.  With an appreciation for subtle argument and vast historical tradition, he canvasses some of the most important sources of the Heaven myth - for such it remains.This is a rather one-sided book. Whether Marx, Freud, Dawkins or Derrida makes flawed arguments, Russell has still failed to answer the objections of those who see a preview of Hell in the collapse of the World Trade Center. There is little appreciation that Heaven is not just a divine reward but has also been used to justify oppression, cruelty, and indifference with a shrug of pious shoulders and the equivalent of the oft-repeated "There'll be pie in the sky by and by." Heaven was the lure that drew terrorists to die in an act of foul murder. To them, it was a faith-based act that guaranteed admission to Heaven. Who can help but be ambivalent about anything that is claimed to inspire such profoundly different - and morally inconsistent - consequences?  Arid discussions of Aquinas simply fail to deal with these issues.Russell also does not meet the legitimate claims of those who know how easily promises of eternal bliss can be used to crush hopes for justice, fairness and compassion here on Earth  - let alone the notion that we still actually need the Earth. People who can defend global pollution, and fear-mongers of all descriptions, rail that we need to prepare for the Rapture - and let our unique and wonderful planet die. We have Heaven to look forward to, after all.Somehow, the idea of Heaven has been permitted to eclipse the wonders of this Earth, however it came to be, and to obscure the need for morality - as opposed to mere dogmatism - in this life. I think many of the early religious fathers would cringe at the way Heaven has been and is being used to inspire violent fanaticism or indifference to humankind and Earth - arguably God's creation. This is taking Heaven in vain.Russell's book tells us nothing about any real afterlife. There is, after all, nothing to tell.  It is, rather, a useful way of understanding the sometimes beneficent, often ugly, values of those who cannot be happy with life on Earth and want their reward - or revenge - in the alleged hereafter.  Like individual notions of God, notions of Heaven readily become mere extensions of one's own predilections.Far more worthwhile is still the classic and profound work of William James ("The Varieties of Religious Experience"), who was reputed to be too religious for the skeptics but not religious enough for the doubters.For those whose minds are open to the real, physical heavens, Carl Sagan's outstanding new book, published posthumously by his widow and colleague, Ann Druyan, is truly awe-inspiring. She adapted the title for this collection of Sagan's Gifford Lectures from James himself: "The Varieties of Scientific Experience." We can read Sagan's words with new delight, as he offers among the most thoughtful insights I have ever read on the universe and our place in it. The lectures are rendered in Sagan's characteristically lucid, delicious prose, with gorgeous photographs - often in color - of phenomena in the actual heavens.  This is a handsomely-produced book. In it, Sagan gives as much proof as anyone can of how wonderful our planet is and how fortunate we are to be able to enjoy it. If there is a Heaven, Sagan must be there, along with Darwin, Galileo and T.H. Huxley. But enough of "that" Heaven - let's enjoy and preserve the one we have now, while we can.
Not as Good as I Expected. My house was a total loss after a fire. I needed info on home insurance so I got this book. BIG disappointment. No help at all.I then got another book on Amazon titled "Mold, Fire, Flood & Other Topics: Homeowners Insurance Explained." Great book--I recommend it.
No redeeming features. This is a very bad book. It is poorly written, the characters are caricatures in misery, and it is almost impossible to develop any empathy for them except for the older daughter, who suffers in silence after the devastating, and, to her, mysterious, death of her mother. Her father fails in both his calling to ministry and his responsiblities to protect his daughter. He is so distant that he believes what teachers tells him about his child's behavior, which is a perfectly legitimate childhood grief response, rather than the bad behavior that others choose to label her with indifference to her deep pain and confusion. He fails in his responsibilities to his parishoners by not realizing that he himself is mired in grief and needs a break. I couldn't finish this. It is drivel
Worst diet book ever!. Although Roizen and Oz have a great premise here for loosing weight what they have to present gets lost in the presentation.  The book is full of idiotic quips that are redundant, serve no purpose to the book, are a distraction to the overall message of the book and at times were rather degrading.  While the quips are at first funny, 30 pages into the book it gets to be rather tiredsome.  And the diagrams and cartoons in the book didn't add to it at all.  The diagrams belonged more in an elementary school science book than in a book whose target audience is suppose to be adults.  The cartoons, like the quips, just got tiresome.I was inspired to go out and buy this book after seeing the YOU ON A DIET show on TV.  I honestly thought the docs had something useful here.  Unfortunately I was only able to make it half way through this book before having my "fill" of it.  As the diet was in the last part of the book I didn't quite make it that far and at this point I just don't have the stomach to open this book again.As I mentioned before I do believe that Roizen and Oz have a good premise here however I just found this book to be too full of silly foolishness to be taken seriously as a diet book.  I am glad to see that it has worked for others, I just wish these two had presented their material better as I was totally ready to give their ideas a SERIOUS try - unfortunately I just don't think they were serious enough about their ideas for me to try them.I don't recommend this book to any serious dieter.  If you want serious motivation, a common sense plan and someone who will talk to you like the adult you are then I suggest any of Bob Green's books - a very enjoyable read from which I gained enough motivation to lose 50 pounds!!  Having reached a plateau that I am having a difficult time breaking I thought something new and different might be worth a shot.  You On A Diet was definitely not new or different, it was boring and degrading
Outdated don't waste your money. I bought this book for last minute prep for my exam and I foundout it is nothing like the real exam, It doesn't really give you a feel for the real exam,There are other exam preps material out there that gives you more of a feel for the real exam than this book.
The book says all spirituality is imagined!!. The book states that all spirtuality is imagined, and anyone who believes otherwise is a fool. This is very Atheist and offensive. I may have been better off buying another book
Done With Dean. I have listened to a bunch of Dean Koontz books. While listening to the second one I saw so many similarities, which really turned me off. And this flaw continued which each book I listen to, which caused me to be reluctant to buy this book. However, most of the stories were pretty good so I stuck with him.  This is not the case with this book.  "Cold Fire" is absolutely horrible.  I so regret purchasing this book.  It is so bad that I have decided to swear off Dean for looooooooong while.Just on a side note, "The Bad Place" is the first DK book I read and it was very entertaining.
Boring. A serious snooze fest.  Of course, if you are a huge Kim Newman fan, you'll be pleased; literally every other story in the book is one.  If you must read this book, check it out from the library; at least that way you won't be wasting your money
Very Disappointing. This book was very disappointing.  It was written in a stream of consciousness style with bizarre attempts to integrate modern analogies and to compare David to modern figures from unrelated fields.  I had the feeling that it was written in one weekend without the scholarly research for which I would have hoped
Boorrrrrriiiiinng. I'm a Grisham fan but this one caught me snoozing. The story was predictable. The characters were ones I feel like are in my hometown which made it quite sad. I kept waiting for it to get better...and it didn't. I skipped entire sections (the ones with the radio broadcast) because I was so horribly bored. I read ahead and didn't feel like I missed a thing! Ah, jocks turn into typical people. Jocks mess with girl...jocks lose girl...old-jocks don't get girl. It's all be done before...in my hometown.I know that authors need to veer away from their typical genres; Grisham did it wonderfully with Skipping Christmas. Unfortunately, this one just wasn't reflective of his abilities to draw in the reader. I stick with his courtroom thrillers. Those take my breath away
WORST BOOK EVER. This was the worst darn book I ever read.  I read it last year and never want to read it again.  It was about a person who turned into an owl and called chinese food "food of the gods."  Don't make the mistake of buying or reading this book.  It was terrible.  I hated it.  If you like dumb books, definetly buy this!!!!!!!
Good songs, but book is not very user-friendly. I've been a They Might Be Giants fan for several years and I am about to become a teacher, so I have been perusing many children's books lately and decided to check out Bed Bed Bed.I listened to the book with the CD and the thing that stuck out at me the most about this book was the pacing. "Impossible" is the longest song, but all its lyrics are crammed into two spreads. While listening, I found myself becoming bored looking at those pages so long. At that point, the book just seemed like a decorated lyrics page."Happy Doesn't Have to Have an Ending", though only 3 spreads (including the title page), was much better paced because of its fast tempo."Idlewild"'s three spreads were perfect, since it was a short song with few words.However, "Bed Bed Bed" was a whopping 11 spreads long, even though its time length was just a bit shorter than "Impossible". I know it's the title song and should probably have more emphasis, but in this case, it meant that I had to flip through one line pages so quickly that I didn't even have time to glimpse at the pictures if I wanted to keep up with the song! I would have much rather had more images of the shape-shifting imaginary creatures in "Impossible" than individual pictures of kids doing things like brushing their teeth and sitting around.I got this book thinking that it would potentially make a unique addition for a listening center in my classroom, but if I had such a hard time keeping up with the book, I imagine my students would be even more frustrated.If only a few changes were made, this book would be much better, but for now, if I want a visual representation of They Might Be Giant's kid songs, I'll stick to Here Come the ABC's.
A Dull Psychoanalysis. As an avid fan of Desperate Housewives, I am really not all that impressed with this book.  While some of it was interesting to read, the majority was dull and often annoying at times.  It seems as of the editor of this book was looking to make a quick buck off of America's hottest new series.This book is a collection of essays that picks apart and analyzes certain aspects of the show, all along, diagnosing and dissecting the characters and the motives behind their actions.  It basically recaps what we saw in the episodes and then whoever wrote the essay throws in their opinion and psychoanalyzes the scene/character/episode.  Where it gets annoying is when the editor/author of the essay goes into their own life biography and tries to make themselves feel "important" enough to be compared with the characters on the show.  Half of the essay is an overly-detailed explanation of the author's daily life and then suddenly a quote from the show is thrown in, summarized, and analyzed.Truthfully, I don't understand the purpose of this book.  It's as if a bunch of women got together and threw in their opinions along with their own personal stories and issues.  It's basically boring coffee talk with a bunch of strangers.  Fans of the show will be disappointed.  This isn't worth buying unless you are trying to psychoanalyze the show, and even then it's not quite worth it
Do not waste your time....lousy. This is one of the worst written books I have ever read.I wish I had saved my money and my time.The book is full of superlatives.  Everything is "the best ever experienced" again and again.The characters NEVER become embraceable.  One male character is pathetic while the other is a jerk. The female lead is portrayed as perhaps innocently unaware, but is really just stupid.  Her friend is promiscuous, which is all we ever really get to know of her.The writing is at a level well below that of an adult reader. But, the content could not possibly be meant for a younger reader. Very inappropriate.Not sure who would really like this book.Maybe someone who really likes descriptions of food and does not care about plot, story development, characterization or any other facets of literature.Find yourself something with a little more substance, and I think you'll be much happier.
Contrived, convoluted plot twists with no backbone. Contrived, bloated, disconnected, unrealistic to the extreme. The good Wolfsschanze, the bad Wolfsschanze, the Nachrichtendienst, the Odessa, the Sonnenkinder, the Rache...good god, what does Ludlum do but think up another covert cult when he needs a new plot twist or another shoot-em-up-scene? The motivations of all these various groups are weak and thin and improbable.  Trying to keep it all straight is difficult, made more so by that fact that each is just a thin veneer for a plot twist. After a while you no longer care. For those interested in the general plot, a much better alternative would be Robert Harris's "Fatherland.
Waste of time. People who enjoy this book seem to characterize it as an original work of sci-fi/fantasy and a thought-provoking exploration of insanity, which interests me very much.  However, I found this book to be neither original nor an adequate account of someone's "descent" into or recovery from madness.  The premise is intriguing enough as the novel begins, gradually revealing the story of an amnesiac/schizophrenic patient being admitted to a psych ward, who turns out to be a professor at Cambridge.  Immediately, the reader is thrown into 50 pages or so of stream of conciousness ramblings that were quite frankly difficult to trudge through.  This put a bad taste in my mouth, possibly tainting the rest of the book for me.  The remainder really wasn't terribly interesting; I found Lessing's writing style to be excruciatingly boring and lacking any sort of insight.  Other reviews of this book tend to fall to the extremes of loving it or hating it; I guess that means I hated it.  So maybe I just didn't "get" it...personally, I don't think there was anything to "get".
Real Philosophy or Social choice?!?!. Yes it's true. The book of Sen it`s too much focused on the "theory of social choice" and it never makes an analysis of freedom and rationality by a pure philosophical point of view, but always by the point of view of the "social choice".And it's also true that this kind of analysis is often related to the impossibility theorem of Arrow, as all the social choice theory could be reducted to that theoremI think the title of the book does not say the essence of it,  People philosophically intrested in these two concepts should read something else...
Worth every second, every page. I'm not going to waste your time with a book review that's as long as the book itself, so I'm going to get straight to the point and say I absolutely loved this book. Though I love stories/movies of this genre, I'd never read a Tom Clancy novel before reading Executive Orders. That's about to change. A large portion of this book is about how Jack Ryan learns to become president, which by its nature makes this a very political story. However, it was written so that readers not up-to-speed on political know-how and jargon (like myself) could easily understand and follow along. Basically, you learn about the presidency and its twists and turns just as President Ryan learns, and I think that's what makes this book unbelievably easy to read...despite its 1,300-plus pages. In short, this was one hell of a story that I couldn't put down. I even learned a thing or two. Totally worth the price of admission, five stars
Movie is better than book. This is one of the few instances that I have found in which the movie version of a novel is better than the novel itself.  This is a contrived work through and through, and one can understand why Bertolucci completely changed the ending for the movie.  Moravia here displays his utter sentimentality with an admixture of arm-chair psychology that is truly laughable....and this is probably his best novel
What's the point?. Very little plot, which is boring.The reader should be paid by the page, if not by the word, to read this book!
Too many typos. I'm surprised that the previous review did not comment on the number of typographical errors; as far as I can see there is only one edition. The typos range from the merely distracting, to places where sentences become gibberish. Based on content, I'd give this at least 4 stars, but I found it too difficult to read. It's a nice complement to *Goedel's Proof* by Nagel and Newman--N & N give a much clearer exposition of Goedel's work, but Hintikka brings up a number of points I have not seen elsewhere (warning: many of the points raised can't be fully understood without referring to other works that treat them in more depth, unless you already have a strong background in mathematical foundations and logic)
Not helpful. I returned this book.  It is boring and seems very old fashioned.  More like a textbook than a parent guide which was what I was looking for
The Battle of Gettysburg tension, excitement... boring!!!. When I think of the Civil War I think of excitement and danger. I expect  to read a good rich book about it. Yet this book squeezes all the fun out  of thesubject War. Yes, war is nothing fun yet it may be exciting and  detailed. This book totally lacks all this information. Yet it does tell of  the blood thirsty belligerent Generals that are awaiting battle. I have a  love of books, all throughout my life. I have read many too. I highly don't  recommend this book for pleasure reading. Unless you want to get details  for an essay, forget about it
NOT THE BEST MOUSE BOOK. A MOUSE LOOSES HIS FAMILY MEMBERS & THEN FINDS THEM.  IT'S JUST AN OK BOOK, VERY UNDERSERVING OF ALL THE 5-STAR REVIEWS.  A BETTER MOUSE BOOK WOULD BE- IF YOU GIVE A MOUSE A COOKIE.
Grad student's review. I am a graduate student at ASU.  This book is part of the required course materials, since Montgomery is affiliated with ASU.  The quality of this textbook is what you may find in a mediocre $40 statistics book.  I have not seen statistics dealt with in a more confusing manner.  Explanations are incomplete, graphs meant to illustrate concepts are not labeled, symbols and functions are used without defining them, and there are errors in the examples.  My understanding was that D. Montgomery has been in this field for a long time.  However, basic principles, like including units with the data, are ignored.  I expected by the 6th attempt these problems would have been worked out.  The other reviews do not make sense to me, since my classmates feel a similar frustration with the book
A rare Heinlein travesty. This is the ONLY Heinlein work I don't like and have read only once, and I've read everything he wrote that I could get my hands on for more than thirty years (since I was a teenager). I've literally worn out multiple softcover copies of several of his novels, and starting to do the same in hardcover, especially "I Will Fear No Evil" and "Time Enough for Love." I'm sorry to say, however, Heinlein completely lost me with "Job"- it's not a 'comedy,' it's a travesty
First edition is what you want, not this one. The book is a big disappointment. I picked this book because I had bought the first version few years back and looked for an upgrade. It turns out to be a new book - from content, style, to author. For instance, the 'template tools' chapter is just a recite of the man pages, accompanied with poor examples, and explanation is less than helpful.
waste of money waste of time. Wow, I bought the book thinking it would be a helpful how-to-guide, it was more like a BAD novel of someone who had spent too much time in the deep under belly of New York. Don't waste your money or time on this one it's not one bit helpful. Amazon[.com] sells better books for a successful restaurant, I know I found one and this one was not it
Too good to pass up, and also useful. This book is an enormously easy, fun read.  As a side benefit, it will improve your grasp of the English language.  I liked it so much that I bought an electronic version for my PDA, so I'll always have it handy.  Everyone needs it
Where are the flags? And sound effects?. I remember hearing about this book by the great patriot Sean Hannity sometime in 2001, then it was a mere idea. From that time on, until August 20th 2002, I waited for what I thought would be the greatest book of all time. I remember seeing the cover art and hearing about the title: "Let Freedom Ring" with not just a picture of Sean Hannity on the cover, patriot that he is, but also a flag. I loved it, couldn't be more happy.Well, the day of the book's release, I took a day off work (i've never missed a day of work before in my life), and rushed to get this book. It looked better than I ever imagined.With the flag on the cover and the title of "Let Freedom Ring," I thought, finally, technology has caught up to our patriotism. I expected a book filled with flags, flags with sound effects. Maybe some firework sound effects.Boy was I wrong. I opened the book only to the colors black and white. No red. No blue. No stars and stripes. I quickly turned the pages, looking, searching for flags. I found none, no sound effects either, no fireworks.At that point, I went into a 4 year long depression. I nearly committed suicide at several points. It's only now that I can bring myself to review this man's book, patriot that he is.I say this so you know what you're getting yourself into. There are no flags, no stars and stripes, no fireworks, no sound effects.I have since recovered, but only because of old stars and stripes. I went back to teaching last year, not fully recovered, and my colleagues, knowing how much I love America and the STARS AND STRIPES, suggested I have my class do a research project: find the most patriotic book ever made.The methodoloy was simple: A book made out of flags with flag pictures would score high, a book that was not made out of a flag or flags and had no pictures of flags would score the lowest.We found some very good books and they did cheer me up. The one that was the most patriotic by far was a book called "President Jesus: How Jesus Wrote the Constitution, Freed the Slaves, and Won World War II." Its published by a small church in Texas. I was very proud of my students for finding it. It has brought countless joy to my life. Along with the book, made entirely out of a flag, with flag pictures, and written in blue and red ink, you get a giant flag. I'm not sure of the dimensions, but they had to haul it to my house in a moving truck. I've draped it over my house and it covers it completely. People even have to crawl under the flag to enter the house.Now I often go outside and just gaze at old stars and stripes for hours at a time, smiling.
Just Awful. Instead of a testament to his climbing expeditions, this book might best serve as a testament to what seems to be Jim Wickwire's blatant misogyny and egocentrism.After detailing how he decided his wife should leave college to support him, Wickwire regales us semi-boastfully with anecdotes relating how he expected his wife to be nothing more than a housekeeper, child-rearer, and "sex object" (his words).  After insisting on a large family, and getting offended at a well-meaning priest who gently suggested birth control, Wickwire  (by his own admission) proceeds to by-and-large shirk his duties as a father to all five of his children, supporting them only in the economic sense.We then get to read his thoughts about the innate subordinism of female climbers, and their tendency toward sexual hijinks on the mountains.  The brunt of Wickwire's finger-pointing rests solidly on the shoulders of the female climbers he discusses, until he falls "in love" with Marty Hoey, a talented female climber with the sense, it seems, never to have gotten seriously involved with Wickwire, despite his attempts to the contrary.  Wickwire seems to read much into incidents like feet (separated by different sleeping bags) accidentally touching in a overcrowded tent.  After the reader is forced to endure reading a series of desperate, petulant, and adolescent notes and conversations directed from Wickwire to Hoey, he recounts her death on Everest perfunctorily, for the most part, and in terms of how his wife forgave him for this one-sided indiscretion. All things considered, I'm not sure who should be more outraged: Mary Lou Wickwire, reading her husband's embarassing account of "falling in love" with Hoey (and knowing all her friends and peers will be reading it too), or Marty Hoey herself, to whom Wickwire attributes a number of childish and maudlin love notes, and who is no longer here to defend herself.To be fair, Wickwire may not be the narrow-minded boor he appears to be as when, in 1985, he sadly acknowledges of the inevitable entry of women into the legal profession (one wonders what rock he was living under, or climbing over, not to know that women entered the legal profession long before then).  The book, while also hampered by a ridiculous title, is full of stilted prose and dialogue.  In Wickwire's world, climbers never say things like "We've gotta get down the mountain, fast." Instead, they make proclamations like, "We must descend quickly, or we shall perish upon the mountain." If they were climbing in King Arthur's time, maybe; in this day and age, no one speaks like that.  As a result, the dialogue sounds stilted and fictitious, even if it had a basis in fact.  The prose lingers too long, and clumsily,  on Wickwire's relationships with those around him, even though his relationships seem rather shallow.  Again, this may be the fault of the co-writer or the source, one never knows.I would heartily recommend saving your money and time, and reading a more climbing-related and less self-centered and angsty text
the literary equivalent of candy corn. The success of this book might be chalked up to the old axiom how no one ever went broke underestimating the intelligence of the american people.I was drawn to this book by it's title and central premise.  TOo bad Ben Sherwood can't write worth a lick.I'm not sure which is more upsetting:  how poorly Ben Sherwood writes, or how low our expectations have fallen as readers, given the number of positive reviews this book has received.
Terrible, worst book I've read. This book was terrible, and I would not recommend it for anyone, especially young teens. Although I do understand the author's intentions, the grammar and punctuation were incorrect. Issues such as an eating disorder and incest were present and were never really dealt with or handled properly. Overall, the story was very unrealistic. I had to make myself finish reading it, despite wanting to quit many times. It was not exciting and didn't keep my interest. Not recommended at all
Worthless for Word. If you just want to switch from VB to C# and are looking for a good how to reference this is not the book for you especially as it pertains to Microsoft Word.  There is a solid description and how to for the range object, but that's about it.  Word's Bulleted/Numbered List object, arguably the most convoluted of them all, doesn't even get mentioned and tables are glossed over in barely 2 pages.
Just OK. I bought this book hopeing to get into shape for my wedding, I find it dificult to follow. Yes she does map out a plan but you have to filp back and forth and practilly memorize the book before you go to the gym to get the moves down!
A Disappointment. This attempt to extend a masterpiece of poetic philosophizing on matters a woman ponders at mid-life is a whiney and disappointing series of personal complaints in the self-congratulatory self-pity mode followed by trite  self-help suggestions at the end of each chapter
A Bit Disappointed. I have read several of Nicholas Sparks' books, but this one was different for me.  It was a very very slow start.  I was more than 150 pages into it before I got interested in the plot.  I had even considered quitting reading it at times.  It ended up being an okay story, but nothing that I couldn't have lived without reading.  What I did enjoy is the way Mr. Sparks writes about male characters in the romantic way women wish men really were.  I would suggest another read from Mr. Sparks like "The Notebook" or "The Wedding" if you want a good romantic read.
Betrayal of Trust. I received what looked like a nicely preserved used copy.The book literally fell apart from the binding the first time I read it. It continued to come unglued from the binding each time I attempted to read it.Not a good quality copy.Would not purchase from this supplier agai
Just an Over-rated Mediocre Mystery. At best Dan Brown's Da Vinci Code is just a mediocre modern day mystery with religious conspiracy overtones. The characterization seems like it came straight out of a 70's made for TV movies. If you have read any mysteries before the plot is paper thin, the first time the true villain makes an appearance, it is basically a "well isn't that contrite" moment. But it is a fast EASY reading novel. This book is just fine for lounging on the beach or passing the time on a cross country airline flight.Some people take the conspiracy overtones to being anti-catholic. I think this is just nonsense but if you are sensitive to this sort of thing you might be offended by this book. Althogh, there are some kooks that think this book is about reality, instead of fiction,A much more interesting book, in a similar venue (modern day mystery with religious conspiracy overtones), is Foucault's Pendulum by Umberto Eco. Be forewarned, Eco's novel is a MUCH more challenging read but in the end is a more enjoyable novel. It is analogous to comparing cotton candy (Da Vinci Code) to a 12 course gourmet dinner (Foucault's Pendulum). Both will satisfy hunger, both are a type of food, but the popular one is something which can be consumed casually and in the end leaves you wondering if you should have made an effort to consume something that would have been more fulfilling.
Bad Television Show In Words... If you are a cop or in law enforcement this book might be worth your while.  However, you're better off skipping this one; there are too many other good books out there.  Since when does piecing together interview after interview, quote after quote pass for good writing?  I get the feeling that Schulman spent time as a stenographer.  There are so many people, so many different angles in this book that I don't even think Schulman could keep track of it all
Too simple, bad photos, not Hawking. I'm not a cosmologist, but Stephen Hawking's Universe was so simply written it is essentially condescending.  The language is akin to the level one would read in a newspaper.  Moreover, the pictures are second rate pre-contact lense Hubble knock-offs (despite being published in 1997), and the book has very little to do with Stephen Hawking.  Sure, he wrote the foreward and did some editing, but it lacks the wit and wonder of a Hawking work.  Naming the book after him and putting his picture on the front is misleading.  I AM a chemist, and despite this, Filkin's descriptions of Chemical discoveries left even me guessing because he was attempting to dumb-down ideas that aren't dumb-downable, and didn't include diagrams which would be helpful for anyone trying to understand the concepts (like neutrino capturing or particle acceleration).  If you want to learn some cosmology, read &quot;A Brief History of Time&quot; or &quot;A Short History of the Universe&quot;.  These are simply written but informative works that won't leave you waiting for substance
Whinniest Author EVER. Oh. My. God. If you've ever wanted to read a book written by someone who is ungrateful and whines and thinks they are better than everyone else, this is YOUR BOOK!!!  This book is so long and drawn out and has NO POINT.  The author had absolutely no reason to write this book, other than to vent their ungratefulness on the rest of us. It breaks down like this: Polish family flees to Canada to escape the Nazis. They start out rough but end up doing quite well. WHERE'S THE STORY!?  The "author" goes on and on and on about how boring things are and describes her self-superiority over everyone else with paragraph after paragraph of just boring descriptions.  It's no fun to read.  She had it VERY WELL growing up in Canada - her family was safe and ended up making a good living there - WHAT'S THE PROBLEM!?  The author has an attitude problem - rather than try to make do in her new envrironment, she just whines and whines about it CONSTANTLY. At least her little sister tries to blend in. This one just cries about it and seems to think she can see more or understand more than everyone else around her.  News flash: YA CAN'T.  You are just like everyone else honey.  You should be grateful for all your parents did for you instead of fighting it every step of the way.Don't read this book. It's boring
Frustrated - can't give any star, but your system insist. I have ordered the items twice and still have not received it by now, because your shipping department have problem to provide the correct mailing address to DHL.
On the problem of anti-Catholicism. Professor Jenkins has written with insight and clarity on a number of controversial topics, unfortunately, while this book raises some important points, it is rather tendentious compared to his past works. At one point, he claims that the Clinton Administration's Health Security Initiative failed to make it into law because of the Administration's petty aversion to having the Catholic Church as an ally. This strange assertion will come as news to many, including Theda Skocpol, author of the most comprehensive study on the failure of the Clinton health care proposal. Elsewhere, Professor Jenkins explores the pedigree of anti-Catholic prejudice in America in depth, but he fails to do the same for Vatican hostility to the United States which has a long pedigree of its own. Despite the good feelings towards the Catholic Church in the United States at independence (due in part to French aid against the British) and the disestablishment of Protestant churches, the Vatican regarded the U.S. "as the bastard brat of Jacobinism" (to quote Samuel Eliot Morison) and warned against the heresy of "Americanism". This hostility persisted right up until the papacy of John XXIII. Also, during the 19th century, the Vatican made no bones about its opposition to freedom of religion, freedom of thought, and freedom of conscience. This hostility persisted right up until the Second Vatican Council. Unfortunately, while none of the Vatican II reforms have been formally rescinded during the papacy of John Paul II, they now seem to be as much a dead letter as the splendid list of rights embalmed in the old Soviet constitution.Nevertheless, it is deplorable that Roman Catholics have been and are the object of violent malice in speech or in actions this book indisputably documents. Such treatment deserves condemnation wherever it occurs. It reveals a kind of disregard for others that endangers the most fundamental principles of a healthy society. But the proper reaction to outrages committed against Catholics should not be to claim that all who take a critical view of the church are motivated by prejudice. There is an immense and inordinate effort by the Vatican in some countries (e.g., Poland, Italy, the United States) to manipulate civil-statutes and to have its doctrines written into the secular law. Even when the Vatican's efforts may seriously threaten the lives and well being of a large number of people, (as in attempts to hamstring public health efforts against sexually transmitted disease) its advocates remain undeterred and refuse to consider the magnitude of the risks involved. Although the authoritarian inclination of the Church is not a crime, it is a more or less strong tendency ordered towards clericalism; and thus the inclination itself must be seen as an objective threat to a democratic polity. When the Church seeks to illegitimately extend its power in democratic societies, or when civil legislation is introduced to confer privileges to which no one denomination has any conceivable right, neither the Vatican nor Professor Jenkins should be surprised when other distorted notions and practices gain ground, and irrational and violent reactions increase. Therefore special concern and attention should be directed toward those who have this inclination, lest they be led to believe that the subversion of the U.S. Constitution is a morally acceptable option. It is not.With all this in mind, decent Catholics should ask their Bishops to be especially cautious of any programs that may seek to pressure American law and society to abrogate the rights of any citizens, even while claiming not to do so. A careful examination of the public statements and the activities conservative Catholic pressure groups promote reveals a blatant duplicity by which they attempt to mislead Catholics and the general public alike. For example, they may present the teaching of the Magisterium as if it were the mandatory source for all secular laws. Its specific authority is held to be binding on the entire society. Some of these groups will use the word "democratic" to describe either the organization or its intended actions, yet they do not defend and promote the interests of American society; indeed, they even openly attack it. Those within the Church who argue in this fashion often have close ties with those with similar views outside it. These latter groups are guided by a vision bitterly opposed to American liberty and pluralism. They reflect, even if not entirely consciously, a 'sacral state' ideology that denies the democratic nature of the United States, as well as the rights of every individual. This does not mean that conservative Catholics are not generous and giving of themselves on occasion, but when they engage in seditious activity against fellow citizens, they confirm within themselves a disordered political inclination that is essentially self-indulgent.Jesus promised, "You shall know the truth and the truth shall set you free" (Jn. 8:32). Conservative Catholics (including the hierarchy here and in the Vatican) should have the truth about American society and its secular democratic culture clearly explained to them so they will stop denigrating it so incessantly. After all, without the defeat of Nazism and U.S. opposition to Soviet communism, the young Karol Wojtyla might well have been shot in a secret police cellar instead of going on to become pontiff. There has never been a society in human history that afforded so many--Catholics included--the opportunity to practice their religion so freely as the United States. However, Catholics must be trustworthy custodians of other's freedoms as well as their own. Perhaps Professor Jenkins's next book can take up this challenge
Ridiculous climax. I listened to this on CD in my car...driving around western Virginia.-The author is not a very good reader...her rhythm/intonation is off...but I didn't mind the flubs at all. It's nice to have a reader that sounds like a real person. And by having her read it, the we avoid the distraction of having the technical terms being pronounced incorrectly. (Although I'm not used to hearing "hooves" rhyming with "moves".)-It's a matter of taste, but talking animals (or babies, for that matter) have no appeal whatsoever for me. Ugh! And if they did talk, no horse that I've ever ridden would have said, "Are you all right?" when I fell off. I believe they'd say, "Aaaaaaaaah...at last. Hey, there's some grass!"-Being a woman of a certain age, I liked the Sister character, (although I don't believe she still had her figure at 72). But the denouement---and Sister's actions in it---was utterly improbable and illogical. Gimme a break
And the point was...?. I was excited to read the book because it talked about even how unattractive or intelligent women can be seductresses.  However, all the author talked about was how the various artists, intellectuals, and adventurers used sex to get what they wanted from men.  Basically, the author reduces women to physical beings and tries to justify this treatment by comparing the women in her book to the Sumerian goddess, Inanna.  There was no everlasting love for these women, a myth if there ever was one.  And then Prioleau claims that if women reclaim their sexual selves, they will gain the everlasting love that has been eluding them.  Essentially, the book is BS and I wouldn't give this book to anyone.  I would actually advise friends and family members to avoid it at all costs.  It just perpetuates the image of women as sexual creatures to be used by men in exchange for power, money, fame, and security.
Horrible. If you MUST read this book, get it at the library. Don't waste your hard earned cash on this boring "To Be Continued" rag. I cared absolutely nothing about the characters. The attacks on the USA, while interesting and plausible were never resolved. When the ending mercifully came you could not imagine the look on my face.. Absolutely dumbfounded that Weber would end it that way.. At least now I know never to take a flyer on him again..
Not worth the effort. I found the book disappointing in that it depends on the interpretation of experience being a legitimate means of proving the existence of a deity.  I don't need this book for that.  Also the christological bent of this author is offputting, giving the sense that he's not able to step back far enough to sense whether his views are in truth as objective as he pretends them to be, or as I sense them to be, subjective wishful thinking
A botched extension of a great short novel. Having read some of Gregory Benford's work, I was greatly disapointed by &quot;Beyond the Fall Of Night.&quot; His attempt to spin an addition on Clarke's short novel was a blunder. It's astonishing that he didn't pick up on an essential point of Clarke's original story, and proceeded to write himself into the ground, like an aircraft with no Glide Path. More surprising was that Clarke allowed this to be published. I wondered if he even reviewed works like this
Rubbish. First let me say I am a beleiver in the UFO phenomenon. However, the special on saw on TLC absolutely proved to me the Phoenix lights were flares.   But, I guess people will beleive almost anything, if it make their theory correct.
How about a zero star rating!. Very disappointing and BORing! NO likeable characters, VERY uninteresting story.  Could/Would not finish--too many "better" books waiting
If I could only give it a ZERO. Only 38 pages into this book, I've had to put it down in sheer awe of how utterly inaccurate this book is.From the questions it suggests you ask a prospective pediatrician to the AAP's "neutral" view on circumcision, this book is obviously written in a very biased undertone.Thankfully, I got this from the library. All I have to do is return it and try and forget the bad, bad information it provided.Keep looking
BAD, VERY BAD. This book had potential, but the terrible character developement and choppy flow of the book blew it.  The end leaves you with more questions than the LEFT BEHIND SERIES books do!!
Read like a cookbook. I bought this book as a text book for a college course. I was extremely dissappointed because the style in which Mr. Edwards writes is an excellent example of what a text book should not be.  I wondered if I had bought the clif note version. I felt this book was written like a cookbook.  It left a bad taste in my mouth, and I wanted to throw the recipe away.  I felt that Mr. Edwards book was an excellent example of &quot;easy way out&quot; management.  He limited the examples in the text to only the those he used, and left an impression that all of his decisions were correct. I would like to ask Mr. Edwards if he felt he was successful in running the PG County Fire Dept. using the discussed methods.  I would also ask if he felt the Dept. was in better shape after his tenure as Chief. If you are interested in learning to manage fire service personnel you may want to read this book, because of the limited information on the topic.  But if you set it down after the first ten pages dont be suprised, I have seen toast that wasnt as dry as this book
A narcissist's view of 9/11. In the years since September 11th, 2001 many authors have tried their hands at the 9/11 novel, with all of its delicate subject matter, and thus far they have met with only limited degrees of success: Jonathan Safran Foer, Julia Glass, Wendy Wasserstein, and others have centered novels on the pre- and post-9/11 era, and now Claire Messud takes her turn with "The Emperor's Children," a novel set during the months preceding and immediately following that horrific day. The titular 'emperor' is Murray Thwaite, a prestigious journalist living the quintessential Manhattan lifestyle: fame, money, parties, and the adoration of literati and socialites alike. He has cultivated an image based on truth and integrity, although those charactersitics are notably lacking in his actual person. His 'children' are the people immediately surrounding him, captivated by his presence and hoping to coast on his celebrity with varying degrees of maliciousness. At the novel's onset most of them are suffering from some form of paralysis about their life's direction. First and foremost is Marina, Murray's daughter, who seems hopelessly trapped in a prolonged adolescence -- afraid that if she grows up and tries to make her way in the world she will be unable to live up to her famous father's reputation (the thought of disappointing him is particularly troubling to her). It is easy to forget that Marina is 30 years old because she is quite deliberately written like a high school aged socialite. Then there is Murray's nephew, Frederick "Bootie" Tubb,  who has grown up in awe of his distant uncle and comes to Manhattan after dropping out of college to ask him to be his mentor. Bootie, an intelligent but overly philosophical and idealistic young man, quickly becomes disillusioned with Murray (for who could possibly live up to the lofty expectations that celebrity produces?), and becomes determined to expose his uncle for the charlatan he believes him to be. Complicating things further is Ludovic Seeley, a smarmy Australian businessman who has come to Manhattan to start his own magazine -- and aims to shake up the existing journalistic order by dethroning the reigning king. Ludovic is such an arrogant cliche that all he needs is a mustache to sinisterly twirl to be an outright cartoon. Lastly, there are Marina's best friends: Julius, a gay hanger-on from chilly Michigan eager to make an impression on the New York social scene, and Danielle, who is presumably the humane center for the novel to pivot on, but suffers from such ludicrous Ally McBeal-esque crises in her love life that her credibility is dangerously suspect after the first hundred pages. The characters are uniformly pretentious and are alternately mildly and seriously annoying, but Messud manages to propel her novel forward despite their intrinsic unlikability because, as shallow as they are, they are all multi-layered, complex, believable people. The many threads comprising the narrative are expertly weaved together for some compelling character studies (even if you wouldn't necessarily want to hang out with the lot of them). But that willingness to stick with their stories is, at least for me, predicated on the belief that they will be changed people by the novel's end. They aren't. And while the narrative is expertly crafted, Messud has a penchant for overusing commas in her prose that becomes, increasingly, irritating, as she uses them to stretch out her sentences, and to add separate thoughts, or descriptive elements, and even, occasionally, dialogue, so that they feel like run-ons, like this one right here, this example I've devised for you, but are, for the most part, technically, grammatically sound, even though you may have to re-read the most trying sentences a second time, just to figure out what she is saying, without letting all of her distractions get in the way.Messud does an admirable job building suspense as the chapters go by and September 11th draws near. There is a great degree of foreshadowing to be found, some directly indicating that September will be a month of great change, what with Ludovic's magazine set to launch on the 13th and a wedding to take place, but naturally none of the characters can predict just how fateful the month will prove to be. The sense of impending disaster looms large in "The Emperor's Children," and it is quite unfortunate that the novel loses steam when tragedy actually strikes. Indeed, 9/11 is almost anticlimactic when it occurs, serving merely as a catalyst to wrap up everyone's story lines. It was unbearably annoying to endure the outrageously selfish way that the characters responded to the attacks and the gross loss of life that they witnessed. In the late afternoon of that day, after the towers had fallen and Manhattan's skyline was irrevocably altered forever there wasn't a lot of soul searching going on in the hearts and minds of these characters. All they care about are their own petty problems and how the terrorists ruined their carefully planned calendars (I felt like throwing the book across the room in disgust when Ludovic had the audacity to go on a tirade about how his precious magazine's launch had to be cancelled). I live in the tri-state area, about an hour and a half away from Ground Zero, and the events of that day and the intense mourning that followed will be with me for the rest of my life, and what Messud has critically failed to capture is the way that 9/11 actually brought a grieving city closer together for a brief moment in time, and how for once people put aside their petty complaints to work on the larger issue at hand. I remember crying at work alongside my stunned colleagues and the reassuring hugs we gave each other, the phone calls I made to -- and received from -- people I hadn't even spoken to in months or even years, just to make sure that they were all right. I remember the eagerness with which people helped each other out, whether the need was great or small. This incredible outbreak of brotherly love earned the admiration of the world, but it is conspicuously absent from Messud's telling. One character uses the tragedy for personal gain career-wise, one uses it as an excuse to wallow in self pity (not for anything to do with 9/11, mind you, but for strictly personal reasons) ... I don't want to give too much away by outlining the callous behavior that offended me so much, but in my opinion it was woefully inappropriate. I had hoped that tragedy would change the Emperor and his Children for the better, but I was wrong. And it's a shame. Messud is definitely a capable, promising writer -- but this isn't her finest hour
Don't buy another CRC book. This is a *partial* copy of the Mathworld material online at the Wolfram Research web site.http://mathworld.wolfram.com/It makes for a decent mathematical enclopedia, but there are many others around, which should be purchased instead - look on Amazon for reviews.To most reasonable peoples thinking, CRC should not be allowed to make any money on this particular book.The FAQ on the Wolfram Research web site"Q: May I host a mirror site or create a personal mirror?A: No. The material on this site is updated frequently, and so any mirror would rapidly become out-of-date ...."So if a mirror of the web site will soon be out of date, it goes without saying the book will too. Now I am one of those people who like to have hard copies of books, and would generally accept it might not be as up to date as the web. (I own a copy of "The Mathematica Book", despite it is all online for free).But in this case, given what CRC did to Weisstein and Wolfram Research, I would not out of principal buy this book.Also, I would suggest that nobody contributes to the Wolfram Research web site, as CRC get the copyright. I use the material on there, and find it useful, but I would not write something so that CRC can benifit.As someone else said, send Weisstein $5, then buy another book.
Too technical for the layman. I should start this out by saying Howard Bloom is a genuis, and I am a big fan, but that is what makes this review harder for me to write.Everything that made The Lucifer Principle great makes Global Brain not so great. The Lucifer Principle was entertaining and easy to read. It was a rare book, one that dealt with complex ideas, but not in a way that was above the average joe. This book read like a school textbook, and one that you would read in grad school to boot.Another problem was that this book had no clear cut goals, and those it did seemed to similiar to The Lucifer Principle.Stick with the Lucifer Principle and skip this
Waste of time. "The Heart is a Lonely Hunter" is simply a compilation of character sketches loosely strung together.  If you are a student of literary characterization and the methods authors use to bring a character to life, you might enjoy this book. The charcters are indeed animated.  However, if you are searching for a book that combines vivid characters with any sort of plot, this book is not for you.  By the time I was half-way through the book I was seriously wondering when a coherant plot would develop.  One never materialized.  This book does not adhere to the standard beginning-middle-end, protagonist-antagonist-plot-resolution formula by which most novels abide.As I was reading this book as a book club assignment, I trudged through to its completion.  Now all I wish is that I could recapture the hours of life wasted on its pages.
Amusing but completely unreliable. This fat volume about food and cooking, packed with anecdotes and trivia and stories, is amusing but completely unreliable.As a source of information about the history of food, it is useless.  Many of the assertions of fact here are questionable, and none of them are footnoted so you can check them out. The author seems to have taken snippets from here and there (mostly, apparently, from French sources), sorted them thematically, and uncritically assembled them into a continuous text.  No doubt a large proportion of the assertions here are true, but there is no way of telling the difference between the true ones and the others!What's more, the translation is poor.  Not only are some gallicisms rendered word-for-word (and so only intelligible if you translate them back into French), but there are no translator's notes for topical references.I cannot recommend this book for anyone seriously interested in the history of food
Trite and banal. I wonder how long it will be before Frost's literary stock is devalued as much as it deserves to be. These are trite and banal poems that do not ring true or sincere. Frost seems distant from both his poems and the reader. What he has to say is obvious and unoriginal. How he says it is on the level of a hallmark greeting card at its best; at its worst, it is no better than a limerick. Posthumous revelations about his horrific cruelty to others and his shrewd creation/manipulation of his celebrity image as the New England farmer-poet only confirm that there was something seriously wrong with this man and his poems that an earlier generation missed. How earlier generations could find genius in such obvious observations is astounding.Bad poetry from a twisted man
Only read half of it. I picked this book up at my public library because I had put it on my reading list a while back when I saw that the President(!) of the United States George Bush read it while he was on vacation too.I went to my local cofee place and got a MEDIUM regular cofee flavored cofee but in a LARGE cup (so theres room for plenty of milk which I like and also you only get charged for a medium even though its in a large).  Anyway I am reading this book and it seems okay but then this guy with a laptop bumps into my chair where I have rested my cofee which is not at all my fault because thats why the chair has a little ledge there.  So then this guy says he is sorry but that doesnt exactly unspil my cofee if you catch my meaning.  And he offers to pay for a new cofee but it doesnt really matter its the principle of the thing.Anyway then he leaves and I notice my copy of the book has cofee spilled on it not just my pants as I thought previously.  So I'm not about to read a book with cofee stains all over it so I take it back to the library.Now here I have to point out that I had a little incident a couple weeks back with the librarian and long story short they lost a book about a fireman that I returned and made me pay for it but not without a fight.  Well you better believe that same librarian who yelled at me is watching me now whenever I go in there and she sees that cofee stain right off when I turn the book in.  I explain that its still perfectly good and you can still read it and it wasnt even my fault and maybe they should get the $8.50 from the cofee house they made the cofee not me.But you can guess how this ended up.  I am down another $8 dollars and change (I paid the .50 cents in pennies I got from the place I keep pennies in the car which got me a cross look since I counted them out one by one but it was worth it).  And I never finished the book since it was ruined.But! I liked the parts I read "okay" and if the President likes it I guess it gets FOUR STARS only I made it TWO STARS because I only read half.  Maybe I will read the second half later if that librarian retires and then I will come back and give this book it's missing TWO STARS if it ends well.Lesson learned is life is not always fair but you "keep on keepin on" like they say
Painfully boring. Last week, I happened to come across this book in the library. As I had recently bought "Writing a Book that Makes a Difference" and "Writing Creative Nonfiction: Instruction and Insights from Teachers of the Associated Writing Programs" by the same author, I thought it would be good to read this book to get a feel of what's in store when I finally get down to reading my own books.Gosh! I hope the other two books are better than this one. I tried hard to read this book, but I had to give up finally. Call me a philistine, but I just could not "get into it" (I'm at a loss with words to describe how this book simply could not grip my attention).
Crimes of Omission. Disappointingly, this uneven collection focuses on relatively marginal writers (e.g, Minette Walters instead of Elizabeth Peters), and has odd emphases.  Does the reader really care in each essay about the religious convictions, real or speculated upon, of every single author?  Charlotte Macleod is noted only as a biographer, and other ignored authors are Sharyn McCrumb, Mary Stewart, Jane Haddam, Dell Shannon...oh, the list is endless
keep your money. This book was not enlighting, alot of the information was out date. The phone numbers to the locations were disconected etc
Only for diehard Charlotte Bronte Fans. Although the spark of creativity is there, it still takes some time to appreciated this novel after reading Janes Eyre.  The main character Crimsworth seems to be arrogance, aristocratic, and audacious.  This could be Bronte's first take on a male perspective, but is that what she considered the male psyche to be as she portrays on her other novels' male characters.  All in all the novel has some worth, but needs getting used to
Overrated. I have read both of Hyland's novel and I find her to be completely overrated.  She uses the same voice for the main protagonists in both books: one is a sixteen year old girl and the other is an eleven year old boy. The fact that their voices are indistinguishable points to her weakness as a writer. At least this book had a plot, unlike her last one. Hyland is constantly touted as a writer to watch, but I really can't see what all the fuss is about
cool idea but not a good book-in fact bad book. When i bought this book it had a lot of good reviews but it was nothing like what i expected.  The main charaters at first are good but they develop into wining and annoying people always complaining.  the book has absolutley no action done by the main charaters, no sword fights or any action at all, all the main charaters do is run away and complain about having to run. I give this book 1 star because the plot had could have become a good book but the charaters are nothing like what you would expect after reading Jordan, Goodkind, Brooks, Le Guin, Rowling, R.R. Martin, Nix, Herbert, Tolkein, and all the other fantasy authors i've read.  I hate to tell authors that their book was bad because i know they worked on them extremely hard but i will never read anything else written by this author Ian Irvine.-read something else
Everything that rises must fall. Flannery O'Connor's novel is a blending together of nine short stories, all independent of one another working together to achieve a common goal.  In my opinion, if I have read 155 books in my life, this book does not make the top 150.  No single story was very appealing, making it nine slow starts and nine mediocre finishes.  To give a more objective view of the book, it was written in a third person omniscient point of view.  O'Connor takes a somewhat cynical approach toward each of her characters.  In their descriptions, the flaws of each character are pointed out rather than the virtues.  These are some of the more obvious styles that O'Connor uses.  In the stories, various devices are used.  Among these are flashback, imagery, and hyperbole.  Each of these individually contributes to the overall story.  Without these devices, the point O'Connor was trying to make would not be as solid.  The overall theme in the book seen throughout the stories is a need for personal change.  Each protagonist goes through a series of events and detailed descriptions of what is wrong with everyone else, only to point the finger at themselves at the end.  The moral of this is that rather than trying to pin our problems on others, maybe we should take responsibilities for our own flaws.  If from what I have said you still wish to read the book, by all means, go ahead.  Many people have liked this book, but I am quite convinced, it is not my style
Mind-numbing garbage. I've read all sorts of books throughout my educational career...from James Joyce to dry sociological texts. I've read books so dull I could feel them sapping my life energy.Never before, though, have I had to suffer through a book as mind-numbingly awful as 'Member of the Wedding.'Mere words cannot communicate how bad this book really is. It follows the pathetic, worthless existence of Frankie, the most unlikeable, irritating, sorry excuse for a human being ever to disgrace a piece of literature.This book reads like a bad Linkin Park video, and consists largely  of Frankie whining about wanting to belong, and wanting to travel with her older brother, who is about to get married. The ONLY thing I can say for this book is that it is relatively well-written...obviously, Carson McCullers was a good writer. But Thomas Harris wrote 'Silence of the Lambs' and the he wrote 'Hannibal.' 'Hannibal' is a god-awful book, and it STILL doesn't approach the level of putridity reached by this claptrap.Of course, many reviewers would have you believe that this book is about the awkwardness/isolation/loneliness of acolescence. Bull. I was an awkward/isolated/lonely teen, and I did strange things, but Frankie's actions are downright bizarre, inexplicable, and only serve to make you loathe her further.For absolutely no reason, the author kills off a couple characters at the end, just to make sure that if you weren't suicidally depressed by the book by that point, you sure wouldn't have a reason to live after finishing the whole book.Like I said, think bad Linkin Park song: garish, whiney, needlessly depressing, and completely pointless. There is no message here except that there is no hope, no moral except that life is empty, pointless, isolated, and lonely. I'm a big fan of literature/music/art that emphasizes such themes as isoltation and abandonment...and thus, I tend to enjoy such works even if they're pretty lousy.This, however, was the bottom of the barrel in cheap, exploitative, pathetic, useless literature. If you want to read something that deals with isolation/abandonment/loneliness, read Eugene O'Neill's 'The Iceman Cometh' 'Long Day's Journey into Night' or 'The Hairy Ape' I promise you will find all much more well written and moving than this garbage.In conclusion, when I finished reading this vile book, I hated the main character, I hated the human race, I hated  the author responsible for my suffering; but most of all, I hated myself, for subjecting myself to this bloated corpse of a novel.Read it on the toilet, or better yet read something GOOD and save this to use as toilet paper. Consider it an appropriate afterthought
Not much useful information. This book is not very useful. Its very simple and real advice is missing. You learn more from prison life by wathing a good prison movie.For example, their only advice against the rapes is that you should fight back hard with all of your strenght. Well no s**t Sherlock?! This whole book is full of this kind of tips
remember this is the "old" version... Having not seen the orginal Rudolph TV show in a very long time I forgot what the story line was... remember that in this version of the story the snowman eats reindeers and apparently elves or anything else that would be upsetting to a child. There are a couple of scary illustrations in this book. My 3 year old was in love with the Rudolph movie but once he saw this book he refused to ever have anything to do with Rudolph again because he said he "didn't like the scary snowman".  Yes, I know it's a classic, but be warned
Completely outdated!!. I purchased this book in October 2003 and, even though I was a total beginner, I quickly realized that it is completely out of date!! DO NOT BUY THIS BOOK TODAY. This book was published in October 2000, and web programming and publishing programs have evolved so much since that there is barely anything relevant in this book anymore. After some further research, I decided that the best way for me to build my website was to learn one of the 'HTML visual editor' programs, and I purchased a recent book on DreamweaverMX which has all I need
OK if  you can't be bothered to search. Although much of the information contained in this book is available through other sources--www.onewedding.co.uk, for example--it is likely to be useful for someone in the beginning stages of planning their wedding and reception.
Poor, Even for a Statistics Book. I found this book to be poorly organized and poorly written.  Within the chapters, the authors jump around between problems, text, definitions, etc.  The text was poorly written and unhelpful from a layman's point of view.  I found the book unhelpful for learning statistics, and wouldn't recommend it
I HATED IT. I JUST DIDN'T LIKE THIS BOOK. I WANTED TO PUT IT DOWN AND NOT PICK IT UP EVER AGAIN, BUT ONCE I START READING A BOOK I HAVE TO FINSH IT. FIRST SHE WAS TRYING TO RUN AWAY FROM HER PAST, THEN I DONT KNOW WHY HER HUSBAND STAYED WITH HER. SHE MADE ME SICK AND I LIKED HER SISTER MORE THAN HER. I WAS KIND OF HOPING THAT HER HUSBAND WOULD HAVE LEFT HER FOR HER SISTER INSTEAD OF STAYING WITH HER. ERIC JEROME DICKEY HAS BEEN SLIPPING IN HIS LAST FEW BOOKS I HOPE THE NEXT TWO COMING OUT THIS YEAR WILL BE BETTER.ASHLEY
Macintosh Users Beware. I would have rated this book zero stars for Mac Users, but I was forced to choose a number ... so I chose 1 star.  This book is totally directed toward Windows users.  If you are a Mac User, check your CD for a Mac User Guide.
This was ok... I know there are many different Jewish beliefs and approaches. I am not Jewish. The author makes an honest &amp; straitforward approach. A decent read
A disappointment. I'm a fan of Koontz but this book was a disappointment. First of all it seems that not much happens. Molly, the main character, goes around worrying about what will happen next and the writer spends way too much time philosophing. It's too cutesy with children and dogs (Koontz, please, the super intelligent dog concept is getting tired). For most of the book it would be a 3 star book, but the ending is too cheesy and religious. What will he write next? A "Left Behind" book
Needs a companion book. While this is a good quick reference guide, I have found that I have needed another book for most things.  This would probably be good for kids as long as parents have another source for more detailed reference
ASK A SILLY QUESTION ... Richard Rothstein is no more qualified to advise on education than the new governor of California  (who is a body-builder).  The  objective of education is economic self-sufficiency.  Getting ahead in life requires connections, not "knowledge."  American blacks are denied connections.  We all  know why and how.  The black-white gap which Rothstein writes about  is not  information but access.Valuable  knowledge is learned on the job, not in school. Teachers do not control access, employers do.  Blacks who are told otherwise are being cheated.Centuries ago schools were for the elite, whose privileged  positiion in life was predestined.  This was not changed by free public schools.  America's political leaders never learned this fundamental lesson.   US Grant  - who in fact  liberated blacks - imagined blacks would quickly join mainstream   America.  KKK put an end to that dream.  Just saying again and again that there is a gap does not  acknowledge the reality.  Ask a bona fide teacher.When black youth knows  schooling will be rewarded, education will command respect.Wallace F. Smith,  Walnut Creek, C
Not My Cup. My stars are generous. I liked this memoir the first time I read it, but upon reading it a second time I could only wonder what I was thinking the first time around. As fellow reader Bruce suggests, Tea's story DOES have merit and, I would add, social importance, but the ways in which she conveys her story--or fails to convey it sometimes--leaves much to be desired.I feel like the real story is still in the walls of Tea's mind, in the walls of the house where she grew up, in the walls of words that she has contructed and called The Chelsea Whistle.But hey, it's her memoir, not mine.In short, Tea's memoir could be about 100 pages shorter! It had really good potential, but it does not leave a lasting impression. I would have liked to see Tea draw out more of the social issues and implications (relating to class, religion, sexuality, etc.) surrounding her coming of age. Instead, at some of the most crucial moments, we get walls--pointless references to what she ate on random days or how she tried to cure a yeast infection. (And trust me, unlike other writers, there was no symbolic value in any of these references.)Nonetheless I credit Tea for being so open and candid with her story. I just expected and hoped for something different, something resonant and socially useful (especially since she calls herself a feminist). Something more.
A Book About Highschool Drama. After reviewing the novel, Teacher: The One Who Made A Difference by Mark Edmunson, I would give it two stars.  This book was about a boy and his high school memeories and how in the end a teacher made a difference on his future.  This book only relates to the teacher every so often, until the last chapter, where finally the author lets us the reader know how his future was affected by the teacher.  Throughout the book I felt like the reading was pointless and had no relation to the title.  I learned more about the football plays than I did about the author being affected by his teacher.  The good thing though, was some of the stories were interesting but at points they were hard to understand.  The author would be explaining one thing and then quickly switch over to another, making the book at some points have no organization.  Also the use of big words seemed sort of ridiculous just because the tone of the book was so casual.  The words were very out of place.  His use of analogies with philosophers and characters in the book was also something that kept my interest.  If it wasnt't for the few funny stories and the intersting analogies I feel I would have tossed this book away a long time ago.
OJ Should Hire Posner. This book is uniformly praised by ignorant people who want to believe the Warren Commission. Posner saw an opportunity to take their money, and he took it. Good for him. I'm sure if there was a sizable market of people wanting to believe OJ was innocent, he'd write that book too, with all sorts of convincing "scientific" evidence. Take a look at Weisberg's Case Open, if you can find it , for documentation of some of Posner's more amusing misrepresentations.
Hated It. I love the Scarpetta books, but I had to force myself to finish this one.  The plot was disjointed, and the use of the English language was atrocious.  I can't believe she published this.  It is absolutely not up to par.  If you're going to waste your time on this book, get it from a library so you don't waste your money as well
Not as Sweet as I'd Hoped~. A Recipe for Bees reminded me a lot of the novel Vinegar Hill. In both stories, a wife is living in a dark, unpleasant home environment. In A Recipe for Bees, Augusta, an older lady, approaching the end of her life, reflects back upon her childhood and her marriage. Her mother dies at a young age, leaving her alone with an unaffectionate father. When she meets Karl and they become married, Augusta moves from one unaffectionate household to another. Living at Karl's father's farm, Augusta is only subject to more withholding of affection and is living a dark and depressing life. The rest of the novel delves into Augusta's search for independence and what she chooses to make of her life. The story takes us down journeys of the ups and downs of marriage, being a misfit in the community, and mother/daughter relationships. The main problem reading it, is that I couldn't find it in me to like the main character, Augusta. I also felt that the story left the reader with a depressed feeling of what marriage is like.  The weaving of the &quot;bee&quot; theme added a nice touch to the story, but if you're looking for a great read with a &quot;bee&quot; them, try The Secret Life of Bees by Sue Monk Kidd. The writing in A Recipe for Bees was good, but I felt the story was lacking something
Wrong wrong wrong. Someone should actually read this book before reviewing it. Like Bill Gates, Popcorn is as wrong as she is right. Visionary? I'll tell you who the visionary is: Ted Nelson, not Faith. Cocooning? It never actually  happened as Popcorn describes it
Posing for high school seniors. I bought this book to try to learn some useful poses for my subjects, and given most other people's ratings, I decided to give it a try.  However, upon opening the book my first thought was, "these all look like high school yearbook photos", which is exacltly what they are.  It seems that that's primarily what type of photography the author does and his book is geared almost exclusively to that market.  His main concern, which he stresses throughout the book, is creating a "saleable picture", and he keeps emphasizing the importance of pleasing mom, since she's usually the one with final say over the pictures.  A better title for this book would have been, "How To Take High School Senior Pictures".Even then, most of the pictures are not very good, both in their original execution and in their print quality for this book. In addition, the poses are unnatural and awkward looking, and the book is filled with typos and grammatical errors.To be fair, the author does suggest some useful basics of things to do and things not to do when posing a subject, but there is really very little useful information here.So, if you're interested in learning how to take pictures that look like a Sears portrait, this may be the book for you.  However, if you really want to learn some useful techniques for posing your subjects in a more natural or more artistic manner, I'd steer clear of this book
There are better guides. While I had high hopes for this guidebook, I found it a bit topical and overgeneral. Nonprofit organizations would do better to invest in a more thorough, professional introductory guide to the topic of fundraising
ONE SIZE FITS ALL DIET. Once again Gary Null "Phd" recycles information into another GN book with his one size fits all vegeterian diet and vits and supplements. Gary Null is probably the only author that carries a Phd and fails to reveal where he got his BA, MA and Phd. A quick reading of Quakwatch.com shows that Gary Null has  "nontraditional" credentials and owns a multi-million dollar supplement company. He also sells everything from magnets to water and air filters.The confusing thing is why someone consuming a nutrient dense diet of organic vegetables, fruit and legumes would need supplements at all. The only reason I could think of is it is a bait and switch technique since most people unable to continue any diet that is restrictive, time consuming and costly give up. So GN conveniently has dozens of vits, supplements, and food replacement products to fill in the gap. I estimate the cost of following GN recommendations in full it would cost about $600 per person a month. To prove my point GN for decades has been against chocolate but recently he has added a GN "healthy" chocolate bar to his portfolio. Gary hooks people in by promising the fountain of youth and eternal life. Interestingly this 60 plus year old finds it necessary to put a old stock photo of himself in his books.
McDonald's - How to Build a McEmpire While Making People McFat. Funny how people always vote a review to be "not helpful" when the reviewer expresses an opinion the voter doesn't like...If you are a mickey d's binger who gets pissed off when people expose the fact that their food is utter garbage (or, if you are a Mc-Exec), you'll automatically hate my review or any others like mine.  But if you're here to really see what someone who hasn't been mc-brainwashed, hopefully this review will help you.This book tells an accurate tale of the solely profit-focused means by which mcdonald's has grown into the fast food empire it is today.  Sure, it's a capitalistic wet dream.  But what this book doesn't cover is how Mickey-D's exloits workers, vales corporate profits over franchise success, and feeds people McGarbage that can't even be called food, all without being honest about its products or practices.I'm sure devoted McEaters and McCapitalists will trounce my 1-star rating & review, but that really just proves my point.Read this book.  But if you care to know the WHOLE story, be sure to also read something presenting another view - such as Fast Food Nation
Disappointment. I am not sure why the author thought he had something to offer on this subject.  There was no original thought or useful lessons on the topic that was promised by the title.  I read this book because it was the subject of an on-line book club for public health leaders but will be much more discriminating in the future regarding the purchase of books that are recommended by this group.
Good book for someone who only likes to read. I buy most programming books with the expectation that there will be some step by step modules geared toward developing some type of application.  I found nothing of the sort in this book.  I found a lot of code to demonstrate what the author was saying.  I felt the whole book - was geared toward the history and explanation of what various programming components were all about.  I am an accomplished ASP Web/Database Developer and was interested in learning how to write activex components.  I thank the author for wasting my money
Iran. This book began to contradict on matter of King of kings Ismail. In one Chapter author wrote that King Ismail was a great King and was the best thing happened to Iran, the following chapter the author illustarted King Ismail as a burtail King of Iran
Anxious Billy-Bully. Infant mentality from O'Reilly, this time in context.We all know who you work for, Billy Boy.  History will tell.  And you know it
Not for complete idiots. I have a Ph.D. in philosophy but could not follow the descriptions in this book of how to use a compass and topo maps in conjunction with a GPS.  I also was as confused after I finished reading the book as before I started about such questions as how to find something in a forest when the satellite connection doesn't work.  On the other hand, the book does give a decent introduction to the sport and general procedures of geocaching
Where are the first 8 stories?. I bought a dog-eared copy of this collection (&quot;Trouble is My Business&quot;) at a book sale for $1.50 a year ago.  The copy I have is thick with 12 stories.  I bought this copy of &quot;Trouble is my Business&quot; to have a better copy, but was disappointed to discover that it had been whittled down to only the final four Marlowe stories.  My question is, what the hell happened to the first 8 and why is Amazon.com still describing this as a collection of 12 when there are merely four?  That's not jake, fellas
The (im)practical approach to DW design. If you work for a large corporation which has millions of $ to spend on DW projects, maybe you should look at this book and even consider some of the ideas that it contains.But if you need to develop a data warehouse using limited resources and within a certain timeframe, your time will better used reading other books, because following the Inmon approach will lead you to an unnecessary complicated and expensive design.I found that the arguments used by Inmon to demonstrate the limits of the dimensional approach are not convincing at all. For example, at page 142 he says "Because there is a different data structure for each data mart, making any data mart into a data warehouse doesn't make sense."Having personally implemented several data warehouses using the "conformed dimensions" approach, I can guarantee that it worked and produced a very elegant and clean data model.
Silly!. Great cover, enticing premise. I couldn't wait to read this book...BUT... Every one-star review before mine lays my feelings out perfectly. Let me add a couple more. Frannie grows up, decides to live with a man and writes home to tell her mother what she's going to do. What does her mother say? That's nice, dear. I trust you to make the right decision. Oh please!!! This is the 19th century after all! Then for good measure let's throw this one into the mix. After the indomitable Una shows understanding and makes decisions that earn her the admiration and accolades of every living person, famous or not, that she comes into contact with...she decides to buy into an oil well to help a friend even though everyone agrees that this is throwing money down the rat hole. An oil well! You must be kidding! Of course, she eventually recoups her money plus a bunch.I could go on and on. I finished every page of this book although I must say I skimmed through the last 100 pages. When I finished and my husband asked how it was, the only way I could think to describe it was SILLY
not for beginners. I had to buy this book for my class. This book doesn't instruct how to input equations. Not enough example answer codes for each problem. Less visual and tedious to follow all words.
Lazy Man's Way to Riches. There is supposed to be a companion Web site that is not available and no contact with the author seems to be available.  Very frustrating.  There is a companion guide that is out of print and is offered used on different Web sites for over $1,000.  It's ridiculous
Much better cookie books out there. I picked this book up at a store and ended up returning it.  Some cute ideas but was disappointed by the many recipes that started with cake mixes.  Tried the witches' broomstick cookie, cute but not a great tasting cookie.  If you really like to bake cookies there are much better books out there
What Is Truth?. The author of this book states that Ellen G. White spiritualized away Christ's second coming. I would like for him to give chapter and verse for that because she was looking for His literal return just like every other Millerite and Seventh-day Adventist. She often refered to it as "the blessed hope". If this author is wrong about that what else is he wrong about? Christ said "Few there be that find it." Study carefully a good KJV Bible and use a good concordance and study history. Read the books of Daniel and Revelation side by side along with everything Christ said about his second coming and prophecy (including false prophets) and you can't go wrong. "Every word of God is pure." With a prayer asking God for understanding He will guide anyone. The Bible explains and defines itself. "Man doth not live by bread alone, but by every word that proceedeth out of the mouth of God."The one star rating I have given is too high but there was no lower rating available.
Something like an enema. I'm going to wait until it gets cold enough to burn this guy's book. "Oblivion," couldn't be a better title, while reading these stories--I couldn't actually bear to finish even one of them-- you feel as if you have entered some circle of Hell, and your punishment is to have to read all this crap. This guy makes me mad, his prose actually bores into your skull, it feels like torture to read and you want to say enough, yes, I will tell you anything you want to hear, but please just shut the blank up
One of the most cliched Lackey books. Up until I moved on to other authors, I had read pretty much everything Mercedes Lackey had written. My opinion is perhaps a bit biased now, since I'm no longer interested in her writing (and cringe somewhat when I read it); however, even back when I really loved what she wrote, this book never worked for me.I'll try to avoid repeating what others have said, so except for the first point this will just focus in on some of what stood out to me. First of all (this one has been mentioned, but I wanted to underline it), I'm not sure how accurate it was as far as Native American beliefs and practices. If someone who is a Native American from the specific people group the main character hailed from would like to comment on this, I would be most interested (let's not get any more "Education of Little Tree" type books out there, shall we?).Next, one of the things that annoyed me was the treatment of sex. Now, this is certainly at least partly based on my feelings towards sex in general as being something meant for marriage only. However, I got annoyed with the way that Jennifer's grandfather felt that sex would solve all of her personal problems (okay, maybe not ALL of them, but still). From my real life observation, if someone is stressed and dealing with all sorts of personal issues, sex isn't going to be anything more than (to paraphrase someone close to me) a bandaid covering up the splinter so you don't have to actually take the splinter out (i.e., a "solution" that lets you avoid the real problem). You might feel better for a little while, but it's not going to fix things. And considering the way things were between her and her former lover, I wasn't convinced that sex would help. Rather, I thought it would confuse things. They had reasons for breaking up, reasons that I didn't feel were fully dealt with. Jumping back into bed with each other wouldn't solve her problems, it would make them that much more painful a few [months, years, or however long it took] down the road when they had to break up again because they hadn't fully figured out whether they should be together or not. This is one of my main issues with Lackey's books; she uses sex far too lightly, without generally looking at some of the consequences that come in real life.Finally, here's my biggest issue with this book (which also ultimately became one of my issues with Lackey's writing in general). In this book she seemingly bends over backwards to be openminded and fair towards people of all races, genders, religions, etc. She in fact states this several times in case the reader didn't get the point; everyone should be accepted, have equal rights, etc. So if this is her belief, why is it that EVERY SINGLE WASP (White Anglo-Saxon Protestant) male is an abusive, heavyhanded, racist, sexist, etc. jerk? (and I'm not 100% sure on this, but I seem to remember that every WASP female was abused, timid, and frightened, although generally wanting to be good) I know that WASP males have caused a lot of damage in the world; however, they aren't the only ones, and there are plenty of them that are great guys (and honestly, at this point in time, pretty much the only people groups out there, at least in any large numbers, are those who at one point in time in history conquered [and frequently did horrific things to] other people groups. WASPs just happened to be the most recent, and most successful worldwide, at doing this). This annoyed me so much that I couldn't appreciate much of the rest of the book.So there you have it. Some aspects of the book were alright, but unfortunately they couldn't outweigh these negative issues for me
Perhaps, maybe, suppose. An entertaining, though frustrating look at the Victorian era. Wilson's habit of using 5 words where 1 will do and never writing an unequivical sentence grows old quickly, and it is hard to keep track of where each chapter is going. Paragraphs and chapters do not segue neatly into one another. While the book does discuss a lot of interesting ideas and people I can't help but think other books on the era must do so as well and in a more pleasing style of writing
Ageless, I think NOT!!!. Tonight I saw Mr. Chopra on television.  I was stunned at seeing a man who hardly looked healthy never mind younger or ageless!!!  Common folks, put two and two together.  Why can't he produce the effects he promises and makes you pay for such empty promises.  My Dr. friend was correct about Chopra finding a way to milk folks for tons of money!The shocking part was the man who carries an air of such lofty spirituality displayed little spirituality on the TV.  He was not only bloated looking but so was his attitude, full of criticism for Western thought, Christianity, America's foreign policy etc.  I am not saying we are perfect or there isn't room for criticism but he was full of criticism with nothing good to say about what is worth acknowleging at the Western culture.  He had to set himself up as the one voice of enlightenment....it sells more books, healing appts, lecturers, etc.I copied a portion of what another reviewer wrote because it shows the level of superiority in attitude and the traversty of such actions upon real dialouge, the kind of arrogance that came across by Chopra on tv tonight. Before finishing want to say,  It's ok to want to make a fortune only don't wear false spirituality to do so. In the early 70's I went to the Marharishi (?) Meditation Center in NY where they charged $200 for the mantra, the same mantra they undoubtedly recycled a billizion times, asking the initiate not to share the secret mantra!  I was so young and naive.  Then there was Baghwan (?) with the fleet of Roll Royces and a hefty bank acct. He had followers hand over the deeds to their homes for the price of enlightenment, of course they did so willing based on what they were made to believe! That guy feed into the human desire of some, to let go and feel it was ok to do whatever they want...endless sex, drugs etc...no judgment. All this done in the name of being more spiritual, enlightened than the rest of us! Chicanery comes in many forms, only in searching for the NEW often people ignore the obvious deception that is right in front of them. End"Having worked with a large number of cancer patients through the years, following their fears and struggles, it seems like an insult to ordinary humble workers to say "Reprogram your quantum mind and get rid of the cancer". If Chopra could show one case of a person who could do this, including himself, I`d be willing to change my view of this as a condescending way to treat suffering humans who need compassion and good palliative care, not easy solutions that give the responsibility to the patient, whereas the doctor stands with no soil of the human factor on his hands. This is a travesty of the Hippocratic ideal, and will strengthen the view of alternative doctors as superficial, money-loving peddlers of false hopes. 1 star rating is inevitable, I hate to say. Luckily, there are many good sources of the same knowledge that Chopra embezzles. (Hope I haven`t been too harsh, I have no wish to attack Chopra, but I wish to strengthen a more substantial approach to the issues of aging, health and dying).
Not Science Fiction. Boring. Couldn't get through it. Robert A. Heinlein, a leading writer of science fiction, wrote "A handy short definition of almost all science fiction might read: realistic speculation about possible future events, based solidly on adequate knowledge of the real world, past and present, and on a thorough understanding of the nature and significance of the scientific method."In Stranger in a Strange Land, we're introduced to a human who has magical powers simply by virtue of being raised on Mars. These powers, as of page 333, are not explained. There is hardly any conflict in story, and the conflicts that are presented are written with little skill or passion. Smith dispatches enemies in the action scenes by making them disappear without effort. During negotiations, Smith's lawyer steamrolls the opposition. Most of the prose is spent on the author's pontification. At this point, I'm cutting my losses and shelving the book. I'm going back to Asimov to read some real SF
This book is out of date. I don't know why Amazon is still pushing the 3rd edition 4 months after the release of the 4th edition, which is much superior!  The 4th edition is available on Amazon as well, but you have to look elsewhere for the large print (Walmart online has it)
Great Book, Bad Edition [Penguin]. This is my favorite book. I've been through three different copies: a now out-of-print Classics Club copy, the Loeb Classics Library copy with the original Latin facing the English text, and this Penguin edition. The Penguin is by far the worst of those three. Among its faults is the fact that it's translated into prose, which makes for an easier read but in the end dumbs down the text and reduces it in beauty; and while the footnotes are sometimes informative, most of them I find insulting to both the reader's and Lucretius's intelligence. Go with the Loeb, or some other edition; chances are it's better than this one
Barron's is Bull. The book is pretty much useless. The one thing that will come in handy is its dictionary. The questions are badly written and confusing, and the answers don't actually vary very much. The reasons given for the answers tend to be little more than saying "The author implies -repeats multiple choice answer-
Find no secrets here. A monster book of 641 pages. Proof that Eco's editor was already dead, or the book killed him. It is filled with lots of esoteric knowledge and history.Be advised that the translator, William Weaver, does not translate the chapter headings, nor the majority of foreign dialogue. Is he assuming that we read French, or would want to?The inclusion of 8 drawings does not advance the story and you wonder why they were included. They are there possibly solely to annoy the reader.Eco makes the reader feel uneducated by using words and terms no one ever heard before, let alone want to use.And the story suddenly becomes the Italian version of John Knowles' "A Separate Peace." And with this transformation: The hunt for "The Plan" or the Templars' Secret," is just a red herring, the story is not about these long dead French knights. As Eco uses 1960-70's LSD induced stream of consciousness writing style for the last 60 pages, he leads his main character to the Zen-Tao-I Ching conclusion that watching his friend be murdered is all for the best.Perhaps Eco should take his own character's advice and "Ma gavte la nata," and take the cork out
Unbiblical and bad writing make for one star. This book is so flawed in every which way, it is hard to know where to begin. First of all, we are living in the end times, and when Jesus comes, that's all she wrote, folks. There's no seven years, no Christians being zapped up, etc. This is our Second Chance on Earth. No tribulation. This book takes figurative visions and tries to apply it literally, and does it poorly. Reading this book made me think that if this was true, then what's the point of trying to be a Christian. Why not just live your life the way you want to, and then when people zap out of thin air, change your life. It's ridiculous and sends the wrong message. Plus, the writing is for second graders with no redeeming characteristics to it. But I really don't think the author's care at this point (seeing how many millions they've made printing lies). My recommendation is to read the bible instead of this series; then you'll get truth and the bible is probably shorter (and much better writing). Man, not even Kirk Cameron could save this train wreck.
Just Okay. I would rate this book as okay.  It doesn't delve deep enough into the subject matter and he tells too many personal stories.Also, he says that evil spirits aren't fallen angels but the souls of the damned or the unsaved dead.  I skipped most of that chapter.Overall I wouldn't recommend this book.  A few parts are good but most of it is boring
Ennobling Ambiguity. Obtuse, ill-concieved, and at times poorly organized, this book was the bane of my undergraduate Medieval EuropeClass... I found it to have little value in understanding the cult of ennobled love in Medieval Europe. Few times did I actually garner new insight about the subject, and to make matters worse, I not only had to write a paper on it, I also was not fortunate enough to purhase it on Amazon.com I bought at my campus bookstore and I ended up paying more for it
Terrible. Having read - and absolutely loved  - Ms. Gilman's hilarious memoir, "Hypocrite in a Pouffy White Dress", I naturally expected this book to be a great read as well.  I was sorely disappointed.  Ms. Gilman's sassy style gets lost in a sea of trite "you-go-girl" cliches.  As the pages turn, Gilman's voice just gets angrier and angrier.  Every other sentence is prefaced with "Yeah, well..."  The writing is terrible, the editing is sloppy...I could go on forever.  Grandmother's quotes were wonderful, but otherwise, this book was difficult to take.  Gilman makes it abundantly clear that only as long as you share her extremely liberal views - this coming from someone who considers herself moderately liberal - can you make it into the Goddess Club.   After the first twenty or so pages it began to irritate me.  This is not a manifesto on how to cultivate some "girl power" and exercise it, but rather an excuse for Ms. Gilman to hop on her soapbox and rant.  I would suggest skipping this shallow read.
A popularity contest for ideas. Shermer's book is an attempt to classify various lines of research into science, nonscience, and `borderlands' science, but he follows no rigorous methodology.  Instead, he subjectively classifies various theories, practices, and lines of research into his three categories, based upon how popular certain theories are among mainstream scientists, and how much the theories, practices, and lines of research appeal to his narrow scientific fundamentalism.There really is no need for this book.  The celebrated philosopher Karl Popper brilliantly solved the problem of the demarcation between science, and philosophy, ideology and nonsense decades ago, and his work has been endorsed by scientists from Einstein to Hawkings. The criterion is testability.  Scientific theories are theories that are capable of being tested by experiment or observation. Our theories can never be proven correct, although a single counter-instance can prove them wrong.One can sum up Popper's famous demarcation between science and non-science by saying that the criterion of the scientific status of a theory is its falsifiability.   Accordingly, theories that are not falsifiable in principle cannot claim to be scientific, and so belong to metaphysics, ideology, or pseudo-science.Popper's criterion of testability provides a clear, logical way of separating science from ideology and philosophy.  Hence, string theory is not science but philosophy, as it currently makes no predictions capable of being tested.  Popper argued that Marxism started out as a scientific theory: it predicted that capitalism would lead to increasing misery among the masses, and then be overthrown by revolution and replaced by socialism; it also predicted that this would occur first in the most technically developed countries.  When the so-called worker's revolution first occurred in then-backward and agrarian Russia, supporters of the theory did not accept this as a refutation: the theory was simply modified so that it became immune to falsification.  In other words, Marxism was transformed into an ideology.The universal property of scientific theories cannot be stressed enough.  A scientific theory cannot be merely speculation about a particular fact or an isolated event, because nothing new and non-trivial can be predicted from such a speculation.  This point has to be stressed, because it has caused a great deal of confusion among philosophers and historians of science.  For example, Shermer writes in the book:"Popper's attempt to solve the problem of demarcation ... between science and nonscience begins to break down in the borderlands of knowledge.  Consider the theory that extraterrestrial intelligent life exists somewhere in the cosmos.  If we find out by making radio contact through the SETI program then the theory will have been proven absolutely ... But how could this theory ever be falsified?"Shermer's mistake is his categorization of the statement `extraterrestrial intelligent life exists somewhere in the cosmos' as a scientific theory.  It is no such thing.  It is merely speculation about a specific fact, from which no non-trivial predictions follow.  (For instance, it does not follow from this that such life would want to contact us, would share our values, would be friendly toward us, and so forth.)  It is no more a scientific theory than the statement `there are white swans somewhere on the lake.'  Such statements about specific factual matters can indeed be confirmed, even proven `beyond all reasonable doubt.'  But this is only because they are not universal statements.  Scientific theories are universal statements about how facts fit together, and from such universal statements follow predictions about specific facts.  So, from the universal statement `all swans are white' follows the prediction that `the next swans we will see on the lake will be white.'  The former is a (simple) scientific theory; the latter a prediction about a specific fact that follows from the theory, and that may used to test the theory.Note that Shermer would have formulated his idea as a scientific theory if he had stated it in a universal, testable form, such as: "life arises quickly wherever there is water and an average temperature above freezing, and given a few billion years, some of this life will become recognizably intelligent."  This is a universal statement that relates specific facts to each other, can be used to make predictions about how much intelligent life exists elsewhere in our galaxy, and can be tested (at least in principle) by sending probes to planets in which conditions for life appear to have been appropriate for a few billion years.  If intelligent life is not found, then the theory is refuted, and must either be abandoned or modified.It is precisely at the "borderlands of science" that Popper's criterion works so well.  Parapsychology for instance, most certainly is a science to the extent that it makes predictions capable of being tested.  But Shermer gives little attention to this field, as it conflicts with his ideology of materialism.Shermer is not a scientist, but an historian.  And as an historian he has no excuse for being woefully ignorant of the history of science.  At one time reports that rocks sometimes fall from the sky (what we know call meteorites) were dismissed by most scientists as superstitious fantasies.  The idea that the continents could drift was ridiculed for decades.  Even X-rays were considered an elaborate hoax.  Those who ignore the lessons of history are doomed to repeat them, and Shermer has simply not learned that popularity of ideas cannot be used as a guide to separate science from nonsense.But Shermer is an intellectual lightweight who is simply out of his league when discussing the philosophy of science.  If you want to read something really magnificent on the subject, I recommend "Replies to my Critics", in The Philosophy of Karl Popper, Part II, edited by Paul Arthur Schilpp.
Lame. I was excited about this book, then i read it at the bookstore. Trust me, you don't want this. It really looks like it was thrown together with no real reverence for the game, the art, the authors, Gygax, etc
Least interesting and helpful book on the subject thus far. I have read many books on MPD/DID, and this one is the least interesting and helpful thus far.  I do not wish to take any personal jabs at the author, however, MPD/DID is obviously not her only disorder.  By the time you get to the end of the book and read about more post-healing "tragedies" and abuse, one gets the feeling that the author thrives on such drama.  When people write autobigraphies, they take the reader into their world. I do not wish to be dragged into this author's world.  It's not about happy endings, but it is about wanting to read truly good books written by truly healthy people who have truly overcome
Hated it!. This is sad for me because I love her other work. And even though that last couple of books aren't as funny as they were in the beginning, they still have a plot and they make sense. I feel cheated by this series and won't be reading anymore of it.I called my friends and told them not to read this. The plot is just too stupid, who is going to cut up a couple of NASCAR's and steal a hauler and seriously what guy doesn't have tools in the trunk of his car, even if they are just for show? Then you have a dead guy in plastic wrap and you argue about what god would want you to do with him?  The Cigar/Fruit stand ladies, are not only annoying, all the "secret" staying over is just ridiculous. The autographing was kind of funny in the 1st book but in this one it was over used and stupid. If you're hiding, you hide. In the opening of the book Barney said no body cheats her, and in the end she's sleeping with Sam who did exactly that.I am tired of media that has women taking back cheaters or worse yet begging for a second chance. Stupid funny isn't for me and a bag of dog poop? Not funny. This book treats us like we are too stupid to care there is nothing but a bunch of slapstick going on, I might as well have watched a 3 stooges episode it would have been more fun.There were a few times I laughed, the NASCAR stuff was interesting but the rest of it had me calling my mom mid book and asking her to shoot me.
Decent class of cover....that's it. Approximately 250 pages of hybridised vacuity build from snippets of information coralled together.  I can best describe this work as almost entirely cliche ridden.  It is further evidence that human computer interaction studies are largely 'solutions' in search of problems.  The chapter on 'mega-creativity' is replete with casual opinion and banal anecdotes.  Likewise chapters on the 'new education' and 'new medicine' are pitched several degrees below what the average Time or News Week reader would expect in content.  Overall this is a poor piece of work in terms of content and I regret having wasted money on it.  At some point in time, I hope that a Shokal equivalent emerges to debunk the self-aggrandising twaddle that typifies most HCI work.
Poorly written. I am very disappointed in this book. After reading only the first couple of chapters, the poor editing and grade school sentence structure becomes exceptionally annoying. By the time the author has described the "branches" or "denominations" of Heathenry, they sound so unpleasant as to actually turn one off to the faith altogether. This, coupled with the rambling tone lead me to feel that this book has no direction and is mostly opinion, disguised as authority. If the author actually lives up to their assertion that they are in fact "clergy", one would assume they could at least write a decent sentence. If you are new to the subject, go google the topic. You'll learn more and the writing is better
No go. My 9 year old son did not like this book.  He said, "you got me a book that says I hate Match, but then the author says that math is great. That makes no sense, Mom!"  He's tried to pick it up a couple of times, but it has not sparked his interest
Too Little Too Late. I was very dissappointed with this book.  First of all the title is a little misleading ... Taking the Leap.  I was more interested in a book that would help me switch from my current job to a career as an artist.  This book is designed more to help the artist just starting out in his/her career (presumably just out of artschool) to set realistic goals, build a body of work, and guide the artist through the business side of the artworld, ie approaching galleries, selling, copyright and other legal stuff etc.For what it actually is, the book is about average.  Clearly written, easy to understand if not on occasion dumbed down.  For example, the section on understanding who the major players are in the artworld includes such catagories as, The Artist: you, The Collector, The Gallery Owner.  Including definitions for these terms seemed more like filler than actual usefull information.Another problem with the book is outdated information.  Mainly where the internet is concerned but also when it comes to the sample resumes and artist statements.The book has it's good points too.  As I said it's well written and easy to understand.  The section on photographing your artwork is a keeper as well as the guide for creating a submission package to send out to galleries.  If you have trouble with setting and keeping realistic goals for yourself this book will help you with that as well.I'd be interested in finding out what's in Lang's new book- Taking the Leap 05 (which unfortunately I wasn't aware of until after I bought this one and at the time of writing this review, it's still yet to be released.)  I don't think I'd invest the money in buying the new addition, but I might breeze through it if I saw it at the book store.
A hoot!. Some of these reviews are great.  Some are hilarious and show just how little each gender understands about the other.  My favorite review is the one that says something like "Women have more to offer than at any other time: they're better educated, they make more money, and they're more fun to be with than ever before!"  I'd love to see the statistical research backing up that last assertion.Anyway, about the book.  Truly, all the content could have been packed into one essay.  The rest is just filler anecdotes that contribute little understanding but for some reason make up the vast majority of these types of books.  Probably because they're really not a whole lot to say on the topic.My own experience runs something along the lines of the book.  I'm in law school and I've noticed that an extremely high number of law school women are very, very pretty yet have lots of trouble getting men interested in them.  Looking around, it's because these women are *extremely masculine.*  They have nice faces and bodies, sure, but to be a lawyer (or other professional) one must be directed, unemotional, focused, hard working, serious, outspoken and aggressive.  These are all traits that testosterone produces!  And it's true, the women in law school are far more like female men than anything else.I'm dating a couple women who have no college degree but who are very feminine and soft and gentle, the complete opposites of law school women.  Most of the guys I know in law school are doing the exact same thing.Therefore I think that these women are having a hard time finding men simply because men see them as other men, not as women!  Several of the women I know in law school are dating or have married rather effeminate men: artists, a whale trainer, etc.  These are not the types of men who are the "Alpha males" of the business world.The more Alpha a male is, the more he wants someone who is his complete opposite: soft, gentle, giving, unassuming, submissive.. a girly girl.  The women mentioned in this book aren't girly girls, they're man-girls.  Who wants that?
Big on marketing, short on details. I have over 30 year of woodworking experience building tables, chests etc. I bought this book as it sounded like everything I ever needed to know about box making. The book was a big disappointment. It has lots of colorful pictures on nice glossy thick paper, but lacks the detailed instructions of how to build a box. Normally the Taunton Press (Fine WoodWorking Magazine) has excellent articles, but this book falls short of giving you the 'know how' to build a box.
Witty but devoid of content. In the midst of life I felt the need to look for a little guidance in the "gentlemanly".  This book delivered very, very little truly helpful information.  I imagine I could have produced a book like this back in the day, with plenty of alcohol on board and witty friends around the keyboard...  It's cleverly written and modestly entertaining, but really not at all what I was looking for.If, however, you do need to know the "gentleman's" take on smoking pot, threesomes, and carrying a flask, this may be your book
TO THE PUBLISHER OF THIS BOOK BELOW. Everyone is entitled to their own opinion concerning what they read. Amazon.com graciously allows these opinions to be viewed online. The joke that concludes the first book is mocking and demeaning and was meant to be such! The only " believing " found in this author's books are of her own theories and write-off explanations. However many aspects that the author uses to examine the parapsychology of the great city of Chicago....her conclusions are only within the closed minded framework of folklore and myth. People who have had paranormal experiences in their lives do not share that view.
The Path to the Dark Side. I don't know how it happened.  Whether he was threatened, bribed, or just accepted a super offer from the dark side.  However it happened, this guy has lost his way.  I love Power vs Force, but I think its probably a good idea to take what this guy says fron now on with the proverbial grain of salt
Too Primitive!. The disigns elements were too rustic for my taste.  I was looking for more of a casual elegence.
Accurate but BORING!. Other than the chapter on the Driods, this book is not worth your time.  Better to read Kip Thorne.  How the author could have taken such interesting subjects and made them some uninteresting is somewhat amazing.   Don't read this
horrible. war books are not my favorite, but even so this book sucked. i will admit when i am wrong about a book but i was not wrong about this 1. from the moment my prof. assigned it, i knew it would be like pulling teeth to finish and it was! this is notttttttttttttttttttttt a classic or anything close to 1. spend ur ten dollars on a pillow cause you are going to need it
Better Has Been Written. I'm going to catch flak for this, if only because looking at others' reviews I realized that this is the lowest the book has gotten.  This is mainly because the people who read it are a self-selected group, and so they like it, unless they're from Montana, in which case they like it but call it too one-dimensional.The major problem with this book is that it takes a single theme and doesn't go anywhere with it.  There is no progression or movement in its somewhat flimsy premise. To quote the opinion of a man I respect: "The book is in bits and pieces--some of these bits and pieces are good, others are just...bits and pieces.  It feels all of her friends told her to write this book, she wrote some bits, showed them around, had somebody read and like them, and then a publisher gave her a check and said 'finish the book'."The insight provided by this book is debatable, given that she approaches the reality of Wyoming with a desire to reshape this in literary form to fit her notions of theme.  There is some good imagery.  There is also some wasted space, some disjointed incompleteness, and a sense that the book, as thin as it is, is itself wasting space by refusing to allow for more complex and varied explorations
Two words - Henry Hazlitt. You can waste your time reading this book, sure. Go ahead. Or, you can pick up Henry Hazlitt's "The Failure of the New Economics: An Analysis of the Keynesian Fallacies" and watch as an infinitely more talented writer debunks and destroys Keynes and his faulty logic. Not only does he translate the thoroughly unreadable Keynes, he shows the reader multiple instances where Keynes simply contradicts himself, yet keeps right on chuggin' (savings = investments; somehow in his General Theory, Keynes manages to both prove and disprove this). He explains in lucid terms that Keynes "General Theory" isn't "General" at all; in fact, it can only be applied correctly in static situations. In most cases it can't account at all for dynamics. Don't waste your time on this piece of socialist garbage
Not helpful - not worth reselling. I just threw this book away.  Not even worth trying to re-sell. Wish there were negative stars for ratings ....I got this book when we decided to give IVF a try and maybe my mistake was getting this book after 1 1/2 years of infertility treatments.  The information in the book was very dated.  Reading through the author's experiences was extremely traumatic for me, but after spending a day upset over 'how bad' the book made the IVF process seem, I realized that a large part of the author's bad experiences came from her having doctors who might have been the best medical doctors ever but who had little compassion for their patients.  And then reading through her incessant whining about how much she hated needles .... Infertility is a medical condition, but no one was forcing her to take shots nor was her life riding on that medicine (unlike many people who have to take shots of life-saving medicines every day).Even her bluntness was annoying sometimes.  Her "sorry, but that's the way it is" writing style might truly reflect her experiences, but my 2 years of infertility treatment experiences have not been like that.  There are many different types of infertility treatments and many different styles of REs/doctors.  You do not have to put up with competent but uncompassionate medical care.
The  Time Machine. Well The Time Machine was an ok book. It could have been better. Wells does a great job at describing the future from his view point. High points in the book were chapters 4 through 9 thats where the Time Traveller goes to the year 802701 and meet carnivorous creatures called Morlocks. One thing I did like about the book is the epilouge after chapter 12 saying that the Time Traveller never came back, it was a great cliffhanger. All in all, The Time Machine is an ok book. I strongly recommend this book to H.G. wells fans
Enron cited often. Some good ideas on driving innovation, but in hindsight, some of the cited companies haven't passed muster if one tracks their long term business performance.  One of my favorite quotes from the book - "At Enron, failure - even of the type that ends up on the front page of The Wall Street Journal - doesn't necessarily sink a career".  Yeah right!  This kind of thinking puts one in jail
We were unable to use in our schools because of the content. We ordered this book on the good reputation of the author, but were very disappointed in the author's portrayal of witches.  We are unable to use this book in our schools
Poorly explained. I have a university maths degree and found the book very obvious and drawn out for the first few chapters. In spite of this I looked forward to what was going to be explained later. Suddenly from a very simple and easy to understand explanation on the EMH he starts to use mathematics in his equations that I had a lot of difficulty following. There was very little or no explanation of how these equations were arrived at and a lot of mathematics and statisics is assumed. This book does not apply the theory in ny meaningful way to the markets let alone the capital markets in my opinion. I found that I took very little away from this book and would not recommend it to anyone who has basic mathematics like myself or is looking for some deeper insight into the markets. I would hate to have Mr Peters as a teacher based on his book
This Book is Obsolete (0 star rating). The book's case studies, code and build files assume that J2EE 1.4 comeswith the PointBase database server.  J2EE 1.4 currently only comes bundled with the Derby database server.  As a result, the book is useless.  Emails to the publisher failed to resolve the problem
Did you all actually read it?. First off, I am an avid reader and love a long challenging read, however, this novel is one of the worst I have ever read! It is long, boring and has absolutely no plot. I purchased it when it first came out without reading any reviews. Although from the looks of most of them here, I personally suspect that many of those who raved, never actually read the book
I don't agree with 5 stars... There is only one reason : Stephen Thornton has spoiled Marion's original masterpiece. If you can get the 2nd edition, which Thornton didn't join yet, just compare it with current one. Except this, I dare to say this book is the best intermediate classical mechanics text book. This was the bible of classical mechanics, but not any more.
My first - and LAST - Kinsey Milhone debacle!. It's tempting to spoil the end of this novel in order to describe how BAD it truly is, but Ms. Grafton has somehow earned a following, and as I've said before, there is something for everyone out there. After all, some people (not a majority) actually voted for George W. Bush, on purpose! I think this level of mystery fluff is for them.Rather than spoil the nutty climax (I have worked in hospitals for years, so I ain't buying it) I will mention that the second paragraph of this schlock novel closes with the words: "...life is one big, savage joke; not funny ha-ha, but cruel like those gags sixth graders have been telling since the world began."I became so distracted thinking about people who were already in sixth grade when the world began (where did they go to kindergarten?) that I almost missed the rest of the chapter
DON'T BUY THIS BOOK. This book is a hastily cobbled together piece of worthless junk.  Written in &quot;bullets&quot; so disorganized as to render the content meaningless, it includes such helpful tips as &quot;Hire a personal trainer or U.S. Marine Corps sergeant to get you going.&quot;  Believe me, your best time management move is to NOT waste any time looking at this book
Rima needs to read Keynes's GT,especially chapter 20. There are just too many errors ,of interpretation,omission and commission,in this book to justify purchasing it.In this review we will concentrate on Rima's(R)handling of the work of J M Keynes.On p.84,R's claim that the Physiocratic concept of hoarding is &quot;surprisingly suggestive&quot; of J M Keynes's idea has no supporting evidence to back it up.On p.133,R claims that Malthus had developed a principle of effective demand,a la Keynes.What Malthus expressed was an uneasy feeling and/or intuition that Ricardo's deductive,analytical system of market self adjustment to a global optimum was overlooking(or assuming away)the possibility of insufficient aggregate spending.Nowhere does Malthus ever systematically present a theoretical counter to Ricardo.What Malthus does is express some reservations in an exchange of postal letters with Ricardo.In chapter 20 of R's book, she attempts to deal with Keynes's theory of effective demand and Keynes's discussion of involuntary unemployment which follows directly from his theory.Keynes worked out the mathematical details in his chapter 20,titled &quot;The Employment Function&quot;.R should have simply reprinted that chapter in her book,replacing her chapter 20 with Keynes's chapter 20.R's Figure 20.1,discussed on pages451-454,directly contradicts Keynes's analysis
Coffee table chicken coop book. I was aware that there were no building plans (based on other reviews), but I wasn't too worried because of I can make materials lists pretty easily from drawings. However, I was surprised that the drawings in this book have incorrect measurements (rather frustrating). This is a coffee table book, and even as that, it's not so exciting. There were really only a few designs that broke away from the square-box chicken coop idea. The best thing about this book is the presentation of the idea of keeping chickens as being an urban middle-class phenomenon. It was good for ideas, but it's not a keeper
SURVIVING ON THE RUMORS OF ITS SORDID REPUTATION. I heard about this book growing up but didn't read it until just recently (a middle-aged adult) and I have to agree with so many other reviewers who feel its popularity largely stems from the time period in which it was written, i.e., it was SO SHOCKING AND DISGUSTING! Such filth! I mean, that's why I heard about the book when I was growing up. But as so many others have already pointed out, it is tame by today's standards. I also have to agree with another reviewer who wrote that the "female protagonist is completely a male fantasy. The book's message is simply that men like women who are able to climax at the same time as their partners without any need for foreplay or other effort on the man's part..." Now, you see, what struck me about Sir Clifford's situation, and Lady Chatterley's, for that matter, is if they really loved each other, his paralysis from the waist down wouldn't have had to put a stop to his supplying her with orgasms; there ARE other things that can be done, yes? In fact, quite possibly Connie would have had an orgasm for the first time! (Ahem, women readers will know what I mean.) But Clifford treated Connie poorly. With or without the lack of sex issue, I think she would have been emotionally open to an affair anyway. Which to me, just goes to show that a man wrote the book...a man totally out of touch with what really makes a woman tick.
Daft. This book is really, really daft, because to date there is only a minute number of mobile phones available on the planet which implement MIDP 2.0. You can't imagine how painful that is, because chances are you won't be able to run Knudsen's code on your device. Not only that, you won't even be able to compile it with your version 1 tools. It's a shame really, it's otherwise a good intro to J2ME with plenty of code and an appendix which serves as a reference. Pity that we'll all have to wait at least for another year to use this book while the mobile device manufacturers get up to speed. I for one am a bitterly disappointed programmer, I can tell you that, and wish I hadn't spend my last bucks on this book
Some textbook!. This is the longest textbook I have in my collection and it is also a bad investment book at that. I know some readers really enjoyed the detailed explanations, but the book was too detailed and wordy for me. Many of the explanations are unnecessary and examples can be simplified to get to the core of the problem/concept and drive at a much stronger intuitive understanding. But this book doesn't do that. It is cluttered with definitions and wordiness that kill the intuition one could get by reading a more concise, straightforward text. A really good book is Investment Science, by David Luenberger. Although his text assumes you have some background in calc/stat/probability theory, the writing, examples, and organization is far superior. You'll actually begin to understand how investment really works, without getting bogged down by the numbers, terminology, and jargon
Action Packed?. The reason I decided to finish this book is because by time I had read to page 400, I figured I might as well keep going. This book is a real drag. The 700 pages are a classic Ludlum example of 'Quantity, not quality.' This book easily could have been 300 pages less.  Most of it is political talk in which Robert tries to keep your attention by adding exclamation points or italics within every sentence.After reading the Bourne series and Matarese Circle, this was way too long. I can't believe other reviewers when they claim this was 'action packed' and a 'page turning thriller'. One review said that the rescue in part one was so exciting they couldn't stand it.I am still waiting for this book to pick up and take me away with all the action that most reviewers have proclaimed, but it's too late for that because I have finished. Not even enough substance to keep my interest. I just wish I had it in me to take a book and stop reading it after I've gotten 2/3 of the way thru. The reviews that raved about this Kendrick guy being the next Bourne and that this book could have been 3 exciting books... One, not even close. Two, sorry but one drag is enough. One star because it has some similarities to today's war on terror in America and one star to me for somehow surviving this one= 2 stars
Not at all what I expected. I thought this book would be more technical, with more details about glass itself. It's really just about the Renaissance and Greek revival. I can remember reading many pages without the word 'glass' even being mentioned! If I wanted to discuss the origins of science, I would have read a book titled that, not a book called "Glass". I expected the book to actually be about glass! I'm actually dreading finishing this book
A sloppy critique, One of Zizek's Worst. Zizek's failed encounter with Deleuze will prove to haunt him since Deleuze and Guattari provded a framework to get outside of Lacan which Zizek still remains embedded in completely.  I should say from the start, Zizek is absolutely brilliant, but his slip ups are all too numerous and his hasty publication of books have created an unendurable repetition of content. There are content problems with the book and style problems, as many of the previous reviewers have truthfully attested to.  But even the 100 or so pages on Deleuze are wrought with references to movies and books (and sometimes the occasional refreshing joke), but all in all, the book probably amounts to 30-40 real pages of thorough critique.  The problem is that Zizek prepares books by writing books, and in reading the most recent big work - "The Parallax Gap" (which Zizek calls his most important work), one sees that the books of the previous 4 years were a type of movement towards this.First I how those interested in Zizek might go about critiquing Deleuze which is coupled with recommendations for Zizek's other works.  After that I will recommend an alternative route to people interested in a crtique of Deleuze (outside of those made in other reviews - such as "Deleuze: A Critical Reader")If you want to get an idea of how to critique Deleuze through Zizek, I recommend reading Lacan very closely, and critiquing Deleuze through Lacan.  But if Lacan is intractable for you, Zizek is a helpful guide to realize Lacan's contributions.  I would even hasten to add that if one is unfamiliar with Lacan, one cannot account for the weaknesses and strengths of a text like anti-oedipus (which has the capacity to perform the same reduction on lacan).  If one were to buy a book on Zizek, I think the least scatterbrained and most theoretical (Hegelian) is "For they know not what they do" but be sure to get the second edition with the very long preface (80 pgs) which reconfigures his position now with regard to his previous work.  Organs without bodies is important to see how Zizek directly comprehends Deleuze's work (and at times, he reposes problems in interesting directions), but it will probably piss alot of Deleuzians off, and  not because his critiques are right on, but because he has hardly payed attention to the unique elements of Deleuze's philosophy (which is to say, he critiques Deleuze as if he would critique any positive thinker, without exploring in depth, the complexity of his system).Zizek is most interesting for his Lacanian reading of Hegel, which is quite good, and very interesting.  His main (hegelian) idea is that the ontological or the transcendental is created from the failure to fully represent the real.  In Deleuzian terms, Zizek would say that the virtual is created from the inconsistency of the actual, which we then generalize into the virtual.  Therefore, Deleuze's claims to "think without an image" are undoubtedly a way to make the reader forget Deleuze's own positioning (which is mainly from Nietzsche).  And yes, for those of you who bash Hegel without ever having even read him, Deleuze is extremely close to Hegel in many ways, and if you don't understand how they are alike and different you don't really understand the problems either of them face.  But Zizek treats this proximity as if it was an attack (which merely just calls into question Deleuze's own aversion to Hegel which does betray a proximity).  This is immature, but perhaps is only as immature as Deleuze's aversion to Hegel.  [But Deleuze never wrote a critique of Hegel in this fashion! As Zizek ahs done with Deleuze].But Zizek did make me pay attention to key passages that I did not before, which accent the transcendental nature of Deleuze's empiricism.  Zizek's own failure to critique Deleuze made me question my own (as other readers have) deification of Deleuze. I began to ask why Does Deleuze call his system "Transcendental Empiricism" if he destroys transcendence at every turn in favor of immanence?  The answer is that Deleuze is situated in the transcendental turn in philosophy which reconcieves as the transcendental not the noumenal thing in itself (as in Kant), but rather the situation in which the noumenal and the phenomenal are limits [as in Heiddeger, Husserl, Lacan, and Merleu-Ponty](recall the passage in A thousand Plateaus that the body without organs is a limit).  What this means is that Deleuze's concept of Difference cannot be concieved as something apart from the situation of the human being which does not have access to all of reality (recall Deleuze's claim that "Difference is not diversity, diversity is given, Difference is by which the given is given")  This "by which" as Difference (and Derrida's Differance) makes Deleuze's immanence very problematic since this "middle" area is still human.  The real problem is whether the structure of consciousness (expressionism) can be extended to the world "Everything is consciousness because it possesses a double" (Difference and Repetition, 220).  This question is always the question they come back to, and it is the shakiest component of Deleuze's system.  It is also the component that needs to be confronted via lacan, which unfortunately Zizek fails to do in a systematic way.  Plus he writes the book After Deleuze dies, when Zizek had active engagement with his ideas very early on.If anything, it is good to convince oneself that one is questioning one's own idols.  If you want a breath of fresh air in philosophy, I recommend the books: "Contingency, Hegemony, Universality" which contains a dialog between Ernesto Laclau, Judith Butler, and Slavoj Zizek (he doesn't make stupid references every 5 seconds in this book).  I also Recommend any book by Renaud Barbaras ("Desire and Distance" might be an extremely interesting counterpoint to Deleuze).  Another book - "Naturalizing Phenomenology" is an essential book that deals with what Zizek does badly, how consciousness studies and cognitive studies contribute to these contemporary thinkers.Whatever you decide, it is true that Zizek's critique is essential to understand in order to truly understand Deleuze's strengths and weaknesses, whether you get it from this book or others.  If you can remain Deleuzian and take Lacanians seriously, you can only then call yourself Deleuzian
Convicted Watergate Felon Decides to Judge the rest of Us?. Give me a break.  It must be nice to find Jesus in prison and then spend the rest of your life using your newfound brand of Christianity to pass judgement on the world.  Enter "Lies that Go Unchalleneged in Popular Culture," Colson's latest collection of rants about what he thinks is wrong with the rest of us.  Who are the rest of us?  Just about anybody who does not subscribe to his narrow point of view.  He has his favorites, however.  He goes after gays and lesbians with a vengeance as he always does, which makes one wonder if old Chuckie has something to hide himself.  He criticizes the science that has proven over and over again that there is no such thing as homosexuality being in ones genetic makeup.  He calls it "phoney science."  (People who don't know what they're talking about often use such adjectives to describe something they don't understand.)But his hatred for the so-called immorals doesn't stop there.  He encourages other Christians who are reading Dan Brown's DaVinci Code to "throw it away."  Aside from advocating such an infantile gesture, I find it disturbing that another author would advocate destroying someone elses writing, which is tantamount to censorship as far as I'm concerned.Charles Colson is nothing more than a bag of wind weighed down by his own b.s.  He quotes scripture and interprets Biblical passages to suit his self-righteous agenda.  If there is a hell, it's fires are reserved for the likes of Colson and his zealot band of fundamentalist nut jobs.  He attacks feminist spirituality, the gnostic gospels and modern popular culture in general.  In Colson's world, everyone who isn't a Christian is one for the hot place.And in case anybody out there reading this is wondering?  No, I am not an atheist.  And I do love what Jesus stood for.  It's his fan club here on Earth that I hate.  Think about that.  As far as I'm concerned, one has nothing to do with the other.In the meantime, if you want to read Christian writing that doesn't regurgitate the sort of hateful rhetoric that taints everything that leaks from Colson's poison pen, read anything by John Shelby Spong or Peter Gomes.  Better yet, read the Bible and come to your own intelligent conclusions.  The Bible is not Colson's book alone to interpret.  It's time someone told him that. And I don't mind that I'm the first.
Perverted. I'm sorry I wasted the money. I can see by the reviews you either love it or hate it.  I'm not squeamish by nature, but this book is one continuous torture fest which not only targets human victims, but animals as well.  Three quarter's way through, when I realized this indeed was the premise from beginning to end, I started skipping these parts (which got me to the last page quite quickly). I was bored and disgusted with the author.  I believe he had a sick fetish and lived them out through these pages. In the end my eyeballs got six-pack abs from rollng around so much.  This book is going on my "Do Not Lend" shelf as I value my friends and wouldn't consider them subjecting them to such gory nonsense.
Disappointing, but redemptive at the end. One would think getting a starred review meant the book was spellbinding, but I did not find that to be the case.  The idea of Poe as a character was intriguing enough for me to read the book, and through much of it, the quality of the plot and dialog was top notch.  Unfortunately, about 2/3 in, you could see which way the plot was going, and it was a disappointment to find a plot unfolding that was reminiscent of Cornwall or Patterson at their commercial worst.  However, things turn around in the last 20 pages and the last 2 plot twists make slogging through the corny initial motives for the crime worthwhile, almost
same 'ol same 'ol. I am not excited about this purchase because it is just "another hints book" like all the other authors.  I wish someone could come up with a better book pertaining to this subject!
You can fool some of the people, all of the time. Have you ever read a "study" that contains tiny bits of truth (usually things that are obvious) but the rest is false?  That's the case with Generations At Work.If you remove the stereotypes all that remains is stuff that ought to be obvious.  It may be that some CEOs with large numbers of disgruntled employees are unaware of even the most blantant trends and conflicts in the workplace but the lesson there is to fix the workplace, not the employees.  All generations will be cynical if they are contstantly in danger of being laid off.From my own experience, 3 examples that are completely the opposite of what this book describes.  (1) People in my age group are supposed to be driven overachievers.  How I wish that were true.  Must have come from astrology or something.  (2) I worked for a company that hired two young "golden collar" tech experts.  These kids were outstanding.  There were no personality conflicts.  There were no generational conflicts.  And the fact that they were so knowlegable made us worship them!  So what if they preferred rock climbing to golf?  (3) Speaking of stereotypes, the company shut down and we all got laid off.  According to this book, young IT professionals can write their own ticket, right?  False, again.  Four months have passed and one of our young geniuses has a boring job with a long commute and big pay cut.  The other has refused to take a crummy job and remains unemployed.The book is not without humor, perhaps unintentional.  Apparently Lucent is a good example of how waring generations can make peace.  But I wonder how many managers want their company to perform as Lucent has.In the end, the key to a productive harmonious workplace is for people to have jobs they enjoy, pay well and are reasonably secure.  In a lesser work environment all managers can hope for is to tap into the stereotypes in this book to try to keep the dust down
Sometimes Witty,  Often Wrong. Mark Steyn in Broadway Babies Say Goodnight (Musicals Then and Now) has accomplished an unique objective.  He has written a book that is meant to appeal to people whose veiws are strictly politically conservative, love musicals (particulary fond memories of older musicals that they are in fact too young to have even seen) and do not know any actual facts about the history of the genre so the author's glaring mistakes will not prove an annoyance.  Even stranger is that he has found these people and, God bless them, they have the book they have always dreamed about.  For anyone else, this can be a bit of a slog.  It is funny (espcially if you like puns) in places but the arguments are so often backed up with mistakes as to be worthless.  This book is not truly bad.  It is just simply odd.  If you like Mark Steyn (this book is more about him anyway) then enjoy.  Othewise, it is worth a pass
Disappointing. I saw The House of Doors recommended on the page for the movie Cube. With Cube being one of my all-time favorite movies, The House of Doors immediately caught my interest. After reading the positive reviews, I immediately picked it up and started reading with great expectations. Unfortunately, I was disappointed.The novel contains some great ideas, unfortunately they are overshadowed by a couple flaws. Primarily, too much is explained too early. The antagonist and main purpose behind of the House of Doors is revealed early on, leaving little mystery for the reader to unravel. Secondly, I found the writing style to be uneven at times. The author frequently uses exclamation points and odd analogies, which often come off rather silly. It is something you do not want to see in a serious horror novel.On another note, from the write up I was expecting the novel to contain a fair bit of horror and gore. While there are some moments, I found them to be few and far between. This did not matter to me, I was more interested in the story.Those looking for a sci-fi adventure with some horror elements may enjoy this novel. If you are looking for a serious horror or mystery story, I recommend looking elsewhere
Not Bad. I use "The Notebook" and "A Walk to Remember" as optional films in my upper division sociology courses. After hearing many positive student responses, I was curious about Sparks as an author--one of the few males writing commercially successful romance novels.  After a slow start with "True Believer," I was more satisfied with "The Rescue."  Taylor's friendship with Mitch and his emotional growth add dimension to an otherwise standard tale of boy meets girl, etc., etc.,
Waste of money. I wish I had read Maya's review sooner (see earlier post)!!I found this on the shelf of a Wild Oats grocery.  It was an impulse purchase because I needed a vegan cookbook in a hurry after deciding to go off meat and dairy for health reasons. Once I took the time to examine this book more closely, I realized I had made a major mistake in trusting that Wild Oats would have a good vegan cookbook for sale.I totally agree with Maya Saran.  She has very precisely described the problems with this book's tone and recipes. I couldn't cook most of the recipes without a major shopping trip, or a specialty order from an internet store.  I am so glad I saved my receipt - this book is being returned as soon as possible!
Does unconscionable violence to the integrity of myth. This book's author is one of an ilk that cannot abide to leave the stories of other religions than her own unscathed by her yen for monotheism.  The Preface of the book, rather than simply forwarding the myths in their entirety, sets the stage for euhemerization of the Norse stories to fit her own need for bland orthodoxy.  And the final myth of the book is hideously rendered to completely alter the cosmogeny of the Norse pantheon, again to suit her own weak religious predisposition.  This is akin to changing all of the Old testament stories by, say, removing any references to rape and murder simply to white-wash those books to suit modern, enlightened sensibilities.If an author proposed to write on the myths of still-extant religious practices, then the least that author can do is present them unedited and unsullied, clear in their original form and intent.  This book's author is unable to see her way past her own religious indoctrinations, and so ruins otherwise lovely stories with her poisoned pen.A far better story book of the Norse myths to be read for children is "The Children of Odin", by Padraic Colum, and illustrated by Willy Pogany.
what you dont know. this is basically a walkthrough but they dont tell you that i was dissapointed when i finally get it, but thats just me its up tu yo
Not Useful. Nobody questions that Feynman was one of the great physicists of the 20th century.  (In my lifetime perhaps only Gell-Mann was more accomplished in his results of physics).  This review, however, is not about Feynman the physicist, but rather Feynman the author of 3 textbooks, which purportedly try to teach physics.  At this he has categorically failed for a person that initially knows very little physics
Grrr!. Mars and Venus Together Forever is one of the most ridiculous, stupid books that I have ever had the gross misfortune to read.  I probably should have expected what I got, considering that Mars and Venus on a Date left me cold, but I read this one anyway because the original Mars and Venus book had SOME interesting insights and I'm a sucker for a cheap book.Anyone who buys into the stereotypes promoted by John Gray must be barmy.  He exaggerates, overemphasises and blusters his way through the 200+ pages - probably with the best motives in his mind - but in the end the stuff he writes is uninspiring and insipid.  According to him men and women are still ruled by `ancient' traditions which dictate that women are all do-gooder types who only desire to stay at home, chatting with other women and looking at flowers whilst men are all aggressive cavemen, grunting their way through their lives with zero finesse, a beer in one hand and the TV remote in the other.I don't see how anyone, man or woman, could read this book without being annoyed.  For women, the book is terribly unempowering.  If you don't fit in with any of Gray's ideas about what a woman should be then you are labelled as masculine.  I don't want to read a book which tells me that when I am at work I am moving towards my masculine side because being goal-oriented, competitive and efficient are male traits.  It's all phooey!  For men, the book is also offensive.  John Gray says that men shouldn't express their feelings because it will cause a woman to lose her attraction for him.  No, I don't believe that men and women are the same in all respects - there are gender differences - but in Mars and Venus these are distorted.Overall this book is not worth your time.  Underneath the waffle there may be some good points, but all of these are outweighed by the stereotypes.JoAnn
Christmas Pleasures. I am very pleased with this purchase.  The photos are so wonderful and makes one feel so relaxed and into the Christmas spirit.  Have already tried a couple of the recipes and the family thoroughly enjoyed them.Thanks to Southern Living for another wonderful Christmas Book
Unreadable!!!. I was given this book for my birthday and I tried to read it. I had such a hard time reading the book which seemed to drag on and on. Eco seems to go into tangeants and details such mundane scenes that I didn't get past page 30. I am an avid reader and have read everything from fiction to non-fiction to classics. I just couldn't get into the book and found it difficult to read
Cover blurbs do not accurately reflect contents of book. This is a history of packaging, not the psychology of packaging as I expected.  Thus, I found it entertaining in places and terribly boring in others.  If you are interested in packaging, from its origins to its impact on the environment, then this books does the trick.  If you are fascinated in pop culture, then I would pass
"Pauliana and the yellow brick road".  Does Ms Davis live in the here and now?. I am a 40something male, diagnosed with MS 10 years ago.  Ms Davis seems to have missed her mark! When she writes about "finding your bliss", is she kidding me?  Bliss for most of us who suffer from MS would be to just have 10 minutes without pain, discomfort (I won't start with a list).  Ten minutes, that's all.  Just take away our pain (body and mind)just for this brief instance, would be beyond any bliss you could imagine.  Her biggest and most damaging issue is that NOT ONCE DOES SHE ADDRESS THOSE OF US WHO SUFFER FROM PAIN!  Mostly pain in our bodies, how to deal with it, what to do, who to turn to.  Who is she kidding?  She must not an issue with pain, only numbness.  This is understandable, MS is different in each case.  Actually, if I had to choose, I would have gone more twoards the numbness (in the event I had to make such a horrible choice)  Her Ten steps to moving beyond.... should be retittled: "My walk down the yellow brick road and it like totally stressed me out".  In "Lean on Me" who is there to lean on?  Don't wast your time with this book.I only give it one star for the references made in the book i.e. web addresses, orginizations etc.  It's the only reason I'm going to keep the book, it will be on my shelf in the reference section.  Sorry Ms Davis, but I had to tell it like "I" see it, in thousands of people.  Just ask Montel Williams about his "pain" issue
not good for learning, OK as a reference book. i am currently subjecting myself to finance curriculum at a quant-heavy, top-5 bschool.  this text was recommended for my Intro Cap Markets class (although the prof didnt exactly use it in the class).i often used it to gain understanding of what was taught in class.  unfortunately, i found this book to be EXTREMELY painful.  it was verbose, overly complicated, hard to read, poorly organized & full of jargon.  while it is thorough in its coverage of Capital Markets & instruments, i found it to be nearly impossible to read.esoteric theories & mathematical proofs were introduced with little background, and often without insufficient detail to understand grasp.  but the jargon & vocabulary are what made the book so unreadable ... trying to read a chapter in this book would literally consume 4-5 hours of my time.AND forget about trying to use this book to do problemsets OR assignments. i could go on, but trust me, this book is bad ... UNLESS you already have a good intro & just want to use this as a reference
Unexpected Trash. l love reading Lawrence Block's Matthew Scudder novels and many of the author's other works. But this particular effort is, in my opinion, pure out-and-out trash.Now, the premise is excellent: a man going over the edge because of the trauma and losses from the 9-11 WTC bombings. And, initially, someone else accused of the first murder.And then begins the trash, much of it totally unnecessary - in particular, the often-depraved and carefully described sexual needs and actions of a female character who manages to become quite unsympathetic and near-lunatic in her acting out of every possible sexual want - not 'need', want!.Then, there are several just plain hokey and/or unclear aspects: first, the clearing of the first murder suspect (very poorly explained), and second, determining who the murderer is/was, a "yeah, right" reader's reaction. And, a few of the sub-plots just become plain boring.l find it difficult to believe that the author actually wrote this trashy novel; the only suspicion l can come up with is that his agent or editor took too many liberties in an effort to spice up this l-o-n-g novel
state of analytic philosophy of mind at the end of century. I sympathize with many of Searle's views about the inelliminability of the intentional character of consciousness, and the general misguidedness of philosophy of mind.. but I would ask: is this a big discovery? why read Searle rather than Husserl in the first place? Is his naturalism of any philosophical depth or interest? I would say no. I believe reading this book is a waste of time, as it was for me..
How can a writer this bad sell so many books?. Someone gave me this book and told me how thrilling it was. Halfway through, I find myself still reading it mostly to laugh at the horrible writing and melodromatic style. It's a little depressing to think that millions of readers have made this guy rich and famous on such awful writing. It's good for me to pick up a book like this now and then to be reminded that by avoiding the most popular authors, I'm not missing much.
What the....!. I grew up with this story - what happened?!  Somewhere in this grossly underproduced version they forgot that even in a kids story you need talented actors.  Kids know when someone sounds wooden and unskilled - and you can't pawn something as poorly done as this off on them.  They're smarter than that!  I could've done a better job in my garage.  "Under the bridge lived a troll..."  Come on
Anti-American Propaganda. Shooting People is a small thesis on how America exported reality TV to Europe and gave them bad habits. It blames the US for everything.The last time I checked, we never forced Europe to watch television
Not Worth Purchasing.... I found the recipes in this book to be simple and bland. I am actually in the process of returning the book.  Anyone who cooks can come up with combinations better than this.
Discouraging. I was disappointed in the contents of the book.  Although some of the information was helpful, each chapter ended with how difficult it was to be an independent IT Consultant.  Also, the book is written from a UK perspective and does not focus on many aspects that are specific to the US, including new legislation (SOX) or sub-contracting
Not A Good Idea... I've read all of Slaughter's books since her first, BLINDSIGHTED, and each one only became better than the last.  I raced through FAITHLESS (which is great, by the way) to begin TRIPTYCH.....and am totally disappointed in this book. It simply isn't worth the read.  Karin Slaughter has followed Patricia Cornwell in departing from her tried and true main character and format to do a stand-alone book.A horse of a very different color.  There isn't even a trace of her feminine flair for forensics (how's that for alliteration?) anywhere...just a lot of severed tongues and gorey murder scenes and a cast of ugly and unlikeable cretins who made me want to toss the book without finishing it.I did finish it but I hated it.I understand Slaughter is at work on another such book and my only comment, regarding a successful writing genre is: if it isn't broken, don't fix it.
THIS BOOK IS TRASH. This book is the biggest piece of literary trash I have seen in a long time. It is a collection of peace-mongering propaganda that seems to take issue with political reality as much as the author does in her own life. The agendas in her poems spoil the spirit of the pieces and make the reader resent the author. The poems are rather sophomoric at best, and are poorly written. Most of them make no sense; you would have to be inside Ms. Walker's head to comprehend her contorted style. It appears that Ms. Walker should re-enroll in a college level poetry class. THIS BOOK IS TRASH. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS PIECE OF JUNK--I TOOK MY COPY BACK AFTER 24 HOURS
Fluff. This book is garbage. Filler to make money. A travesty. All the others were awesome to OK. But, let's face it - Get on with it! I'm not really interested in +++pages of Matt traveling with the circus, or Elayne's torment becoming Queen, or Egwene's mishaps with other Aes Sedai. I want some ACTION. What's going on in the AshAman (sp?)'s heads- I mean, how cool would that be since the Taint is gone? I'm sick of this. But I'll still read the rest, who knows how much time I've already spent. SURELY IT MUST BE OVER SOON. Not even Tolkien could go on this long. Wrap it up
Nanny Diaries=Devil Wears Prada. Really, there's no difference in these two books.  They both have whiny main female "heroines" who invoke ZERO sympathy!  This book was not funny, not clever, and definitely NOT worth spending money on. I just don't understand how someone will stand for being stomped all over like this and does not quit...especially after all the extra "drama" that popped up.  All she did was complain about everything...just like Andy in DWP.  I don't know which book was published first, but the authors of this one and the DWP author had the same mind.  These books read almost exactly the same: young girl gets impossible boss.  Made to do unbelievable things.The only person I felt bad for was Grayer, the son.  Poor thing. Parents uninterested in spending time with him even though he loved them deeply.  I just don't see how a book can be humorous when this was ones of the book's main points.I was going to use this book to see whether or not the movie would be worth viewing, but I doubt I'll go see it.  If I do, I'll be using a movie pass or someone else will foot the bill.Pass on this one
Poor service -- very poor follow-up. As part of a $250.00 order, I ordered the Michelin France Provence map in English, and the Michelin 2006 Red Guide France: Hotels and Restaurants in English - both Items they sent me were written in French, which are of no value to me.  I requested a shipping label to return the map and the book and asked they send me the English versions. The Amazon Outsourcing Desk in India refused both request.  I requested an American Amazon Customer Service Manager contact me on this Issue.  That has never happened.  I am also being asked my Satisfaction on a 3d book - Markets Of Provence - which they never sent me.  The remainder of my $250.00 order were the English Versions, as ordered.  My Overall Satisfaction:  Well below the 1 Star shown.  Actual Satisfaction "F Minus" for all departments in Amazon and far less for their very poor Customer Service and lack of ethical follow-up for their mistake
Look again. I found this book completely unhelpfull and a waste of money.  I know nothing about the travel industry and looked to this book as my introduction into it.  I am more confused than ever and now have no intention of entertaining the idea of opening my own home-based agency.  Thanks but no thanks
I like the red one more.. I like the original red structural package designs by Haresh Pathak.
Book Description. This book comes after "Devil's Embrace" and is about their son and daughter. The in print version has been RE-WRITTEN
Essentially because she found religion. If you are into religion, this may be a good book for you.  If you are not, it is not
authorware 6. This is a HUGE mistake in buying this issue.  Wait until the reviese edition comes in, there are too many mistakes throughout the book.  Its fustrating not being able to finish most of the excercises because of typos or left out information
dissapointing ! mainly material from other books !. This is a great dissapointment from the respected author and the respedted publisher. In the book there are 18 sections of problems. eight of them are "problems from..." other books. Most of those books are themselves on-the-shelves collections of prbloms. Some of those books are really new, one of them has not yet been published ! . Some other 5 sections are "problems from..." magazines. There are many available books of  interesing problems (including this one). Fans of those book should be careful - they may get mainly something they already have.
Terrible. This is the first Grafton book I've read, but I'm pretty sure it will be my last.  Simply put, this is the worst book I've read in the past year.  The plot is ridiculous: it centers around the murder of woman who is prostitute/porn star/water treatment plant worker.  The characters only exist as canned responses to the investigator's questions.  Critical clue are revealed in predictable fashion to achieve an utterly anti-climactic ending devoid of any epiphanies or suspense.
GOLDEN BUDDHA. I normally enjoy the Cussler books, especially the Dirk Pitt stories.  This one, however, is especially contrived and very confusing.  There is virtually no character development, so keeping track of the various pieces of the plot is difficult.  I felt like I was in the "fog of war", seeing hundreds of snippets and just hoping it all came together in the end.  Will the real Clive Cussler please come back?
Uninspired. I approached this book with great anticipation after reading a glowing review. I found I had a hard time sustaining interest in the book. I did not find the characters to be well drawn. Ms. O'Brien seemed to be so in  love with her prose that I had difficulty understanding the motivation for  her characters behavior. This seemed more an exercise in the writing of  prose than in the crafting of a novel
Pure, unimaginable BOREDOM!. This book has about one or two mildly interesting parts, but it reminds me too much on Jumanji. This book was recommended to me by a friend, and after reading the book, i wanted to hit him! This book was hideously boring and confusing as times. Once i put it down, it fealt like i was taking a VERY heavy burden off of my shoulders. I reccomend that you do not read this book
Just about unfinishable bore. The Bourne Identity by this author was great but this is a contrived, monumental bore.  Intricate plotting is only worth following if the themes and characters are worthy of attention.  This book is some kind of desperately single-minded, looney-left hate fest.  OK, you can say Hoover was a monster, and say it again 10 times, maybe even 50 or 60 times, but that does not a book make.  The world presented here is sick, but the sickness is the author's monomania
hard to extract the meat of the topic from this book. It is no doubt that this author 'loves' animals. That is apparent. What also is apparent is that the author is not a writer. Many chapters started out with a 'subject' of discussion only to find by the end of the chapter the author touched on everything 'but' the subject leaving the reading saying "huh". She vicariously relives too much of her own experience losing her self in it to the point that she forgets what it was that she wanted the reader to gain thus losing the the essence of the point. There is a comparison to famed horse whisperer Monty Roberts, to whom I have personally worked. She is not a monty roberts. I beleive she is a caring individual with a lot of stories just not a writer. I do not recommend this book as a guide to training or understanding dogs.
Shallow Characters, Snarky Remarks. I did not care about the people in this book.  It seems to want be a romance story but fails.  The writer sacrifices any chance of eliciting real feelings from his readers in favor of making  sarcastic remarks disguised as cogent observations.  One particularly icky description of a first sexual encounter, supposedly recounted by an elderly character, does not have the ring of words being spoken and instead comes off as nothing but cheesy erotica writing.  Additionally an entire scene at a shotgun wedding in the sticks replete with bitter, bulging bride and fluffy lavender bridesmaid gowns (a scenario that's been done to death) is nothing but a bad excuse to take cliched potshots at the straight world.  I bought this based on a rave review from the NY Times that appeared on the cover.  I do not know how this book received such a review.  The writing style is snappy and shows promise, if only the author chooses to tackle a story with a bit more depth.  Otherwise, this book offers nothing more than a couple of brief moments of humor, that is all.
Don't Bother With This One. I saw this at the bookstore and read through it.  I can't imagine who would have use for this book.  It is an illustrated guide to design and has numerous pictures of various door styles. It is a very poor "how to" book, and even includes metal doors and drawers (why would anyone include metal fabrication in a woodworking book?).Many of the kitchen photos are out of focus.  The only interesting portion of the entire book was on page 126 which explained how to create snap-together window grills (a.k.a. mullions).The end of the book is filled with photos of the author's door production facility (and this would be interesting to which group of woodworkers?).All in all, this book is not worthy of Linden Publishing who usually produces outstanding works
A big disappointment... Unfortunately the book didn't uncover any "secrets" whatsoever as the title alludes to.  The information contained in this book is very basic.  I found one major problem with the text in that it encourages "component depreciation".  My research and understanding is that this was clearly outlawed in the US in the 1980s.  When I contacted the publishing company for clarification, no one would answer this simple question.If this book was filled with high quality ideas, I would have overlooked an error or two and given this book 4 or 5 stars.  But that wasn't the case as I've only been in the real estate game for a short time and already knew most of what is contained in this text.  All in, this book isn't even worth the $5 +shipping I paid for it used...
This one did not work for me. I think this book might be helpful for the professional interior decorator. It was just not what I was looking for in a color book. Each section generally starts with a page or two of colors squares, i.e yellow or yellow-orange. It then describes the color (A very 1950's yellow, warm and dense. Look at it with only the colors below and the three to the left). These pages are then followed with photos of rooms using some of the colors. The entire book is arranged this way. The red rooms are almost completely red (page 5-6) and very few of the rooms were my particular taste or style. Some of the color palettes that were used together seemed more jarring than coordinated, except when the author got to the more sedate, calmer colors (pg, 32, 38).I prefer the BH&G - Color Schemes book which has a more realistic and useable color palette and presents them in beautifully decorated rooms. Again, this one might be more useful to the professional decorator, but for me it was too much text and history
anti-minimalist?. For someone who claims to be writing a book which supports historicity of the Bible, and an anti minimalist stance, Dever's work is a disappointment. According to Dever, the historicity of the Bible is basically limited to the period of kings. He thinks that no researcher takes the early Israelite history such as the Exodus seriously, a point of view which is definately not true
Female Chauvinist. Our church book study group mistakenly purchased this Bad Girls of the Bible instead of the one by the other author.While I had great difficulty getting through the first chapter, I am now using this book to improve my understanding of the Bible, and to learn more about ancient times.This writer makes-up her own story lines, and conveniently leaves out portions of chapters and verses that do not fit her story line.  For example, in chapter two, she states that Egypt where Joseph is held as a slave by Potiphar, is a dry hot land.  Perhaps she should read just a little earlier in the Bible. In Genesis 13:10, we are told different.10 Lot looked up and saw that the whole plain of the Jordan was well watered, like the garden of the Lord, like the land of Egypt, toward Zoar.While the ordering of this book was a mistake on the part of the person who ordered the books for us, I believe it is a Godsend for us to read and discuss this book, though I doubt we will actually be using the questions at the end of each chapter.  Instead we will ask questions regarding her inaccurate portrayal of these women and the facts of history.
Gloating, Biased. Is the main goal of EVERY male evo-psy writer to attack feminism? Here's an experiment for you: Juxtapose the ideas in this book and, say, Pinker's Blank Slate with those of,I don't know, ANY two female evo-psi writers and watch the incongruities jump off the pages. It's f&#%ing comical. But guess what? The females' books are way better thought out and accurate while the males' are a lot of wishful thinking. Hmmm....aging, successful man writes that lovely young lasses and aging, successful males are made for each other.  That men are wired to treat sexually liberated women like s@&%, and to fawn over repressed,chastity obsessed airheads. Whatever
Blow The Whale Down. What is this book about? Whale revenge? What is that? I read the whole book and all they do is ride around in a boat. And there's a whale. And they kill it. This is basically Moby Dick for kids. I'm guessing the whale is the main character as none of the characters are memorable. I don't fault the author, but what editor allowed this book to sneak by? I guess somebody who likes whales a real lot
Poorly written and boring. The most boring business book I have read.  After 95 pages, I have yet to gain any 'nuggets' and am disappointed with the poor standard of writing.  Not only does Mr Cooper fail to provide actual step by step examples where his process has been followed successfully, quoted statistics are unhelpful and are clearly provided solely to support his case.One extract from the book (page 16/17) tells all:"We find the average success rate of developed products to be about 67%.  But averages often fail to tell the whole story: This success rate varies from a low of 0% to a high of 100%, depending on the company!"I don't think one has to read a book to know that statistic!Much of what Cooper writes is common sense and I believe of little value to a dynamic organisation wishing to promote the internal development of breakthrough products and their succesful launch thereafter.I cannot believe that there are not better books available on this subject
Spoilers....if that's even possible!. This will be short and sweet--I read this about three years ago....this book had potential but sucked.  Forget the fact that there is a graphic and brutal rape and murder of a kid, I can deal with that.What I can't deal with is the fact that this girl goes to heaven, watches down on everyone she knew and basically the one last thing she does is inhabit the body of another girl and f*** the he** out of some guy she thinks is hot.  YEAH--tell me, on what effing planet is a CHILD raped and murdered and her one wish is to come back to earth for a few hours and do some guy?Anyway, yeah, at that point the book became a huge chore for me to finish.  Lame to the extreme.
Be Warned. Once upon a time Tami Hoag wrote romances.  This is a rather simplistic romance and not one of the mystery/suspense novels that she now writes.She is better at the latter than the former
Obvious attempt at selling a novel to the movies. I wish writers who attempt to write "historical" thrillers would take the time to READ a book that was actually written and published in their chosen era.  This is an awfully contemporary 1919.  "Don't blow my cover" one of the cops says at one point in the book.  When Wheeler attempts to write period dialogue he resorts to bad clichs or catch phrases that belong to the 21st century.  Lazy writing, I'd say.  And unimaginative to boot. The book is filled with laughable anachronisms and outright errors (for example: Lady Doyle was an occult -- she was a practitioner of automatic writing and a book was even published about her talks with her "contact"). Wheeler obviously is having fun with all real personalities of the period, but I was getting tired of the overpopulation of real people and how they all seemed to have interchangeable personalities and their contemporary attitudes were increasingly annoying.  It seemed like he couldn't create any fictional characters of his own.  He fails miserably as a novelist.  The book is really screenplay disguised as a novel - plenty of snappy and "hip" dialogue, an overabundance of action sequences, lots and lots of gore and violence.  But a novel?  No. There have been countless books using Doyle and Houdini as detectives of sorts.  "The List of Seven" is far better than this book.  And the novels of Daniel Stashower that feature Houdini and his brother Hardeen are immensely better.  Wheeler really doesn't know much about his subjects but slides in so many references he thinks he does and he thinks he can fool his readers as well.  However, anyone who has read in-depth biographies and/or the letters of these people (Doyle, Lovecraft, and Houdini) knows that these men are much more interesting and colorful than the caricatures to which Wheeler has reduced them
Starts off OK but really pushes the boundaries of common sense. In many ways, Yungen's book is good.  It rasies serious questions about the influence of Eastern thought and metaphysics in modern Christianity, and some of his points are quite valid.  However the conclusions that he draws regarding cnetering prayer eventually become very tenuous and downright tangential.  To be blunt, his reasoning goes like this:A: Eastern mystics chant mantras ("om")B: Contemplative prayer sometimes involves repeating a word or phrase ("Jesus")C: A=B, therefore contemplative prayer is un-ChristianAnother form of his reasoning:A: Eastern religion influenced the Desert FathersB: the Desert Fathers influenced Thomas MertonC: Thomas Merton influenced Richard FosterD: Richard Foster influenced Rick WarrenE: therefore Rick Warren believes in Eastern religionPlease read this book critically if you read it at all
Series crashes with third book - be warned. After reading the trilogy, I was left wondering what the hell happened? I have just read all 3 of the His Dark Materials trilogy and what was a strong start in book 1 and 2 is utterly demolished in this clunker.Pullman allowed his eagerness to bash religion to completely destroy an engaging story - one of the most creative stories I've come across in 20 years of reading fantasy. There isn't even a remote chance of a sequel to fix up this mess. If you look up `anticlimax' in the dictionary, you'll see a picture of this book. From first page to last, time is wasted on boring characters, while all the good ones are either killed off, or just MIA for the entire book. Spoilers ahead.What about Lyra and her parents? Somehow, she never knows what happened to them and after all she has been through is supposed to be content with going back to school like a good little girl? She never even confronts them to try and understand their motivations. And Will just goes back with Mary Malone to her apartment so they can figure out how to avoid the cops. Over a cup of tea, naturally. And that's it for him.In addition to all that, this book doesn't even seem to be connected to the first two. None of the characters resonate they way they used to and instead of being good friends, Will and Lyra fall in love and have sex at the tender age of 11 or 12 . . .  all in the last 30 pages. What happened to the story, for cripes sake?!  And what happened to the `temptation'? Was choosing not to stay with Will her way of not succumbing to it? The whole premise is just so lame to start out with. As an earlier reviewer pointed out all the windows that were opened for centuries didn't endanger the universe, why not leave one open for 60 or 70 years to give Lyra and Will a chance to know each other. The flimsy reasoning behind this is just as contrived as their sudden and immediate love for one another. Supposedly, they had more than gonads going for them, they survived death together!Pullman didn't feel like thinking it through, he just wanted a gut wrenching ending. In addition to that, he wanted to mock the reader by taunting us with the `reality' of knowing that nothing they did in the trilogy has any hope or meaning. All of Will and Lyra's efforts are futile, kind of like - guess what? religion for the rest of us morons.After having the reader go through endless pages on the mulefa-elephant aliens or whatever, ultimately the characters the reader wants to know about disappear with barely a whimper. Iorek Byrnison, Lee Scoresby - instead we get page after page about Mary Malone the Disaffected former Nun. Pullman all but pants in his eagerness to give the finger to anyone of us who believes in Him or anything for that matter!This is NOT children's literature, it's a hate ridden manifesto that is more suitable for adults who at least have some way of maintaining some sort of perspective throughout this sloppy mess. It's totally dishonest to sell this as a children's book, or even as a competent work of fiction. All of the painstaking work of the first two books is undone with this one.We never get closure on Lyra's parents.We never really understand what Dust is and where it comes from.We never see Will reunited with his mother.We get a lame battle where `god' dies and no one even knows why or how.Lyra and Will fall in love, but have to `sacrifice' it so that all the windows to other worlds can be shut forever, with only flimsy reasoning behind it.The mulefa and Mary Malone's work together amounts to nothing, everyone just goes home. Presumably, Will goes home, although we never see it. All that yearning after his mother and so forth . . .nothing.The major enemies are killed off too easily - and what about Armageddon? What happened to the Fortress and all the rebel angels and . . .you get the idea. It all just sort of disovles.Mary forgot to be the Serpent, or else I missed that in one of the countless pages on the mulefa.Another reader pointed out:" Phillip Pullman could have written a masterpiece with this series. Instead, the story falls flat under the weight of the author's own agendas and mockeries. What a waste of time. I can't believe this book actually won awards. It stopped being thought-provoking and started being inane and silly."It would have been better if Lyra had just awakened one morning and it was all a dream. Instead, relearning how to read the alethiometer will somehow enable her to build the Kingdom of Heaven in the course of her lifetime. Absurd.This was one of the most disappointing and infuriating reads of my life.
Some useful information. I am building my own house and find myself frequently referring to this book. There is much useful information; I only wish it were more up-to-date. It was published 12 years ago, but much of the info was out dated even then. And plumbing isn't exactly a rapidly changing field. The sad thing is that there aren't really any books out there that are much better.There is some info that is just plain wrong. I followed the book's instruction to use 45's to keep my sewer line from sloping more than 1/2" per foot, at great effort and expense... turns out it is not required, just an old plumber's legend. Be careful about following any of the advice in this book.Does anyone still use cast iron or copper dwv pipe? The book specifies a Kelly fitting for cleanouts. Is there any code which still allows that? Can you even buy a Kelly fitting? Most houses in the faster growing parts of the country are slab-on-grade and have been for years, but this book only devotes a few pages to this "new" concept. If you buy this book you need to be aware that much about plumbing is regional and code specific, and much of this book was out of date before it was published. It can still be a good source of info if you keep that in mind.
Amazon lead review misleading. Amazon reports (8/27/06) that 282 of 288 persons found a review by  "Damian Nash, Durango, Colorado" to be useful.The reviewer states: "I am also a scientist, and know that most of my highly rational, empirical colleages [...]"A quick Google shows that reviewer to be a high school teacher.This should give us pause when considering what '5-stars' mean given the current '5-star' glut in the reviews of "The Final Theory", to give only one of the egregious examples at Amazon.It may be time to put an evaluation ( I suggest a 5-X scale) on reviewers.  That scale should be applied on a peer-review basis and not a popularity/incident/anecdote basis.  Reviewers who only submit '5-star' reviews would rate an automatic '5-X' until peer-evaluated
Bad, really bad. When I started reading this book, I was reminded of the excellent Silverberg's little novel &quot;The World inside&quot;. However, a few more pages into Oath of Fealty and I had a shallow, epidermic, cardboard story that reads like a tv mini series. Stay away at all costs
A tough slog that's more about quarks than jaguars. I picked this up because I thought it was going to have some information about Ecuador (the Jaguar section) in it. It does--about one whole pages worth. The rest of the pages concern Gell-Mann's ideas on the inter-connectedness of things. Gell-Mann, for those of you who don't buy the Nobel prize-winning scientist collector cards, was the identifier of the Quark, that object that is smaller than what had previously been thought of as the smallest element (electrons are made up of a collection of quarks). This book is interesting but rough slogging at times as Gell-Mann tries to give you an instant understanding of the last ten years of modern physics. This should appeal to fans of Richard Feynman and Douglas Hofstadter, although the style isn't as smooth as either of them
Likable read- no direct skills. I thought this book would offer more in the way to make changes in your home, instead it is a nice narrative of people who have been helped by the author.  I prefer a direct "how to" approach, and this was not it - very disappointing.  Gregory Bodenhammer has two books on this topic that are more direct, concise and to the point.  I found that "Back in Control" and "Parent in Control" had a lot of useable information
The 360 degree leader. I am disgusted with Maxwell's inability to actually write a book rather he takes quotes then compiles them in the last two thirds of his book after he puts something in earlier on. DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME AND MONEY ON THIS ONE
Are Cliff Roberts and David Owen related?. This is a wonderfully researched book and well written as you'd expect from Mr. Owen, and I enjoyed reading it. But wondered if I was the only one who thought it was ruined by the obsessive desire to defend Cliff Roberts,  even on matters that really seem pointless. So I came here to read reviews  and I couldn't help but notice that many of the glowing reviews here on  Amazon appeared to be written by the same person, but I was glad to see  some agreed with me about the format of the book. I suppose it's a must for  the pictures if you want to see the course the way it once was, but I  recommend avoiding it if you get irritated with a book that has an agenda  and seems to go out of its way to not just tell the story, but to address  issues that someone wanted addressed
Very basic historic reference work, not much more. I bought this book expecting to learn more details on the design and development of this rifle and to have a reference work to show some examples of this design. OK, it fills that bill for the average enthusiast.But I found the slightly politicized content, the less than acceptable technical descriptions, and a few mistakes (I count no less than six reversed photographs!) to make the overall book a below par experience.A technical book like this should have had a competent technical editor. I see no evidence of this
It's a tad on the Euro-Socialist side, but Marcus isn't a bad artist. I thought the art had a certain charm, and used strictly as a picture book for children who can't yet read, I think it's quite nice.  (Too bad you can't make up your own story to go with it.)  The moment the child starts to read, though--better hide it quick, because...Unfortunately, the book reads like a condensed Communist Manifesto for kids (as others have noted), or a Socialist agenda primer.  I don't know for sure that's what Marcus Pfister had as an aim, and I'm not going to speculate on his politics.  He has three kids and may raise them as he likes, and indulge in any such philosophical musings as float his boat.Yes, I suppose sharing is nice.  Certainly sharing one's talents and abilities for the betterment of others is a great thing--but in America, we get paid for that (charity is voluntary, not coerced).  Furthermore, stripping yourself of what makes you unique and interesting (not necessarily BETTER, just unique and interesting), or giving away all your possessions, is a lousy way to make and keep friends, isn't it?  Is this book implying that somehow friendship can only be obtained by placating envy (a negative personal quality that should be dealt with by self-examination and intent to change, not pandering)?  Is it saying that being interesting and having unique qualities is bad?Almost seems like it, at least to me.  Furthermore, there's an overtone of "only by belonging to a group can you have self-worth," which is as hoary a case of balderdash as ever I've seen.  Of course, people who agree with that egregious sentiment will disagree with me, but that won't make them right.(The two stars, if you must know, are for the art.
One of Lightman's lesser works. If you have read "Reunion" or "Einstein's Dreams", you'll be quite upset with this novel.It seems rather limited in its scope, and is lacking metaphor like Lightman's other works.  He has developed as a writer since this book, however.  Don't let this one discourage you from exploring his other wonderful novels.
Pete, You Still Don't Get It. Don't read this book. I wish I hadn't. It ruined Pete Rose in my eyes, not because of what others have said about him, but because of what Rose said about himself. My grandpa was a huge fan of Pete Rose and once took me to meet him at Riverfront Stadium when I was around six. About the only thing I'm glad for with this book is it didn't come out in my grandpa's lifetime.We all make mistakes. We're only human and that's what humans do: we screw up. Sometimes badly. I wish Pete Rose was in the Hall of Fame. I wish he was coaching the Reds today. I wish most of all he'd never placed a single bet on baseball. But as for Pete, like I said up there, he still doesn't get it, and I doubt he ever will.This book was a disappointment for many reasons. It did give me a nice look at Pete's career with the Cincinati Reds and took me back to my grandfather's tales of how great the Big Red Machine of the 1970's was, but what was lacking in these 322 pages was contrition, and I think that was supposed to be what this book was about.The Pete Rose I met in My Prison Without Bars, was a likable fellow, but underneath his trip down memory lane was a sort of combative, "this is somebody else's fault" attitude that put me off and I'm sure put a lot of others off, too. Rose admits at last that he in fact bet on baseball during the 1980's, a fact that surprised virtually no one, but instead of presenting an apology, or even a straightforward confession, Rose comes across as a bitter man, still trying to squirm away from his wrongdoing. He blames everyone from his friends and business associates, to Major League baseball (for not forgiving his gambling addiction as it did the drug and alcohol addicitons of other players). Rather than presenting the public with his mea culpa, Charlie Hustle, the greatest baseball player of his era, left me feeling negative toward him, and thinking he is a slightly unintelligent crook. Those were not images I had of the man before I started this book and I'm sorry that's how I felt when I was done.If I could say something to the man whose life is the subject of this work, I'd tell him: Pete, you've led an interesting sixty-plus years. You're one of the greats and a hometown hero for what you did on the field. You deserve to be in Cooperstown. But your attempt to make amends with this book---probably your last chance, sadly--is a dismal failure and a backset. I remember well the night you passed Ty Cobb's all-time hitting record. I read this mostly to acquaint myself with a player about whom I heard so much growing up. I now wish I didn't know 4/5ths of what I now do know about you.As I said starting out: don't read this book
As authentic as a daytime soap opera. I'd heard the buzz (both pro and con) and thought I'd take an independent read. I was dismayed with this book.James Frey has insulted anyone who has gone through a real experience with substance addiction by trivializing the truth of whatever experience he really had. One of the hardest things an addict has to grasp is the TRUTH so that he can take ownership of his actions and take the 12 steps or whatever is necessary to save his life and often the lives of loved ones tangled up in the mess with him. Lies are what enable "slips" and "enabling" and "denial" and those other catch words that describe continued misery and failure. Recovery is nearly impossible without honesty. So, can we look at this man's "memoir" and expect it to offer anything of value? It's poorly constructed, repetitive, and narcisitic. Even if Oprah hadn't exposed him, the writing takes the tone of "whoppers" like Frey's account of the drug house visit in which he "rescues" Lilly. Other reviewers and Smoking Gun have written about the fantastic episodes one by one, and I can't improve on that.Suffice to say this mockery of misery and hope is no more real than a daytime soap opera.  Story lines in a soap may look like real life to one who is isolated from real life, the same way A Million Little Pieces might look to someone who has not been touched by real addiction. A real addict with typical delusion could be misdirected from a true course of treatment with tragic result.I was left with the impression he thinks institutions and people who help others with substance recovery are pitifully misdirected or inept. Like a joke of some kind. I'm not laughing.
Not written by actual students!  And lots of inaccurate information. This book isn't written by students.  Read the fine print.  What a sham!They get a LOT of their facts wrong.They boil down each school to innacurate stereotypes.  In the end, you have barely any idea what it's like to actually GO there!If you look at the fine print, the way they write this book is, they interview students ... compile a transcript of the interviews (often messing things up along the way) ... send those transcripts to writers, who have limited understandings of each school, and who misunderstand the information in the transcripts - and that's what's in this book, the flawed writer's take.Here are complaints that have run about this book in the past:---------The information in this book cannot be trusted to be accurate. For example, the write-up on Bryn Mawr claims that students there call themselves "Bryn Mawrians," when in fact Bryn Mawr students refer to themselves as "Mawrtyrs." Such evidence of sloppy research makes me wonder from where the writers get their information - and what else is just plain wrong.------I bought this book, and I looked at what the book said about my college (Pitzer) and everything you could pick off the website they got right. But as one has said before me, they get A LOT wrong. For example they say the school has two places students can eat, mentioning a place called "The Gold Mine," they mention this place a number of times, yet it does not exist. They talk about "nick names" that everyone calls the dorm buildings, nicknames that I have NEVER heard. Another example is the big fair that Pitzer has each year, there is a very strange story behind how the fair started. If they asked anyone on campus about the fair, they would could tell them the story. Yet the book says its a fair celebrating the coming of spring. Why would a college located in southern CA, with warm weather year round have a fair celebrating the coming of warm weather in the rest of the country? Yale kids are smarter then that? Arn't they? I gave a three star rating because general information is put in the same place. But there are a lot better books out there. So unless your just skimming the book while your in a book store, steer clear of this one.-------This book is horrible. They don't interview any students, they haven't for over 15 years. I'd stay away from this book, it will give you false hope and ruin your college experience. The publisher should stop running press on this garbarge. It's the SAME EXACT BOOK every single year, they just update the cover. Give it a rest!-------So, according to this guide every school must be either...a) A "party school" where the students are inebriated a greater percentage of the time than they spend in class. It turns out that the tuition and board at these schools are merely cover charges for the four years of parties and jam-band concerts. Chances are you'll miss the majority of your classes due to hangovers, so don't even bother with the academicsorb) A "nerd school" where the social life is defined by the number of people in your study group. Forget parties and fun at these schools kids, it's off to the library...Did we mention the lackluster "male to female ratio"...funny, considering they mention that for an all-male school...--------Overall - this is not a very helpful book to use while choosing colleges.  I wouldn't recommend it
vaudeville. She seems to have been heavily influenced by both azuza street crowd i.e. much of today's pentecostalism/charasmatics i.e. the toronto/brownsville blessing (a history which is fraught with charlatans and very biblically problemic) and hollywood.In studying many of her sermons what is readily apparent is the lack of any solid biblical understanding or doctrine. It was just get saved and jesus loves you. A cozy accomodation to the masses who can pretty much define that jesus they want to believe in and then follow.
LOW-FAT, LOW- SODIUM, LOW-SUGAR. This book still have the magic and mysticism of a distant planet, but is rather insipid and simplistic.  Very low-reading
CHARACTER, LOYALTY, COMMITMENT???. $aban uses the words Character, Loyalty & Commitment throughout this book...Obviously this is a clear case of, "Do as I say, NOT as I Do". Mr. Webster define's Hypocrite as, "one who pretends to be pious, virtuous, etc. without really being so"...How many time will they change the color of his shirt on this book's cover
Disappointed. You would think by now I would have learned not to judge a book by its cover, but that's exactly what I did in this case. The picture on the front cover is charming. The words "Fresh, engaging, and authentically British" from a Booklist reviewer are splashed on the cover. And that reeled me in.If you like the cozy mystery genre, and are a fan of Agatha Christie, Anne Perry, Dianne Day, Rita Mae Brown, or Margaret Miles, this may not be the book for you. If you liked the 90's TV show Roseanne, you're in for a treat. She's back, this time as a British house cleaner named Lois. Ann Purser goes out of her way to make Lois unsympathetic, and her husband Derek and daughter Josie downright annoying and unlikeable. It seems as though Purser's trying to break down the stereotype of the British mystery by choosing working-class characters in modern times, which I completely respect, but she's building up another stereotype at the same time: that working-class people are brash, crass, and argumentative.Aside from unsympathetic and sometimes annoying characters, the conclusion of this mystery is a bit far-fetched, and leaves a lot of questions unanswered. The sad thing is, I'm not even all that curious about having them answered.A very unsatifying read.
Are You Kidding Me With This?. I really don't mean to sound judgmental but this was the very worst book I have ever read.  I mean even Nancy Drew books have more of a mystery than this one did.I have always heard good things about the Jesse Stone Novels.  This was the first and only one I will read.  I don't know if the grammatical errors were the author's fault or the editor's.  Even the dialogue between characters didn't even have complete sentences.  Very poor sentence structure.  I agree with C. Richard's review..."Distracting" in that there are terrible grammar errors throughout this entire book and was hard to focus.Ths story was contrite and very easy to figure out way before the end of the book who the culprit was.  This is the only review I have given that has been a poor one.
Obvious ideas. I was forced to read this book because of a teacher of mine, for a topic at the university. She came to the classroom with this book, as if it were the ultimate guide on teaching. First of all, I thought it's not a topic for the kind of subject we were having/discussing in the classroom. Secondly, the things the authors wrote are so obvious, at least for some persons, that all I can say is that I really had a very good time reading it as a comic book, nothing else. I laughed very much with all the explanations a teacher would give to a 7 or 9 year-old pupil, because he touched her on the arm. It was a lecture, not a simple explanation! Clearly we have to be polite, encouraging and nice towards the students. But this book really exagerates some points in such a foolish way, that I could only laugh. I never had problems with students in my classes, I always tried to encourage them to like the subjects; I am sure they learned many things, as well as I learned from them, too. This book was just a waste of time.The worst thing is that the teacher I am talking about, the one who came to the classroom telling how wonderful the book is, doesn't practice what the book preaches! She is hated at the university and never behaves as the book says to. How is it possible? She didn't learn anything from it???Maybe it's good for people who are starting a teaching career - then I would say read it, but even though I would be very cautious. But being recommended by someone who does exactly the contrary than the book states, I could imagine it wouldn't really be that good.
When used as a self-study text ... When used as a self-study text, I found the book to be lacking a sufficient quantity of example problems solved in adequate detail to be truly helpful
slow, wordy. i really liked the first one and even went to my mom's house to pick up the second one (this) at 10:30 at night right after i had finished it because i was so pumped to read on. from the get go i could not get into this book and i had to force myself to get to page 120. not much has happened to make me want to finish it. very boring. not really into roz and mitch characters, i don't think they are very well developed, they seem kind of blah. and the story is kind of blah. blah, blah, blah, and just words for the blah, blah, blah going on and on.
it gets 1 star for the cover of the book, which I liked. This book was so horrible. It was given to me by one of my friends for Christmas. I'm so glad I didn't actually part with legal tender for this putrid novel. I forced myself through the book, not caring what happened to any of the characters who were flat and boring. It was the biggest waste of time (like something you'd read in a WGS class). And why is it that the only story I ever come across in anthologies by this woman is "where are you going, where have you been"? Is this her best story? How pathetic..
Not Anne Tyler's best. I usually really like Anne Tyler (and I do like her consistency in telling stories about characters that are real, but not necessarily likeable) but this was my least favorite book I've read by her.  I could understand how the main character felt marginalized in her life, and to some extent how she could make the decisions she made, but she just seemed to lack depth.  In a story that was mostly about stepping out of her life and creating a new one, this character seemed to shrink and lose depth when it seemed she should be growing.  To me the main character was difficult to identify with, and I found her choices often disappointing.  I've found Anne Tyler's other novels to have odd characters that were often nothing like me, but I could still identify with them on some level.  There are many other Anne Tyler books that should be read before (or instead of) reading this one
awesome book poor size. This is one of the best children's books ever written but it is a mini version of the book and was not portrayed as one.  It is over priced for the product.  I sent an email regarding my bewilderment  to Amazon and got no response
more fiction, than fact--  a wasted ot money--. This is a book for a novice, as no serious student of John Brown would consider the author has done any serious research. It's garbage. Reynolds states John Brown killed "Pro-Slavery" people. This is NOT true. The TESTIMONY of the VICTIMS, disprove that. The testimony shows John Brown murdered Northern people, while he and his men, acted like Southern people, trying to put the blame on Southern people. John Brown did not kill a single slaveowner in his murderous rampage.Here is a quote from a Serious researched book on John Brown:Some people believe John Brown is "A HERO". After the event below, John Brown and his gang would ride to four more houses continuing their slaughter.  "A Hero"?[Quoting directly from Otto Scotts book, sourced below]The night was hot and humid; the river was not far away. The Doyle family was asleep as the men approached their cabin. Two bulldogs rushed out, barking. Two of the men stopped and slashed one to death with their sabers. The other dog fled, howling, and the family awoke.The men knocked heavily on the door and James Doyle swung out of bed. "What is it?" he called."What way to the Wilkinson place?" a man's voice answered.Doyle opened the door, saying he would tell them, and was almost knocked off his feet when several men rushed in shouting, "We're the Northern Army! Surrender!"Mahala Doyle clutched her youngest, a girl, and began to stammer. "Hush, Mother, hush," said James Doyle. His three sons moved beside him: William, twenty-two, Drury, twenty, and Hon, fourteen. The men pushed Doyle, and then the two eldest sons, out the door. Mahala Doyle began to weep, but when they reached for the fourteen-year-old she sprang out of bed and clutched him "Not him; Oh, God, not him." (3)The old man in the light jacket, leather tie, and farmer's straw hat, his face as thin and stern as an ax, punched the boy back and the men left, slamming the door.Mahala Doyle clutched John and listened, her eyes wide.The men stopped their prisoners about two hundred yards from the Doyle cabin, The leader placed his revolver against Doyle's forehead and pulled the trigger (4) as coolly as a man shooting a lame horse.That set them off. One, in a frenzy stabbed Doyle's corpse with his saber. William Doyle was stabbed in the face, slashed over the head and shot in the side. Drury broke and ran in the darkness, was pursued, and overtaken near a ravine. He put his arms up to ward off their blows, but the men, bearded, burley, and in a near frenzy, hacked at him with their sabers. His fingers and then his arms were cut off, his head was cut open, and he was stabbed in the chest. They continued to hack after he fell-and after he was dead. He had frightened them; he might have escaped.The Wilkinson cabin was next.Source-"The Secret Six" (John Brown and the Abolitionist Movement)-Otto Scott-copyright-1979-p.6(3) [p.323] Cf. Howard Report Appendix, ex parte testimony, 1193; Villard, op. cit. 159(4) [p.323] James C. Malin, John Brown and the Legend of Fifty-Six (Philadelphia: The American Philosophical Society, 1942), p. 385.Dr. Malin, who explored John Brown's career in Kansas with thoroughness that has enraged propagandists, especially Marxists ones, quotes George Grant-a young settler who knew that Brown boys, saw them leave on their murder mission, and spoke that Brown shot Doyle but personally did nothing more..."[End quote]*****************I've read several books on John Brown, and -"The Secret Six" (John Brown and the Abolitionist Movement)-Otto Scott, is, (IMHO) the best one ever printed
700+ pages of reader suffering. This novel started out pretty good in that I didn't know where Koontz was going with Martie's panic attacks and fear of herself.  It seemed to take FOREVER for anything to actually happen. The antagonist was a caricature.  So over-the-top, it was a job getting through each page. If this had been my first Koontz novel, I probably wouldn't bother with a second.
Miller's NYT reporting needs to be remembered. Anyone who's read this book, or is considering doing so, should consider what has come to light about Judith Miller's reporting in the build-up to the Iraq war (simply do a search on google for "Judith Miller" - see, in particular, the articles in Slate). Miller was regularly writing front page columns for the New York Times which contained sensational claims (now known to be wildly inaccurate) about Iraq's possession - or efforts to obtain - WMDs. One telling detail to the quality of Miller's reporting can be gleaned from her concession in May of 2003 that the now-discredited Ahmed Chalabi provided most of the scoops (aka lies) for her front page stories on WMDs.Based on the sheer extent of errors in her pre-war reporting, I think readers of Miller's work need to utilize a heightened degree of skepticism when assessing her claims.
Trash Book and the trash networks it covers. If you can read something that looks like it was written by a five year old child, as well as not get sick to your stomach on all the trash it covers, this only confirms that the networks are only interested in money, not program content
The silver kiss. In my opionion The silver kiss was a good story. Its just i really didnt like how fast it went or how it ended.... . But dont get me wrong it was a real page turner i couldnt wait to finish
Unpleasant Reading. After 20 minutes of reading I just couldn't take Epstein's self-absorbed writing style anymore. When buying I really wanted to like this book
Very disappointing!. After reading reviews here I decided to buy this book. I love books by Indian authors (I am Indian myself), and really like the simplicity portrayed in such books. However, this one was not up to the mark.A lot of things didn't make sense. First of all, how can Devi's sister be so insensitive and think about **x when her sister has just tried to commit suicide? Moreover, is it possible for the entire family to be so mean to the mother who actually "runs" the house? I had to skip many pages because it got to be such a drag.I also did not like the writer's (amateurish) style of writing - it reminded of Sydney Sheldon / Daniel Steel books where certain feelings are exaggerated. The writer also did not really give us a glimpse into the real psyche of the characters. The story was cliched - one sister is better than the other, people compare them, etc.All in all, I would just skip this book and move on to other "rich Indian books" by talented writers. I was seeking a book highlighting simplicity, realistic Indian families, and an interesting sense of style. I found neither in this book
A poorly writen book with many glaring ommissions. This is a poorly written book with many glaring ommissions
Boring and confusing. I have derived many hours of pleasure from this author. My favorite is Ivanhoe. I wouldn't recommend this one, though. It is boring and confusing
Not Krentz's best!. I usually really enjoy Jayne Ann Krentz and her alter ego Amanda Quick, but I actually returned this one to the library unfinished. I found it boring and the whole dream reader concept to be unbelievable
STUDENTS BEWARE!. This author is notorious for errors, serious omissions, & questionable "sources" in his work.If you are a student, DO NOT CITE THIS MAN'S BOOKS AS SOURCE MATERIAL IN A PAPER OR THESIS
Discard it!. This is one of the worst books I have ever read.  Its title deceives us.  We expect to see things like "kittens are cuddly," or "mothers love us."  Instead we read "snow is white," and "rain is wet."  We are led to believe there is something important in "whiteness" and "wetness," but these are merely descriptions of the world about us.  In giving such bland descriptions, the author attempts to derive values from facts, in effect deadening our senses to what should be depicted for children as a wonderful world.  The fact of the matter is, there's nothing important about this book at all.  Discard it!
Disappointing. I do usability inspections as part of my job.  I bought this book based on Nielsen's reputation and the description of this book here on Amazon.com.  I was very disappointed to find that this book was scholarly, not practical.  After scanning the book, I returned it for refund
Great book - TERRIBLE edition. Don't take the star rating wrong - this is as good as any of the other books in this series, but this edition (Quiet Vision Publishing - paperback, printed in 2000) is the cheapest printing of a book I've ever seen. Only about 20 pages into it, pages started falling out of the back. The type is huge and goes all the way to the edge of the page so your thumbs are constantly in the way while you're trying to read, and there are typographical errors like using two hyphens instead of em dashes. I know they make an electronic version of this book. As part of my job I convert a lot of print-intended content to digital publishing formats, and that's what usually happens to em dashes during that process, so I almost wonder if they just printed out their digital version and bound it. It looks like it was printed on a laser printer (especially the terrible cover illustration which looks like it was drawn by a 12-year old), and the fonts look like they're just PC-standard 'Times'. There are also several footnotes, which in the original edition that I read years ago were placed at the bottom of the page they were referenced from. In this edition they're in the back of the book
Not Well Written. I have read hundreds of paranormal romances and this one just does not have it at all.  Besides the numerous spelling errors, the story line  is trite, the character development weak and the conversation inane and unbelieveable.  The idea isn't bad but the story development is amaturish and the contact between the two is like child and mentor rather than lover.  None of the love scenes were believeable in even a remote manner.  They seem to have been taken from other stories so therefore lacked power.  It cost way too much for the lack of worthy story.  If you want to give Offen a try, borrow the book from someone or the library. Don't waste your money.  I purchased this and the second in the series which I am not going to read.  I'll give it to the half price book store and let someone else suffer through the stories.
The legend of bagger vance. I am disgusted that you would even think to ask me what my thoughts are. I emailed you with a complaint that the copy I bought was listed as new. I complained that the page edges gave the appearance they had been torn using a ruler rather than guillatined. I was very disapointed with the book and even moreso that you failed to reply to my email - I have bought a few books fom you and intended to buy more but your professionalism is so lacking that I think from now on I'll shop elsewhere.Lindsay Elliott AFSMPO Box 42KedronQueensland, Australia 4031Ph:0409899574You have my email address!
Not the caliber of Jensen's former books... I eagerly looked forward to buying and reading this book.  Having read Jensen's other books, I have come to appreciate his willingness to address the ills of this society.  However, I was deceived by the title, which I felt would discuss revolution or solutions to the ills of this society.  Here is the final line to the book, &quot;There is much work to be done.  What are you waiting for?  It's time to begin&quot;.  To be honest, I expected more.  I could not shake the feeling that Jensen's recollection of the class discussions were half made up.  If you are seeking a book that looks at how a teacher can institute a no grading policy in class while seeking to institute a non-hierarchal classroom, then this book MAY be for you.  I say MAY, because being a teacher myself I have already played with these ideas and more.  I liked at times how Jensen addresses the free-loader problem within the system he uses, and although he fixes this problem within his classes, he never discusses the ramifications of his solutions or the ramifications of letting a free-loader turn in more than one or two recycled papers throughout the semester.  Hence, the disappointment of the book.  I honestly found myself saying three-quarters of the way through the book, &quot;What a waste&quot; and &quot;This feels like filler&quot;.  To sum up, Jensen's previous books are wonderful because I knew what I was getting, this book I felt did not address the issue of change (revolution) and thus I was not satisfied.  Be free thinkers and then what?  Bring back the Renaissance era?  What happened to the Hippies in the 60's?  They got jobs.  How do we negotiate idealism and realism?  The solution must address both
Dark Victory: America's Second War Against Iraq. In 1993, Record, a former Senate Armed Services Committee staff member, authored Hollow Victory: A Contrary View of the Gulf War[1] in which he took President George H.W. Bush to task for not ousting Saddam Hussein. In the present book, Record takes George W. Bush to task for having corrected his father's mistake.The new book, while well written, is reduced by the author's permeating antipathy for so-called neoconservatives, alleging without proof that a sympathy for Israel's Likud Party colors their view of the world. While it is true that neoconservatives tend to be staunch supporters of Israel, every president since Harry Truman has defended Israel's right to exist and to defend itself. Nor is there anything new about U.S. support for democracy or opposition to terror. The only recent development is a willingness of the U.S. government to reach out to new partners, even if this means working without traditional allies. Record further blames neoconservatives for "the president's controversial use-of-force doctrine," curiously overlooking the impact of 9/11 on Bush's thinking.Record holds neoconservatives responsible for pursuing policies that cause many adversaries to dislike the United States. He laments "the Bush administration's foreign policy fails to grasp the fact that others do not see us as we see ourselves-that is, as a benign and historically exceptional force." But the Bush administration does grasp this; it just believes that being respected is more important than being liked. The costs of winning Syrian, North Korean, or Chinese favor for U.S. policy would be too high if it meant abandonment of democracies such as Israel, South Korea, and Taiwan. Conversely, Libyan strongman Mu'ammar al-Qadhafi may not like the United States, but it was his respect for the Bush administration's willingness to back force with military action that led to his decision to abandon his nuclear ambitions.Record's style is confident and authoritative with plenty of facts cited and examples given. A close read, though, shows that Record ignores facts that undermine his arguments. For example, he trumpets a 1999 UNICEF report that relied on Iraqi government statistics to conclude that sanctions on Iraq killed 500,000 Iraqi children; he ignores a joint Food and Agriculture Organization and World Health Organization study the following year that found that half the Iraqi population was overweight, and that hypertension and diabetes-not diseases of the hungry-were among the leading causes of Iraqi mortality.[2] Other facts he simply gets wrong. How could the Defense Department have airlifted Ahmad Chalabi into Iraq during military operations when Chalabi had returned to Kurdish-controlled northern Iraq months before the war began?Dark Victory has many other weaknesses. Record engages in one-man's-terrorist-is-another's-patriot moral relativism. He conflates the Afghan mujahideen with Al-Qaeda, an anachronism that ignores a decade-long fight between Al-Qaeda pan-Islamists and Afghan nationalists such as Ahmad Shah Masud. While determined to debunk any analogy between postwar Japan and Iraq, Record ignores the South Korea example, frequently cited by Deputy Defense Secretary Paul Wolfowitz. Notably absent from a book about Iraq is any consideration of what Iraqis think; Record writes as if Iraqis do not exist.A book should be more than a glorified op-ed. Unfortunately, Dark Victory is not.Middle East Quarterly, Spring 200
Why Not Actually Read the Books?. Tolkien's books are brilliant.  Why read cheat sheets?  You can just enjoy the fantastic majesty of his novels
Whoppers...more or less unsubstantiated. In 'Gold Warriors' by Sterling and Peggy Seagrave claim that materials seized by the Japanese military from across Asia between 1895 and 1945 have been used to finance a range of ethically and morally questionable political activities with the United States government acting as the leader of this cabal.These valuables range from cultural items through intellectual property, industrial materials and equipment and precious and semi-precious gemstones to massive quantities of gold and other metals. The Seagraves claim that much of the materials seized between 1942 and 1945 were secreted at 175 sites in the Philippines; this country being used as the transit station.The authors go on to state that much of this treasure trove has been recovered by a loosely linked collection of groups including the US, Japanese and Phillipino governments, various crime cartels and treasure hunters. In the case of the US governemnt, this wealth was used to finance anti-communist and/or right-wing agenda groups.When I considered how to rate this book, I was conflicted. As fiction, it is clearly worth a five star rating. As non-fiction, that is to say the truth, I have to give it two stars...and that's generous.The problem is lack of documentation for many of the claims. Now, before the Seagraves or you say, "Check the CDs!" (the authors tell you repeatedly of the wealth of information that is on three CDs you can get from them...sort of like the hunt for the gold and other valuables in this story:  "The wealth is there, surely you must beleive me!")  I have to say, "I purchased this book on the assumption the story would be told with backing documentation attached."Documentation is few and far between this work. Some other critques have cited mis-spellings of place names and technical inaccuracies related to volumes of gold in the world. To them, I want to add:  Battery Crockett on Corregidor - cited as a location where looted gold was hidden in the remains of a power room hit by a Japanese shell - was neither a mortar battery, nor was it damaged by a major explosion caused by the Japanese bombardment. The explosion happened at Battery Geary.In addition, the site of Post Theater - where a small quantity of gold was hidden in a bomb crater that a treasure hunter was able to locate because he was able to find two aerial photos of the site that were taken minutes apart with one showing the crater and the second showing the crater having been filled - is also mis-identified as to location on Corregidor. For those who care, the Post Theater was on Middleside, close to the major set of enlisted barracks, not on Topside near MacArthur's so-called headquarters and the 'Mile-long Barracks'. In fact, while the Post Headquarters was at Topside, MacArthur's HQ was in Manila until he evacuated the city. Then it was in Malinta Tunnel, well below the surface of the island. In fact, it was his using the tunnel that resulted the troops calling him, 'Dugout Doug'.)All this simply builds the case for not just shoddy research but a questionable truth about what is being said as a whole.As I have not seen the CDs (BTW, I don't intend to pursue getting them) I don't know if they contain information that may provide proof for many of the statements contained in this book. You see, if they don't, we are compelled to believe second and third hand accounts of what deceased and/or unidentified individuals have claimed.Or at least it is a statement that the authors claim was made. My concern is that validity is not automatically granted by placing a statement in quotations; an activity that occurs frequently in this book.It is in that aspect that this book falls into what I call "heresay history," a circumatnce where the opinions of an author or authors are presented as documented evidence.In fact, as I think about this story - which I'm sure contains any number of truths like Japanese looting and hiidng of valuables and killing of POWs - my overall impression is 'Gold Warriors' great similarity with other questionably documented stories such as Roswell, The Philadelphia Experiment, The Montauk Project or Project Phoenix, the Kennedy Assasination Conspiracies, etc. etc. etc.But, it is a heck of an entertaining read on a long airplave flight
Disappointing. This was not the life-changing book it was touted to be. I have no major complaints, but the book was not helpful
All hype, no substance. Clever marketing ploy, calling this the last novel written by an author, supposedly a passenger on Oceanic Flight 815, portrayed in the ABC series LOST. There are even LOST references sprinkled throughout the book - Hanso, Mr. Cluck's, John Locke, Oceanic. Unfortunately, it's the only clever aspect to this book. It's a wholly sophomoric effort in the private dick genre.PI Paul Artisan is hired by a rich man to find the man's identical twin, the supposed "bad" twin of the title. For a novel this short, Artisan spends an enormous amount of time thinking screamingly inappropriate thoughts about women he meets along the way - some simply in passing - including bedding the rich man's stepmother and a hippie yoga instructor named Sky. About half-way through the story, Paul makes some high-handed comment that he's not doing to the job just for money anymore. This statement comes completely out of the blue. I didn't find his thoughts or his actions backing this up.The author has the annoying habit of repeatedly referring to the protagonist by his full name. Really not necessary, since they're the first two words of the book. Paul has a mentor with whom he discusses the case, a former college instructor named Manny, with whom he shares custody of an aging, but young-at-heart Labrador named Argos. Manny has a knack for making his point by referring to classics like Lord of the Flies and King Lear. References which, invariably, Paul never gets, and Manny has to explain.Frankly, I would have rather read a book about the dog
Terrible if you Speak Spanish. I normally don't put a book down without finishing it, especially one in the genre of classic American literature.  However, Hemingway's English translations were so irritating, trite, and immature that I could not get past them.  The use of "thy" and "thou" to indicate the ud. form is ridiculous in 20th century English.  Quoting the characters as asking, "How do you call yourself?" instead of "What is your name?" is downright silly.  If Hemingway really wanted to convey what the characters were saying literally, he should have simply quoted them in Spanish and provided a translation in parentheses or in an index.  Regardless, who needs a literal translation?  How is "How do you call yourself" better than "What is your name"?  And is it really important to know who uses ud. to whom when this form doesn't even exist in modern English?  I found these "translations" so distracting from what was going on that I couldn't continue past chapter 2.  I get the impression that the hundreds of reviewers who have raved about this book over the past 65 years don't speak Spanish.
Not For Football Fans. Having first seen the movie, I was prepared that this was not a starry-eyed wholesale endorsement of high school football, but I was still thrilled when my wife surprised me with a copy to read.I have never been so dissapointed with a book on football, or all of sports for that matter. I enjoyed Next Man Up and A Civil War, due to Feinstein's balance between negative and positive lights on the game. Bissinger, in Friday Night Lights, shows no such balance.He does not "follow the season" in any logical fashion, sometimes skipping entire games, and spends a chapter instead focusing on national politics. Honestly, you'll see the name of Michael Dukakis more than you will the name of Permian's starting quarterback.I love football, I love high school athletics, and found this book to be very annoying. Check it out in a library before you spend your dollars on it
The worst choice. I bought it on Aug 24th and it is already Sept 23 but I haven't received it.  I already requested for refund.  What a worst service you guys offer!! I won't buy it via your service again
Too short, too high level. We own about 15 of the DK Eyewitness Travel guides, and have dogeared the pages over several trips. They are amazingly useful.But this one is not their best effort. Hawaii is a very diverse place, and to try and "hit the highlights" in a travel guide is a mistake. This book is right at 200 pages, but almost 80 are about Honolulu, Wakiki and Oahu, leaving only 120 pages for all of the other islands. Even the pieces about Oahu (with little info about the west coast/Makaha and just a mattering on the North Shore) and Honolulu (with a few measly paragraphs on Pearl Harbor) is scant.As I said, I love the DK Eyewitness series, it is the first travel book we get when going someplace new. But for Hawaii, there are several other books more in-depth. If you are going to Maui or The Big Island, I suggest getting Maui:Revealed or Hawaii The Big Island: Revealed (each 300 pages, pictures, maps, etc.)
Did the other reviewers read the same book that I did?. Wow! Where do I start? There were probably 50-60 grammar errors in this very short book. Didn't the author have a proofreader? You will be feeling like you wasted your $10 with this. Even the 3 free bonuses listed on the cover aren't accessible. The link provided in the book doesn't work. The author states in the Introduction, "This information is going to blow your mind..." That it did for its lack of value. The few simplistic secrets that he refers to as his "little known system" are all over the internet, and are free. He admits to being a promoter, and it shows
Good pictures.....text leaves a bit to be desired. This book reads a lot like an entry-level psychology textbook where you get a taste of what is about to come, but you never quite get there.  The author has gone to some great pain to provide you a psychological overview of what various signs and symbols mean in regard to Freemasonry.  Instead of taking the symbology at face value, as most people would do, the author has "read between the lines" and interpreted what is "really meant" by the working tools, and so forth, of the craft.  My impression is that much of the interpretation is a bit far fetched.  Case in point, the author states on page 31, "This collection of symbols, and particularly their proximity to the place in the Temple where Divinity is said to reside, indicates that a Master Mason, in the sense that we are defining him, is a person who is conscious at a psychological level which relates to the World of the Spirit in the same way that our ordinary ego is conscious of the body and the physical world."  Overall, this book is a rapid fire snapshot of many works of art regarding Masonry, but the emphasis is more-or-less on a pseudo-psychological impression that one man has attempted to define and apply to the craft.  The message throughout the book seems a bit juvenile for such a strong subject.  The text is well written though and has found a place on my bookshelf, if for no other reason than the pictures that accompany the text.  The photographs throughout the book make it worth buying if no other reason applies
Pseudo-Christian Claptrap. I will never ever recommend this author. She may claim to be a Christian, but her behavior is anything but. This person has no business counseling parents of homosexuals, as it is clear she has no understanding of them. She describes them as something that formed wrong, flowers that didn't open. I have news for you, Ms. Johnson. God doesn't make mistakes. Each person is made that way for a reason, just because you can't get out of a stone age interpretation of the Bible, don't infect other parents and friends of gay people with your poisonous fake christian "love". I want to go wash my hands in lysol. It is because of attitudes like hers that Christians like me are portrayed as a bunch of whacko nutjobs
You wouldn't want to share a carriage with this fellow. I started this book because I love the quote about writing being but a different word for conversation.  Yes, there are moments of great wit.  However, they are lost within a mass of verbiage so dense that it makes your mortgage agreement look like a Little Golden Book.  It's not the sublime non-linearity of Joyce's writing or Ornette Coleman's playing.  It's the amplification of the self to an unbearable degree.  Certainly a unique achievement, I guess.  But so is Lou Reed's &quot;Metal Machine Music.&quot
Hardly about Robert Oppenhimer. The title of this book is very misleading. It is minimally about Los Alamos and even more minimally about Robert Oppenheimer.You will learn more about the travails associated with the drive from Santa Fe to Los Alamos than you will about any of the scientific contributions of Robert Oppenheimer.The author seemed to take more interest in the social activities in Los Alamos than in what Oppenheimer was offering to contribute to the production of the Atomic Bomb.....except of course, that is, for his famous martini's, and his inspiring speeches.There was entire chapter devoted to the birth rate at Los Alamos. This is not what I hoped to learn regarding Los Alamos and Oppenheimer.Then there was the authors droning on about the socio-political tensions amongt the scientists' wives.The woman (Dorothy McKibbin) who was responsible as the gatekeeper (at 109 East Palace Place)was frequently portrayed as having and endless infatuation of Oppenheimer. All the way through the book references were made regarding how enthralled she was of him (even on page 348: "He hypnotized me with those blue eyes.").Again I fail to see what that has to do with Oppenheimer as the "Father of the Atomic Bomb" or the Secret City of Los Alamos.If you pick this book hoping that it will promise what the title suggests you will be very disappointed
So bad it should never have been published. I'm really very surprised that anyone liked this book at all.  How could anyone who likes Salinger's writing stand reading Alexander's terrible prose?  It is really painful, and that's just the starting point.  As others on this page have mentioned, the author has little or no understanding of Salinger's work (the example of his misunderstanding the story &quot;Teddy&quot; is a particularly good example, but the book is strewn with them).  Worse, the author isn't just ignorant but actually hostile to Salinger.  It's hard to understand why someone would take the time to write a book about someone he clearly dislikes.  If you must read this book out of curiousity, get it at the library.  I felt really ripped off after buying this book, and wished I had not given a nickle to this creepy author.  And if you are NOT familiar with Salinger, by all means do not read this book.  Read Salinger.  Your own speculation about the guy based on his fiction will make more sense that this so-called biography
It's a CRIME that this book is still for sale. The publishers should be sued. Maybe we should get a class-action together.Imagine taking an instruction manual for the very first Apple computer and putting a new title on it "How to use your new home computer" and selling it in bookstores today. This book is doing EXACTLY that!Also, it is highly doubtful that the tactic ever worked in the first place. The author's website vanished years ago. In a thinly traded NYSE stock if you try to repeatedly front the specialist with 2000 share orders he will simply move the price 50 cents against you immediately following your next purchase. Game over.[...
Too much hyp for an "okay" book. I have heard that this is a children's book (and perhaps there are abridged versions), but I have no idea how a middle schooler could read this dense, verbose novel and understand the subtle, underlying themes Swift portrays. I have heard many positive reviews concerning this book, and although there are many insightful points, perhaps the material was not presented in a interesting fashion, for very often I got lost in the words and nonending references to English politics. On the other hand, it's important to note that in the early 18th century, English satire was probably extremely dry (very different from today, huh :) ) and hard to follow. All in all, this book is an exploration into man's true nature and, despite the sometimes clumsy manipulation of langauge, expresses a mature intellect that reflects Swift's intelligence.
Glad I didn't pay hardcover price. I LOVE Suzanne Brockmann's writing. If she were any other author, I'd give it 1 star. This one just didn't do it for me. I didn't like the heroine Jane (who seemed irritating & immature) and I didn't care about Cosmo (i guess the character development was lacking). I couldn't identify with the gay FBI agent and the intern chasing the in-the-closet actor storyline was a flat out bore. I read romance for escape - one of the last things I want to do is escape into a homosexual love story. I never finished her last book (an extremely disappointing read - the one abt the CIA agents). I don't know if i'm going to finish this one. I certainly hope Max & Gina's story doesn't follow this pattern of poorly developed characters.
This book is bad. This won a pulitzer for reasons I don't understand.  Maybe it's because I'm not sophisticated enough, but after reading Gunter Grass I'm starting to think literary awards are given out on the basis of how regular and detailed the physical descriptions of male genitalia and its veins are in the book.  This is a leaving Las Vegas style story about a guy who decides to drink himself to death.  The only problem is he's lived his whole life and settled in to die by a quarter of the way through the book.  This book gives you empathy with the main character not by putting you in his skin through skilled storytelling, but by boring you to the point you yourself know what it's like to want to die.  This book seems mainly to be loved by those who deem it a mark of sophistication to like things most people find offensive.  Sex, foul language, crude descriptions - they're all fine as a means to an end but this books parades them for no literary purpose I can detect.  This book has interesting elements, but it's bad
Toxic psyachiatry is toxic for parents of the mentally ill. I was going to assign this book to my students in my Abnormal Psychology class... The first chapter is powerful and true. However, this author irresponsibly attacks the parents of the mentally ill as responsible for their children's illnesses!!!! He also attacks NAMI, the National Association of the Mentally Ill, an organization that has helped more mentally ill patients recover, find support and their way to a successful and meaningful life, and has truly educated more people about mental illness than Breggin has ever done himself, I am sure. The good points the book makes about inadequate and even harmful psychiatric care in mental institutions are, in my opinion, obfuscated by his unwarranted attacks on parents -- attacks, I believe, that may be a result of his old-fashioned psychoanalytical training
An Easy Read That Left Me Wanting. I was so impressed that Mr. Rubenstein had been named teacher of the year, and that he used humor in his title that I really wanted to read his book.Many of us want to hear eachothers' stories and gain knowledge, new perspective, or steal from another teacher's toolbox of tricks.My opinion of Mr. Rubenstein's experience is that he has become a hardened, sarcastic, and unresponsive teacher. His theories and strategies are very last century, and I do not mean 1990.  While I applaud his ability to poke fun at himself, to recognize that he is always under the microscope of his students, and to have created a strategy that "worked" for him, I cringe at the lessons (humane, societal, responsive, responsible) that he's teaching his high school students.My suggestion to all educators' looking for a helpful book on classroom management and discipline is to first take a good long hard look at themselves and ask two questions. First, What do I want the children to learn? Second, How am I planning hte activity for success?
This is not her best. I have read everybook Karen Kingsbury has written and I have to say that I struggled to finish this one. Most of her books are written with many plot lines, this book sad to say was very slow and boring. She attempted to make so much out of one thought and it did not work well. I hope that she returns to her previous style of writing. I would not recommend this book to anyone if that had not read her before. I am positive that they would be "left deflated.
Balanced mixture of good and crap. OK... this book has action. However, it seemed to me that the action sequences were not written for the readers but rather to satisfy Author's need to be tedious and verbose.Here is a question I want to throw at the people who read this book and gave it more than 2 stars."How did the military test Supernova to see whether it works or not in the first place before it was stolen?"I sure as hell would love to know the answer to this question from the readers who are hyping this book and also the author himself.This book is trash. Dump it and move on to the next one on your list
Review of "The Passing of The Great Race". "The Passing of The Great Race" was one of the racialist books written between 1855 and 1920 that would strongly influence the the National Socialist Party. The first was Gobineau's "The Inequality of The Human Races", the second was Houston Stewart Chamberlain's "The Foundations of The Nineteenth Century", the third was this one, and the fourth was Lothrop Stoddard's "The Rising Tide of Color Against White World Supremacy". Grant was a lawyer and conservationist who was a firm beleiver in the Old Order, free of Bolshevism and Socialism and centered around an Anglo-Saxon culture. Grant always tried to portray himself as more scientific than romantic racial theorists such as Chamberlain, but his theories actually have little scientific basis. For example, his division of Whites into Nordic, Alpine, and Mediterranean Races is anchored only on the basis of Nordic Scnadinavians having blonde hair, Alpine Slavs having brown hair, and Mediterranean Italians having black hair. Even worse is Grant's lack of historical basis. He considers the French, Southern Germans, and Poles to be a mix of Teutonic or Celtic Nordic peoples and dark-haired Alpine peoples who invaded Europe from Asia, but there was never any record of Asiatic peoples reaching France or Germany, at least not after the Celtic period. His classifications of Alpine are also very flimsy. He considers Southern Germans to be of Alpine stock, completely ignoring the fact that Southern Germans speak a Teutonic language and often have Teutonic features such as blonde hair and blue eyes. He also considers the Walloons of Belgium to be Alpine, ignoring the fact that they are descendants of the Celtic Belgae, who the Romans clearly described as being tall with blonde and red hair {sounds Nordic to me}. He also claims that the Irish and Welsh have substantial amounts of Mediterranean blood, ignoring the fact that both those peoples are Celtic and often have blonde or red hair. The most puzziling part of this whole thing is how this book became so popular when practicaly everyone is labled as inferior. Grant considers the only pure Nordics to be people with blonde hair and blue eyes, so why did people like Teddy Roosevelt {brunett} endorse it? Grant's book just lacks any spirit. I've read Chamberlain's "Foundations of The Nineteenth Century", and anyone who is of Celtic, Teutonic, or Slavic stock and is anti-Semitic will be riled up with the romaticism of the "Germanic" race being in constant battle with the Jews for survival. Anyone who has Celtic, Scandinavian, German, Anglo-Saxon, Polish, or Baltic ancestry is included in this Germanic race, while Grant tends to alienate anyone who isn't a blonde, blue-eyed Anglo-Saxon or Swede, even putting the Germans down as inferior. This book should also be compared to Stoddard's "The Rising Tide of Color", which was written four years later. Stoddard also went by the Nordic-Alpine-Mediterranean model, but focused less on this than on the White Race as a whole. Stoddard was a visionary, looking to White issue in the future. While Grant clamored about keeping non-Nordic Russians and Italians out of the country, Stoddard warned that the real dangers are non-White Asians and Negroes. Grant's book has little relevance to today's issues, as practically every White American is a German-Irish-Polish-Italian mix. Stoddard, however, saw that all Whites had to band together against the "rising tide of color".
A book for a Princess. I ordered this book because my husband who owns his own remodeling company never gets around to fixing anything in our home (go figure).  I was disapointed because it seems most of this book refers to is for people who have ZERO knowledge.  How to look at a circuit breaker?  Come on if you don't know that then you don't need to attempt any of these things in this book.  It did include some basic wiring which I was glad for.  I would definitely save your money however & find something not so "dummy" oriented if you already know the basics.
Vastly Over-Written and Vastly Over-Praised. From the remarks at this site, people either love this novel or hate it. I hated it. I hated it for the reason that it represents all that is bad about MFA program writing in the last 30 years. The emphasis is entirely on STYLE. Forget story. Forget that your reader needs some reason to be reading the narrative. Just throw out and string together wonderful language and the reader will follow you anywhere. Some of this thinking goes back to Henry James, some of it goes back to Virginia Woolf who was so terrified of books with plots or dominating conceits (like H.G. Wells' THE TIME MACHINE). The first 100 pages of this novel are about a real estate deal and the people to whom Frank Bascombe is trying to sell a property. It's brilliantly written. In fact, it's so brilliantly written that I had a lot of problems seeing a former sportswriter being so introspective and articulate about his life, his loves, and the region of the country he inhabits. This book has no driving plot. In fact, it's an arbitrarily chosen conceit: what happens on July 4th in the life of one guy. It's not James Joyce's ULYSSES nor is it trying to be, but EVERY thought this man has is in this book. And none of it is related to a plot or story or any reason whatever why a person--any perso--should pick up the book.Indeed, that seems to be the crux. I read this book because it was by Richard Ford, a man whom all of my colleagues in the mainstream fiction world revere. You must read this book, they said. So I did. And I consider it an extraordinary waste of my time. To be sure, this is a judgment call, but I'm allowed to make it. EVERY reader is allowed to make that call. But I know I'm in the minority in this. This book is supposed to be one of the greatest American novels of the last 25 years. But will it be so in another 25 years? Are novels now only to be interior monologues (which Virginia Woolf preferred and said so in her essay "Modern Fiction")?Perhaps our values are changing. Perhaps the MFA programs in this country are correct in only cultivating style rather than story. But what it eventually evolves into is a form of narcissism, wherein the author writes at length, putting on the page all of his or her thoughts about whatever and we're supposed to . . . what? Applaud it?I believe that the authors we'll remember will be the natural storytellers. I don't think Richard Ford is one of them. But, man, he sure can write
they teach all this in college. I didn't see anything in this book that was not covered in my college courses. I felt like the author assumed I knew nothing, and it felt like she was speaking down to me. I wish I had never bought this book because now I have to deal with the hassle of returning it
Good book, but don't listen to the audio version. I have listened to (and enjoyed) many books on CD in the past few years.  This reader is among the worst that I've had the displeasure of hearing.  The content of this book is great, so don't get me wrong.  However, the reader makes it impossible to experience the book the way it was intended.  He pronounces many character names incorrectly, including Carpathia and Adbullah.  His character voices range from unconvincing to downright abrasive and/or annoying (especially Carpathia's).  His voice inflection is often very wrong when reading dialogue.  He also adds pauses in the middle of sentences without any obvious reason.  These are just the most obvious and annoying problems.  There are too many to list completely here, so please trust me and avoid listening to this book
Avoid this like the plague. This is without doubt the worst book on DHTML/Javascript that I've ever read.  The author tries to be cute, funny and authorative but ends up just plain painful.  The examples are over-long and artificial, and would be difficult to incorporate into a real world application.  The author peppers the book with snazzy shots like "It's the modern way!" but rarely explains the benefits of the methodology he's pushing, and glosses over any shortcomings.For instance, in discussing regular expressions he provides a simple expression for a telephone number, then points out that it's seriously flawed.  But it's "suitable for our discussion" so onward we press, and a correct solution is never provided.  Bad luck if you were after such a beast. (Footnotes abound - often just URLs to now broken links - so you have to wonder why he couldn't have provided the solution at the bottom of the page.)  The part on Ajax is a joke - he just plugs in an out-of-date version of the Sarissa library and never scratches below the surface.Beware
Snack on this. Well, I'm not sure what the tastes of previous reviewers are, but they certainly are not aligned with mine.  Thank goodness I checked this out from the library instead of immediately ordering it.  I was appalled to discover how absolutely disgusting many of the recipes sound.  To give you an idea: "anchovy balls," "cooked tongue canapes," and "mayonaise popovers" (the poor Brits would be dying a thousand deaths over what has happened to their beloved Yorkshire puddings in this recipe).  Fancy a recipe for chicken skin?  Because it's in here!Many recipes favor 70s recipe stars like white bread (read: Wonder Bread), "American processed cheese," cream cheese balls and the equivalent of Vienna sausages.  My stomach trembles.  And then there are the Duh, Obvious "snacks" like toast (!!) or my personal favorite, a "recipe" for a hot dog and a piece of wonder bread wrapped around it.  There clearly must have been a struggle to reach the 1001 total.  I also had a good laugh about how often the word "Oriental" is used in a recipe's title -- dude, please, escape 1971 and enter our new century
Disappointing. The Christian life should be one of honesty with ourselves, with our communities and with the world. All too often it isn't, and Steven James' target is a good one. Sadly this book is both overwritten and repetitive, and remarkably self-involved. Difficult to recommend
desperate housewives prequel. I thought this was one of the worst books I ever attempted to read.  The whole plot is just plain ridiculous.  Bored middle-aged housewife meets drifting artist and in the space of four days they fall madly in love with a passion that lasts a lifetime.  When the kiddies find out they think it is noble that mom cheated on dad and pined away all those years.  Such rubbish--don't people see how contrived and unrealistic, not to mention immoral, this is?  Avoid this one
Horrible Book. This is another example of someone just throwing a book together in order to call themselves an author. The drawings cannot be followed therefore the book is useless. Another wanabe master. Do yourself a favor and skip this book
Which &quot;THE SILLY BOOK&quot; is this?. I'm looking for one of MY favorite books of childhood called &quot;The Silly Book.&quot;  I've read David Sullivan's review and the review from a reader from California and I'm not sure what to think. MY &quot;The Silly  Book&quot;  featured a character named Boodleheimer and including entries  like &quot;Boodleheimer, Boodleheimer, rah, rah, rah! Boodleheimer,  Boodleheimer, rah, rah, rah! The more you Boodle, the less you Heimer! The  more you Heimer, the less you Boodle! Boodleheimer, Boodleheimer, rah, rah,  rah!&quot; Does this ring a bell for anyone? Is this Mr. Sullivan's  &quot;The Silly Book&quot;, the reader from California's &quot;The Silly  Book&quot;, or none of the above? I'd really like to find this book!  If  you know where I can find it please e-mail my at jmy856@aol.com.    Thanks
At times enjoyable and a great read but overall a long bore that drags on. I really liked the book from the begging I got hooked and could not stop reading. I loved the part with the missinaries and there triels and tribulations. We see how the missionaries tried tyo change Hawaii's customs on the people and we sew the down fall of the missionaries. But after that the book draged on and lost it's touch. It went on and on and on and only a few other things I enjoyed. i laos enjoyed the leaper partsd and the trials and tribulations of the chinese and Japense people. the problem here is that the auther gose on and on about pointless stuff we will soon forget. This novle could easly of been 500 pages but it's over 1000. I was dissapointed but it wasent entirley a bad book it was enjoyanle at times
doesn't hold up well to other historical mysteries/thrillers. After reading His Dark Materials, The White Mercedes and The Broken Bridge and enjoying them quite throughly, I ventured forth into the deep unknown of "Ruby in the Smoke", expecting something equally well written, insightful, and entertaining... what I found was below par to my standards.First of all, the character development was practically non-existant, I put down this book feeling that I didn't really know any of the characters at all. Sally Lockhart is your average every day Mary-Sue; uncommonly pretty, quiet, strong, independent, and as flawless as the Ruby that she is destined to find. The emotions displayed at the death of her father are bland and un-grounded, and it's hard to believe that she has emotions at all at certain points of the story. There are hints of romance that never follow through, statements that are never really explained, and mystery that is...kind of unintriguing.Setting aside the flatness of the characters (Jim was the only one that I think I liked at all, simply because he had some flicker of a personality) there are many things that just don't go smoothly in my mind with this novel. A girl wandering alone in England in the 19th century for one--although she is rumored to be independent, there really is no way that she could have been -that- independent, given the context. Her strength is too faltering to really give credibility to the fact that she wanders the streets alone in her free time in an era where those sorts of actions were not even tolerated.Furthermore, the plot is too formulatic. It follows the Hero Motif to the T, with absolutely no bells and whistles. The heroine is perfect, the companions are as following: the charming one, the mischevious boy, the fiery maiden, the kindly old man, Ms. Scarlet with the candlestick... ok, well you get the picture. The villian is flat, cookie-cutter evil, without the dimentions that Pullman gave to his Mrs. Coultier in His Dark Materials. It's an ugly old woman that wants to kill little girls for fame and fortune. I know that this book was meant to be a cliche--but there could have been a little bit of development thrown in to make it, well, more fun.The action is a little under-described to make anything truly interesting. It's a bit of tell-not-show writing with a dryness that doesn't go down well enough, and an ending that leaves you thinking "is that really it?" Who knows, perhaps the other books in the series are more engaging than this one--but the way "Ruby in the Smoke" reads, theres really nothing encouraging me to go on with the series.Overhyped? Yes. Make room on the shelves for a better mystery--this is something that reads better if you don't have to pay for it, I'm sure
The Worst of Several Genres. I love mysteries set in WW II and like old time radio so I couldn't wait to begin this one. The "hero" is a junior varsity Tom Joad but,OK, I was game.  The cast of characters that seemed to number in the low 80s and be interchangable "baddies" and "goodies".  They were hard to keep track of without a scorecard but there is no quit in this reader and I pushed on. Then when we got to the Jersey shore, I found out that in 1942 with America fighting for it's life against fascism, and losing, our hero knew why.  All the servicemen were bullies (A drafted station employee) or morons (the Coast Guard beach patrol).  The 4F "hero" was the real McCoy however.  Although not actually mentioned I bet he wished that dratted ear injury hadn't kept him from joining the Abraham Lincoln Brigade.  He was moderate enought to think Marxism had some problems; the murder of 10s of millions of Ukrainians and the Nazi-USSR Pact probably and I say probably, didn't elude our observant literary genius.  He was also a 1975 era feminist; all those plucky WW II women throwing off the handcuffs chaining them naked to the kitchen sink had his unhesitating support.  Most big businessmen, probably wearing spats and silk high hats, were the bad guys needless to say.  I wondered how someone could write such a truly awful book.  I couldn't finish it and it's a point of honor for me to finish all books.  Then in the bio it all became clear.  The author was a flack for former Congresswoman Pat Schroeder of Colorado.  I'm still haunted by her rictus grin and constipated, Quaker schoolmarm expression that said "somebody, somewhere is having fun and I want it to stop now!!!"  Anyone who could stand to work for Pat could write this book with ease
Great read if you ignore the last few pages. On the surface, John Waters has it all -- a loving wife, a beautiful child, a successful business -- but appearances are deceiving. His marriage is in trouble, his business is under investigation by a federal agency, and his business partner has made questionable financial decisions which jeopardize everyone's future. Into this mix wanders Eve Sumner, a stunningly attractive woman who makes it abundantly obvious she's chosen Waters as her next conquest. However, appearances are again deceiving, because Eve Sumner claims she is actually Mallory Chandler, Waters' first great love.Funny thing, though: Mallory Chandler died ten years previously.So who is this woman? And how does she know things only Mallory should know?In an effort to discover the truth, Waters finds himself involved in an affair that quickly turns dangerous, as Eve/Mallory displays the same obsessive behavior that destroyed Waters' love for Mallory twenty years before.This novel requires a major suspension of disbelief for its critical plot device: transmigration of a soul. Once the reader accepts that, however, the story moves along quickly and works well within its preposterous premise. Waters flails and fumbles and does his best to fix the mess he's made by getting involved with Eve/Mallory, even as she seems to be setting him up for a murder charge. His desperation and fear are palpable, and certainly mitigate his at times wrong-headed choices. I truly enjoyed this story, that is, until I read the final pages.The final plot twist, which I won't reveal here, is so farfetched, even within the confines of a plot that stretches suspension of disbelief to its outermost limit, as to spoil all the good trashiness that preceded it. I read the last few pages and threw the book across the room. I felt cheated. I think Mr. Iles wrote himself into a corner and couldn't think of any other way to give the reader a happy ending. Gah.Never have I been so disappointed with a novel's resolution.Oh, and the frequent references to a novel written by a character within this novel which happens to have the same title as a novel written by Iles bugged me too.Gah.Oh. Go ahead and read the story. Just rewrite the ending in your own head. I did
If I Only Had A Brain. Why do I keep doing this to myself?  I swear on a stack of Bibles I will NOT read another self-help book again and then someone BEGS me to try "just this one".  What can I say when I am beseeched with "Mr Reader, you're a smart guy so this is the book for you."?Well, right off the bat I had the same question as other reviewers. Is Eric Jansen a neurologist or a physician or is he involved with cutting edge technology mapping neurons and the synaptic flows?  Well, the answer is No, he is not any of the above but, like most of us, he has read a lot and has some ideas about improved learning using a carrot and stick aproach to our brain.   There are some reasonably good ideas here but nothing startling, original or life-shattering.One thing that I began to detest was the refrain that we must learn with the brain in mind, as if there were some secret ways human beings learn without using the brain.  We get a round of memory techniques, why we retain some data and lose other, effective methods for instilling long-term retention, "tricking" the brain.  What the author is attempting to do is suggest that the brain operates in certain patterns and our attempts at learning should incorporate those "known" patterns.  But I found absolutely nothing new here (of course), no startling discoveries or deep insights about how the brain works.  There are some common sense suggestions but beyond that I think most teachers are aware of methods for teaching children that optimizes normal thought patterns.Much of this is editorializing over the sorry state of schools and I agree that our educational system needs a radical makeover for the future. What I cannot accept is the fluff he throws out (with the occasional factoid about the workins of the brain) as if he had answered some ageold question.  Think with your brain and avoid getting this book.
Slow reading. This book was dull and I would not recommend it to someone who is not a fan of Ben Shahn and his work
Sophomoric and sloppy. I'll preface this by saying I'm a cryer.  I cry at movie previews when they simply look entertaining.  I cried all the way through Superman Returns.  I did not, however, shed one tear during Message in a Bottle.In English class, I always learned to "show, not tell" when writing.  When that is your rule of thumb, you'll write a moving piece of literature, even if you're not completely skillful.  Sparks is the master of telling without showing.I'm honestly baffled by all the good reviews it gets.  The story is somewhat engaging, but with no payoff.  But the work is filled with passages like (and these are from memory; if I picked up the book to look for verbatim examples I'd have to type the entire thing), "He went to the refrigerator, opened the door, and took a beer.  After opening it, he sat down on the back deck."  Or, "Though she was overweight, she moved quickly around the table."  "She got out of the shower, dried off, and put on khaki shorts and a white cotton shirt."  Have you read enough yet?I'm new to the romance genre.  My mother-in-law recommended Sparks because -- I think she was trying to imply -- his sex scenes aren't too graphic.  They were to me, but then, I'm new to romance, and spoiled by the masterful, unequaled storytelling skill of Stephen King.Please hold your New York Times bestsellers to a higher standard.  Let's hold on to whatever quality control we can in music, movies, and literature
One word describes this book. "Zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz..." Oh my God was this book a snoozer. What a waste of time
Awful. I actually threw this book out.  I never do that but I'd already wasted my money and I didn't want to waste any more of my time or that of anyone else.It's so terribly put together--typos galore on every page, Sawyerisms double-spaced as space fillers, no original thinking and simple regurgitation of info readily available.I've also never felt so compelled to write a review...and this marks my first.P.S.  I would've given it 0 stars but that unfortunately wasn't a choice
Disappointed!!. After reading &quot;The Church Ladies&quot;, I was very excited to read another book by Lisa Samson.  I wish it hadn't been &quot;Songbird&quot;.  I did not enjoy this book at all.  It was very depressing and sad.  The Eiplogue was perhaps a small bright spot but overall I was very disappointed.  The book was a little long and when a little happiness came along in the book, it would be immediately overshadowed by another bad event in Charmaine's life.  This book was just not for me
Zzzzzzzzzzzz. I hate to say this about a classic, but--I found this book incredibly boring
Waste of time. This book was a day in the life of an average nobody with average problems, average kids, average ex-husband, and all of that trivial stuff that doesn't warrant being written about.  My life is more interesting, and  that's not saying much
Mel Levine is an idiot. I found this book to be insulting to children and to educators.  This man obviously has no idea what he is talking about, his ideas are strictly from the deficiency model of student underachievement which has been shown to be a faulty method of explanantion.  Any educator who reads this book and takes it seriously should be relieved of their jobs ASAP.In addition, his physical descriptions of his patients are bordering on perverted
Didn't find anything that was useful or particularly interesting. I had high hopes for this book what with Dr. Allen's apparent endorsement and Jay Cross writing a positive review of it. I found the book dry and boring. I started each chapter with the hope that it would reveal something useful that could be readily applied, but each chapter ended flat. I found a great deal of wisdom in Dr Allen's books. I was hoping that this book might give me somewhat of a different perspective that would expand upon (and even disagree with) the instructional design perspective in Dr Allen's books. Instead it caused me to want to go back and re-read Dr Allen's books to see if my present experience level would cause me to find new meaning. (Micheal Allen's Guide to E-Learning and Creating Successful e-learning)I give this book 2 stars because Clark Quinn does include some examples. I think that this book would have been far more worthwhile if it was written around these examples. I would have liked to see him explain an idea and then really delve into how he applied that idea in the examples he shows in the book. Instead the examples seem somewhat removed from what the author is primarily saying in each chapter
Quite probably the worse DL book ever released. Really, I'd give negative stars if it was possible.  Before I get going, I'd like to point out that I've always liked Douglas Niles's DL works, The Last Thane aside.  In particular, I'd recommend Fistandantilus Reborn, The Kinslayer Wars, and Emperor of Ansalon as excellent examples of how good a writer her can be in this setting...even if each has slight flaws, they don't add up enough to detract from the book.In Wizard's Conclave, it seems like all there are, are flaws.  As far as the issue of Dalamar the Dark's hair color, he WAS killed and resurrected.  The shock of that COULD have bleached his hair - it happens in real life sometimes when people experience a severe trauma.  That was the least of it in my mind.For starters, the heroine (Coryn) was far too naive and STUPID throughout the book.  The idea that a kender could just show up (in Icereach, of all places, without being a god, as in The Icewall Trilogy) at Scharon's door and guide a 15-year old girl to Palanthas WITHOUT INCIDENT is ludicrous.  Plain and simple.  Any ship they took would have had to pass close enough to the Gale off the coast of Southern Ergoth to experience negative weather patterns from its fallout, yet we hear nothing of a storm-tossed ship or anything.  Just smooth sailing!Secondly, the Tower of High Sorcery in Wayreth has a whole big piece of source material on it (Raistlin's Legacy: The Tower of High Sorcery) that was readily available to Mr. Niles that he apparently didn't look at once.  Wayreth Forest is just that, a forest.  No caves, no mountains, NO SECRET TUNNELS! It is guarded by a COPPER dragon, not some massive green holdover from the Third Dragon War.  It is also a structure that CANNOT be harmed.  Raistlin, in Test of the Twins, was a god in an alternate future and even his DIVINE power couldn't harm it, never mind some wild magic.The villain was, in a word, boring.  The writing was kiddie (he should have named Coryn Harriet Potter and just have been done with it) and there were so many problems that they got in the way of telling a good story.  Not the least of which is the idea that every wizard had the "fly" spell memorized for every day use or that they suddenly had a full compliment of spells after years of having no access to them.  Oh, and lest I forget, they made good time from all corners of the continent, all arriving at the SAME EXACT TIME the day AFTER the Night of the Eye.  I wasn't aware Ansalon had Leer jets.The Master of the Tower has his own form, but it was not once used, and is more powerful than just about any wizard because he IS the Tower.  Why he didn't lock the villain and his toadying sidekick in a room and allow them to suffocate is beyond me.  The Tower's physical layout was incorrectly described, or should I say incompletely described.  No mention was made of where the fence went from the foretower.And for all of Coryn's unbelievable (literally) powers, she HAD to use her little copycat spell on that arrow to win? What about, oh, I dunno, casting a haste spell on the arrow so it would get there before Kalwhatshisname had time to turn around?Was there anything about this book I liked? Yes, actually.  I liked that Jenna became the Head of the Conclave, even if she's far too old to have withstood the punishment she took.  She was no spring chicken in Dragons of Summer Flame as it was, yet here she is 40+ years later and still running around like she was in the prime of her life.  Even Elminster would have a problem bouncing back from the kind of injuries she sustained!The best part, though, was the scene with Palin and Dalamar.  I felt that it was an excellent closing of the book on the Majere family (Linsha aside) and their involvement with the future of Krynn.  Palin sacrificed magic at the end of the War of Souls trilogy and in this book - released shortly after Prisoner of Haven and, thus, a great piece of loose-end-tying - we see him happy for the first time in years.  A family that rose from peaceful common stock returns to peaceful common stock...a great way to bring their saga full circle.In short, though, Mr. Niles took far too many liberties with the story, not the least of which was betraying the tone of DL with a kiddie fantasy story, dialogue sequences, and pace.  As I said, though, I like Doug Niles's DL stuff, by and large, and will just be forced to file this in the Miss category for him...which is still far outnumberd by his Hits.  I really hope that he phoned this in due to personal feelings towards the story idea and the supposed story arc that is supposed to come with it.  Coryn is rumored to feature prominently in his upcoming trilogy...I can only hope he doesn't continue the trend established in this book, but rather takes the story seriously and attempts to make the read not only fun, but worthwhile as well
Hate math? you'll hate this book!. We are up to chapter 5 in this book so far. Several people in the class have had to take it over several times now. The book is too hard...at least for a lot of people it is. The concepts are not presented clearly. It can be very hard to correlate the example problems to the homework problems. Even with the student solution manual (which does not have every odd #, but every other odd #, heh) I am lost. A big group of us get together for a total of 7 hours per week working on our homework with tutors and they are even lost! AHHHH. This book is horrible! Good luck to all whom have to take this course
Crichton phoned this one in. If you've ever seen the great movie (Thirteenth Warrior) that was based on this book, "Eaters of the Dead" will just not measure up. Maybe the structure of the book was the problem. Crichton wrote it in the style of an medieval manuscript to try to convey the authenticity of an actual 1000 year old document. Maybe he was too successful with that conceit. It was usually the aim of medieval chroniclers to present the dry facts of an event rather than to strive for dramatic tension, character development or an elevated literary style. Unfortunately, those qualities are necessary in a novel.  This was mostly a bore. Don't bother
Target audience: the overprivileged. If you're over 50, white and wealthy, this book is for you.  If you are someone who has dealt with many of life's hardships, please do not look to this book for inspiration.  It is such fluff, I cannot tell you how disappointed I am in it.  Nothing profound lies within, it is poorly re-written and, seems to me, a quick way for Thomas to make some money and keep her name out there.Written by a wealthy older white person, for other wealthy older white people.P.S.  I am white
Bought this based on a 5-star review? WHY??. My child is in 3rd grade and must look up synonyms.  Very few of the words on her lists are in this book.  This is not a helpful book at all.  I guess I should buy an adult thesaurus for 3rd grade
Maybe I'm justing getting older. I have read all of the Artimis Fowl Books and loved them until nowI was disapointed with this one, and not found Artmis unusaly irritating, but felt the whole book was the lacking the charm and wit that had made the other three so good.Truth be told I was younger when I read the first three, but still I can reread them and enjoy them (as I did after reading the fourth and being very disillusioned with the whole seris) so if you want my advice then I suggst you don't buy this book and let the magic of the first three live in peace
Disappointed. My husband who is off fighting for the Constitution sent this book to our daughter.  If he had not sent it, I would want a refund.  My daughter and I sat down to read the book together.  She thought the drawings did not match the words and thought the author still did not like the Preamble. (HE makes mention in the begining that he was forced to think about the Constitution). There was no inspiration from this book and she hasn't picked it up again.  The pictures are not exciting to children and only vaguely connect to the words.  She loves the Freedom Rock version of the Preamble and and really enjoys Lynn Chaney's "America A Patriotic Primer", so I understand why he made the purchase, however it is not inspiring or uplifting or interesting
There is no storyline. I bought this book because it was on my son's school summer reading list, and he loves cars, trucks, buses etc.  However, it has no storyline.  Each page has one or two words that basically say nothing!!!  My son liked the pictures, but the "story" didn't hold his attention at all
not cute at all. 0 stars if there were such a thingugly boring squares (oops, i mean "patterns")cheesy hickish dialectGreat! for middle americaan example of bloggers jumping on the knitting book bandwagon feeding the sheep along the wayreally can't for the life of me figure out the hype behind this book
Sophomoric and Painful. I had high hopes for this book.  They were dashed.  It's mostly a series of "tests" to determine what to do and "letters" about surreally unbelievable situations.  For this book, "white trash" implies that burglary is the preferred career, everybody has four or more husbands/wives over time and innumerable dalliances beyond, and any carnal urge results in children who must be taught how to burgle.It's just not funny, and has nothing in common with Jeff Foxworthy or David Barry writing about similar topics.
Good on process, low on recipe's. The book covers the process of smoking well. Good information on brining, sausage making, and processing smoked foods is provided. It lacks fundamental data such as internal temperatures of smoke cook meats. A few  recipes are presented, but this is not a cookbook
Shoudl be 0 stars... There is a reason there are 247 used ones of this book.We used this book in for our men's study group and every one of the men, and every one of the wives agreed, that this was a worthless book.  It was written for a 1950's wife that no longer exists.Now 3 truly wonderful books to help you with your wife are:Discovering the Mind of a Woman by Ken NairIf Only He Knew by Gary SmalleyTogether Forever: How to Overcome Problems and Rekindle the Love in Your Marriageby Anne Kristin CarrollThey are truly inspirational as to how to be a good husband
Well Documented But Highly Slanted. McMaster has taken upon himself the task of blaming the civilian leadership in the U.S. for the disaster in Vietnam.  How they misled and lied to the public and ignored the advice of the military.That is true but his deliberate slanting of the evidence to prove his point damages what is a well-documented interesting book.  General Harkins comes off in this book as a man doing the right job but who was ignored by Lodge.  In fact, although he was ignored, Harkins clearly was pollyanish in saying things were going well when they weren't.  As the Bright Shining Lie makes clear, the countryside was falling to the Viet Cong during Diem's regieme (Harkins' time) and did not suddenly happen when Diem was overthrown as McMaster seems to indicate.In addition, General Westmoreland continued the optimistic vein of Harkins.  He ignored the advice of his Marine commanders about sending Marines into the Khe San area and other areas the NVA and Viet Cong were strong and so suffered many losses.  Yet McMaster doesn't focus on the weakness and bad decisions of Westmoreland because the General.The only  military member that McMaster severely criticizes is Taylor and that is because he "sold" out to McNamara. In point of fact, LeMay who comes off relatively well in this book was a nut whose preference was to bomb North Vietnam so much we could pave the entire country and then plant a victory flag.  Some victory if you kill all the people. The JCS was not united as McMaster does admit.This book is well documented and covers a fascinating topic, the deliberate misleading of the American public in Vietname.  However, McMaster's failure to be objective dramatically weakens the book.His criticism of McNamara and Johnson is well documented.  However, in his desire to prove his main thesis and, I suspect because of his loyalty the military, caused McMaster to gloss over the failure of the JCS and Harkins/Westmoreland, and to ignore the fact that rural Vietnam was largely lost long before Diem's overthrow.Although not perfect, A Bright Shining Lie does a much better job of describing this sorry tale.
Poorly Organized. Mr. Das (aka Jeff) seems to enjoy dragging the reader through as much suffering as he can recall. That appears to be his main point. The text is scattered with no logical order.Frank Hazelwood
Polo anyone?  Hardly. As another commenter indicated, this book is written by someone who only wished he was a polo player.  It's frighteningly inaccurate and I can't believe that one polo player in the world would agree with the presentations (or should I say misrepresentations) provided within the book.  But to focus on the pathetic longings of a man who cannot even understand the rudimentary principles and practices of an elegant and beautiful sport that he wishes to focus his novel on is not even enough...no the content of the book is entirely jumbled with ridiculous sexual escapades merely placed in convenient intervals to titillate domesticated bookworms who may find men and women and transvestites and transsexuals sodomizing each other interesting.  Fortunately I didn't buy this book and with the cold weather upon us I now have the kindling I need to start the Yule log--so thanks Jerzy
"History of Hydrogen" would be a reasonable title... but this still would not make up for the disarray this book is in.The author has a lot of interesting information, but "Tomorrow's Energy" (TE) is very poorly compiled and editted, making it very difficult to read or skim through. I have another book I would recommend in place of this one, but I will hold off until the end of this review because TE should be fully addressed.There is almost no foresight in this book. TE reads almost like hydrogen is just a fuel of the past when in fact many of us hope and expect it will one day be our fuel of choice. Even in the last chapter, "The Next 100 Years," the author just continues quoting away and giving speculation by others instead of reflecting on where hydrogen is going to go from his expertise (his perspective would have been nice since he has obviously done a lot of research on the topic).The book reads like a collection of essays by the author on historical bits about hydrogen. Instead of telling us who did what on what date and here is what the person who did it had to say, it would have been far more useful to have the author explain in his own words what is going on and break the book into smaller sections if necessary (which really is necessary since there are so many random discussions it is painful).Also, as "Slezak" mentioned, the units (GJ, BTU's, calories, you name it, it's in here) are flip-flopped throughout the book, making it incredibly difficult to follow the numbers, which is really relavent information to this topic.The only type of person who will find TE useful over the book below is someone who wants to know a lot of details about the history of hydrogen and less about whether it will be useful for us in the future.Now, my recommendation..."The Hype about Hydrogen" (THAH), by Joseph RommTHAH is still a little dry, but it does magnitudes better than TE, and it is consistent with units and has pretty clear descriptions. I couldn't put THAH down (I finished it in less than 2 days*), but after getting into TE about 100 pages, I dreaded going back to it. I made myself finish TE because I looked forward to what I expected to be the forward thinking last chapter (which, as mentioned above, was a great disappointment).*I'm a diligent (slow) reader
way too complicated. This is a good book for serious health nuts that have the time and energy to make simple easy recipes with a million strange ingredients that you've probably never heard of. If you plan on making lots of baby food with kelp and sea weed then this is the book for you
The giant should remain strong no matter what. I read this book and it confirmed my feelings that USA, as the only super power, should ALWAYS remain STRONG.The book is composed of some 400 pages full of critiques as if the author wanted America to be the haven of saints when the world has been full of crocodiles, for instance the introduction brings about a fair resume of the author's intentionsHow!In the Introduction I came across a passage which I hereby quote `''It was in the early days of the Vietnam War that a Vietcong officer said to his American prisoner _' You were our heroes after the war, and a common phrase in those days was `'to be as rich and as wise as an American'' - What happened `''.The title `Killing Hope' - updated edition 2004 - by William Blum, and many of the contents are indeed offensive to the USA because it speaks about U.S military and C.I.A 'interventions' since World War II and endeavours to portray them as the bad guys.C.I.A (USA) intervensions?Didn't such 'intervension' save many countries that now live under the 'shades' of democracies, in Europe and the Far East (Japan) enjoying unprecedented richness and prosperity, with a high standard of living for their nationals.As one individual out of six billion living on this planet, do I blame the USA for protecting the interest of its citizens.USA is The World Giant and one has to learn how to convince them of one's view points , rather than garrulously defy them with boring speeches and  empty written words.
You're Kidding!!. I read this book only because it was lent to me by an unfortunate person who was lumbered with it for Mothers Day. It was the only BTB book I've read since "Woman of Substance" and I fine it hard to believe that it was written by the same writer! The dialogue was unbelievably twee and some of it was out of a Victorian novel---the heroine calls her brother --Brother mine!!!!!Oh brother! I finished it because it was so bad that it was funny
Good on Theory, Weak on Practical Aspects. The book presents translation theory and information on the history of translation.  It lists proverbs with their translations as well as cognates and false cognates.  There's humorous examples of bad translations.  Therefore, after reading it, you will know how to evaluate the quality of a translation without having been given much practice in translating.  If you're looking for a book on translation theory, this will be a fine introduction.  It isn't as good if you need to learn to translate
A total waste of money. This book is a waste of money for whomever buys it, a waste of paper, totally useless and offers absolutely no useful info beyond what any reasonable person does not know. The writer merely lives on a parked boat and might as well live in a cramped apartment from where he can write the same worthless stuff. There are no "essentials" in the book. Believe me, go spend your money somewhere else!Dutch West
For those who like this kind of book... If you think you'd find a lot of unrelated platitudes interesting, then you'll enjoy this book.
Rubish. Bla bla bla. Read "Inside Job" by Jim Marrs and watch the DVD "9/11 In Plane Sight", maybe you'll learn the truth
NOT AT ALL WHAT I EXPECTED... TOO BORING TO GO ANY FURTHER THAN THE FIRST SEVERAL CHAPTERS. I THUMBED THROUGH THE REST AND SAW IT WAS ALL THE SAME. NOT REALLY A PERSONAL CONFESSIONAL-SHE MENTIONS HER PROCEDURES VERY BRIEFLY. IT INSTEAD READS LIKE TEXTBOOK MEDICAL HISTORY OF THE ORIGINS OF PLASTIC SURGERY. IF YOUR ANYONE WHO HAS HAD, OR IS PLANNING TO HAVE ANY SURGERY OR INJECTIONS, SKIP THIS BOOK-UNLESS YOU WANT TO READ ABOUT SOLDIERS WHO WERE DISFIGURED AND MAMED DURING WAR SO PLASTIC SURGERY WAS BORN. ALONG THOSE SAME LINES, I DID NOT WANT TO READ IN EXCRUTIATING DETAIL ABOUT THE ORIGIN OF THE "POISON" BOTOX AND HOW IT WAS ORIGINALLY FOUND AND DEVELOPED FROM ROTTEN SAUSAGES. THE STORIES ABOUT PEOPLE SHE ACTUALLY KNEW ARE SHORT AND SO COMPLETELY OFF THE WALL FROM WHAT ANY NORMAL WOMAN WOULD EVER WANT TO DO ARE USELESS TO READ ABOUT AS WELL. UNLESS YOU ARE RESEARCHING FOR REFRENCE THE STATISTICS AND ORIGIN OF PLASTIC SURGERY-SKIP THIS BOOK
I don't agree with the other reviewers. I was not convinced. Having tried Mr. X (it had such a "must have" look about it) and found it seriously wanting, again the main character is not persuasive enough. He actually sounds like a complete jerk. Maybe it would have been more convincing written in third person but as is.......... Not as bad as Mr. X which was a total dissapointment but definititely much ado about very little
LAME. Sean Hannity is a joke, all of these pundits are. WE should dig a hole and push them all in, then throw in a few starving tigers. That would roc
wasted opportunity. sensationalist, titiliating, and as a result, a total let-down (much like "heavier than heaven")while Cross's journalistic eye provides some interesting detail re: Jimi's early years, after that, it reads like "Hammer of the Gods" meets the National Inquirier.  just plain silly, and a disservice to the greatest guitar player ever.Cross spends more time examining Jimi's proclivity for groupies and drugs (which, of course, is part of the story...i guess), than the music itself.It would have been nice to know, say:In 1966, preceding acid rock and living in a relatively tame NYC, how did Hendrix come to write the songs that comprised "Are You Experienced"?  how did his playing transcend his predecessors?  how did dylan influence his songwriting?  (we learn Hendrix *did* emulate Dylan's hair.)we don't know.now, if Cross was unable to formulate  answers on his own, then could have easily dialed up a litany of rock critics, musicians, and fans who'd be happy to extrapolate.instead we get only crumbs, which are ultimately overshadowed by second-hand stories from druggies ("jimi didn't like alcohol!", ex-groupies ("jimi wanted to marry me!", and hangers-on ("jimi slept with 8 chicks at once.")it was thorougly exasperating.if you came from Mars and read this, your impression would be that yes, Jimi was messed up and reckless; but you would have no idea he was one of the most influencial artists in the history of the world.  if the book meant to honor Hendrix, it did the opposite.if you want incisive analysis of the *music* itself, simply read Amazon readers' reviews of his records.  The fans themselves -- not an overwrought author -- can encapsulate the power and beauty of Hendrix far better, and far more consisely.
Waste of time & money. The book is full of useless fillings. Finding your colors is limited to few hair and eye color combinations. It also depends on you doing a test with different colored fabrics & determing how the color reflect against your skin. After reading the book, I still don't know what my colors are. Besides, with so many different color hues on the market, how can one tell if what you're buying is an ever green or true green for example, confusing. The lack of pictures showing the types of collars they're recommending for different body types (e.g Mandarincollar,cowl,bardot...)...is annoying,to say the least. Questionnaires are poorly structured, & the section on makeup, underwear & accessories is trivial. Save your money (i'm glad the book I read was a borrow from the library) and save your time. Pass
Couldn't finish it. Oh my word.  I have only ever not been able to finish a book twice in my life -- and this was number 2.  The first few chapters were ok, but when things really started cooking plot-wise, the writing style became, well, high-schoolish.  I wanted to like it, so I plowed ahead.  But, half-way through it, I gave up.The writing style is amateurish, and clunky.  Characters act in a melodramatically, with no realism.  There are patches of good writing, but these patches are quickly followed by a clunker or two.I would hope that the sequel to this book improved, but since I can't finish the first, I won't be trying the second
Christ loved the church first. If the church is our example of marriage Christ LOVED us first. He did not need to be respected first. I agree with the main idea of the book, however the author puts more pressure on women than on men. Men, lead the way in love as Christ did, even when he received no respect but crucifixion
Glimpses of Hildegard under a heavy overlay of Fox. This book claims to be &quot;Text by Hildegard of Bingen with commentary by Mathew Fox.&quot;  In fact, it is nearly all Fox with only occasional brief quotes from Hildegard.  Confusingly, Fox uses  &quot;illuminations&quot; to mean what Hildegard and everyone else calls  &quot;visions&quot; rather than the pictures in manuscripts which are  properly called &quot;illuminations.&quot; This book contains, however,   twenty-five reproductions of these pictures.  To judge from other  reproductions of the same pictures, the quality of the reproduction seems  mediocre.  Here you can learn only what Matherw Fox, a Domican,  thinks  about these visions.  To find out what Hildegard said about them visions --  which is far fresher and more stunning that what Fox has to say -- one will  have to look elsewhere.  As an introduction to Hildegard, I would suggest  &quot;Hildegard of Bingen, A Visionary Life&quot; and &quot;Secrets of God:  Writings of Hildegard of Bingen,&quot; both by Sabina Flanagan
this man talks nonsense. This book is a good idea in principle but clever clogs Mr Maltin seems to know nothing about films. Whiles he raves about old fashioned stinkers such as Citizen Kane, Casablanca and Psycho, he is far less complimentary about classics such as Weekend at Bernie's, Gremlins 2 and Police Academy 5: Assignment Miami Beach. I think Mr Maltin should learn to keep his so-called opinions to himself in future. Verdict: A very expensive doorstop
Boutiful imagery ultimately fails illuminate. I got this book after many glowing reviews by others and also on the recommendation of my coach, and after reading it cover to cover several times and really trying the exercises, this book is unfortunately consigned to the dusty corner of my shelf..The imagery may be helpful to some people in developing the correct feel, but none of the images worked for me; neither did any of the alternates that my coach suggested- I simply could not feel what Sally Swift was trying to get across with her colorful metaphors.  As a very practical horseman, I like my books to have a great deal of technical aspects of riding, so I did not appreciate Swift's use of zen and mysticism borrowed from the martial arts world..So bottom line, for me, imagery did not work at all as a teaching method.  I have plenty of imagination- I'm an engineer with a number of papers and patents to my name and I'm also a fantasy artist, but I learn in a very technical manner- explain to me how this aid applied in this manner encourages the horse to use this group of muscles in this manner, and I can do it and get the desired results every single time because I understand the "why" of it, but tell me to feel it, in any flowery language you want, and you might as well be talking to a brick wall..If you can imagine what it feels like for your forearms to turn into water hoses, then this book will likely be good for you, but if you're like me and have no idea, then save your money as there are much better riding texts out there.
A mediocre and oversensationalized story. I had to read this book in ninth grade honors English.  I thought the book was one more the more profound wastes of time I had ever expended when I was done.  Now that I'm in college however, I do not despise the book as much.  I still feel that it is of very little value.  Had the author been white and not helped along by Ophra, this work would be largely unnoticed.  It's just another story about how someone had a rough life... with nothing to differentiate it from all of the other books like it.  The reason I have rated it so low is because it seemed to be an agenda setting work.  Maya Angelou is black and has used this book to help push her liberal agenda.  Again - if Maya Angelou was white and was not well liked by Ophra, the book would have flopped.  I would not recommend this at all... especially if you are a conservative.
Empty stories filled with senseless plots. "Don't Look Now" is just one of many pointless, non-thriller, lackluster, poorly written short stories by Daphne du Maurier.  I could not find a point in any of the five stories, and they all left me feeling empty.  "Don't Look Now" was completely dim-witted and anti-climatic (as were all the stories).  "The Breakthrough" did make me question science and at how much we want to live, but the characters were flat and lifeless.  "Not After Midnight" felt like it was going on a downward spiral to nowhere land, without a point to be found.  "A Border-Line Case" left me feeling repulsed and wondering what du Maurier was trying to say.  "The Way of the Cross" made me wonder if du Maurier's way of thinking is that God gives people their comeuppance; I found the shifting narrator to be irksome and it showed how little the author gave her characters varying personalities.  I closed this book realizing, that after these stories, along with "Rebecca," that du Maurier has a very monotone and bland style of writing; she often goes of on pointless tangents.  "Pointless" is the ever returning word when speaking of du Maurier's writing.  I do not recommend
A horrible textbook!. This text is a nightmare.  Terms are poorly defined, if defined at all, and examples are few and far between.  The illustrations are laughable.  I've seen better graphics in nursery books written 30 years ago.  If your professor assigns this text, and you're new to Java, be prepared to shell out more bucks for better sources or cruise the Internet to get the answers you need.  This book won't provide them.
Unbiblical and bad writing make for one star. This book is so flawed in every which way, it is hard to know where to begin. First of all, we are living in the end times, and when Jesus comes, that's all she wrote, folks. There's no seven years, no Christians being zapped up, etc. This is our Second Chance on Earth. No tribulation. This book takes figurative visions and tries to apply it literally, and does it poorly. Reading this book made me think that if this was true, then what's the point of trying to be a Christian. Why not just live your life the way you want to, and then when people zap out of thin air, change your life. It's ridiculous and sends the wrong message. Plus, the writing is for second graders with no redeeming characteristics to it. But I really don't think the author's care at this point (seeing how many millions they've made printing lies). My recommendation is to read the bible instead of this series; then you'll get truth and the bible is probably shorter (and much better writing). Man, not even Kirk Cameron could save this train wreck.
disheartened. I came to Blowback by way of a year-long research project on  globalization. Over the past year I have read dozens of books, both scholary and popular, on this topic. Right - Left - Love America - Hate America - Multi-Cultural - Eurocentric; I've suffered through them all ( happily, there is as yet no feminist perspective on the subject ).First let me state that Chalmers Johnson, this regrettable book notwithstanding, is not by profession the village diot. Johnson is a highly respected economic and political analyst, a man who used to be worth listening to.What happened?  How did he come to cobble together this breathtakingly unanalytical smorgasborg? Where did the imperialist conspiracy rant come from? Johnson, where did you go?Well, the easy answer is that he delves into complex areas of which he has no knowledge.  His take on America's military policies is ludicrous.  Anyone who questions why the U.S. Army is still in Korea after 50+ years need only point to Seoul on a map and drag his finger a couple of inches north, where he will discover NORTH KOREA. Of coures once an idealogue veers into unknown territory there is no other path left for him than that of conspiracy.  Conspiracy "theory" is all fine and good for the lazy and uneducated; it's their sanctuary; but for a scholar of Johnson's caliber to go there is incomprehensible. Unti you see what I saw.The professional works that I read on globalization were pretty much uniform in that they addressed one or another facet of free-trade and concluded more-or-less-nothing, all in scholarly language.  For the most part the popular books were  not nominally about globalization at all, although globalization was the only thread holding the books together, and to each other. Brushing aside the fact that most of the authors of the popular group are ageing oddballs from the 60s ( you underestimate the mustard-gas-like effect of that era at your peril ),the only possible reason for these immensely angry, nonsensical books is this: no one fully understands globalization.  No one. Even when you define the thing narrowly it is a cantankerous beast, too young to tame; growing unpredictably every day like the Blob. They're frustrated, these authors.  I can't blame them, but for some reason they must have a scapegoat and the've rounded up the usual suspect, America, as in why does America impose - dominate - ignore, etc. the third world?  Silly question, really. You're at the top of the food chain, what do they expect you to do? When bad things happen you want to be sure they happen to someone else.
franken is a failure. Al Franken is an individual who has been mediocre at everything, this book is his attempt to take on radio giant, rush limbaugh.  All I can say is; it is a good thing Mr Franken used Rush's name on the title, otherwise this book would have been like every other Franken project: an abject failure.If you are easily entertained by shrill, and hysterical name calling this book is for you.  I found it sophmoric, and superficial, pretty much like Al
Descend into Insanity 1 Page at a Time. In another rehashed treatise on Savage's perverted sense of truth, he sells a miserable, peripatetic screed to his lemming-like followers.  This man's politics and principles have been condemned by such well-established conservative journals as The Economist.  We all need someone to trust, and for Savage that person is the MD who will prescribe him some thorazine.  Gets 2 stars only because of the book's educational value as an example of the ramblings of a lunatic.  Barry Goldwater must be spinning in his grave
Closer to healthy than atkins, but not quite there. The Paleo Diet is based on an interesting premise- the idea that what we ate before agriculture suited our needs perfectly because our bodies had been bred by evolution in response to our what we could find to eat in our environment. It seems like a giant leap to assume our paleolithic ancestors naturally gravitated towards exactly what we need to eat. Animals in the wild do make sensible choices most of the time, because their decisions are instinctual. Self-awareness creates a problem that doesn't exist for other animal behavior as it does for humans. Sometimes we do things out of curiosity, or laziness, or false beliefs. So, considering the erratic behavior of present-day humans, who is to say our paleolithic ancestors were any more intuitive about their nutritive needs? Even the book suggests humans ate what they did out of trial and error, frequently just trying whatever they encountered in the wild.The fact that wild foods are frequently much richer in nutrients than domestic foods does not mean that you must subscribe to a strict paleolithic diet to take advantage of this fact. Rather, eat more wild-sourced food. Just about anything edible from the wild will be a healthy food, unless the environment from which it comes is polluted- and that is a very real problem.Meat is a very dodgy thing nowadays, not like it was in the pristine wilderness of the paleolithic era. The Paleo diet would be a healthy thing if we were still in that world. Now, we need to worry about heavy metals in fish flesh, and antibiotics and growth hormones in feedlot animals. Beef will have some naturally occuring omega 3 if the animals were allowed to wander in a more or less natural fashion, as they did when the most commonly employed mechanism for animal control was the cowboy. This is no longer true. The average cut of meat in your supermarket is taken from a feedlot animal, fed the wrong food and in conditions unsanitary in the extreme. Basing a diet on meat in this day and age can be dangerous. You must choose your meat sources carefully. Meat made from free-range animals raised on pesticide-free in a caring manner can be very hard to find.I found Loren's rejection of all products of agricultural development a little too simple minded, and in some cases irresponsible. There is nothing at all unhealthy about whole grain foods or legumes consumed in moderation, and significant weight loss could occur for most people if they ingested organic whole grains and legumes but conscientiously avoided only the major evil products of agriculture: high fructose corn syrup, trans-fatty acids, artifical sweeteners, uncleaned foods raised non-organically with pesticides and herbicides, and improperly raised food animals.My main objection to the book is nearly one hundred pages (about half) of the book is dedicated to the spiel- convincing you this thing is real and valid and worth your time. I think the forward to the book or perhaps the first chapter alone would have been sufficient for that purpose. After a while you get the feeling Loren is trying too hard to sell this idea to you, and it really interferes with the flow of the book.Further, a lot (but not all) of the studies cited show only marginal advantages of different aspects of this diet. The claims that you will experience great weight loss and feel better than you ever have are quite nice to imagine, and peppered throughout the book. But it's hard to believe with the less than overwhelming studies cited.One last nitpick. One great way to compensate for the lack of typical food taste enhancers like salt and sugar is the use of herbs and spices. something very much like the paleo diet already exists as part of peasant cuisines around the world. It's a pity the recipes included do not explore those, but instead offer somewhat watered down and uninspired fare instead. Espscially asian cuisines frequently make due with alot of the ingredients that are ok on the paleo diet, and their interesting spices make it all the more entertaining. I found the recipes far too traditional and western-centric.
The ultimate self-love is self-abasement. There is a certain pose in these poems, and it is quite effective as poses go, but Buddhism is not a pose, nor a cloak for anger, nor a disguise for preening, and these well-made poems have a hollow core as if the empty kettle had belched. Sorry. I had really wanted to like it
A Disappointment. I had respect for Prof. Wheeler, and so this book came as a tremendous disappointment. It does little but trot out all the latest fringe 'theories' about a woman who has already been the subject of numerous myths  and dubious theories already
P.O.S. Tipler says many times "as I have proved".  Huh? What the f is he talking about?  There is no proof in this stinking pile of filth.  He's got an abundance of physics in the back of the book-I'd like to hear from a physicist if any of that crap makes any sense, but I don't think it should matter.  I am intelligent enough to understand basic physics concepts, and Tipler just doesn't make any sense.  His writing is so bad that anyone who reads this entire thing will have wasted a colossal ammount of time.  The more books you read, the sooner you know when to stop reading, put the book down, and read a work of fiction instead, which can play with such ideas without boring you to death
WAS THE AUTHOR LEFT BEHIND -- IN SCHOOL?. This series may be good for a laugh. Some of the writing is engaging.But the premise is absurd.WHY, in this day and age, should anyone accept the world-view of the Bible? A book that tells us to buy and sell slaves, stone our wives to death if they accept some other tribe's beliefs, and subordinate our minds to an absolute despot up in the clouds of Mt. Sinai?In a sense, Bible believers have been "left behind" since the 1700s Enlightenment. Tom Paine's "The Age of Reason" showed the God of the Bible to be a cruel, vindictive monster. And what did Thomas Jefferson call the book of Revelations? "The ravings of a madman."Read this series, if you like. Enjoy parts of it. But make no mistake: to take any of this seriously, you have to regress to a prehistoric world-view, before men learned to think, to ask questions; before logic or science -- a time when dazed, superstitious primitives believed stars could fall to the earth, if they didn't grovel humbly enough to their supposed god.Do the absurdities and contradictions bother no one? When the "sheep" are raptured up to heaven, their clothes are left behind. So heaven is a nudist colony?The basic contradiction, of course, lies in using worldly action (some of it exciting) to proselytize for the unworldly, the supernatural.But why should we care whether any of the "good" guys gets killed? And why should THEY mind -- won't they go straight up to heaven? That's what they WANT, isn't it? Why even lift a finger against the "bad" guys -- didn't Christ say, "Resist not evil"?Worried about who will win? "God" is infinitely powerful. So Jesus (who is 1/3 of God -- or something like that) is sure to win when Armageddon rolls around, in book 12 of the series. And the "sheep" -- the believers -- will happily worship him, looking just like the pictures of dim-witted, bovine people you see in the tracts Jehovah's Witnesses leave at your door.The going price for a used copy of "Tribulation Force" is one cent. Does that tell you something?Actually, the story-telling is worth more. The basic premise is worth less. Perhaps it averages out
Now - what. I listened to this work on CD.  It took two attempts before I completed it.  I completed listening to the first CD and thought I had missed something so I re-doubled my efforts and began again.  I came away with the feeling that there were a couple of things of value but overall you will really have to dig deep to find them.  Also, if you are a Christian reader/listener you won't get past track one on the first CD.Even after studying world religions in college and living in Asia for a year, I was left with very little to walk away with from this book.
DISAPPOINTING. I'm a big fan of Hooper's paranormal mysteries and was eagerly awaiting this latest in the series.  However, a FBI agent who is missing her psychic abilities throughout most of the book is not what I was expecting from a Kay Hooper book.  It was hard to get involved with the main characters when so little information was provided, and I found the Satan cult slant boring.   I think the book would have benefited from bringing in one of the agents from her previous books.
Old concepts repackaged and regurgitated. All Covey is saying in his longwinded book, basically, is this: Listen to the people you love. Put the family first in all your decisions. Blah blah blah and something about synergy.The writing is horrible, and the metaphors are overused. I also dislike Covey's plagiarizing material from the Bible and not acknowledging where he gets his "inspiration".  In one passage he equates the Bible and other books of scripture with "Chicken Soup For the Soul" as "wisdom literature".  Despite being a supposed devout Mormon himself, obviously he's afraid to mention the Book of Mormon in that passage. Perhaps he's afraid of scaring away potential pigeons--I mean, readers.This was a book my book club decided to read; otherwise I'd have never even tried to get past the first few pages. I wonder how a man who is on the road more often than not can really interact with his own family and give "us", the poor ignorant masses, advice on our own families. In one passage he even says that other people's advice may not apply to our own situations. Then how can he expect us to take his advice?Don't waste your money. If you absolutely must read it, get it from the library. Covey doesn't need your money, he has a huge house with a basketball court and indoor pool. He's doing fine.
Avoid, Avoid, Avoid. This book is silly.  You could get better results by buying a bag of fortune cookies, saving the fortunes from the cookies, taping them to a dartboard, and throwing a dart.  With that approach, you could have had cookies, too.
Somewhat Disappointing.... I don't want this to be misconstrued as a knock on the author, because I think he's a great author and a great writer.  I'm simply critiquing this particular book on what it's done for me...and that's not very much.  This book works if you've never written anything in your life and know absolutely nothing about writing, otherwise it's a bit of a waste of time.  It didn't offer me anything that I could learn from that I couldn't get from something else.  If I have to read another book that goes on and on about how the first thing about writing is you have to write, you have to write a lot and you also have to read a lot.  Forgive me, but I think most educated or even semi-intelligent people know that whatever your passion is, whatever you want to do in life, you have to do it.  Most don't need to be told.  You're already doing it because you love it, hence why you want to do it forever.  We don't need to be talked down to like an idiot and that's the problem with some of these thespian overly educated writers, is that their snobs and they write in a way that is condescending.  They are basically saying it's this way or forget it your wasting your time.  They didn't invent writing.  Writing has been around for centuries.  This book strongly emphasizes how important it is to outline and that you'll be doing it for the rest of your life, but it doesn't give you clear and excellent examples of something so critical.  Instead it gives you sample charts of time travel from his science fiction books.  If I had to hear one more comparison about what this author did with his science fiction books I was going to throw the book out the window.  I was really hoping for more actual writing tips on grammar and sentence structure, but no such luck.  I do have a couple fantastic writing books that I loved and I found to be absolutely beneficial and they are....  "Bird by Bird" by Annie Lamott and "On Writing" by Stephen King. Both of those books were funny and witty, entertaining and packed with very informative and helpful tips for the writer in you. They are much more evolved writing books to check out and help you get better at doing what you love most
Worthless Picture Book. This is not a how to book. This is a picture book. The author is a consumate artist, no doubt about that, but the publishers have marketed it in such a way as to suggest that you...the reader...will learn how it can be done. Not true. The author merely shows countless numbers of his own work. This leaves you to guess how it can be done. If you are a fan of the authors work then add this to your collection. If you want a book on how to render lighting effects in your own work then pass this book bye
That's It. Ms.Steel is truly the Queen of repition. She needs to get some new editors and listen to them or unplug her word processeor. I see that is the ongoing critism of her books. I swore I was never going to read another of her soaps(I can't stand those either) but this given to me by friends that said it was sooo good.  I'll stick with the authours I know I like from now on. And I hope she finds some new descriptions to use besides impeccably and exquisite/exquisitely, she has worn these out. BUT she's laughing all the way to her banks and investment brokers
More than a disappointment!. I wanted to cry when I put this book down because I miss the Danielle Steele that wrote 'Thurston House', 'Family Circle' and others.  For years now I have felt that she is simply putting out books because she is contractually obligated to by her publishers.  I really feel like her heart just isn't in it anymore.  She has become very idiosyncratic and predictable.  Every book has her main character 'being honest.' I keep reading because I am a loyal Danielle Steele fan and I write this in hopes she'll read it and either decide she is writing because she loves it (like she once did) or decide to retire and let us love her through her earlier works.  This book was just awful.
Unsatisfying and disappointing on many levels. Reading this book is like trying to hold onto a handful of water.  The  characters are paper-thin, unbelievable and unlikeable; the multiple plot  threads are unconvincing, tangled, and ultimately go nowhere; nearly every  bit of action that might have been interesting happens at a remove.  Read  WJW's books--ARISTOI, HARDWIRED, VOICE OF THE WHIRLWIND,  DAYS OF  ATONEMENT--but stay away from this one and its prequel
Preface should include a Warning about the Overuse of Footnotes!. 10 years ago, I orginally bought this book right before a transatlantic flight having no idea that instead of a being a good read to pass the time that this bloated collection of footnotes would induce coma.A couple of nights ago I pulled this book from my collection for another read to give it another chance - dry and boorring.At almost 400 pages the author's original contribution could easily be compressed to no more than 200 pages - the other half is all annoying footnote explanations.This book should be totally reorganized incorporating the footnotes into the author's independent text.I realize that the author is deceased - was it from footnote overdose
This book is worthless. I will be succint:  This book is absolutley worthless.  Do not buy it unless you want to feel as ripped-off as I do
For Once, the Movie is Better Than the Book. Gabriel Noone is a 53 year old gay man with his own radio show which comes on at 11 PM. He's upset because his lover of 10 years has left because he needed space. Into his life comes a book written by 13 year old Pete Lomax (although it took him 2 years to write the book and he began it when he was 12 - so he should be at least 14) about the abuse he suffered at the hands of his parents and the pedophiles they sold him to. Pete has been listening to Gabriel's show and admires him very much.Well, Gabe calls up little Pete and begins a friendship. He tells  Pete all his personal problems and Pete sympathizes and gives him   advice.Later, he begins to doubt Pete's existence because no one has ever seen him. He lives with his adoptive mom Donna - sometimes she's a PhD psychologist, and sometimes she's a psychiatrist (MD) - according to Gabe anyway. (Gabe also has a lot of issues with his Dad - which are neatly resolved by the end).The movie version goes into much more depth, and is much spookier and actually thought provoking regarding Donna' motives, without dwelling on unnecessary sexual descriptions and details that are important on Gabe's agenda.It's unlikely that anyone would believe that a 13 year old boy would listen to NPR, or even know what it was. Much less have the patience to listen to a grown man's whining about his love life.See the movie
A Banal and Brainlessly Belligerent Buffoon. I read parts of this "book" until my intelligence was thoroughly insulted and I immediately returned it to the library. What a stultifying simpleton this man is. He is someone who wants to appear to have all the answers without having any foundation of intelligent ideas. And unsurprisngly, this dolt absolutely embarrassed himself during a recent appearance on the "David Letterman Show" and what made matters worse was just how oblivious he was to his infinite stupidity. First, he claimed that no one should criticize President Bush "because we're at war and it's no good for the country." Come again? I say that such a statement is "no good" for democracy, which is something this submental gasbag has forgotten about. The right to openly disagree with an alderman or a president is guaranteed by the First Amendment. And this man is a graduate of the John F. Kennedy School of Government? Also, he insisted that Cindy Sheehan, whose son was killed in Iraq, not have the right to be publicly upset with President Bush and the invasion of Iraq because "she's connected with left-wing elements in this country." What left-wing elements? I feel that Cindy Sheehan is as connected to left-wing elements as much as Bill O'Reilly is associated with logical reasoning.
Becky irritate my nervous. This book is a over rated. This is the story of Becky who was such a pathological liar with a relatively small mind. She lied about everything small and big, important and unimportant, good or bad so to speak, attempting to make everyone happy in her small and selfish ways, or for her own selfish reasons. Coming from a loving good family with great education, why she was so absurdly and senselessly stupid and dump is really beyond anyone with a minim dose of common sense can understand, except for those who think in the same way. Wonder what a sheltered life can do to one's life. May be someone should write a book title as "How to Tell the Truth in Daily life." Or call it "How to Tell the Truth 101."  The interesting characters who worth my sympathy is the wedding planer and Becky's mother. I had hard time to finish the book because I was out of patience with Becky less half way through the book. It is entertaining sometime, but most of the time Becky just irritate my nerve.
Very disappointed. I finally opened this book after many years on my shelf to help me in my quest to tell my adopted kids that I have made contact with their birthmother. What I read was a lot of anger, stories of unsuccessful reunions, and a feeling that an adopted child can never reach peace with either family. I refuse to believe that is true, but that is how the book comes across. Some points in the book are excellent, but the negative was just so prevelant.
Beyond the Occult. This book should have been a hard back and it isn't! I will be returning it as the order was incorrect
just such a disapointment. not worth the 10 minutes it takes to read this bookle
Mailer Sucks. I've never liked anything this unpleasant man has written but this one takes the cake. It's worse than his previous worst novel, Ancient Evenings, which single-handedly turned me off for years on all things Egyptian.No, I'm not some outraged evangelical railing at someone making use of "My Lord `n Savior," I think Jesus is fair game and a fine topic for literature and speculation. But I'm not going to do as so many others seem willing to and automatically bestow praise on a book merely because it takes the sacred Jesus and casts him into the harsh light of modern judgment. In The Gospel According To The Son, Norman Mailer, proponent of the "non-fiction novel" (figure that one out) manages to make a good story dull and argumentative, drains all color and life from the plot, and delivers something that is SO dead on arrival it's unrecognizable as the tale of Jesus: a biography already filled with drama, betrayal, false arrest, torture, execution, and all the raw material of a gripping story. I've got to hand it to Mailer, not everyone could take a story ready-made for adaptation, all-but handed to him on a silver platter like the head of Saint John the Baptist, and then smash it down to third-rate nonsense. Here even the Devil was boring and it takes A LOT to ruin the best villain ever created. Mailer seemed to want to absent all vestiges of Christ from this little re-telling of the life of the historical man, Jesus of Nazareth, and I can actually respect that, but in rendering this material so skeptically humanistic as to be bland beyond tolerance puzzles me. I can't say I laughed out loud at the truly bad jokes slipped in here and there amid the equally execrable prose, but the line about "Peter was like a rock...he could be broken by a bigger rock..." elicited a genuine chuckle that something so lame made it past an editor.Right after he released this work back in the late `90's, I heard the author on NPR saying, in essence, "The Gospels are badly composed. There are many writers who could have written them better, and I am foremost among that number." Mailer's ego knows no bounds and his trash talking was a little endearing. I just wish he was able to back it all up with a better book than this.The bottom line is this book blows. Skip it in favor of The Last Temptation of Christ, or read a good translation of the four Gospels
For me, very disappointing. Wow!  I'm astonished that everyone else liked this so much.  For me, watching Ruth Yancey Fox ruthlessly destroy the lives of everyone in her family was just too depressing.  I probably wouldn't have even finished this if I hadn't been on vacation.  I thought Ruth should have had her comeuppance a lot earlier in the story, and then there would have been a LITTLE more joy and happiness instead of grinding misery for the whole damn book.  I also thought the depiction of the black servants was a bit racist and patronizing.  (The old warmhearted-but-dimwitted stereotype.
So Drawn Out, Boring, and Predictable. Alright, already.....from the very beginning I knew where this book was going and unfortunately Bagshawe took 472 pages to get me there. I was expecting a great read after just finishing her novel "Adored", which I adored!!  I'm not giving up on Bagshawe yet, though, and will attempt another of her books.  Her writing style is comfortable and it's an easy read, but the plot developed after just a few chapters and the rest just drudged along a predictable course.
Only if you have to. I had to have this book for a class I took. I found it difficult to track. If you must buy it, look for it used
Disappointing, Considering The Reputation Of The Source. In my opinion, this book reads like a school book report. It is a disappointment, considering the reputation of the source -- Stephen Ambrose. Maybe I expected too much because the author is well known. On the other hand, I didn't expect too much from the not well known author Norman Thomas Remick and his book &quot;West Point&quot;, and was most pleasantly surprised. But there you are, then. It's not what you do, it's who you know that counts
Ouch!  Worse than Most Paperback Romances. This book proves once again, that you don't necessarily have to be a good writer to make lots of cash and sell huge quantities of books to the mass market.  "True Believer" is an all-star team of cheap, shallow cliches.  There is no plot.  No one really believes anything, and everything is a contrived, superficial mish-mash.  The dialoge has no depth, and when you've had too much dialoge, there's paragraph after paragraph of the main characters, "thinking" to themselves.  Wow, is this bad.  "Message in a Bottle" was a great plot idea, but its been a slow, steady descent since then.  You might have a good laugh at it like I did, but otherwise I was very disappointed.
Grrr!. Mars and Venus Together Forever is one of the most ridiculous, stupid books that I have ever had the gross misfortune to read.  I probably should have expected what I got, considering that Mars and Venus on a Date left me cold, but I read this one anyway because the original Mars and Venus book had SOME interesting insights and I'm a sucker for a cheap book.Anyone who buys into the stereotypes promoted by John Gray must be barmy.  He exaggerates, overemphasises and blusters his way through the 200+ pages - probably with the best motives in his mind - but in the end the stuff he writes is uninspiring and insipid.  According to him men and women are still ruled by `ancient' traditions which dictate that women are all do-gooder types who only desire to stay at home, chatting with other women and looking at flowers whilst men are all aggressive cavemen, grunting their way through their lives with zero finesse, a beer in one hand and the TV remote in the other.I don't see how anyone, man or woman, could read this book without being annoyed.  For women, the book is terribly unempowering.  If you don't fit in with any of Gray's ideas about what a woman should be then you are labelled as masculine.  I don't want to read a book which tells me that when I am at work I am moving towards my masculine side because being goal-oriented, competitive and efficient are male traits.  It's all phooey!  For men, the book is also offensive.  John Gray says that men shouldn't express their feelings because it will cause a woman to lose her attraction for him.  No, I don't believe that men and women are the same in all respects - there are gender differences - but in Mars and Venus these are distorted.Overall this book is not worth your time.  Underneath the waffle there may be some good points, but all of these are outweighed by the stereotypes.JoAnn
Not written by D, but another in household. This book is inspiring in the way that it encourages people to trust God.  Perhaps I should've given it two stars but what dissappointed me within reading the first two pages were the statements of&quot;....we deserve judgement&quot; and &quot;he was a 'godly' fugitive&quot;.  Perhaps being a little over-analytical or precise I would like to comment that man, himself is not godly.  Thus, using the word &quot;godly&quot; to discribe someone who wishes to follow &quot;God's ways&quot; should not be described as &quot;godly&quot; due to its misleading implications.  Second of all, the book should be precise on &quot;we deserve judgement&quot;.  Yes it is true that Jesus Christ is Lord of All and that this book has much good coming from it's pages, but one must wonder if the good that is meant to encourage can be ruined with inaccurate text that does not coalign with scripture.  God is the righteous judge and although we do not deserve His mercy, He is a God most of all of Love &amp; Truth.  Please understand that I am not bashing this book.  There are a lot of encouraging passages, but the &quot;spider scenario&quot; and other statements are misleading and do not rely all on scripture.  One should still satisfy ones curiosity and may do so in &quot;borrowing&quot; this book.  But in order for one to be a &quot;careful&quot; and &quot;passionate&quot; christian one should not be afraid to question what one is reading
LeCarre & Deighton he isn't !. This was a very ordinary spy novel. Nothing outstanding and nothing that suspensful. Way too many coincidences and not enough reality such as a LeCarre or Deigton would have.. If this book were a movie it would be classified as "B".....This is the first Littel book that I've read. Some reviews stated that Littel was in the genre of the great spy masters. Based on that info I purchased this one and one called The Company... Well, in the lexicon of Howard Cossell; " Fugetaboutit"!! He is a long, long way from the Masters ..
Gotham Not Concerned with Accuracy. Perhaps the girth of this work makes it difficult to check all the facts, but I found gross inaccuracies throughout. The authors are biased and totally unconcerned with representing historical truthfulness. The references to Aaron Burr in this book are perfunctory, snide or downright malicious. The first mention of Burr I found was on page 241, regarding the Battle of Brooklyn, where the authors state, "Howe's dallying gave Putnam and the rest of the army, guided by Lieutenant Aaron Burr, time to slip out of New York...." They fail to mention that Burr, debating with General Knox as to the wisdom of remaining, took it upon himself to address the men and take charge. In the ensuing retreat, they met the enemy during which Burr distinguished himself with "coolness, deliberation and valor...His meritorious services to the army on that day, rendered him an object of peculiar respect from the troops..." (Wandell & Menningerode). Yet Burrows and Wallace merely accord him a perfunctory nod.On page 279 they state, "Among the new assemblymen that year was Aaron Burr, making his political debut with no principles to speak of..." Snide and unnecessarily insulting.Hamilton, on the other hand receives page after page of high eulogism and the authors take great pains to speak of him, wherever possible, with the greatest regard. In Chapter 19 they state, "Hamilton treated the convention to a remarkable five-hour lecture....."  I wonder if the Philadelphia Convention felt that enduring a five hour diatribe was a treat, though I must admit Hamilton's ability to ramble on at such length is indeed remarkable. The authors' choose words for Hamilton which are positive; for Burr, negative.They describe Burr when he was the front-runner for Jefferson's running mate as, "...too young, too pushy, too devious...," words they claim were said by "...many Democratic-Republicans...," though they fail to say who. They go on to say, "Burr even dammed Minetta Creek to create a grand ornamental pool by the main gate..." (of Richmond Hill.) By inserting the word, `even' they insinuate that he committed a heinous act rather than improved his property. Snide and misleading.In the five paragraphs dedicated to the "Interview in Weehawken," they state that the impetus for the challenge was Hamilton's remark that he, "...looked upon Mr. Burr to be a dangerous man, and one who ought not to be trusted with the reins of government." While Hamilton certainly made this comment, it was not the one that Burr felt was demeaning to his honor. It was the "...still more despicable opinion..." statement that compelled Burr to demand an explanation.Though several letters passed between Hamilton and Burr prior to the duel, the only reference this book acknowledges is, "Hamilton let it be known....that his remarks `turned wholly on political topics, and did not attribute to Col. Burr any instance of dishonorable conduct, nor relate to his private character.' Burr nevertheless demanded an `interview' on the field of honor." This cannily shifts the blame totally onto Burr, making Hamilton seem like an innocent victim, which he was not.Furthermore, in describing the duel they state that Burr aimed and fired, Hamilton fell mortally wounded and Burr fled. They fail to mention that Hamilton not only fired, but probably fired first. Again, by misrepresenting Burr, they lionize Hamilton.The section ends with, "...facing a murder indictment and fearing his house would be attacked by a mob, he slipped out of town into obloquy everlasting." This won a Pulitzer Prize? I think they wrote the passage just for the opportunity to use the word, `obloquy.' Indeed, if not for books and authors like these, Burr might get the recognition he deserves, rather than the kind of calumny they write.In a passage on prostitution, they mention Madame Jumel saying, "She did, however, manage a short-lived marriage with the equally notorious Aaron Burr..." Malicious. I could cite more passages where he is mentioned either with contempt or disregard, but I think the point is made.The bibliographical list for this book is so extensive, they can only list authors without titles or page references. I finally found Lomask (Milton) and Kline (Mary-Jo, I presume) mentioned, but I have to wonder if they actually read any books on Burr or took the time to study his papers. Surely learned people who do in-depth research should, at some point, come the conclusion that history has dealt unfairly with Aaron Burr and stop this ongoing character assassination. Burrows and Wallace seize every opportunity to denigrate Burr while neglecting to use a single accolade when fitting occasions arise. It is distressing that, in 1999, opinions of Aaron Burr remain this convoluted.  I do not recommend anyone to buy this book
mildly entertaining but predictable. The cover blurbs mentioned "plot twists", "mystery", and "suspense".  In fact, it's very linear and (spoiler alert?) everything happens EXACTLY as you think it will.  I kept waiting for the twists but they never came.  I like books about athletes, athletic team dynamics, and youth sports issues, so this looked appealing.  Not a bad read, but pretty ho-hum.
Disappointing and predictable. This novel was a selection of my book club and as such it was a letdown. While you could classify the book as a "good read," so is a lot of mass market fiction. The characters are not well developed, and the author doesn't portray them subtly or fully enough for you to care about them. The plot as well as the writing is cliche-ridden, and the ending is pat. It is clear early on that the sisters will mend their relationship, find true love, and all will work out in the end. If you are looking for a recent, well-written book about sisters with more interesting plots and characterization, and a nice dose of humor, try Case Histories by Kate Atkinson or Rise and Shine by Anna Quindlen. A second-tier Anna Quindlen book is sharp, funny, and better written than most premiere efforts by other writers
Very poor source of dietary information. These people have stumbled upon the truth (carbs make you fat and contribute to poor health), but they cannot wean themselves from years and years of mainstream dietary misinformation.  So, for instance, they still publish the &quot;food pyramid&quot; with a base of six servings of carbohydrates.  They state that a food with a glycemic index of 70 or more is &quot;high.&quot;  That is really high!  Yet they recommend graham crackers as a snack for children (G.I. of 74). This book is confusing and poorly written
And yet more elitist filth in print. I was recommended Borges' works by one of his innumerable over-educated sycophants and I will never forget the tremendous time I wasted attempting to grasp the supposed value of his life's work (when I should have been writing my dissertation). Each time I read one of his pedantic, mediocre peices of short fiction, I was convinced by these elite book review troglodytes that I would like other examples of his work if I continued reading since &quot;all of his stories are so unique.&quot; I found the exact opposite to be true. One story after another about mazes, mirrors, mystical mathematical formulas and books, books, books. The ideas were transperant, the language boring in the extreme. His poetry is trite. Who needs this? Borges reads like a petulant graduate student at University of Chicago who failed repeatedly to get his/her short fiction published in _The Atlantic Monthly_. Particularly among academics, literary elites and like people, many seem to cite Borges and worship his genius more than read him--and certaintly _no one_ reads him critically. I read most of his work, and I can tell you, outside of a few interesting turns of phrase, you'd be better off reading a Yale dissertation on the semiotics of self-superiority. People incessantly talk about how imaginative Borges is. The vast majority of popular SF and fantasy writers are more imaginative. Even many of the despicable magical realist &quot;geniuses&quot; make Borges look rather plain. Borges merely litters his works with elite literary references and a kind of faculty cocktail party wit to make it more palatable to the kind of people who never step foot out of Manhattan or Cambridge. If you're this kind of pompous fellow, you'll want to sleep every night with a portrait of Luis by your side and a series of mirrors, as it were, slowly attempting to seek some kind of trans-substantiation with this benighted old librarian. If you're the kind of person who prefers reading about interesting characters, enjoying nuanced use of language, and grasping subtle, daring ideas that transcend purile academic banter, run far, far away from Jorge Luis Borges. Even top authors from all over the world and every historical period get bad reviews. The adulation of Borges merely underlines the fact that this is more about a cult of personality among (those who think themselves) intellectual elites than a serious attempt to evaluate his fiction. I think his fiction is better considered a kind of academic experiment, relegated to quirky local fiction publications and coffee house poetry slams, and not an example of literary genius. In that sense, 30min spent on one of his short stories gets you the drift of his entire body of work, and that's about as much attention as he deserves
Mind numbing. This is the first book I ever thew in the garbage. It was so bad that my teenager and I read parts outloud for laughs.Here is an example of a PERFECT PHRASE on how to break bad news to the boss:"I just have made what might be a career-limiting move."
Good Fireplace Book. This is a great book to read by the fireplace. After about thirty pages you can conveniently toss it IN the fireplace! This is the most boring, disorganized, pointless book I have ever read. I read it because it was recommended by Stephen King. If you want a good book, I would recommend looking elsewhere
Horrible Book. This book scared me to death and I was for sure I would have a miscarriage.  Made me feel like I was not worthy of pregnancy b/c I was overweight!  My husband threw this book in the trash and we are better for it!!!!
A little disappointing.... I am a fan of Kary Odiatu as a competitor and fitness model in many magazines.  I bought this book on a recommendation of an acquaintaince as well as the fact Ms. Odiatu and her husband were the authors.  As a personal trainer, I try to find books that would be well suited for my clients.I was up to page 85 wondering when anything of real value beyond a lot of rah-rah was going to appear.  Sadly, that did not happen.  Even the chapters that were designed to enlighten about shopping and training, were basically hollow.I was gravely disappointed in this book and even find it quite perfunctory and remedial for even a beginner to the lifestyle.While I do appreciate the emotional support and 'You can achieve it' sentiment -- it was most repetitive and truly took away pages and pages from what could have been a wonderful book if it ever got past the cheerleading and proceeded deeper into fitness.I strongly recommend Christine Lydon's book 'Look Hot, Live Long'; Beth Horn's book "The Natural Way"; or Bodyfitness for Women: Your Way to Physical Perfection, written by Gerard Thorne and Phil Embleto
A Bit Disappointing... I found Rick Hess's "humor" to be a bit hostile and sexist in places (such as on page 88 when he implies men would rather kill themselves than let their wives manage their homes.) It distracted from what is a serious subject.The probability chapter struck me as being quite irrational. Mr. Hess's states that there is no such thing as probability, that we are denying God's sovereignty, when we believe that 2 parents with blue-eyes are very likely to have blue-eyed children. What I think Mr. Hess is denying is the clear evidence that God *usually* acts within the physical laws he creates. Yes, he can override genetics and give a child any color of eyes he wishes--but under ordinary circumstances, we can safely count on God to follow the laws of genetics. Following Mr. Hess's statement that there are no laws of genetics, one could state that with each pregnancy they would have no idea if they would give birth to a human, a cat, or who knows what. How ridiculous! I'm not even sure how he thought this anti-probability chapter contributed to the central thesis of quiverfullness. If anything, it seems to take away from his argument, since if God is soveign and totally unpredicatable, then we have no reason to think that birth control would ever work anyway, so what would it matter if we use it?While the book makes an excellent case that children are a blessing and that Christians should desire to be blessed with children, it doesn't make a Biblical case that the use of non-abortifacient birth control is "sin". I think many Christians would like the issue to be cut and dried, but the truth is, God does give us choices in life. Many times there are equally valid choices. Sometimes one choice is "better" than another choice, but that doesn't make the lesser choice "sin".Still, many informative & interesting points are brought up in the book. It is a quick read, and probably worth the read for someone seriously investigating this subject. In my opinion a much better read on this subject is "Birthing God's Mighty Warriors" by Rachel Scott
Still looking for the funny parts. This book is devoid of humor or insight. Save your money and apply it towards "Adventure Capitalist" by Jim Rogers.  I wish I had
Misleading, repetitive and under-researched. It is unfortunate this book didn't come out better. Some glaring problems with it include:- has no concept of energy physics to begin with- does not understand "hydrogen economy" (hydrogen's an expensive storage, not a source of energy)- downplays geological data of oil discovery (or doesn't understand it), although Hubbert is covered briefly- believes or disseminates half-baked unproven ideas from the research sector: scientifically not valid energy sources are brought forward as alternative fuels- does not deal with the net energy concept (EROEI) or even refer to itWith these fundamental oversights it's really difficult to recommend the book.It's not completely without merit as it does tell some of the basics right, but mostly it's pathologically impartial journalistic fluff, without looking at the hard facts as a good researcher should.It's too much about how we are miraculously going to replace oil, gas and coal with tar sands, nuclear power, hydrogen and live happily ever after.To those readers who want to believe this, this might be a good book. People looking for valid and scientifically solid reasoning on the subject will be sorely disappointed.I'd recommend books by Deffeyes, Simmons, Heinberg, Campbell and many others before this (all on peak oil)
The thing about a confessional... The thing about a confessional is that no one ever confesses times when they did something good. Times when they were more clever than usual, or nicer.  When you confess, you're exposing the times you were cruel, or petty, or stupid.This book is a confessional.There's not a single likable person in the book.  This is an understatement along the lines of 'Goebbels would have made a bad rabbi', but there you go.  I'd put this book down and feel depressed about life.The illustrations are good, although it was strange that, after spending six detailed pages learning about the main character's tattoos and the crappy quality of them, we never actually see any tattoos in any of the pictures of the main character.
Zero stars (if they had that option). I really have to say that this is the worst management book I read. [...] Moreover, the book is full of clichs. I kept reading it, expecting that the good part was coming, but there was no good part! I eventually reached the end of the book where he says "If you don't try, you will never know", and "don't let anything grind you down", as if these were very revealing statements. This is what we tell little kids, and we all learned this when we were 5 years old, and I find pitiful that the author has no other ideas to conclude his book with. I would never recommend this book to anyone in any business field.
smug math book. This is one of those math books where the authors enjoy making inexplicable leaps between equations that really don't follow in a smooth logical fashion one from another.  They are terrible at explaining things.  They like to boast that they are from Stanford, (subtext: implied: if you are not from Stanford you probably wouldn't understand it anyway, you poor pitiful low-income commoner).  I absolutely hate the tone of this book.  And the side comments in the margins are inane, weak and mostly irritating.  I threw it aside in disgust and went back to Warren Weaver.
Two books in one. I had been looking forward to reading about the Lessons learned by a blind person but I was not prepared for Sunday School lessons with each learning experience.  I feel the book would have been much better with a little less preaching.
ABSOLUTE BOREDOM. This unfortunate book suffers from an acute case of aphoristic intoxication, evidenced in such pithy morsels as: "like most cynics he was profoundly sentimetal about sex" and "our marriage was the meeting of zero and zero."Although such modestly entertaining observations kept me plodding along, the book is a lame attempt at armchair beat philosophizing, ensnarled in a wholly unengaging plot and unbelievably boring characters. I first read about this greatest of books in Joe Ezterhas's biography, and it makes sense that he would consider its shallow machisimo the stuff of masterpieces.Avoid this. Reread Day of the Locust. Recommended for only the most die-hard of Hollywood historians or cultural completists
Another not very exciting Lt. Bak story... I keep trying but cannot get interested in the stories by this author.  They seem to drag out with her style of "he said/she said" writing with nothing exciting, except perhaps one part in this book.  The story begins as the famous Lt. Bak is asked by his commander Thuty to investigate the disappearance of an explorer named Minnakht. His guide, Senna tells Bak of the disappearance and attraction to turquoise mines near the sea.  The land is hostile and murder and death come as Lt. Bak questions each man over and over. The ending was not exciting or unexpected. Lt. Bak's constant referrals to the donkeys (we know how he is sympathetic to animals, this big strong medjay!! I had to make myself sit and finish it.
Poor (beautiful) me!. An interesting thing happens when people write memoirs of terrible things that happened to them: readers are afraid to say anything bad about the books themselves, because it looks like they're being unsympathetic towards the tragedies described. I felt for Dani Shapiro when her father died, but without that incident, this reads like the work of a self-obsessed rich b*tch who epitomizes solopsism: nothing in the world matters to her but her own experience and what people think of her. It is very important, by the way, that you think she is beautiful, as she reminds you constantly throughout the book. That, to me, is the quality of someone who hasn't quite worked out her own problems--someone who is sadly aware of how she acts and says and what you think of her as a result--and someone who is probably not completely honest with you, dear reader, because the ugly parts of her--the ones for which you won't feel sorry for her--are most likely omitted
Will this ever end....?. I admit that I'm addicted - despite the s.l.o.w. progress, constant female bickering, and frequent fashion details.  I want to see how this dang series ends...will it?This particular installment of the Dragon et. al. left me feeling underwhelmed.  The ending was a disappointment, but I'll press on and order book 8.
Disappointing. The plot is good but there are about 200 pages too many.  Why a full chapter to tell us what the protagonists are thinking about the attach case, when we already know it was not in the car and we could tell them where it is? We know where the precious document is : another useless quest. People are murdered by the half dozen, the characters are outrageous, most of the time improbable, and I felt the semi-erotic swimming episode totally stupid, not to mention the girl apologizing constantly about it.I have read much better books than that. Sorry..
Just Plain Dumb... ...but that's to be expected since this is, after all, written for the sort of person who is somehow STILL behind the Bush Administration's foreign policy, even after more than four years of it.  Well, this much can be said: At least the author showed some consideration for his true audience by keeping things extremely short and simple.  Simplistic, in fact.  That audience is very easy to recognize--they're the ones, while reading this book-priced magazine article, whose lips are moving
The Feeling Biologist. On the plus side:It is good to have an advocate for the role of emotions and feelings in rational thought. There can be no doubt that both emotions and feelings have a crucial role to play in learning, discovery, persuasion, belief and insight; the challenge, which Dammassio is not equipped or inclined to meet, is to define the boundaries of the proper role of emotions in rational thought. It is not clear to me how Dammassio would advise members of a jury to weigh the evidence before them 'dispassionately'. Or perhaps he would advise that they shouldn't?Despite the eccentricity of ascribing 'emotions' to single cell organisms, I appreciate Dammassio's distinction between emotions - dispositions organisms adopt, more or less automatically, in response to stimuli which serve to promote restoration of homeostasis, and feelings - dispositions of the mind in which perceptions of emotions expressed in the body, in turn modify those same emotions, and for which mental events can also act as stimuli. This sets up the suggestive and useful idea of the 'brain-body loop', including the 'as-if brain-body loop' where the stimulus is mental.This conception allows Dammassio to explain how the whole body participates in thinking, by mediating processes in the brain. A feeling causes a change in the body (e.g. a tightening of the stomach in response to some cause of anxiety) which in turn produces the sensation of that same emotion (e.g., you feel your stomach tighten, alerting you to your anxiety). This is a very useful idea, and needs in fact the body is able to play this mediating role in brain activity of all kinds, not just feelings and emotions. Dammassio provides a strong argument for understanding the whole person as the appropriate unit for understanding thinking, not just the brain.On the minus side:What is it with this mixture of positivistic, almost Lockean, exposition of human biology, based on 'the latest discoveries of science', in the tradition of Comte, social Darwinism, Ernst Haeckel, Konrad Lorenz, Desmond Morris, Robert Ardrey and company, with, on the other hand, semi-biographical eulogies over the seventeenth century rationalist philosopher Spinoza? It's like the song-and-dance routines put on for pre-match and half-time entertainment at the football. I suspect that Dammassio is relying on a weakness of Spinoza to which he makes a passing reference, namely, that by simply saying that thought and extension are two attributes of the one substance, the difficulty of explaining how thought arises from the activity of material beings is simply by-passed. For this is just what Dammassio does.Like any number of positivists before him, Dammassio finds that 'the latest discoveries of science' have at last given us an understanding of how mental images are formed ... all except for just that last step unfortunately, but that last link in the chain will doubtless be discovered within the next decade or two. Dammassio has the same problem as John Locke: if you see thought as simply the product of one material system interacting with other material systems, then you can push the boundary back further and further (either by speculation or by scientific investigation) but sooner or later you get to that point, and you either insert the homunculus to watch the "movie-in-the-brain" (as Dammassio calls it) or you just hope that that last step will be explained by new discoveries of modern science, just around the corner. Dammassio is sophisticated enough to avoid highlighting the contradiction with any reference to a homunculus, or a yet-to-be-discovered 'control centre' somewhere in the brain, so his ruse seems to be to insert a eulogy to Spinoza in lieu of an explanation.And these 'mirror neurons', introduced to explain empathy, are complete fiction. This is not a claim that needs to be argued, the idea is pure fantasy and the claim to have found the location where they to be found is outrageous. No-one in the field believes it. 'Mirror neurons' are a disturbing step from biological explanation of biological phenomena to biological explanations of social phenomena, and with that, the incipient justification for medical intervention and social engineering as the cure for social problems.All this could be harmless enough. If the object is to improve understanding of the working of the nervous system for the purpose of curing psychiatric illness or brain injury, it is a very worthwhile exercise. But the 'mirror neurons' alert us to the inevitable wider agenda.For Dammassio, all social institutions  are "mechanisms for exerting homeostasis at the level of the social group", and in fact all social, political and ethical phenomena are "extensions" of these processes within the organism, and have their "forerunners" in the social behaviour of wolves, birds and so on. In other words, puerile social Darwinism of the worst order.Faced with self-serving navit of this breathtaking order, and with obvious fictions like the 'mirror neurons' making their appearance in what is presented as hard neuroscientific fact, one is then somewhat hesitant about accepting as good coin the rather appealing ideas about the role of body maps and emotions in the mediation of thought.Dammassio also cleverly plays with the idea that all the phenomena of culture and human society are somehow less real than the facts of biology, self-aggrandizing illusions of animals who kid themselves that they have become something more. Thus consciousness and mind are "what we call mind and consciousness," (this phrase 'what we call' is used several times). Dammassio is clever enough not, like say Desmond Morris, to be explicit in this ploy, he just suggests to the reader without spelling it out.
Then many false prophets will rise up and deceive many - Matt. 24:15. Let me just say I respect the NOI and it's leaders, particulary Mister Farrakhan.  However, the doctrine they are following is false.  Many former Christians and non-christians have been led astray by a religion that is supposedly the black man's religion, and the false pretense that Allah and Jehovah are the same God. However, just because something caters to a particular ethnic group doesn't mean it's right(liquor stores in black low income neighborhoods). In addition if the God of Islam is the same God of Christianity then their messages shouldn't contradict each other! The bible was written thousands of years before "Message to the Black Man". If Elijah Mohammed quotes the bible(which he does many times in this book) to prove his teachings then that means the bible has precedecence because it is the older source.  Therefore, if anything Elijah Mohammed says CONTRADICTS the bible (Farrad Mohammed was the Messiah who came in 1930????) you have to reject Elijah Mohammed, the latter source.  Judge Christianity by Jesus the Christ not so-called hypocritical Christian leaders from slavery times and beyond. If your tires go flat you fix not buy another car. Let's fix the Christian church so we all (black, white, red, )can go to heaven.
Read closer for the true picture. Beyond the Influence injects the reader with exhaustive detail the effects of "the drug alcohol" on the human body and brain in both alcoholics and nonalcoholics.  A psychologist author and a recovered alcoholic paint a clear picture that alcoholism is a true medical disease rooted in abnormalities in brain chemistry.  The audience is clearly directed towards teachers who are in treatment clinics.  Page after page it fatigues the reader with information that anyone with intelligence would have knowledge of but never before took the time or forced to understand the steps to take for an intervention, to find the right treatment program or how to prevent a future relapse.  Looking at the bigger picture sparks the idea that it is not only a lucrative business in supplying a legal drug as alcohol but writing books or establishing treatment centers to reap the wealth from the victims even more.Charles Darwin in the book, On the Origin of Species by Means of Natural Selection, gives the impression that evolution is about the survival of the fittest.  It makes sense why Katherine in chapter four writes that for hundreds, even thousands of years, people have argued loud and long that alcoholism is a shameful personal weakness, a stubborn character defect, or a symptom of some underlying moral disorder.  In a world filled with labels to counter attack chaos and confusion it is very interesting in how life itself operates.  The world in its natural state rests pure evilness. With norms and labels humans put daily pressure upon each other to separate the strong from the weak.  The effect causes some to fall and when this happens some turn away while others flock like vultures to the "weak" in order to either reap the wealth or make themselves feel more excepted. People wish to be settled:   only as they are unsettled is there any hope for them.Thanks to Katherine everyone can rest easier knowing that it is not 100% their fault since she does point out that alcoholism is a disease of the body, not a weakness of character. In the future will we ever see the one million march with flags stating that alcoholism is a disease, so therefore its time we started treating it like one? The truth is that our finest moments are most likely to occur when we are feeling deeply uncomfortable, unhappy, or unfulfilled.  For it is only in such moments, propelled by our own discomfort, that we are likely to step out of our ruts and start searching for different ways or truer answers.  With this said maybe the norms and labels that are pushed on newborns from the time being born do serve a purpose. In a blameless society maybe it is easier to point out that a river runs through us, and that river is called alcohol, instead of pointing the finger back at ourselves from the chaos that we have created among the thousands of years. The march will never be seen and yes the argument that alcoholism is a shameful personal weakness will forever exist and Charles Darwin at the end was correct that evolution is about the survival of the fittest
well... I can't believe they would ruin perfectly good toilet paper on this. What's the world coming to
need lots of materials to make cards. I think that the book had lots of cute ideas but they all require lots of separate materials that I did not already have in my vast collection of cardmaking and scrapbooking supplies. You could use the basic ideas and modify them to make your own cards though
A Book to Make Its Readers Angry (For the Wrong Reasons). I found The Whole Woman more antagonistic and needlessly controversial than enlightening. Greer makes it quite clear that there is exactly one feminist left on the planet, and she is it.I'm hard-pressed to think of any third-wave feminists who live up to her standards. To do so, you would have to be an earth-mother living in a separatist commune with her lesbian lover. There's nothing wrong with that lifestyle, but it's not one to which most feminists would aspire. It's not one to which I aspire.Also, it's as limiting a construction of womanhood as the patriarchal one she deplores. What do you do if you are heterosexual? It's all very well for her to say that you can reconstruct yourself as a lesbian, but that's as insulting as the implication that homosexuals just need to try hard enough and they can be heterosexual.In a similar vein, I found her views of men particularly unpleasant. She suggests in no uncertain terms that they're all potential adulterers, rapists, child-abusers, wife-beaters, misogynists, etc . . . etc . . ., and that any woman who wants an equal, non-exploitative relationship had better become a lesbian. It's hard to see it as anything but pure slander, backed up by the flimsiest of anecdotal evidence. Just because you can cite a few cases of sickos who get turned on by their baby daughters in their nightgowns does not mean that all fathers will inevitably turn to abuse.The rest of the book is no better. It's very poorly researched and argued, and parts of it verge into the insane. She seems particularly taken with the idea of "primitive" women as whole women, because they aren't bound by Western concepts of femininity. What she doesn't mention is that those women experience the same oppression that Western feminists fought long and hard to overcome. They might not wear bras or high-heels, but that doesn't make them any less oppressed by patriarchy. It seems obvious to me that women from tribal societies do not generally have much real political power, but are doomed to bear lots of children and die young. When she does look at the appalling aspects of those societies, she puts a positive spin on them. There's even a section where she seems to defend female genital mutilation.Also, I can imagine that some of her ill-informed views are extremely offensive to people in those situations. She describes IVF as patriarchal appropriation of and interference into the process of reproduction. Similarly, she suggests that women who don't opt for natural childbirth (without anaesthetic, of course) are allowing men to remove them from the process. It's utterly disrespectful of the choices women may choose to make, not because they've internalised their oppression but because inseminating themselves with a turkey-baster seems vaguely ludicrous or because they don't want to experience agonising pain.It's been a while since I read a feminist book that made me angry and this one does so for all the wrong reasons. It makes me embarrassed to call myself a feminist.
Don't waste your money on this "book"!. This book is nothing more than a marketing tool for the author to get you to buy more of his books, seminars and products.  Each chapter gives a taste of a marketing concept and then ends the chapter with a website to go to for more information. Of course these websites want you to purchase the information in the form of more books, newsletters, seminars, etc. I also purchased 2 other marketing books at the time I bought this one, "How To Become A Marketing Superstar" by Jeffrey J. Fox and "Your Marketing Sucks" by Mark Stevens.  Both offered complete, sound marketing concepts that I've already put to use and are showing results. And best of all...they didnt' try to sell me anything
A Disappointment. What a disappointment! Boosting Immunity is a collection of chapters by different authors that is poorly focused and lacks continuity. There is nothing new in this book. It is mostly a rehash of commonly available information and some of the chapters, like chapter two, read like they were copied out of an enclyclopedia. The most attractive thing about this book is the title. Save your money
alarmingly bad shtick. This is a very bad book once you get past your self-conscious fear that you are missing something--I would say an alarmingly bad book: one has to wonder why this manuscript was submitted, and if submitted, not edited. This turns into a repetition of the allusive and graceful, for sure,  but unsubstantiated shtick of the by-now facile co-mingling of forms and genres, made even weaker by a lack of discipline to corral digressive discursions and courage to present arguments in at least occassionally straightforward logical presentation--this is all riffing on material we've seen before and it repeats and repeats and repeats itself. Yes, we can treat "Yahweh" as a purely literary-textual rather than an embedded national-cultic figure whose text was never naked and whose narrative was never uninstantiated in an actual religious-national culture (itself progentive but not, as a culture, textual-canonical), and compare this to the figure of "Jesus Christ as God" and then, propose a Gnostic trope of Yahweh's self-shrinkage in internally distancing (and neurotic) "zimzum."Presumably we could also describe quantum mechanics in a poetical fashion and discourse freely on the feline qualities of Schrodinger bifurcated cattiness vis a vis the solid roundness of Newtonian physical matter--except we would be missing what was substantive and unique about the actual subject matter.I will let Christians decide whether the oft-repeated and repeated remark that Jesus Christ is not Yahweh is meaningful or provocative for them; as a semi-agnostic Jew I would agree that Christianity has not supplanted Judaism and that Judaism will and must always attempt to define itself on its own terms. Still, I must wonder what this observation, when it comes for the second, fifth, and tenth time, actually tells us about the plurality of Second Commonwealth Judaisms, the full Gestalt of "Yahwehism" throughout patriarchal, Rabbinic, and mystical literature, or, indeed, the "Jewishness" of classic Christian doctrinal claims in an age where very Orthodox Jews (who do, it is true, practice the Law) now freely confess to belief in a dead Messiah, who will be resurrected, and who, many declare, is "the essence of God in a body".Moreover, the second-and-third hand derived picture of kabbalah, most particularly the poetical post-Kafkaesque elaboration on the meaning and emotional import of "Yahweh's" zimzum is a debilitatedly reductionist and misleading summation for the reader of the contextual placement and import of zimzum and shvirat keliim within the rich panoply of inter-related Lurianic symbology as understood through its oral and written expositors. Just as Hamlet really is not Yeshua and Bloom's Yahweh is an over-familiarized and sized down version of the theophononic and hieraphantic Yahweh-Adonoi-El of Jewish tradition and practice, so is his Yahweh of zimzum an over angst-compressed shoebox size misimpression of the Divine Structure of actual Lurianic kabbalah
lame... this book is full of useless ideas, good ideas, yes, but common sense...not worth the money..
The law of sex an violence. If it bleeds it leads. Too bad. If it bleeds it leads. Sensationalism at its worst. Painful novel to read but forced myself to finish. Yuck??? Have heritage and have studied history of this era and region from the best of Harvard professors. This fiction was filled with far too much blood and sex. Not a good read, actually somewhat insulting for those with Irish background
A treatise in Chamberlainian liberalism. Barber is a quintessential liberal thinker who believes in unabridged ability of human beings to do good thinks - like improving living conditions and spreading good governance. Hence his vision on how to spread good things in the world - by reasoning, education, being nice, sacrificing sovereignity for the sake of international institutions, and acting on international arena in the way that is devoid of selfish motives.In the end of the day, this idealistic vision brings Barber to lamenting the downfall of the Taliban. If anything, it proves that road to hell is paved with good intentions.That is why.1. That is a perfect agenda for acting with humans, societies, and governments that share your basic values and visions. This is not a preventive, but rather supportive democracy. It definitely has a legitimate role in international politics - but only this far.2. Let us admit that not everyone is nice and can be changed by proper education. Some of the worst dictators like Fidel were educated in the West. Some of the worst terrorists, like 9-11 or London 7-7 bombers, received everything from the Western society in terms of education, affluence, and opportunities. This brings to the question whether liberal Wilsonian thinking is a proper compass to navigate yourself beyond the world of shared values.3.  Dictators, fanatics, and terrorist actually understand the power of good ideas. That is why they block their spread. You can educate and be nice to the people only where you are allowed to. Preemptive dictators easily block preemptive democracy by sensoring books, closing borders, disrupting broadcasts. Here is why wilsonian idealism stops. It simply does not know how to deal with the people who only perfect themselves in being evil. Oh, Mr Barber, did you travel to Kabul in 1999? Why did not you go and talk and convince Mulla Omar about the virtue of good education? Yeah, it is easy to talk multilateralism in New York and Berlin. But it is only because that is where it works.4. Unlike what Barber says, terrorism is for real, and it is nourished by the dictatorial states. The threat of nuclear proliferation is for real and North Korean testings only confirm this. Here, Barber goes into what every ideologue (no matter left or right) falls when reality does not coincide with vision: that is, denial. Denial that evil in the world is not constrained to George W. Bush and neocons.5. This denial makes him fail to recognize the fact that dictators and terrorists free ride on multilateralism. That is, they use international institutions, rules, treaties, etc., to obstruct democratic powers, to bind their hands, and to go on: with repressions, genocide, nourishing terrorism, etc. If you need examples how multilateralism kills, look at Bosnia and Darfur.6. Preemptive democracy beyond the area of shared values is hence nothing but cover-up for this free-riding.7. One thing I totally agree with Barber is much what he says about the Iraq war. It was a wrong decision to go into it. But let us face it: the character of war changed dramatically since 2003. It is no longer the war on Saddam's state. It is the war on stateless terrorism, on the people ready to slaughter their ethnic and religious kin, on the people ready to kill Italians, Russians, Jordanians, Shia, whatever stays in their front. Withdrawal from this war is capitulation equal to Munich. Oh, yeah, peace for our time, like Chamberlain said.8. By no means war shall be a primary weapon in spreading democracy. But it shall be an option in exceptional cases. Let us admit not humans are perfectible. Let us acknowledge that some have to be constrained and deterred. Let us agree that rules of contstraining, deterring, and if necessary destroying evil shall not be entrusted with the bodies where Libya chairs the human rights commission. If we want for multilateralism: let us organize the community of democracies. Let us recognize that Luxembourg shall have more voice on the international arena than China only because it does not slaughter and persecute its people. If this is the case, I will have no problem to give Luxembourg and the US equal voice.Preventive democracy shall be the first choice of the tool because it is safe and because it is nice. But insisting that this is the only available tool means denial of the obvious. If the world could have been changed by the nice means only, it could have been a nice world. Unfortunately, this is not the case. Insisting on the opposite means disarming oneselves from Osamas, Kim Jong Ils, and Akhmadinejads.And that is why Barber mourns the downfall of the Taliban.
Disappointing!. If you're looking for a serious approach to the topics of religious belief or life after death, this isn't it.  It's a poor attempt by an author who  is terrific at conjecture, but poorly trained in the field of religious  phenomenology
Movie Is Better..,. I swear, that this book i awfull. I wasn't much of a fan for the first book. But this was horribale and more confusing. I think Thomas Harris Could've done better.If you Liked This Book check out the movie, soundtrack, The Silince Of The Lambs & Red Dragon also By Thomas Harris
for SELL-SIDE analysts only. I bought this book based on the strong reviews as a complement to Damodaran's classic on valuation, but felt disappointed.To qualify my comments: First, I am not a sell-side analyst, and secondly, I haven't finished the book. After about 50 pages, I threw in the towel.My first stylistic objection to the book is its low content density. There is tremendous repetition and examples are trotted out in excruciating detail, even where the conclusions are fairly obvious. For example, on p. 34: "At competitive equilibrium, the firm can identify no incremental investment opportunities likely to generate returns in excess of capital costs. Competitive equilibrium is often defined as a condition in which investment opportunities generate returns equal to capital costs, but existing investments continue to earn abnormal rates." To me these two sentences are already redundant. But in case you still didn't get it, further DOWN on the SAME PAGE: "...This situation is called economic equilibrium, or economic parity. What does equilibrium mean? When returns are forced down to capital costs, then economic rents and/or abnormal  earnings disappear and no further incentive to enter the business exists".But the most frequently repeated point of the first two chapters, is best summed up on p. 19: "As I say many times in the coming pages [and he's not kidding, there], equity analysis is not prophecy; it's opinion. It was never meant to be objective description, but it is strong advocacy." If you're the sell-side analyst, having to "dress up a pig" to help your firm gain some banking business, this book might offer some ideas. But where does this leave the consumer of such analysis? "It's the investor's job to 'diversify' by considering a variety of analysts' positions." (p.9)I think better advice for the investor might be to learn how to perform sound analysis themselves. For that, I recommend Damodaran's book. I lost my faith in this book's intent to provide balanced (let alone predictive) analysis
Not useful. This book does not deliver on it's cover title. I bought this text thinking it will help me learn the basic working details of TCP/IP. I was totally dissappionted
A major disservice to the book. The book THE LOST CONTINENT is an amazing captivating read.  Bryson is truly brilliant in his descriptions.  This CD totally KILLS that.  First of all the narrator reads at a mile a minute, sometimes to the point where you can't understand him.  And second, they abridged the CRAP out of it, cutting some of the most interesting commentary and actually cutting the entire SECOND HALF of the book!  While the book is amazing, this particular recording of it should be avoided at all costs
Isn't this "theory" gibberish getting old by now?. No, I'm not going to dignify this by elaborating further.  This is just a link in the chain of (giggle) "historial fiction" that currently accounts for DaVinci Code, etc.  It's all been said before, Michael.  HO-hum...
Look how smart we are!. This may be the worst book on real estate or mortgage markets that I have ever seen.  The authors seem to be saying &quot;Look how smart we are!&quot;  I have an MBA from University of Chicago and much of the book is a bad rephrasing of inroductory corporate finance.  My book for the real estate class at University of Chicago was by Bruggman (?) and Fisher; although that book will not win any awards, it is vastly superior.  This book could easily lose 1/2 of its contents.  Don't waste your money
slow going. Smith's book is a classic, and it is cheap - so those are some benefits.  However, the book is poorly organized.  It does not give you a clear outline in each chapter, and instead bounces around a little too much.  The most frustrating part of the book is Smith's clear intention to make all the religions seem as similar as possible.  Therefore, I think he sometimes does not give a clear picture, but instead describes the lowest common denominator.Finally, some knowledge of Christianity will be helpful in reading this book.  He uses allusions from the Bible in every chapter.
Poorly written. According to Amazon author Paul A. Woods is, among other things, a researcher.  This is not apparent from reading this book.I was not expecting a literary classic but at least some accuracy would have been nice.Much of the book reads like bad fanfiction.  The author introduces a Jason Voorhees who is willing to follow the requests of someone other than his mother.  Jason also uses a hunting rifle as a hunting rifle rather than a club or spear.  The poor mischaracterization of the main character stands as the most glaring error in the book.This is not the only error in the book however.  The author also introduces a laser pointer with the ability to burn flesh, a .48 caliber handgun, and a pump-action double-barreled shotgun.The ending of the book is forced and makes little sense.  It reads as though the author was told to hurry and decided to kill several characters out of spite.Waste of money and time.
Not So Good. I was enthusiastic about this book when I first scanned it at the bookstore.  Later, after trying a few recipes and spending more time with it, I found it to be mediocre.
DISAPPOINTING, DISAPPOINTING, DISAPPOINTING!. I have enjoyed many of Anne Tyler's books, particularly, "Dinner at the Homesick Restaurant," "Breathing Lessons" and "Back When We Were Grownups".  "Saint Maybe" was a huge disappointment.  The plot and characters were mediocre at best, and a bizarre religion, The Church of the Second Chance, played a major part in the story. By the end of the book, it had completely taken over.  The Church of the Second Chance fell somewhere between a strict religion and a cult.  Yes, Ian Bedloe was close to a saint for looking after three children for the best part of his life, but why the book was named, "Saint Maybe" is still a mystery to me.  One of the children in Ian's care made reference to Ian as perhaps being "Saint Maybe," but who the heck is Saint Maybe??  The closest I could come up with is "MAYBE you will finish the book... and MAYBE you won't!
Could have been better, I think. Well, the fact that I'm writing a review about this book, while it's sitting open on my desk next to my computer, open and not being read, might be some evidence of how I'm enjoying this book. This book just goes on and on in complex an unclear language about a subject which shouldn't be so difficult. This book is not clear or easy to understand at all. Every sentence is awkward and followed by a footnote, and the masses of footnotes together take up half of EACH page (!), making this work look like a research project for a PhD publication. I have the casebook in this series, and sometimes it seems reading the cases alone will bring more clarity. And it turns to be true! This book might be good if you're advanted-contracts and want to know every little detail, or as an advanced reference later on, to look something up like in an encyclopedia. Some concepts, which should be pretty clear just get too in-depth coverage in this book. It's too complex for a first-year student. Sometimes it starts describing the different views out there, and then there's a jumble in your head as to what the law really is. I wish the author used his own knowledge and fluid language more than footnoted ideas from other authors.
Slow, unlikely, and mostly uninteresting story. What Michael Cunningham does best in this book is the little things.  Similes and metaphors and various details are almost always right on.  The story itself, told in alternating first persons, spends most of its time telling us about the characters, especially toward the end.  It seems we have four psychologists who do very little other than analyze themselves and the others.  First, people don't analyze themselves or others nearly to this degree.  Second, the characters actually do very little when not analyzing.Two other issues are the improbable three-way love affair and Bobby's indefinable sexual orientation.The worst problem of all is that this is a character-driven novel and I just didn't care about what happed to any of the characters
There is a problem. The problem is:  If you are not familiar with 20th Century Irish history, you will be lost reading this book when Part 1 ends. Doyle provides the reader with no historical background and writes the book assuming that the reader is all ready well-versed in Irish history.  I also had trouble visualizing Ireland, the places, buildings, streets, and the battle scenes, which I attribute to Doyle's lack of description and to my lack of Irish knowledge
Well drawn, but not my thing. The subject matter isn't nearly as varied as the Amazon review suggests; the majority of it is vampires and vampire-related activities.  It is very well drawn, though.  Bottom line, I tore out 4 pictures that I thought were especially sexy or good for art reference and threw away the rest.If you like vampires, this book is for you
down in front!. Just as in his book on Orson Welles, Thomson harbors an untoward lust to "get into the act" himself.  He is forever flapping his arms in front of the projector to throw his own shadow up upon the screen.He apparently fancies himself a philosopher, so we are never far from some pompous pronunciamento:"In America we treasure shared things, as if we had a constant fear of being helplessly divided and scattered.""Here, by the way, is a profound contradiction in much of Americana..."etcHe is, unsurprisingly, cavalier enough about facts to expect to be allowed to breeze by with "To be quick about this part of it, the campaign of the House Committee on Un-American Activities was unconstitutional, and in its punishment, the blacklist, it was illegal."    HUAC's "campaign" itself sadly passed muster via  Congress' power to investigate just about anything it wishes to waste time on, or grandstand about.  It was the methods that offended. HUAC "punishment" was indictment for contempt of congress. The judiciary did the rest on that score, dutifully seeing several into the slam. The blacklist was exclusively the illegitimate get of The (frightened) Studios.Worst of all about this book is that, whenever he runs out of cheap, scurrilous, time-hallowed, dirt to re-publish, Thomson concocts bitchy dish "nouveau" of his own to serve up
Would you blame a cancer patient for her cancer?. Then let's not pretend that diet has anything to do with the severe pain associated with endometriosis.I followed the recommendations in this book for a 1-month trial (note: I'm already very physically active, so I only followed the dietary recommendations).  Result?  No effect whatsoever on my longstanding severe endometriosis.  The more I read, the  more I'm convinced that Dr. Redwine in Oregon has the real answer -- meticulous surgery as the only real cure for endo.  Hormonal treatments are only temporary, and many women cannot bear the adverse effects associated with them, including depression, mood swings, decreased intelligence, etc.  Pain medication works, but who wants to be drugged for the rest of one's life?  Medicinal cannabis helps the most of any nonsurgical treatment I've had.  Each of my 4 surgeries has reduced the pain -- I hope that that my next surgery, which will focus on the bowel, bladder, and diaphragm implants, will be my last.Oh, I've gotten away from the point of this review.  Anyway, I checked this book out of the library to see if it said anything worthwhile, but it didn't.  It's easy to prescribe "good nutrition" for a chronic condition; who among us couldn't stand to eat a little better?  But this sort of approach is really a form of blaming the victim -- if you women would only eat properly, you wouldn't have this terrible condition.  Nonsense!  Endometriosis is just like cancer, except it doesn't invade the bone or lymph system (that we know of) and doesn't lead as quickly to death (although some women suffering the intense pain of endometriosis sometimes briefly think that death would be preferable).  Worst of all, endometriosis can really ruin a relationship between a husband and wife (because sex usually makes the symptoms far worse), especially if the wife's physicians aren't sufficiently educated and think the problem is "all in her head.
sloppy. I think better information can be gained by reading wikipedia than can be gained from reading this book. As a metalhead, I have the feeling that Moynihan is an outsider writing about something he doesn't really understand. Maybe he is just catering to people who aren't familiar with metal, but it's to the detriment of the book's accuracy. I think he misses the point of some bands.  He also does a very quick and sloppy job of some sections, which is annoying.For example, he states "the Misfits mutated into Samhain...by 1988 the band had changed names again, to simply Danzig", which is totally false. The Misfits ended when Glenn Danzig left the band and formed Samhain, which later became Danzig. Furthermore, the Misfits reunited (without Danzig) in 1997, meaning that Danzig and The Misfits existed as separate bands at the time of the book's printing. It's one of many sloppy errors/hasty summaries in the book that make it frustrating to read.If you are a fan or already know the story, this book will be nothing but agravation.  If you are an outsider to the genre it should be an interesting read
not very good. I know Batali has become an American icon for Italian cooking, but this book is poorly written and assembled.  It is boring to thumb through with recipies that invite you to close the book and go to another.I love Italy and both Northern and Southern cuisine, but this just doesn't work for me.
Scraps left behind. This book is only a shadow of what Bukowski can do. I was very dissapointed with his wife being so hell bent on releasing his unpublished work. These poems are all ones that he would have never released had he  been alive. They have no charm and show nothing of his talent. His wife I  guess thought they were good enough to be released. I beg to differ. If you  want a good collection of his poems from the last years of his life check  out Betting on the muse which is an amazing book
A popularity contest for ideas. Shermer's book is an attempt to classify various lines of research into science, nonscience, and `borderlands' science, but he follows no rigorous methodology.  Instead, he subjectively classifies various theories, practices, and lines of research into his three categories, based upon how popular certain theories are among mainstream scientists, and how much the theories, practices, and lines of research appeal to his narrow scientific fundamentalism.There really is no need for this book.  The celebrated philosopher Karl Popper brilliantly solved the problem of the demarcation between science, and philosophy, ideology and nonsense decades ago, and his work has been endorsed by scientists from Einstein to Hawkings. The criterion is testability.  Scientific theories are theories that are capable of being tested by experiment or observation. Our theories can never be proven correct, although a single counter-instance can prove them wrong.One can sum up Popper's famous demarcation between science and non-science by saying that the criterion of the scientific status of a theory is its falsifiability.   Accordingly, theories that are not falsifiable in principle cannot claim to be scientific, and so belong to metaphysics, ideology, or pseudo-science.Popper's criterion of testability provides a clear, logical way of separating science from ideology and philosophy.  Hence, string theory is not science but philosophy, as it currently makes no predictions capable of being tested.  Popper argued that Marxism started out as a scientific theory: it predicted that capitalism would lead to increasing misery among the masses, and then be overthrown by revolution and replaced by socialism; it also predicted that this would occur first in the most technically developed countries.  When the so-called worker's revolution first occurred in then-backward and agrarian Russia, supporters of the theory did not accept this as a refutation: the theory was simply modified so that it became immune to falsification.  In other words, Marxism was transformed into an ideology.The universal property of scientific theories cannot be stressed enough.  A scientific theory cannot be merely speculation about a particular fact or an isolated event, because nothing new and non-trivial can be predicted from such a speculation.  This point has to be stressed, because it has caused a great deal of confusion among philosophers and historians of science.  For example, Shermer writes in the book:"Popper's attempt to solve the problem of demarcation ... between science and nonscience begins to break down in the borderlands of knowledge.  Consider the theory that extraterrestrial intelligent life exists somewhere in the cosmos.  If we find out by making radio contact through the SETI program then the theory will have been proven absolutely ... But how could this theory ever be falsified?"Shermer's mistake is his categorization of the statement `extraterrestrial intelligent life exists somewhere in the cosmos' as a scientific theory.  It is no such thing.  It is merely speculation about a specific fact, from which no non-trivial predictions follow.  (For instance, it does not follow from this that such life would want to contact us, would share our values, would be friendly toward us, and so forth.)  It is no more a scientific theory than the statement `there are white swans somewhere on the lake.'  Such statements about specific factual matters can indeed be confirmed, even proven `beyond all reasonable doubt.'  But this is only because they are not universal statements.  Scientific theories are universal statements about how facts fit together, and from such universal statements follow predictions about specific facts.  So, from the universal statement `all swans are white' follows the prediction that `the next swans we will see on the lake will be white.'  The former is a (simple) scientific theory; the latter a prediction about a specific fact that follows from the theory, and that may used to test the theory.Note that Shermer would have formulated his idea as a scientific theory if he had stated it in a universal, testable form, such as: "life arises quickly wherever there is water and an average temperature above freezing, and given a few billion years, some of this life will become recognizably intelligent."  This is a universal statement that relates specific facts to each other, can be used to make predictions about how much intelligent life exists elsewhere in our galaxy, and can be tested (at least in principle) by sending probes to planets in which conditions for life appear to have been appropriate for a few billion years.  If intelligent life is not found, then the theory is refuted, and must either be abandoned or modified.It is precisely at the "borderlands of science" that Popper's criterion works so well.  Parapsychology for instance, most certainly is a science to the extent that it makes predictions capable of being tested.  But Shermer gives little attention to this field, as it conflicts with his ideology of materialism.Shermer is not a scientist, but an historian.  And as an historian he has no excuse for being woefully ignorant of the history of science.  At one time reports that rocks sometimes fall from the sky (what we know call meteorites) were dismissed by most scientists as superstitious fantasies.  The idea that the continents could drift was ridiculed for decades.  Even X-rays were considered an elaborate hoax.  Those who ignore the lessons of history are doomed to repeat them, and Shermer has simply not learned that popularity of ideas cannot be used as a guide to separate science from nonsense.But Shermer is an intellectual lightweight who is simply out of his league when discussing the philosophy of science.  If you want to read something really magnificent on the subject, I recommend "Replies to my Critics", in The Philosophy of Karl Popper, Part II, edited by Paul Arthur Schilpp.
Disappointing. After consuming everything Hillerman has written, and learning something new about Native American culture from each book, and after Hillerman's squib on the Dust jacket, my expectations were set so far above what this trite book delivered that even two stars seems kind... As a 1/8 Arapaho [&amp; 1/8 Blackfoot] i had hoped to learn something about their life.  The characterizations were also paper thin, including both the male and female protagonists... and the denouement was telegraphed for miles... ergo, even as a mystery/suspense novel, this one flunked
Cameron's other titles are more useful to you as a writer. Julia Cameron's books are the only companions that keep me from feeling stuck and isolated in a writer's life. "The Artist's Way" and "The Sound of Paper" are fixtures on my bedside table because she's truthful, sensible, and uplifting. ...And that's why I'm disappointed in this book. It falls very short of the mark.True, in its pages you will recognize all those people who hem you in or hold you up. But you will perhaps also recognize what I did: deep bitterness. I'm 3/4 through the book and have been almost stunned at all the examples of, asides about, and ungloved swipes at movie industry people. Other blocking personalities are treated with a bit of remove and wry humor. But when JC launches on the movie-industry-specific examples, her venom and bitterness seep through. That flaw discredits whatever [thin] usefulness I might previously have found. I hate to say this, but I'm glad I bought it used rather than new
too basic. The three MD's who authored Sugar Busters have discovered that sugar is bad, but haven't learned about all the other horrendous things that have happened to the American food supply.Sugar contributes to disease, they say, sugar makes us gain weight and we should avoid it. So far so good. But turning to the meal plan we find a bewildering array of processed and denatured foods: High-glycemic whole grain extruded cereals like Whole Grain Oat Cheerios and Shredded Wheat `N Bran; reduced fat triscuits; lowfat milk products; lite mayonnaise; and MSG-laden Worcestershire sauce, Kitchen Bouquet browning sauce and canned chicken broth.Reduce saturated fats, they advise, but fail to mention the problems of trans fatty acids.Diet drinks containing neurotoxic aspartame are fine, according to the writers.This book is a good example of that old saying: A little knowledge is a dangerous thing.From Sally Fallon at westonaprice.org.
Self-delusion. I'll cut to the chase.  Self-delusion is the title I chose for this review, because anyone who read this and pretended it was a profound eye-opening experience that revealed hard to grapple with truths about the contradictions in traditional theisms will need a ph.d in self-delusion.  Albee, disappointingly proves that he has quite an aptitude for self-delusion if he believes as he seems to that this is a competent and wothwhile work.  I sincerely believe that my rating of two stars was kind and was a benevolent gesture towards a playwright I have much respect for.  Everyone is self-indulgent at times and so in a very Christian manner (Note the irony, uh oh is this indicator too cerebral and tedious?  Guess it's because I just got through reading Tiny Alice.) I forgive the otherwise impeccable and inimitable Edward Albee
Disappointing. This book started out with some interesting ideas and character development but fizzled quickly.  In the first few chapters we are introduced to Joanna who is coming of age in a supernatural way.  Then, she hides out in a sanctuary for nearly the entire remainder of the book!  Basically talking incomprehensible mytho-babble and contemplating her navel.  I couldn't even finish the book - I was so bored by the time she finally planned to face the bad guys that I didn't even care how `the big battle' turned out and I just closed the book without reading it.
Some Good Points. It is a book with some good poems- 'Girl In A Library', for example is fine. Mazur has issues though that get a bit too personal with the girl in the library. She fears for her ability to love in the future. There are also issues with her mother. It is a fine book with some fine writing but a bit too autobiographical
Need a fair mathematical background. Major steps were skipped.  A reader without a fair mathematical background would not understand why suddenly a statistical result could be used to replace the whole martingale equation.  A lot of assumptions were made on the knowledge base of readers.  Therefore, it is not an introductory text.  If the reader has a fair mathematical background the reader needs not start with this book.  If the reader does not have the background, he can't understand this book.  This book is in the middle of nowhere.  In short, the authors skipped too many steps.  An subjective opion: It seems to me that the authors were very lazy to type.
Este libro es un panfleto. Cuando llego el paquete, crei que no venia este libro junto con los demas, pues es muy pequeno, es una guia muy sencilla y creo que en los libros "What to expect when you are expecting" o "Your pregnancy week by week" que son para las futuras madres, hay una explicacion mas completa sobre el accionar de los futuros padres
Deceiving. I too bought this book for the biscuit recipe. I live more than a thousand miles away from the restaurant and would have loved to been able to make them at home. I did however find a delicious if not better recipe doing an internet search. Save your money if you were seeking the biscuit recipe...very BAD business decision if you ask me. I won't ever go back to the restaurant
Deep Downer. Janet Taylor Lisle hooks you in with a story that evokes the best of popular fantasy with some Pippi Longstocking thrown in.  Then she sucker punches you with a depressing dose of misfortune devoid of fantasy and stripped down to a cold, sad version of reality that shocks and confounds.  The denouement involves mental illness, neglect and orphaning.  For more on this kind of approach to youth literature, check out "Welcome to Lizard Motel" by Barbara Feinberg
A Tale.... The novel, A Tale of Two Cities, by Charles Dickens, is a story of love and compassion, which takes place during the beginnings of the French Revolution. Despite the fact that many aspects of the revolution are portrayed well in the novel, the book is still a tiring read and requires a strong liking for Dickens' writing style.Throughout the novel, Dickens bogs the story down with excessive descriptions and meaningless scenes. The language is relatively simple and easy to comprehend, but the extra descriptions make the novel difficult to fully understand. Most of the characters in the novel are completely unrealistic, which makes it difficult for the reader to relate to what is going on. The character of Lucie Manette, is portrayed as the perfect women with absolutely no flaws. Her character is the supposed epitome for women, but in truth, is highly improbable. Throughout the novel, Dickens' does a great job at keeping the story dry and unentertaining, giving little to no excitement to cause the reader to want to continue. Despite these countless imperfections, Dickens' does manage to be partially successful in his quest to portray the revolution.The book, with all its shortcomings, did reveal to the reader, the atrocities that occurred during the French Revolution, and the events that led to it. The abuse of the nobles, and the radical ideas of the revolutionists are all shown in many parts of the novel. The one other aspect that Dickens got right in his novel was the character of Sydney Carton. Sydney Carton is the only character in the story that many readers can relate too and understand a variation of what Carton feels. Carton is a lawyer who feels that everything he has done in his life has been wrong and believes that he can do no good in life. This characteristic is common among people, and Dickens manages to capture that aspect of humanity precisely.The novel, A Tale of Two Cities, is a slow moving book with numerous flaws that cause the reader to lose interest fairly often. Dickens' overuse of description and unrealistic characters add to the book's dryness. However, Dickens does capture a time in history with great accuracy. This is a book for a reader who likes Dickens' overzealous descriptions and enjoys slow moving stories.
Then Ultimate Un-Motivating Guide. I bought this book to prepare for running my third marathon and found it to be extremely confusing, condescending and un-motivating. I have been running for years and have run many races somehow this book still managed to make me fill as if I was not worthy of running. There are great marathon training guides out there but this is not one of them. If you are looking for something that is clear and inspirational try checking out The Non-Runner's Marathon Trainer
What you would expect. The jacket cover, which talks about Walsh being independent and unbiased belies the fact that Walsh's report was issued two days before the 1991 election between Bush and Clinton.  There can be no doubt of the animus Walsh had for Bush.  If the things in this book are true, after spending 100 million dollars and 7 1/2 years, Walsh could have gotten more convictions than Oliver North for spitting on the ground.This book is terribl
Disappointing. The plot is good but there are about 200 pages too many.  Why a full chapter to tell us what the protagonists are thinking about the attach case, when we already know it was not in the car and we could tell them where it is? We know where the precious document is : another useless quest. People are murdered by the half dozen, the characters are outrageous, most of the time improbable, and I felt the semi-erotic swimming episode totally stupid, not to mention the girl apologizing constantly about it.I have read much better books than that. Sorry..
A sad waste of paper - babbling brooks are better. Having read many books on various financial subjects, this one is on my list as one of the top 10 wastes of time.  In fact I am only writting this to hopefully save you time!  Warning! When the reviews are from annonymous 'a reader' be suspicious
Boooorrrrrriiiiinnnnnggggggg. Inticing beginning, but quickly drops off into the most DULL details of useless information.  Even the ending was dull and in my opinion, and unfinished
Title certainly feels very silly and pathetic at this point. Bush is winning the war on terror?Who here is sufficiently blissfully ignorant to still believe that?  Iraq has completely imploded--even CENTCOM has acknowledged that we are fast approaching "chaos" and total anarchy there.  Bush's occupation there is effectively at an end.As for Afghanistan, the military now admits that the Taliban is making a major, widespread resurgance, and now controls much of the country.  Our recent bid to push back at their growing offense ended in failure. In fact, we now only control the capital of Kabul, and that only tenuously.  Of course, Bin Laden still runs free, laughing at those he killed on 9/11.No, the sad, plain truth is that Bush is not in any way, shape or form winning the war on terror.  This book has simply become a pathetic relic of a bygone era, useful only as an object of sarcastic mockery and derision.  Bush, like those who believed in him, has become nothing more than a very sad joke.
I don't like it. I don't like the book becuase the mom diyd in the begining of the story.The story is about a litol girl in the begining of the story and after the begining it's about a litol gril named Cendrillon and a prins and a faerygodmother in the mittol of the story and she wont's the prins look at her like a rich person at ferst then she wont's the prins look at her like her sell
Undesirable. It's the polar opposite of good writing.  It's so familiar, so conversational, so unturgid, and so padded with fluffy stuff it's unreadable.  Even worse than I figured it would be.  Oh, well, now i know after wondering all these years.
For heavens sake. I cannot say I enjoyed this book, largely because the main character, Joseph Reaveley, seemed to me to be self-absorbed and oddly moralistic in his approach to the horrors of war and the challenge of defending what often seems entirely indefensible. For example, there is the rotten war correspondent who forces (though heaven knows why) a courtmartial of a poor wounded soldier who may or may not have deliberately maimed himself to get out of the trenches and tunnels he was wounded in. It is never quite clear why in the face of no evidence of self-mutilation this fellow is courtmartialed and possibly (we never know) likely to be hung. It is, apparently, because, morality and honor require this??? Then, when this same correspondent turns up dead (with everyone thinking it couldn't have happened to a nicer fellow)- Saint Chaplain Reavely takes it upon himself to find out if he was murdered and if so, by whom. This, in the midst of trench warfare, poison gas - and then the idiocy of Gallipoli - where Joseph appears to confront another war correspondent who thinks the stupidity of that battle should be reported. Oh no, says our Joseph who is horrified that anyone in England should know of this - and tries to stop him - risking his own death (how incredibly brave) as well as that of another poor wounded fellow who, of course, is ready and willing  to die, because Joseph knows best. Then, of course, there is Joseph's moral outrage at his sister who is chastely yearning for a General, and his "courageous" decision to ruin his best friend's life because doing so is "the morally defensible and right thing to do" despite the fact that Joe knows what his friend did was necessary to save England from the truth of the horrors of war. Really?  This was the most disappointing of this series. Joe's previous moralizing was a bit much - but tolerable. This one was way over the top and thoroughly unbelievable
Too simple, too personal. This book is for people who never read poetry or "just don't get it" when they do.The author focuses on why he fell in love with each poem, information that I found boring because of the way it was delivered.  He then picks apart the poems (sometimes cutting out every line, sometimes grabbing at random bits).  It takes away from the magic of a poem when someone uses pages upon pages trying to explain why it is beautiful or moving.  Those things must be felt - gained from the poem itself.There are so many ways in which this book could have been written that would have made it uplifting, touching, or, at the very least, not boring
I regret buying this book. I'm tearing my hair out trying to finish this book, but it's slow going, because the book is so badly written; it's like reading some third-grader's book report. And I'm stunned, because the author is a scholar and her subject matter is so interesting. Mostly, now, I'm just using the book to compile a list of historical figures I'd like to research futher.That's really the draw of this book: Yalom has done a great deal of sweeping research, bringing together a huge number of primary sources from around the world, mixing physical artifact, literary works, and historical record together to create her argument. I just can't get over how terribly it's presented. The book itself is also formatted in a ridiculous manner, with generic curlicues and fleurs-de-lys everywhere. The formatting just serves to underscore how disconnected and spasmodic the narrative is. I think I would be happy to have come apon this book in a library, and spent an hour or two taking notes out of it, but it's definitely not going to find a permanent place on my shelf
B-O-R-I-N-G. A ferocious beast that loves Mickey Mouse?  Capable of ripping two armed policemen to shreds?  Capable of eluding the Marines in the wilderness?  All these talents and the final encounter with this terrible monster is so anticlimatic it made me resent having wasted my time with the novel.  And the ending . . . . horrible.  It was as if Koontz thought the audience of this novel would be teenagers looking for something like R.L. Stine would write.  I'd give it a half a star if I could
This is a 'horror' story?. I have read a few Peter Straub novels, of which "Ghost Story" was one of the finest I have ever come across, but this piece of compacted toilet paper is total rubish.  His detailed descriptions of the town is done so well that I could probably go there and walk through that town with my eyes closed, but this does not make for a good story.  The third time this book hit me in the face after falling asleep, I resolved to leave it on the shelf for a year.  Well it is now two years later and it still bores me to death
Collaborating with the Enemy. Al Qaida and Hezbollah would agree with the authors. Terrorism  aims to undermine Western Civilization and replace with it with an evil empire that would murder all Jews and those who love them. Walsh and Keesmaat, along with Stanley Hauerwas and most who teach "social ethics" at most Protestant and Roman Catholic seminaries, live in a fantasy persepctive that cannot see who constitutes the enemy. As an former smug liberal socialist and pacifist, I find these "ethicists" an embarassment and danger. If America, Britain and Israel, so does the whole of Western civilization. Walsh,Keesmaat and their crowd will be in prison with the rest of us. Will they be part of the resistance or will they collaborate with the enemy?I have always been in ministry to those of moderate income who understand what is the cost of freedom. African and Asian Christian immigrants to our nation understand that cost as well. Let Walsh and Keesmaat talk to those who grew up under Marxist regimes as well as those in exile from Saddam Hussein, the Taliban and the Iranian theocrats. They appreciate the Judaeo-Christian foundations that constituted America! The true prophets are Charles Colson, Jean Beth Elshtain, Richard John Neuhaus, Sean Hannity, Dennis Prager, Laura Ingraham, George Weigel and the Center for Ethics and Public Policy along with the Institute for Religion and Democracy as well as the journal First Things.Kenneth Macari
Disappointing. This book should have been a collection of short stories.  It needs some heavy editing.  There are moments of real science fiction and story telling, but it is burdened by preaching.
Strangely put together. While I found a lot of the material in the book very interesting, it is put together in such a muddled way that it is very difficult enjoy reading it. The book seems to be composed of a number of previously written (and in many cases overlapping) articles joined together with fairly boring 'filler' to try and present a 'complete' view.I would suggest buying the book if you're interested in reading about early colonial life in the vanilla industry in Papantla, Mexico. Most of the other information can be easily found on the internet
Moaning and groaning, at a respectful distance. Be warned - this book is over 600 pages long and every character is a talking cadaver.  Yes, there are seven narrators, but, as many critics have noted, their voices meld into one - this lack of differentiation undermines the basic intent of the novel. Instead of being in the company of seven different characters, I felt I was in the company of a single person, the author - and he wasn't feeling that great.  The book reads as a dreary confession, one that would have any self-respecting psychiatrist reaching for his prescription pad.*There is far less ambiguity here than you might imagine, and in more ways than one.  A change in perspective never overturns any basic fact about the plot or, more surprisingly, regarding a character's motivations - rather than being akin to Rashomon, where each view radically conflicts with its neighbour, here the narrators simply take turns telling the same undisputed story.  This lack of conflict between their vantages leads to a lack of tension; and in itself deprives the voices of individuality.  Yes, one character can see things which another can't, but it's more a case of adding to the overall picture, instead of actually angrily erasing and painting over the space.*The rhythm of the sentences varies little from chapter to chapter.  This is not Faulkner.  The vocabulary is similarly uniform (as an example, "perfunctory" and "insensate" are used by Angela, while for Joe it's "obfuscate" - these being the two allegedly less educated characters).  The characters all achieve a similar level of insight into, and reflection upon, themselves. Perhaps most disappointing is the chapter voiced by Simon, the literary minded precipitant of events.  For all his alleged passion for poetry, his writing is bland and his references to literature rather limited - his voice does not breathe life into the bones of his character.  The dialogue is poorly written - in most chapters it would be difficult to tell who is speaking without prompts, and the overall tone is awkward and dead; perhaps the Dennis Mitchell chapter escapes this criticism.*The two prime female characters are drawn as stereotypically beautiful.  We are carefully informed about the size of their breasts, and the allure of their eyes.  In intellectual matters, they respectfully defer to their male superiors, be this the soulful stuff of art, or the technicalities of card-counting in blackjack.  Yawn.  There's not much evident irony in Perlman's choice of such representations.  When Anna reveals that: "He played me like a musical instrument", I had to check the cover to make I sure I wasn't reading Judith Krantz.  If parts of the book read with the flattened affect of an airport novel it could be because his characters, and his handling of them, share many qualities.  Then there's is the central issue of Simon's obsession with Anna - the narcissism inherent in this is impressive, but its exploration is limited - it might be raising the standard too high, but Tolstoy's 'Anna Karenina' shows how multi-faceted such an exploration can be.*Perhaps, more than reading the book itself, it's interesting to ask why so many people found it so stimulating.  The very flatness of the style does make it easy to read.  The attempt to begin a meditation on character by invoking childhood influences, adult relationships, and unpredictable events, is, as everyone says, ambitious.  It could be that the analysis proceeds at a depth which is comfortable for most readers - it allows fractions of honesty to become visible, while a veil remains over much.  Of course, fractions can add up to a sizeable sum.  My overall reaction to the book was negative, and reminded me of the mood created by reading books by Richard Powers - both authors construct plots which shape a superficial interest, and pen characters with surface complexities, but the crucial insight required for true empathy to be established is missing, as is a winning sense of humour.  At best this is a novel I might admire, but not one that I could love
Padded, padded, padded!. Dr. Gullo has quite a few good ideas here.  My problem is, #1, most of them are already in "Thin Tastes Better"; and #2, the book is blatantly padded, which drives me nuts. The useful material could be condensed down to about 30 pages -- so, to make the book long enough, he repeats every idea about 30 times.  He mentions the GG Bran Crispbread on literally every page... which brings me to annoyance #3:  as other reviewers have suggested, most of his recommended foods are nearly impossible to find.  Absolutely NO ONE in my area carries the bran crispbread; I finally mail-ordered some, only to discover that it's barely edible -- it tastes like thin sheets of wood.  It's bearable if topped with something, but really awful eaten plain.  Take my advice and forget about it -- just get yourself some Ry-Krisp, Finn Crisp or even reduced-fat Triscuits (my staple!).  I finally found Fage yogurt, and it's very expensive ($1.99 for an individual 7-8 oz. cup) -- AND it's only available in either fat-free (which I don't like) or very high fat (250 calories per 8 oz).  I did find Walden Farms salad dressings, but when I saw that they're labeled "Calorie Free," I decided they would probably be vile-tasting and put them back on the shelf.  I also found Vitamuffins, but if you read the ingredient lists, they are NOT particularly healthy:  the top three ingredients in their "Cran-Bran Muffins" are water, sugar, and white flour!  Bran is way down the list, and the fiber content is not high.  So I didn't buy those either.  I was glad to know that Alba shakes are still being made, although again, you have to mail-order them.Dr. G. does have good behavior modification suggestions.  I think he's absolutely on the money about "trigger foods" and always carrying a snack pack with you.  But again, I believe all of that is in "Thin Tastes Better."
It's a &quot;gotta-have-it&quot; book. . . When Sandra says, &quot;Everything,&quot; she means it.  As a professional speaker, I found this book to be a terrific &quot;help-mate&quot; for my business!  This &quot;A to Z&quot; guide truly is a &quot;complete&quot; and indispensable guide for every professional speaker, author and more
Scholarly Ramblings. This is a difficult book to evaluate. Its author is obviously a bright scholar, and the book itself comes from an invited memorial lecture at the Seabury-Western Theological Seminary in 1989. There is lots of good material here about 2nd Century Christian beliefs, and quotations from many sources that can be hard to track down.BUT, it is difficult to know what the author is up to. There is no apparent structure nor theme. He seems to jump from one topic to another with no segue. Each pericope is perfectly good by itself, but there is no cumulative effect. Even more problematic, the documentation is poor and the bibliography is incomplete.This book may have made a very good lecture, but it doesn't survive as a meaningful book. Nonetheless the material herein is very valuable and the book may be of interest to scholars of early Christianity who are interested in the works of Marcion, Valentinus, Ignatius, Irenaeus, etc.
Should be subtitled "in defense of HRT". I was looking for a bit of reasurrance and guidance for alternative treatments.  I certainly didn't get it here!  Ms. Sheehy has few suggestions for perimenopausal women other than HRT, which she describes as almost magical.  Since I have a family history of breast cancer, and--consequently-- no desire to try HRT, I needed books with a more positive tone and other treatment options.  I would strongly recommend Dr. Susan Love's Hormone book and The Pause by Lonnie Barbauch instead
Don't expect much~. This book is the first one you will reach for if it is your first pregnancy. Save your cash and get it from the library. Then read something that expects you to be a thinking woman, not a child taking orders or information without question. If you want to go through pregnancy, labor and birth, and have no say at all or learn anything useful, then stick with this book; i.e., go to the hospital, have an epidural, episiotomy, then finally the c-section that 'must' have been necessary, this is it.Beyond that, read Ina May Gaskins, Henci Goer, the Sears' books, and "Childbirth Without Fear." Read a broader selection - many of which you can also get from a library or spend a night thumbing through at a bookstore.  I am a mother of 4; have had healthier, more positive birth experiences than anyone I know. This book is misleading and negative.Make it the joyful event you deserve
terrified mother. The story goes beyond bad. This is a story of three little girls that torture and kill the wolf in a premeditated way. My 4 year-old son was very sad after someone read the story to him in a school interview to preschool. He said to me that it was a bad story, and the girls have done "bad choices". I can't believe this is in the list of books recommended for 4 and 5's.
Not for a modern economist. Book is out of date with modern economic thought.  Essentially restates classical economics and provides little in the way of acceptance of the need for balance between government and the markets.
forget it. This wasn't any good as a hardback and reissuing itin paperback doesn't change matters.To get an idea of what you are in for, see the reviewsof the hardback version.Bottom line: don't waste your money
I'm done with Baldacci. Since the reviews printed on the inside cover of the book all are blurbs, here are my blurbs:"Really hard to get into ... tough to follow who's who ...""Opens strong, but fizzles out early ...""I literally feel asleep while reading this book one night ...""You'll finally give up without really wondering who did it ...
sorry I spent the time. Like others, I picked this book up after reading several in the No. 1 Ladies...series.  No comparison.The story is in the first line on page one and the last three pages of the book.  I just don't understand the rest of this book.  Isabel never even asked the key question to the whole "mystery" until it slapped her in her silly face.  The mystery for me is - what is the Sunday Philosophy Club, and what in the world does it have to do with this book?I'm sorry I spent the time on this - there are important books to be read
this book sucks. I hate this book. It is extremely boring and it is way too long.  There are too many characters to keep track of and many of them are extremely similar. Do not read this unless forced to. I like to read, but this nearly put me to sleep.  avoid at all cost
Fables are easy to write about. Borrow the book from the library.  Wasting your money on fables is not wise (unless you like wasting money).  While entertaining, this is not worthy of a library collection item
good start, weak middle and ending. i gave it 2 stars as i felt that overall i would not recommend this book
NOT EASY PIANO. My child has an excellent teacher and is doing very well in piano, but when I showed this "easy piano" book to the teacher, she said it was too hard for now.  Maybe, by the end of the summer.  Maybe, "easy" should be better defined as to what level you would have to be at in order to play this "easy" book
What does the turkey have to do with this mystery?. I was disappointed in this book.  I had started getting these books on CD from the library amd thoroughly enjoyed the first few I listened to.  I enjoy the author's picturesque, almost poetic, descriptions of things.  Those descriptions were still there, but they did not connect well.  The mystery of the person murdered becomes an incidental by-line, not really crucial to the other goings-on in the story.  There is no expanation to why the return of the turkeys is of any significance and what do the cats' being able to communicate with them have to do with anything in the story line.  I felt very let down at the end of this audio book
Slow !!!. This book for the lack of a better word was cheesy. I read my first Danielle Steel book a few weeks ago (Malice) and was really impressed. I decided to grab another thinking it would be good as well. This book was slow and the brokenhearted story line dragged on forever. On top of that the main character was such a whiney complainer and that I couldn't stand even reading about him. This book was bad and extremely predictable. BIG DISSAPOINTMENT
Written by a manger for managers. I was able to go cover to cover in about 5 minutes.  If you manage people that use their brains to do their work and you have no idea how to understand, manage and motivate them then this book might help you out a bit.  I found it to be off-topic for me as I was hoping that it was going to be written for the people who Think for a Living rather than their managers.
AWFUL. I am an eighth grader taking Geometry, so it is obviously advanced.  However, this book is not helpful AT ALL in learning.  It is so frustrating to not even have a glossary in the back to find definitions, and the book does a very bad job of explaining tough concepts.  If you are a teacher, please try a different book
Utter new age silliness. Although the concept probably has merit, you wouldn't know it to read this book. This is a lot more religion that science. I am quite disappointed
One of the more preachy books that I have read. I enjoyed Covey's 7-habits work, and bought this to add to my collection of leadership books. This is one of the most heavy handed, preachy books that I have encoutered. Give me a break! After vomiting, I threw it out. Save your money and try these instead:Leadership Challenge21 Irrefutable Laws of LeadershipGood to GreatFirst Break all the Rules
Keep Jason at Crystal Lake. Okay, in the movies, when Jason took Manhattan, it was easily the worst in the series. Here, Jason is taken to Costa Rica, simply appalling. This book couldn't decide what story it wanted to tell. We start off with "The Most Dangerous Game" style of hunting humans using death row convicts and a "Survivor" type reality game show, we move into "Outbreak" with a genetic manipulation that leads to rapid spreading disease and then get slopped into "Night of the Living Dead" where anyone killed by Jason becomes a infectious maniac zombie. This story is simply disastrous. I've been pretty lenient in accepting the new Black Flame novels on Friday the 13th (but not the Jason X series). I've enjoyed the others enough, this one completely blows though. The story could have easily been done without using Jason for any part of it and it would have been better. The Jason/F13 franchise is only used here to try and sell the book. The author has no concept of what the whole Jason/F13 is for and this is just so ridiculously weak that I warn others to stay away from it
Sardonic putdowns ruin the content of this book. I bought this book thinking it would guide me to fun and funky places to visit that were off the beaten track.  Instead, it seemed to be more of an excuse to mock the very places it purported to be interested in.  The topper was when Roadside America described the Aviation Museum in Ohio as if it were a joke, when in fact it is a memorable and inspiring museum.  Overall, I didn't enjoy the tone of the book, which to me, seemed to be one of derisive put-downs.  I think many of the places described in this book would be fun to visit, but it's hard to pick out the good from the bad, with the way this book is written
Very sorry I purchased this book. It took a great deal of determination to finish but not any joy.
Too old fashioned. This book had some good ideas if it were 1970. It's very outdated. I'm sure it was a good book when it was still current, but in 2006, it's just a a waste of time and money.
Half truths and denial of a failed Cuban dream. Towards the middle of 1988, Castro, who had taken personal control of the war, wanted to withdraw from Angola and discussions began on how this could be accomplished without losing face. One of Castro's top generals in Angola had already tried to defect and Moscow was pressing Castro to reach a settlement. The Cuban leader adopted an aggressive stance and threw more Cuban troops into the front line in order to lend weight to his negotiating position in the peace talks. General Del Pino, who also defected to the West, pointed out that it was pure bluff on Castro's part and that he feared defeat was imminent.Cuban forces, integrated with SWAPO units, nevertheless pressed on to within 12 kilometres of the Namibian border. Facing 11,000 Cubans and perhaps 2,000 SWAPO was a force of 500 battle-hardened men from 32 "Buffalo" Battalion, the only available troops at the border until reinforcements could arrive. They held the line until tanks and artillery could be moved up. Cuban MiG-23s joined the fray and one was shot down. As the South African forces prepared to move North to engage the Cubans in what promised to be a Cuban nemesis, the Cubans signed the New York peace accords and avoided disaster.The Cubans immediately claimed victory, which Bridgland points out was 'nonsense', but that:the Cuban story was taken at face value by Castro's sympathisers in the Western press and repeated so many times that it became received truth. The Cubans were helped by the South Africans' own clumsy efforts at propaganda, which amounted to saying as little as possible about the full-scale war they fought in Angola.The SADF at no stage had wanted an all-out war that would take them to Luanda as conquerors. Their objectives had been to fight a limited war in support of UNITA and prevent the Cubans from capturing UNITA's strongholds. The SADF had succeeded in this and was content to let the Cubans take the limelight. As Bridgland points out in his final summary of the war:The War for Africa and the New York accords provided Cuba with pretexts for slipping out of a commitment that had become too hot and too expensive to handle. In 1975, when the Cuban adventure in Angola began, the 'scientific socialist' and 'internationalist' tide running from Moscow looked unstoppable. By 1988 it was a faded dream. Despite 13 years of Cuban support, the Angolan economy was ruined. The Marxist MPLA was in utter disarray and was trying desperately to shed its 'scientific-socialist' past... Castro's dreams of a Marxist revolution spreading from Angola to encompass the whole of Southern Africa had become a poor music hall joke..."The War for Africa" by Fred Bridgland....the most accurate account of Cuba's involvement in the Angolan conflict.
Too Predictable. Not a bad beach read but nothing in this story is unexpected. I didn't really connect with the main characters. I was interested by the description in the supernatural aspects (the lights) it seemed like a mystery/love story that may have been unique but instead was a way too predictable love story.
Self-Indulgence. I think Hemingway wanted to do two things:  (1) critique certain aspects of how WWII was fought (particularly the politicalization of battle plans); and (2) pay homage to his beloved Venice.  To do so, he crafted a fairly thin story about an old soldier who finds himself in one last love with a girl a fraction of his age.  The plot (to the extent there is one) and the relationship between the characters would probably make a nice short story.  The bulk of the book is taken up by tourist writing about Venice (locales, architecture, food, markets, layout, and, of course, the canals) and a journalist's rants about US generals in WWII.  Diehard Hemingway fans will find some jewels worth the read; others should stay away
Disappointing. I thought the book was &quot;oversold&quot; in a way.  From reading the jacket it looked like the &quot;answer&quot; to the Berenger Sauniere mystery, to what on earth it was that turned this impoverished rural cure  into a wealthy identity.  Now, yes, I know we have the sacred geometry, but  it's unfinished?  Where's the follow-up on the trough near the grove of  trees?  Where's the follow-up on just what may have actually happened at  the focal point of that pentagram?  We don't see it.  While the anecdotes  are interesting, and tragi-comic in some cases, they almost appear out of  place?  In some parts I felt like I was reading &quot;The Making of Holy  Blood, Holy Grail&quot;&quot; (which I loved by the way)
Here We Are Sept, 2004. Housing Market is still going up. My own "views" is us seeing the houseing market slowing down and homes in higher cost areas to come down, one cause is because of intrest rates going up this putting most people out of the higher cost housing market. Lower and med price homes will stable off. And someone I read on this form said, her grandfolks wanted to buy a home to live in and stay and not do flips with the home. The stock market has return to pre 2001 if you only held and not pick up cisco and the yahoo ect kept a index fund your doing fine today, even better if you kept buying in the down turn. If your buying to hold a good house to live in maybe even buying a extra home for a rental just keep in mind wise words, just live within your belt and take it in one knoch. Ride the waves and if homes do come down in a crash or just a few rungs go buy some more, the market will return and start going up. Remember the housing crash in the 80's those same homes today are the same ones selling today for huge profits. Also Remember more people move to the USA every year, and this USA growth is not stoping. If there is a crash keep some money on the side and BUY, BUY, BUY, BUY. If there is a crash use it to get your retirement years in order buy and hold and when the market returns sell some and live on the rents of the others
Not Even One Star. What a waste!The title of this book should not be allowed to use the term "accounting." There are a plethora of very inexpensive computerized accounting systems for small businesses. I purchased Simply Accounting from Best Software and was looking for a text to supplement my knowledge to assist me in implementing the system. This mechanized accounting system from Best works beautifully and then I discover this accounting book uses "single-entry accounting" which in my opinion doesn't even exist except in the author's mind or can't be defined that I am aware of. This book comprises a system of manual forms to manage your business and as I said before, should not be able to use accounting in its title. At least label it something like "Use Manual Forms to Manage Your Business.
the truth about burnout. I read this book in my local libary and found it very interesting. It also applies to government which have become infected with consultants and &quot;reform&quot; fads. Another good book was &quot;The Witch Doctors,  making sense of management gurus. WE already survived TQM, and now are  going throug&quot;reinvention&quot; which was supposed to be all done in 3  to 5 years. Now 7 1/2 years later it takes 2x the number of people to do  half the work in twice the time. This is is causing burnout in a lot of  people. I'll buy the book when it comes out in paperback
A HORRIBLE BOOK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I do not recommend this book!!! I took so long to finish it. Do not read it. You will fall asleep in minutes!!!!!!
Dangerous misinformation. Suzanne Somers apparently has no use for modern medical science. Especially as a survivor of breast cancer (although of a very early stage) she is putting her life in grave danger by taking hormones. Recent studies have shown that women who were taking HRT for protection from heart problems actually had MORE problems than normal menopausal women. This is an unbelievably destructive, horribly dangerous book for people to take seriously. Being skinny is NOT more important than being alive. If you want to get the real scoop on hormones, talk to a doctor at an academic medical center (in other words, one that isn't going to mislead the public for personal financial gain) and see what she or he has to say. Chances are excellent that you'll be told to avoid them at all cost. Look at it this way: are you going to put your very life in the hands of Suzanne Somers? I'm sure she's a very nice person; it's just that she has no medical training whatsoever. *** writing from an NCI-designated Comprehensive Cancer Center**
Great if everything is pre-cooked.... Most of the recipes call for prepared meat, not too helpful if you want to actually "cook" on the fire. A few clever things, but I'm returning it, not very useful
It takes a millenium to finish this book. I believe that I was possibly unlucky to choose this book as my introduction to Mr. Yehoshua's work, for I am told that he is a fabulous writer and a fine creator of believable dialogues.  Well, there are no dialogues, and the story drags.  The book however had many characteristics that should make me love it!  My training is that of a historian, I fancy -- in my spare time -- reading on the Middle Ages, I've been fascinated with travel writing, I've lived in North Africa and to top it off, I've done some reading on Judaism in the Iberian Penninsula. And yet this book proved to be a collection of frustrations and it appeared never to end.Mr. Yehoshua chose to base his narrative in the oral tradition typical not only to the Middle Ages but also present in Jewish and North African traditions.  So the development of his story is as repetitive as those told from generation to generation, to remind each of the listeners the main characteristcs of what's being mentioned.  He does it however without the charm that a colloquial narrator would infuse.  This distant omnipresent narrator who tells us the  story instead took away any sense of drama, of importance, of eagerness, and of deeply felt conflicts.  The narrative line seemed adrift, like a boat going from port to port without a chart.There was also not a single character that involved this reader emotionally.  It felt like an intellectual exercise that ended up being too boring to stand.  It was a struggle for me to finish the book and frankly, life is too short for the daily sacrifice I was inflicting on myself.
Disappointed. Pace was ploddingly slow through the first 14 chapters. Characters weren't engaging enough to warrant finishing this book
False History. George G.M. Jones knows not a thing about real history. Claiming that the Great Library of Alexandria is where Aristotle took his knowledge is ludacris because the library was built by Ptolemy II. The Ptolemic line was the successor line in Egypt. Alexander, himself was crowned pharaoh by the people because they saw him as a liberator of Egypt. The priests of Egypt viewed him as the son of Zeus. These priests were of the god Ammon who were told at his oracle. The Egyptian Mysterey System was a creation of white men and is a proven hoax. The first Greek philosophers most likely had some knowledge of Babylonian and Egyptian thought they added reasoning, something none existant in Egyptian or Babylonian thought. Even saying that ancient Egyptians were all black is wrong, as the people of Egyptian constituted a mixture of races. They were black and white. They were in fact Semites, like the Jews and Arabs, people who are Caucasian. Skin color alone does not tell a man's race. An Indian from India is in reality Caucasian, making him closer to Europeans than the Japanese or Chinese. Even most the languages of India and Iran are Indo-European, while the Basque live in France and Spain but speak a language isolate. If the Greeks stole anything from anyone it was the Phoneicians and their alphabet, something that is the ancestor to the Greek, Latin, Etruscan, Cyrillic, Hebrew, and Arabic alphabets. The name Kemet was a reference to the black soil of Egypt. Today it is called Misr anyways.
Not the best portrayal of pre-Civil War America. Beloved is one of the most famous novels by Toni Morrison, America's only female to win the Nobel Prize in literature.  Set in the America before the Civil War, the story moves from the slave South to the non-slave North.  Free the North is not, as this book depicts, for slaves could be captured and returned down South.  The book is conglomeration of multiple themes and storylines.  First and foremost is the story of Sethe, a black woman who used to be a slave.  Second, the book focuses on her baby who died at birth, who goes by the name Beloved, and the reappearance of the baby as a ghost.Third, the book examines slavery, racism, and the politics of inclusion and seclusion.  In the South, Sethe is excluded from civil society in many ways by her color and the institution of slavery, but being a slave, is an integral part of society in general.  In the North, she is not a slave per say, but instead she is excluded from society in general by the ways of white people and their benign racism.  The storylines of this book also explore the physical punishments and practices used to enforce slavery at the personal level.  Here is where this book stands out from others like it like Uncle Tom's Cabin or Huck Finn.  This book could be described as doing for black literature on slavery as what Passion of the Christ did for movies based on the Bible.  it is quite graphic with big servings of the natural thrown in.  But I would not use this book as a study of slavery and the racism built into it.  The text is very confusing and I, the reader, spent much time trying to understand the entity of Beloved, and its use in furthering the story.  In fact, I would call this book a tragedy not about slavery and racism, but a tragedy set against the backdrop of slavery and racism.  Overall, a difficult book to read and though not boring, is not on my list of great American works
A negative view. I've read it. I wish I hadn'tThe illos are nice, but the backstory makes no sense at all. And the writing goes downhill the further you get into the book. By the time you reach Kong's origins, you no longer care.Go see the movie. Either the original, or the new one. Heck, see  the 76 version, even THAT'S better than THIS.
Very bad. The first impression of the book was positive, but it started to become increasingly complex and confusing. I though about having misunderstood something, but many others share my opinion, this book is poorly written crap, and going through all 600 pages is waste of precious time. Authors ignorance is revealed when he speaks about any economics topic. For instance, mergers are presumably inflationary. Gee, you may believe it or not, but no wonder the author is EX-banker. Off the mainstream, front porch philosophy is clearly a stronger of his skills
misleading and unscientific. I picked this book from the shelf because the author's theory of health appealed to me. I am a doctor and agree that modern medicine is not successful in many areas, especially in prevention of diseases. However, this book left me disappointed.The book is biased. Facts are not selected objectively, but at author's convinience.Of course, traditional chapter on "doctor-bashing", totally distorted and presented one-sidedly.Many discussions are unscientific. Are patients with rheumatoid arthritis that are taking non-steroidal drugs do worse because of these drugs, or are they put on these drugs because their disease is more severe? Yes, aspirin can cause bleeding, but what about it reducing risk of heart attack, benefit that outweighs the risk, so that more lives are saved than lost? Yes, unnecessary prescription of antibiotics is very bad, but on the other hand many lives are being saved daily by giving these drugs to people.I have a feeling that most anti-allopathic references were taken from medical dissidents, similar to those who claim that AIDS is not caused by the virus. By the way, are there really more people employed by AIDS industry than AIDS sufferers? Source?Claims from Nobel laureate Linus Pauling about miracles of vitamin C were disproven in many scientificly conducted objective studies. Present opinion (based on science) claims that there are little benefits from taking high doses of this substance, and its preventative properties are at best marginal. Still, the author conveniently skips these facts in order to support his case, and recommends this drug for prevention of colds.By the way, the placebo effect, ascribed to medical treatments  in the book, is well recognized and accepted in allopathic medicine. Every clinical trial measures effects of new treatments against placebo. Yes, many drugs help on the basis of placebo effect. But so are numerous supplements from "natural" medicine. In "natural" medicine, in fact, there are very few objectively conducted scientific studies on efficacy of health products, and most "natural" drugs are given on the basis of anecdotal evidence, i.e. vitamin C helped that guy to get rid of colds, and vitamin E cured that woman of cancer etc. My favourite is the editorial reference on the back cover, where woman treated by Ray Francis "returned to work, making a six-figure income". Does he have treatment for seven-figure salary?While thre are valid points in the book on health education and necessary emphasis on disease prevention, in general, it is biased, opinionated and, I agree with one of the previous reviewer, the title is arrogant. Health and disease is very complex subject. There is place and time for all modalities of prevention and treatment, including naturopathic medicine. However, claims and opinions must be substantiated by scientific methods and not preferences and opinions.
Was the author as drunk as the main character?. Sure, the plot lines are more than a little strange, and I do not mean strange in a good way, but has no one else noticed how unbelievably CLUMSY this book is? I kept reading because one of the plot lines (the more serious one--with the bald fugitive) dragged me along. But it was doggone hard to deal with the style. Maybe I should say lack of style, unless a surfeit of exclamation points counts as &quot;style.&quot; I've read Wambaugh's nonfiction in the past, and I've never found it to be particularly ineptly written. Maybe I stumbled on books he spent some time polishing, I dunno. But this book is a wreck. There isn't a graceful descriptive sentence in it, and the dialogue is almost unbearable. Even if it had been well-written, it would be pretty hard to enjoy a book where the dog is the only truly appealing character
Crummy. I don't know why I do it to myself anymore.  Goodkind brought a real gem into the world of fantasy novels when he wrote Wizard's First Rule.  Unfortunately, as with most novel series I have read, it was all downhill from there.  The most common complaint in the reviews I have read seems to be that Goodkind's novels have become thinly-veiled philosophy essays, and I concur with that.  I'd also add that the story is predictable, the characters behave foolishly, and (how can I put this in a way that won't spoil the ending?) things just seem to work out a little too conveniently.  After this one, I don't think I'll continue to torture myself with any more of Goodkind's work.  I no longer care what happens to Richard and Kahlan, and as much as I liked them in the first book, that's pretty depressing
UGH!. I'm a big Nora fan, but I couldn't even finish this one. By the fourth chapter I began to skim. WAY WAY WAY to much detail for me. Which made it boring and slow. Testing and corrosion, is it fake, is it real ...blah blah blah. ENOUGH! I did however enjoy the side story about the brother (I forget his name). But thats it folks. Unlike ALL the other reviewers, I hated it. I say PASS on this one. But as you can see, I'm in the minority
definitions. Politically Incorrect apparently means bigoted, racist, sexist, classist, and freakin' proud of it, woman!These "guides" are a scary, scary joke written by angry bigots to make open-minded people angry, and to help justify their own prejudices and inablity to let go of the "good old days" when it was considered fitting when a woman got slapped for mouthing off...What a disgusting view of the world
not what I expected. I ordered Found 1 and 2, I expected some cute,sad,and sometimes heart wrenching reading material. I was very surprised to say the least. If the description of the book had include the phrases "excess profanity" and porn material enclosed" I would not have ordered them. I think you should warn readers that these books are XXX rated.
not worth the money even tho its cheap!. No $5 isn't alot, but mine would have been better spent on a magazine. Not good. Recycled material, just a marketing strategy!Buy a real book instead. TPR is always better than Kaplan anyhow
Cheated. I began reading Forever Amber last week (hoping to find a book I might like while I waited for another one to come available at the Library) and from the first I wasn't sure I was going to enjoy this book.  But I am one of those readers that feels if a book is started then you should finish it.  Upon finishing it I feel cheated.The book isn't all that bad.  There is a lot of movement, intrigue and history in it.  But I couldn't feel for the characters.  The main character, Amber, was not someone that I would like and even when things went wrong for her, I still felt that way.  I assume that no one is supposed to like her.  And although I didn't like any of the characters in this book, I guess I did feel something for Amber because I felt like she should be with Lord Carlton...up in until the last part of the book.  Then I realized that she shouldn't be with anyone.The reason for the two stars is because of the ending.  I hated that ending.  I felt totally cheated after reading the whole 700 plus pages and then the book ending so abruptly.  I agree with others who have left reviews here, it seems that the author decided that she either didn't want to write anymore of this book or she ran out of things to write about.Anyway, it was an okay book to keep me occupied until the book I have been waiting for becomes available but I would never recommend this book to anyone. It's really not worth the time.I guess you either love the book or you hate it.  And I hated it.
Something is missing. I can tell you that the main plot is thrilling. The problem is where you can find it. The book goes out of the main story so many times that you almost forget what you're reading. The book's end lacks in wits, HC just got out of ideas and finished the book like a fairy tale: Everybody found what they wanted and lived happily ever after. That's not the way to finish this book because this book has a potential to a paramount end no matter if it's merry or not.Query: Which were the good guys
not what i expected. The book is good if you do not know anything about thyroid disease, the book was not worth the money that you pay for i
Good Reference Book. This book is an excellent reference book for the serious ghost hunter / paranormal investigator. Provides good case histories as well as "ghost stories" that can be used as examples on investigations
JaQuita Price Ms. Scott 8th. The book Teacup Full Of Roses had a few topics that teens today could relate to. Nevertheless, this was not a very enjoyable book to me . I didn't like it because of how short it was. I think it should have been longer to give more details. In my opinion, the prolouge didn't fit well with the ending of the book. Overall, I give the book a 4 on a scale of 1 to 10. I would not reccomend this book to anyone because it was lacking a few things, which made it confusing
Verbose. I used this book for the Cornell Econ 301 course, a calculus based intro to microeconomics. The professor taught everything in lecture so that the book was used only as a supplement. I read part of the book and found that it is too verbose and repetitive. The author could have explained everything in less than half of the book. The exercises are not helpful. Moreover, this little book is sold for more than a 100 dollars. Not worth the money at all.
Catherine's revelations for the church and individuals. Catherine of Siena would recieve revelations from God and enter ecstatic trances.  In those transes she would have &quot;dialogues&quot; with God which her sisters recorded, thus the title. Catherine was used by the Pope to be peacemaker between warring cities and as such she was a Papal apologist, meeting with nobles and dignitaries throughout Europe, a different role for a woman of that time. As mystic she would dialogue with God about the church, the pope, priests and recieve counsel that are recorded in the &quot;Dialogues&quot;.  The prose is instructional, not exhortive in nature.  It is not a book that one reads expecting to come away uplifted and enthused, rather you will recieve sound direction
Misery..... disappointing read .... After reading The Kite Runner, a story about friendship, loyalty during the adverse times in Afghanistan during the Taliban, I was looking for another read centered on these harsh times in Afghanistan.  The Swallows of Kabul was endorsed as book for those that enjoyed The Kite Runner however, disappointly, other than being set in Afghanistan the books similarities end there.I appreciated the descriptions about life during the Taliban rule.  The author painted a vivid image on what it would have been like to walk down the street during these times.  You felt sympathic towards the two couples, eventually their lives intertwined but not how you would have expected them.  I was disappointed in the outcome of the story and was left with a feeling that the book was incomplete.
Borrrrrrrrrring. When I picked up True Believer, I was anticipating a good mystery as well as the chance to empathize with sensitively drawn characters.  Neither panned out.  This book is boring.  The characters are one-dimensional and there is no mystery.  Too much detail and not enough substance.  Not sure what the point of the story was as I didn't get it
If only a vicar was a type of weapon... And lo' my children, the lord said unto thee that... wait a moment... this is the modern age why am I talking like a medieval preacher? Maybe that's because the profoundly stupefying effect that The Viccar of Wakefield by Oliver Goldsmith had on me.The story starts off in a monotone text voice and goes on like that for the entire one hundred ninety nine pages, give or take a few pages depending on version. The story follows a preacher and his family as they fall from grace into poverty. A merchant steals all the money that Viccar Primrose has invested, leaving them poor and forcing them to move out from their home in Wakefield. The book continues and follows the family's trials and tribulations.This book was extraordinarily hard to read, I would not recommend it to anyone that is not a college level English student, and even then only at your own risk. No words are in quotes, the fourth wall is broken constantly, and the main character just preaches what the author thinks about everything. It is probably one of the hardest books I have ever read, and I am a junior English major in college.The characters are amazingly flat, the plot has some redeeming qualities though. The plot shows how the people of the time lived, had fun, and loved; not to mention how mothers regarded their children. The ending though was so... contrived that it ruined whatever interest the main story had.All in all, this story was a waste of time. If you want to learn how things worked in that age, there are plenty of stories that are easier to read, much more accurate, and have less author interruption then this book. Its negatives greatly outweigh its positives, so unless you have to read it, stay away.
Could have done a better job at the beginning of the book ~ Too confusing. My first Philippa Gregory book was "The Queen's Fool"  which I throughly enjoyed.  I could not waited to have time to sit and read!  So as I was towards the end of "The Queen's Fool" I began to see what other books were available by this author.  I bought "The Virgin's Lover" since to seemed to follow "The Queen's Fool".  Within the first 36 pages, I was completely frustrated at the layout of the novel.  TOO MUCH BOUNCING ABOUT WITH THE TIME FRAME.  And the time frames within the book do not match those in "The Queen's Fool".  For instance, in "The Queen's Fool"  Queen Mary dies in Winter 1558 but in "The Virgin's Lover" The Queen dies in Autumn 1558.  Another example is Lord Robert.  In "The Queen's Fool" Lord Robert lives at St. James Palace (Autumn 1558) and presses Queen Mary to name an heir (Winter 1558).  However, in "The Virgin's Lover" Lord Robert is low man in court with no where to go but to his wife's StepMother's.I think part of the problem with this type of time framing is the use Seasons.  Winter 1558....is this November December or January February?  Because further in the book the use of Winter 1558-59 is used. The back and forth at the beginning of the book set me up to confusion a few later chapters into the book.  I spent more time concentrating on keeping the time frame correct then actually enjoying the book which must be quite evident by now with me taking the time to write this review
Some of this author's advice is damaging. I enjoyed this author's other "Outsmarting" book better, the one NOT about menopause.  This book comes across as whiney at times with a "woe-is-me" approach to midlife, despite her efforts to appear positive.  She condones eating things like French fries, potato chips, full-fat products, daily chocolate and has a minimum-necessary approach to fitness.  She clearly isn't a fitness fanatic.  She even mentions that larger women can have a commanding presence and lists Aretha Franklin as an example!  Hello, that woman epitomizes over-indulgence.  Also, if you are very active, you will have to get more food into you than she says.  I tried to only eat the smallest meals only when I was hungry, and probably because I am fit and exercise regularly, I needed quite a few more calories than she suggested.  I suggest women look to a life full of activity as an antidote to depression and aging, and I would not suggest, as the author does, that the fat we need in our diet come from junk foods like potato chips.  There are so many more ways to get fat into your diet that don't involve saturated fats.  Avoiding bad foods does not qualify as a "diet."  It's good sense
Frustrating for little fingers. We bought this book for our 2 year old daughter, and even I had trouble putting the valentines into the slots.  The valentine was not very durable, and was starting to rip already after the first time we read it together.  I was very disappointed and returned the book.  It was not up to Sesame Street standards.  Try "Elmo Loves You" instead
Forget trying to order this from Amazon!. I have been trying to order this from Amazon since October 2005. Twice now they have delayed and delayed the delivery for months only to finally cancel the order. They clearly do not have access to this book
The Invisible Woman. Denmark fancies himself a real tough guy because he grew up in the tough Brownsfield District and because he was named after slave revolt leader Denmark Vesey.  Okay.  Denmark is married to a ghost of a woman named Sierra.  She starts off as a ghost to the reader and is still a ghost at the end of the book.  Who was she?  What did she want?  What did she like?  How did she feel about being placed on a pedastal like some kind of plaster cast mannequin?  What did she think about the life she had in which she wasn't even a real woman - just some breathing fantasy come to life?  Denmark doesn't seem to know or care.  She cheats on him.  He gets real real mad. Why he is so mad about losing a woman that he doesn't even care to get to know is never made clear but he is real real mad.  So mad that he sets out to get revenge by sleeping with every woman he knows even if her man is one of his friends.  Things get ugly.  The only good thing about this book is that Sierra escapes her cage.  Hopefully she will find a real man
Man + Fish = Book. My friend told me this book is incredible but I found it a little far fetched personally.Why doesnt the guy just catch two fish which are each half as big and then he can be eating fish sticks for dinner instead of a big plate of nothing which is where he ends up (WARNING: spoiler alert) in the end of the book. It would be a lot easier and it makes exactly as good a story or even better because it is extra fish caracters.Me I think writers should stick with writing about stuff that is on dry land given the track record so far.TWO STARS for your book Ernest!  One star for each caracter you put in the story (even including fish)!  Youre rating is as good as Melvile got for his fish book so chin up
Disappointed. After reading the Oprah Pick, "What Looks Like Crazy on an Ordinary Day, I was very disappointed in "Some Things I Never Thought I'd Do."  It took me two long weeks to finish this slim novel and I lost interest after about the first fifty pages.  I don't think Pearl Cleage is a paticularly talented novelist; I think she can write realistic,sometimes dynamic dialogue between her black characters, but the story is lacking.I loved the very first part of the book where Regina Burns has just gotten out of rehab, is losing her anscestral home, so she goes to her aunt Abbie for help and comfort and Abbie introduces Regina to the notion that life is not a lost cause--that is the story I wanted to read.  Instead, what I got is a very political story infused with the author's belief that black men especially need positive role models.  I believe we ALL need to be and have positive role models, that it is not just a black thing.I wanted to read more about Regina and Blue.  I felt as if that part of the story was horribly under developed.  I hope that Pearl Cleage's next novel is better than this one, but I'm sorry to say I don't hold out much hope
Animal Farm Revisited. Marjorie Kelly stands heads above her comrades in shouting the old adage "From each according to his abilities, to each according to his needs" from the father of wealth discrimination, Karl Marx.  She pounds her pulpit to not just reform our economic society but to invert it.  Her scheme for change requires more government intervention and less free capitalism.  She is clearly in left field. The fedgov through their meddling in forbidding areas has created the mess we are seeing today.  Corporations are abiding to compliant ethics (established by meddling government bureaucrats) and no more.  Free capitalism abides to the divine ethics and does unto others as they would want done unto them.  Ms. Kelly and those who like this book should reread Animal Farm, visit the Von Mises website or check economic books by Carson, Hazlitt or Sennholz
NOT WORTH THE MONEY !!!!!!!!. The worst story is Kenyon !!!I will NOT buy any more in the future!!
Not Interesting as a Book. This book would do well to advertise itself as a series of articles about topics and people related to chocolate and chocolate production, but marketed as the story of chocolate it's needlessly boring. The chapters are about the length of an article and don't seem to be interconnected except in subject matter. The first few chapters were very interesting, but around the chapter "The Chocolate Coast" I realized that these were the longest 140-some pages of my life. I would be more interested in the history and lore of chocolate, rather than chapter after chapter of how he followed someone around, was almost denied access to their secrets/factory, and then talking about the different fermentation processes and what the machines look like. He may fare better to talk about wines, because that's how the subject is treated and somehow it just doesn't fit. He becomes haughty about the inferiority of american chocolate, treating his audience as a oenophile would speak to someone who drinks wine coolers. As for the writing, it seems to steer wrecklessly between very dry and excessively nostalgic.This book would be a winner with people interested chocolate economics, how different people use difference processes, and how chocolate is used in foods around the world. Unfortunately I wasn't looking for any of these things
customer review. this review is not based on plot or writing skill of author.  the graphic presentation of the book was so unappealing and overstimulating, that i couldn't even read it and returned it.  furthermore, the fact that this was a 400 page comic book should have been mentioned in amazon's (or antone's)listing
Really, really not good... I was really excited about this book.  I've been studying Islam for about ten years now and ride the cusp of converting so I thought this would be an excellent resource - a Christian convert to Islam who has a B.A. and M. Div. from Harvard would seem to be a perfect read.  I was horribly disappointed.The title claims this is an interfaith dialogue.  That's stretching the term a bit; "outer" faith dialogue might be a better term for it.  It would seem to me that his information is as current as his MDiv degree which my guess would be dates back a far as the 70s.  It's as if he has merely rehashed that information, much of which is quite outdated today.Here's his method.  Take the Gospels as we have them, strip away their roots, bring in the apocryphal literature as if they were concurrent with the Gospels as we have them, claim that there were many different groups fighting to represent the "true" Gospel and make it seem as if the power mongers won out.  Fine.  But his methodology is seriously flawed.  An example should suffice.He dates the Gospel of John to 110 C.E. which is a pretty liberal date; most scholars, conservative or other, date it prior to 100 C.E. to between 80 and 95 C.E.  Take an apocryphal gospel such as Treatise of Shem, dated between the second and fourth centuries CE and claim that the earliest date is "most probable" with absolutely no support.  So late date the Gospel of John, claim it has been edited the most, take Treatise of Shem and date it to the second century (perhaps 110 C.E.) and what he's done is presented the Gospel of John and Treatise of Shem as two "gospels" circulating at the same time!  Bunk.Other "fringe" ideas.  The Jesus we all know and love was not from Galilee.  The Jesus pursued in the New Testament was "a member of the Galilean part of paramiliatry insurrectionsts."  This is the Jesus that was arrested; when Peter denies "Jesus" three times he is denying this Jesus, not the Jesus we think.At the trial, then, Barabbas, whose "real" name is 'Jesus bar Abbas' (i.e. 'son of the Father', i.e. our Jesus) is released.  Jesus the aforementioned insurrectionist is crucified thus confirming the claims of the Qur'an that Jesus was not crucified!  How 'bout that.  Though he does not claim this is actually what happened, he tosses it in there as a hypothesis.  He's really working it to make early Christianity fit in the Islamic scheme.The book is, quite honestly, a dismissal of (and insult to) traditional Christianity and introduces the other Christianities as being the more in line with the "true" Christianity (i.e. Islam).  That's fine but the title and intent is flawed at best, misleading at worst.I felt as if I was reading the Da Vinci Code all over again.  Some of his sources are from the more fringe side of Christian scholarship, such as Helmut Koester (from Harvard, no surprise there), members of the Jesus Seminar, even drawing from Isaac Asimov.  The vast majority of his sources are dated prior to 1980.  Nothing wrong with fringe scholarship, don't get me wrong (see some of my other reviews), but he merely gathered information from high and low and everywhere in between in order to back his claims.  It lacks consistency.It's really not well thought out at all and actually does a disservice to Islam as well as someone looking through these apocryphal gospels could simply make the case that Islam borrowed directly from them.  The other problem is that the very same Gospel he claims has been edited the most - John - is the very same Gospel that claims to be prophesying that the "Advocate" was really Muhammad!The only value in the book is that it does present what is standard polemic in many Muslim circles.  Overall, a tremendously disappointing book.For a better in-depth discussion from Westerners who have converted to Islam, try Muhammad Asad, Murad Hoffman and/or Martin Lings
Boots. The original. He was kind of cool, but now he ain't; people using his backwardness against us. Forget this dude, or perish. 1896 speech was a total sell out to da man.Drop ya boots, dawg!!!I
A History of the Same Tired Stuff. Intelligent Design is, ultimately, an intellectually dead end. This is the large elephant in the living room of Mr. Woodward and Mr. Johnson. What is the practical use of a theory such as this? In what ways does it lead to expanding humankind's knowledge? To simply avoid answering this adds nothing to the &quot;argument&quot; for intelligent design. What great predictions will I.D. give us in the end? I find this history lacking in that it provides no real reason to use I.D. as a productive approach to science
A Waste of Time. Don't waste your time. This book is not about cooking. It's more about existential angst that results from a dead-end job. Even Julia (the real one), living at the time, when told about the project, sneered at the idea. The first half of the book is boring, the second half less so, but boring nonetheless. I gave the book away
I'm Trying To Think of Something Good To Say. I can't find anything good to say about this book.  I agree that it's tedious, boring and a waste of money.  I put it down and picked it up and then asked myself 'why', closed it up and put it up.  I was going to sell it here but everyone else who tried to read it beat me to it.  It's not even worth the $.01.
a sad waste of time and money. I went out and bought this book after seeing the reviews posted here and on other discussion lists. This is probably the worst book I have ever read on the subject. Anna Riva has more credibility than this guy! Llewyllyn Publishing House certainly does not seem to be bothered by the fact that they are marketing false information to the public. Who ever wrote in last and commented on the harmful effectd of combining traditions is correct. Hoodoo is not new age fantasy like the wiccan "religion" its a tried and true folk practice. The author seems to believe that he can mix Haitian Loa with hoodoo and blend in a bit of jewish mysticism for kicks. This book and the other Llewyllyn  mistake, Sticks Stones Roots and Bones are both just plain fantasy.
Totally debunked. This book is, in hindsight, horribly wrong. It is now known that there are no WMD's in Iraq. Saddam did not pose a threat to America and the world at-large. It's just sad that the trumpeters of the Iraqi war were playing to the wrong song. It's packed with faulty and "highly dubious" intelligence. The CIA has since admitted as much but I do not expect as much from a hack writting a book to profit from a "massive intelligence failure"
From Standup to... Standup!. Probably a great resource if you're interested in being a standup comic.  Other than that, there's not really that much in this book I found useful or interesting...  a lot of name-dropping, though!  Apparently every comedian throughout the history of standup has taken one of Judy Carter's classes
Not even for $1.99. Alas, I've joined the group of dispointed consumers! I love Alton Brown, but this so called &quot;book&quot; is less (WAY less) than steller. I actually saw this at Chapters for $1.99 and couldn't bring myself to part with the Twoonie required to purchase it. All the previous reviews sun up my feelings - but I just had to add my two cents
Just REALLY BAD writing!. Ok, I don't mean to be rude, but if you think this is great writing you are woefully uneducated. It is almost a sad confirmation of the common stereotype of fundamentalist Christians being uneducated yokels that so many of them think this is great writing. Here's my take: I'd enjoy a good "end of times" story - this just isn't it. The Left Behind series is amateurish and poorly written and just plain astonishing to me that it has had such huge success. P.T. Barnum once said that no one ever went broke understimating the intelligence of the American public and this series proves it. Christians should demand better writing from their revered authors. Go read some C.S. Lewis or something - please.
Horrible Book. The only great thing about this book is its small size and thats about it. The text doesn't do a very good job of explaining the ideas and concepts. Say you are given certain parts of an equation it doesn't really show you how to use to components to solve for the right number. Instead it gives you a wonderful GENERAL overview of an idea that is minimal in explanation. I'm almost at the point of flipping out because the lack of explanations and I'm only on Chapter 2
not worth the effort. I saw this book when I was a child and wanted to read it then (it had a cool cover with a kind of blimp/airship on it).  Unfortunatley, life intervened and I only got around to reading it just recently.Alas!  This book was a lot better and more wonder-filled in my imagination than it actually turned out to be.The story is not very interesting, the setting is not well-painted, the protagonist's adventures are pedestrian, and the whole thing is swiss-cheesed with so much British slang as will likely put an American kid off his feed.Skip this one
Disbelief really hard to suspend!. Mine got unsuspended with the second boyfriend's death.I am a great fan of Nora Roberts and really looked forward to this book.  Believe me, it is not one of her best.I started off admiring her setting and characterization of the Hale family, but, then, this went on way too long.  It also took way too long to get to the real story. The middle of the book bogged down to the point that I had to make myself keep reading, which is very unusual for Nora Roberts.Much of the plot was over the top unbelievable.  How many boyfriends of one person can be killed?  The 20 year mystic connection with Bo doesn't quite come off, either.I'll certainly remain a great fan of Roberts, but no one's perfect, I guess.
Not very enjoyable. As a big fan of the 20 or so L. M. Montgomery books I've read and re-read, I was so excited to finally find a copy of this book. But when I started reading it I was really disappointed. I know this book was published posthumously and wondered if maybe she hadn't had time to polish the stories in it. Basically, I found it boring; one or two stories I couldn't even bother to finish, and others I've never re-read. None of the stories were wholly satisfying; each lacked something of the charm and entertainment of her previous short stories; those that started well ended flat.Another reviewer mentioned that they didn't find L.M. Montgomery's previous short stories satisfying, but I enjoyed the style of those earlier ones, which is perhaps why I didn't like these; they really have a different flavour to her other stories, although she still includes a number of her common themes
Undesirable. It's the polar opposite of good writing.  It's so familiar, so conversational, so unturgid, and so padded with fluffy stuff it's unreadable.  Even worse than I figured it would be.  Oh, well, now i know after wondering all these years.
BS - Pure Ruminations. I can hardly find words to describe this work.  Vacuous comes to mind with little effort.  The entire time I read this, I thought, where's the research?  Save yourself a buck: Think different like Richard Branson
Riddled with errors. Other reviewers have pointed out the errors Eric Alterman makes in this book, like saying that the U.S. was under the Kyoto Protocol.  That was particularly annoying.  He needs to stop writing his books on the back of cocktail napkins
The Dating Game. I did not like this audio book.Out of all of Danielle Steel audio books this one was the worse and most depressing story.In a world of finding a new job and starting to date again.It was a story of a women who was having a problem finding the right man.  It tells you a sad story of the man who used her and the man who was afraid to commit himself to another woman long after his wife died and he tryed to started to date again.
Not a page turner. A friend recommended this book to me, so I picked it up.  From the start, I had to force myself to keep going.  I read the whole book, but I wouldn't recommend it
Expensive advertisement!. This book does describe how to wet pan, dry pan and a few other things...BUT it is a very expensive advertisment for Garrett Metal Detectors and the &quot;new&quot; plastic pan.  Very disappointed in content.  Pictures are ok but not worth the money
Lost faith in Seth Godin as a marketing guru after this book. GODIN wrote about the new way of customer and prospect communication in PERMISSION MARKETING -- a must read.  He then got bold and told us about differentiation by creating something completely out-of-the-ordinary such as a PURPLE COW -- agreeable airplane literature.  Now there's really nothing else to talk about and he tries to push the envelope talking about how Cracker Jack's prize is the product.Your product's soul is not only about the extras.I would have preferred he kept to his excellent job in PERMISSION MARKETING and not losing his focus as he did in FREE PRIZE INSIDE.I am not going to read a 4th GODIN book
System safety is not an inexact science. I must say that I do agree with the words of David Nightengale (Saint Paul, MN) that "If you want to know about accident prevention go to the System Safety Society".The book talks a lot on tight coupling, or dependence, of different parts of systems during different states (DEPOSE, design, equipment, procedures, operators, supplies and materials, and environment), but it all remains very qualitative. Safety and reliability engineers prefer quantitative approaches, which are abundantly available in the area of systems reliability.The author does have an attractive style of writing. Especially the presentation on dam failures (the Grand Teton, the Malpasset and Vaiont dam failures) was interesting to read.
A Bad Man. I read the book because I had heard good things about it.  I was disgusted by what I saw.  I've always been a moderate, so this is not the ramblings of some right wing nut who just hates liberals.  Ted Rall hates America with an almost satanic passion.  After reading the book, I went online and searched for Ted Rall's cartoons.  These cartoons are even worse than the book.  He advocates the deaths of our soldiers and makes one cartoon actually claimed that ALL soldiers are rapists and sadists.  Ted Rall is a sick and twisted human being.  Do not send any of your money to this sadistic and anti-american nut
A Turgid, Pretentious Anti-War Allegory. No wonder there is so little said about this award-winning Faulkner work. It is a chore to read. Only in a few passages does the reader have the sense that the writer can tell a good story. Worse than that, the  characters are like Rorschak blots with the Christian mythology mixed in.  Stick with Faulkner's southern writings for characters who remain in your  memory and images that are profound
Too much guess work and very little science. Even though it was fun to read, I give it one star lest the brainwashed academics out their suffer further undue influence.  This book has been highly misrepresented by evolutionists for decades.  One reviewer made this point but failed to back it up with any facts.  That reviewer failed to point out that it was in the "Descent of Man," not "Origin of the Species" where Darwin first presents man as having descended from apes.Evolutionists apply natural selection to explain all biological development.  It's the worse case of reductionism in history.  James D. Watson and Edward Wilson were on the Charlie Rose show talking about this book.  They described natural selection as the single great development in science since Newton.  They claimed to describe this book as great English literature yet they badly misrepresented it as teaching that natural selection applies to everything biological.  How could these allegedly great scientists be so unscientific?  Scientists aren't supposed to be cavalier in their judgment.  Scientists are supposed to be conservative in their judgment.First of all, let's quote Darwin himself from this book, page 75:  "To suppose that the eye with all its inimitable contrivances for adjusting the focus to different distances, for admitting different amounts of light, and for the correction of spherical and chromatic aberration, could have been formed by natural selection, seems, I freely confess, absurd in the highest degree."  There you have it, from Darwin himself, from his famous book.  Yet, today, textbooks that claim a lineage to Darwin, depict evolutionary trees of everything biological sprouting from natural selection.  Evolutionists like Robert H Hurlbutt, oppose William Paley's design argument because it makes God, not natural selection, the origin of design in the human eye.  See Hurlbutt's book, page 173, "Hume, Newton and the Design Argument."  Watson and Wilson also attacked the human eye argument in an ad hominem way without producing any argument.But, while Hurlbutt is a typical product of academic brainwashing, which passes for education these days, how could two Nobel Prize winners of science, Watson and Wilson, make such a foolish mistake?  First of all, Watson and Wilson are crooks.  Their Nobel Prize fame for unlocking the secrets of the structure of DNA was illfounded.  Rosalind Franklin of King's college is well known to have discovered the structure of DNA and her supervisor Wilson passed it on to Watson and Crick, who, along with Wilson, took credit for it.  A little research by the Nobel Prize committee would have discovered this.  I guess the Nobel Prize really isn't worth anything when you consider how sloppy they are in giving their awards.  Einstein was given a Nobel Prize even though his papers on Brownian movement are a plagarization of Josiah Willard Gibb's book "Statistical Mechanics."Concluding unscientific postscript: Could Darwin's "Descent of Man" have psychological origin in the fact that Darwin himself looked like a monkey
If you're new to PM, prepare to be confused... This is easily the worst textbook I have used in my entire college career. Its language is convoluted and extremely confusing, and its descriptions are poor at best. Had I read this textbook alone without concurrently taking a project management class, I would have been utterly confused as to what the authors are trying to convey. Thank goodness I had an excellent professor to help me delve through this monstrosity
It just didn't grab me the way I expected. I actually read this novel about four years ago and didn't really like it, but after reading all the rave reviews on this site I decided to give it another try.  I came away feeling exactly the same way as before, let down.  The plot never really grabbed me like I thought it would.  Also, I never really cared for the character of Joe.  Emotionally and physically scared by an abusive father, Joe grows attached to his foster family, and even becomes his adopted father Will's personal driver.  When Will is murdered Joe decides to uncover the mystery behind his death on his own.  Sounds like it could be interesting huh?  Well, seems like most of you have but I just coulded get into this one.  When it was over I was relieved, and that's not a good feeling.  Sorry, maybe the third time will be a charm, but I don't see myself reading this again just to come away with the same opinion
Der ueber-professor. John Carey is the Merton Professor of English Literature at the University of Oxford, occupying one of the most prestigious chairs in the academic world today. From this Olympian height, Professor Carey conducts a battle, on behalf of the general public, against most of the writers and thinkers of the Modernist movement.  Why can't we understand modern art and literature? The answer is simple: these major intellectuals both hated and feared the masses, i.e. us; and consciously isolated themselves, in life and in art, from the general public. Thus spake Professor Carey.  And why would these modern intellectuals hate us? Again, the answer is simple.  Because they were influenced by that evil couple of thinkers so influential around the beginning of the century--Nietzsche and Freud.  Nietzsche, according to Professor Carey, despised the masses and yearned for the coming of a superman to enslave the rest of mankind. Therefore, he is responsible for Fascism.  Freud, similarly, made up psychological theories to explain the herd behavior of the masses.  Make no mistake about it, Professor Carey is for the people and against Fascism, Totalitarianism, etc, etc.  On the other hand, those of us--from the masses-- who have actually read the books  from down below find it hard to agree with Professor Carey's sweeping condemnation.  Of course we lack the mountain air and bird's-eye-view of the Merton Professor, but we happen to detect in this book, in the all-too-easy answers given on every page, a trace of what Nietzsche would call ressentiment. Towards the intellectuals that he condemns Professor Carey seems to have a I-hope-you-rot-in-hell attitude; and his chief method is to pick any and every quote from any and every book--out of context--that would prove his wonderfully brutal hypothesis.  In the end, our professor seems to be the one out of touch with reality, with paranoid delusions about the descendents of modernism taking over the contemporary world.  Who's afraid of Derrida? Read this book to find out.!  One final note, today the works of the modernists condemned in this book are studied by all who care about humanity, in all major languages, and in every corner of the world--i.e. by the masses. And as to our Oxford Professor who doesn't even tutor undergrads anymore..
Dublin Made Me, but didn't keep me. Has the superior writing of Frank McCourt and Roddy Doyle opened the door for anyone to believe their memoirs are worthy of public interest? Dublin Made Me, is at best a watery account of Sheridan's childhood which fails  miserably to grip the reader and maintain interest.  This account is more  appropriate for bedtime anecdotes handed from father to child, than  anything even remotely comparable to the writings of McCourt and other  contemporaries.  If the reader is anticipating the rawness and vigor  associated with the accounts of others who have shown the best and the  worst of Dublin life, then they will be disappointed. A very forgettable  read
Relationships. This book is for women who enjoy reading about relationships, in repetitive, excruciating, detail.  Her mother, father, sisters, girlfriends, boyfriends, etc. etc. and her drinking.  Guys will find this hard to keep open
boring. Did not care for this book. It was a struggle to get to the last 100 pages which read somewhat more interesting but was not worth it. Don't waste your time, you never care for the characters, nor did I want to get to know them.
Was she really that GOOD of a mother?. I don't feel that Miller made much of an attempt to prove that Anna was in fact a "good" mother. Like another reviewer said, I don't think she was a BAD mother, but the book really didn't go into much detail about Anna's relationship with Molly (especially up until Anna' ex-husband filed for custody) and instead focused on Anna's life experiences and psyche. After Brian said he wouldn't send Molly back, Anna didn't even seem that concerned about Molly's mental and emotional well-being. She just focused on her notion that Leo's actions were simply taken out of context, and while she wanted to see Molly again, I got the impression that it was based on a selfish concern for her "rights" as a mother, not out of a concern for her daughter.And what was so great about Leo anyway?? He wasn't exactly nice to Anna, often condescending to her, and from the beginning I felt that his affection for Molly was a farse, simply to stay on Anna's good side. He also seemed sexually possessive of Anna--like the scene when he kept having sex with her after Molly came into the bed because of a nightmare. I think Anna loved her daughter, but she made the error of confusing sexual attraction with true love, since she had never felt such an attraction before. As a result, her daughter became an afterthought to someone she had known for 2 months, with dire consequences. Although she did show some signs of remorse, she spent a large amount of time trying to justify her actions instead of showing a very deep concern for her daughter's welfare. If she had put her daughter first from the beginning, instead of being swept up into a sexual frenzy and creating illusions about the new "family" she and Leo were forming, then she probably never would have lost custody of her child.
not a strong point for Naipaul. I am a huge fan of V.S. Naipaul. The premise of this book--exploring the effects of the colonial situation upon the lives of three men--is excellent. However, this book is a confusing conglomeration of three separate and unrelated stories, and there were times when I found myself wondering what was going on. I love Naipaul's flair for narrative and description, but the sections on Miranda are almost entirely dialogue, with lots of obscure references. I actually skipped over the last section on Miranda because I just could not get through it, whereas normally I am unable to put down Naipaul's books. Not one of his best works...in fact I don't recommend it to anyone aside from those hardcore fans who are determined to read everything this great novelist has ever written
wrong isbn. The isbn number I ordered was 0072866845 the isbn # I recieved is 007121582-4 or 007121427-5 both numbers are on the book
Do not waste your money. This is quite possibly one of the worst books I have ever read.  It  drags on like a rusty knife for far to many pages.  The book could have been good, could have saved itself if it had ended on page 152 instead of page 195.  The story after 152 is irrelevant, pointless, lacks continuity, and ultimately leaves the reader wondering why it was included.  Instead of the sad story of the young writer, you end up with that plus a monologue in which the author attempts to build sympathy for himself, justify his existence, and generally prove that at 50 he amounted to something
Lacks detail and helpful tips. This is not one of Lonely Planet's best guides.  There is suprisingly little information.  For example, the book mentions that there are a few companies that give day tours from Rekyavik but doesnt tell you anything about how they compare in price or services.  basically, everything in the guide and more can be found at the tourist information center in Rekyavik, which luckily is run very well.  I found this really disappointing since Iceland is very expensive and I was hoping to keep down costs (in reality this is almost impossible, even eating at the grocery store I was spending 10 dollars a meal for bread and cheese) Furthermore, Iceland is a very small country and it would have been very easy to have given a lot more details.As with any tour book some of the info is out of date.  some of the museums and businesses were closed including the Icelandic Phallogical Museum.  It also seemed that this book was written for the high season in the summer months.  I went in March and found the information on the offseason limited and sometimes inaccurate.  I usually trust Lonely Planet but in this case I would have tried one of the other guide book companies or simply visit the tourist center when you get there.
Too old. This book is now 11 years old. Lot of informations are missing now
A Simple Mind. I know a lot of people liked this book, but it didn't work for me. The main character and his buddies run around like chickens with their heads cut off, acting as if they have committed a huge crime. The problem is, they didn't. There is no crime. I talked to several cops and a prominent defense attorney about this plot, and it makes no sense. It would make sense if someone comes after the McGuffin, early on, but no one does, not until very late in the book. So most of the story has no foundation.
Typical liberal rhetoric. I first read passages from this book in college.  I can now see how liberal professors very much enjoy using this book to influence young minds.  Professor Zinn is a far left author.  He uses the usual lines: America generally bad, communism generally good.  Obviously Mr. Zinn has the right to write whatever he wants, and his writing style is very convincing.  However, if the reader investigates the facts, many holes become visible in his theories.  Those who agree and disagree with his writings should explore opposite viewpoints.  A good example is "Intellectual Morons : How Ideology Makes Smart People Fall for Stupid Ideas by Daniel J. Flynn" which gives the reader a good profile of Mr. Zinn.
wouldn't read it again. I felt like I was watching a poorly made horror movie that included casual sex while the killer was planning his next move. I can deal with there being a rape or murder because all suspense books are based on some type of violence, but did there have to be such graphic detail? I only finished it because I wanted to know who the psycho was.  All violence put aside, it was a decent suspense story but didn't include any romance whatsoever. Casual sex does not equal romance in my book. Reader discretion advised: rape, murder, lots of casual sex, adult scenes and overall violence. Not on my bookshelf anymore
Half Assed. This books was way too overhyped.  Upon purchasing it I was greatly dissappointed.  It does give an introductory crash course in some guitar theory, but a lot of its information is half assed.  The way that scales are presented is incomplete with only partial scales and very poor explanations of how the different forms within a scale link together that I would actually consider as being wrong.  A lot of the examples and techniques explained are stupid. Who cares how to play &quot;Louie Louie&quot; in a bunch of different ways, but I suppose that might get you started at finding chords in more than one place on the fretboard.  Nevertheless, this book is boring and incomplete. Buy something else
OJ Should Hire Posner. This book is uniformly praised by ignorant people who want to believe the Warren Commission. Posner saw an opportunity to take their money, and he took it. Good for him. I'm sure if there was a sizable market of people wanting to believe OJ was innocent, he'd write that book too, with all sorts of convincing "scientific" evidence. Take a look at Weisberg's Case Open, if you can find it , for documentation of some of Posner's more amusing misrepresentations.
lots of fill...little thrill. As a piece of entertainment, this book falls flat. Way flat.  There is a story here, but mundane sub-plots (including the love story) are thrown in in an attempt to fill the pages to make it a book.  I found myself skipping pages - lots of them - to get to the point.  Overall, very disappointing.
Half of the book is blank reserved for notes!. Pages 38 to 97 -- half the book -- is just blank space for notes, which you could just as well write in a 10-cent, 70-page notebook spiral. The beginning of the book is mostly made up of pages with simple checklists and address forms, with some bulletted questions here and there
Technically excellent, but artistically disappointing. I was actually fairly disappointed by this book, though it does merit very high marks on the technical issues, i.e. the reproductions are of high quality, and the photographer knew his tools. It's just that I didn't care  for the choice of images.  Most of the images are very contrasty, moving  quickly between almost oily highlights and deep shadows.  The poses, while  visually interesting, were very artificial and to me, unappealing.  I guess  the photographer was going for presenting the structure of the body and  different kinds of lines you could generate with it.  In that regard, he  did a good job, but it was not a goal that appealed to me.  And one final  FYI, the book is black and white -- no value judgement on that, just  information that I didn't see elsewhere on this page
The Highest Bottom Drunk Ever. If you are at the top of your profession, totally successful, financially secure, surrounded by hot babes, driving a Porsche, AND you have a desire to stop drinking, this is your book.  Wait, on second thought, that is the whole book.  You can read this review or blow $12 and read the longer version.  Your choice
Huge disappointment. After reading "Men Who Can't Love" (which, by the way, is brilliant!), I was excited to pick up another piece by these authors.  Unfortunately I was more than disappointed.  I should have seen a red flag when I saw the title, so I have no one to blame but myself.  Any woman who decides to "like herself" just so that a man can like her is sadly mistaken (you like yourself for yourself, not anybody else!).  Generalizations such as "a balding man is a better catch than a hottie" are... simply put, ignorant.  Theory that a lengthy first phone conversation indicates problems in the relationship going forward is ridiculous.  Half way through the book, I came to conclusion that it was written for teenagers - a couple of valid points surrounded by a whole lot of common sense rambling.  Women who want to improve their self-esteem should look elsewhere.  And finally, who in the world thinks about babies on the first date??
History written by a loser. From Lind, verbatim: "Who won and who lost the Vietnam War?  The only complete losers were the officials of South Vietnam, whose state was erased from the map."  May the dead, maimed and mourning    find some comfort that their misery could be yet more abject: they could be suffering the pain of the war's cartographic consequences."Necessary War"? - Unnecessay B.S
Anti-family secularist claptrap. I just wonder if this would have been published without the author's being married to an author;  I find his stuff repetitively boring as well.  This is a simplistic story of an orphan wife who acts as though she can't stand her husband and seems to glory in anything she can do to upset him  Her friend in these endeavors is an obviously manic / depressive (sorry, term has been replace by bi-polar victim ) whose wealth seems to make her the star.  Their enemy is the EVIL (can't use that word either) Eagle Forum which is trying to close down the local store where the kids get their drug paraphanalia.  It seems that bothladies have problems (oops, not allowed any more by the political correctness police, I mean 'issues') with their male counterparts.  They act like they hate their husbands.I'd recommend this to anyone who hates Religious people and loves to see kids getting in trouble with drugs.  A dog . .
It's called the &quot;Rough Guide&quot; because it's rough. This book was a disappointment.  It's information was incomplete and uninformative (and I'm talking about the recent FIFTH Edition -- published in 2002).  Even in the touristy beachy destinations, I did not find the information helpful.  Many of the budget hotels listed were closed, and there were no similar alternatives provided.  Very little historical background for the sites I saw.  Not much value added.  I spent time on the Pacific Coast (not Baja) and in the Central Highlands.  For Nahrit, Jalisco, the Bajio, and Michoacan states, it's practically worthless.  Some of the worst maps in the business (Lonely Planet has excellent maps, so even if its information is lacking, at least you have reliable orientation).  I would be VERY CAREFUL about buying another Rough Guide
Read if you must. Reading this book, I find that the author's ego interferes often with the documentation of how America went from Haute cuisine to the modern "American" restaurant.  One particular passage paints his mother (a cook) in the same light as Elizabeth David and M.F.K.Fisher, and leaves me wondering why, if she was so enlightened, do I not see her book on the shelf.  Throughout the book, he comes off as an average cook that could no longer take the heat, and left the kitchen to write.With about 30 pages left to go, I cringe each time I reach for the book to attempt to finish it as what the author must perceive as colorful writing becomes more laborious with each page.That said, there is definitely some interesting information, and if you can indeed labor through some of its issues, and weave around the author's bias, you will be somewhat rewarded.  (I especially found some of the La Pavillion information interesting after finishing Jacques Pepin's autobiography.)Bottom line - if you are seriously interested in reading about American gastronomy, this might we worth a look if you can pick a copy up cheap.  I only wish someone with more skill had taken on the project, as it was, in fact, an excellent idea for a book
This book is not what I expected.... I have studied,  practiced and taught managerial accounting for more than 17 years at work, using excellent supporting text and case books from recognized US authors. But to be honest Dr. Kaplan is making easy concepts to appear complicated and cumbersome. His case readings as well as the text materials are very length and hard to &quot;digest&quot; since it does not capture the attention of the reader.I would not recommend the book neither for and undergraduate or graduate degree, despite the well known and worldwide recognition of Dr. Kaplan. His book is far from being pedagogical in nature
Average romance novel. i'm a nora roberts fan, so picking up a book of hers to read is something i look forward to. after reading "born in fire", i was eager to find out what kind of romance the cool and collected brianna would find in "born in ice".brianna is a young woman who is uncomfortable with conflict, and because she grew up in a household where her fiery sister maggie and embittered mom maeve were always battling, she developed the ability to keep a calm facade in the face of a storm. she has done a good job of disciplining her emotions to the point where they can't create further conflict, even if she burns with anger inside. she's very family oriented and longs for a husband and family of her own. after being jilted weeks before her wedding a decade before the timing of the story, she thinks she'll never have what she dreams of.she owns a bed and breakfast in a small town in ireland where she is the perfect hostess. she's always hospitable to her guests. she's a gifted artist in both the kitchen and garden, two places she loves to be. although she's surrounded by folks who love her, she's still lonely.and then comes grayson, the american writer who pops in for a couple of months to write a novel as inspired by the scenery and ambience of ireland. he's one who lives in the moment, ignoring his past and unwilling to plan the future because of the commitment and responsibilities such an action would create.the characters compliment each other well. they're both generous and both suffering from childhoods where they didn't feel loved. she's comfortable with the idea of laying down roots but he's not. that's where the conflict comes to play.and that's kinda where i've got a problem with the book. this is supposed to be a guy who doesn't want emotional ties, yet early in the book he's already willingly becoming emotionally attached to her. there simply wasn't enough resistance from him for me to believe he was really afraid of settling down. there was very little if any sexual tension here, and not enough situations to warrant sexual tension. a couple of encounters of kissing and then they were in bed. and even then, it seemed like he wasn't really fighting himself for being there. there simply wasn't enough of an inner conflict within him. it all seemed like lukewarm resistance.and brianna was simply a saint. i would have liked to see her emote a little more. i understand that she was written to be an ice princess of sorts, but i don't think roberts did a good job of depicting her as a character who was a carefully contained boiler. at times i found it difficult to believe brianna could exhibit any kind of real passion with grayson.there were alot of slow moments in the book that made me wishing i was already near the end. i will say that the ending was sweet. also, it was great seeing how the relationship of maggie and rogan progressed from "born in fire".i'd recommend this book to anyone who likes reading about the vividness of a writer's imagination, as roberts did a great job with grayson in that respect. however, if you're looking for a "can't put down" romance novel, this ain't it
Disappointing. It has nothing but pre-published photos we have all seen before in magazines. The tats aren't even shown. They talk about how Angelina has a lot of them but they don't even list them all. Not made for the true tattoo enthusist. A coffee table book at best. It describes their crazy childhoods more than the tats
Don't, Good read but not Good!. Paulo Coelhho is one of the greatest writers of our time but he failed on this one and I wonder why, commercialism?Good read, but very disappointing conclusion that contradicts the entire story of what he aims to be plus an arrogant person that he states to dispel in this book, contradictions over. I am waiting for his next novel that will re-institute him as the best ...Alas don't buy this book, borrow it from the library and read it in your spare time, better entertainment watching Carnaval or Rome on HBO
Little conceptual explanation. I'm currently using this book for my Process Calculations course. The book has many example problems and covers unit conversions, material balances, energy balances, single phase and multi-phase systems, etc. Yet, the theory is almost non-existent and the reader is presented with a lot of facts and formulae crammed in with very little conceptual emphasis.I do not recommend this book, as an introduction to a process calculations cours
Hate it and love it. I hardly know how to describe this book.  When I read it two years ago, my hatred for Pamela (the character) was something of an amusing obsession.  Although Richardson had meant to portray a model of feminine virtue, Pamela is vain, conniving, self-righteous, wordy, and obnoxiously weak.  I cannot think of a more annoying character in literature...Uriah Heep, Lydia Bennett, Newland Archer...all are more tolerable than Pamela.  I find myself rooting for Pamela's ruin.To top everything off, Pamela's great reward for maintaining her virtue is a marriage to the man who had so many times tried to rape her.  As a husband, Mr. B. is temperamental and demanding.  And this is virtue rewarded?  Even by 18th century standards the idea was thought absurd by many, such as Henry Fielding who wrote parodies, Shamela and Joseph Andrews.Yet despite all this, the book is at times entertaining (if for all the wrong reasons) and pleasantly sentimental.  I admit, I hate it and love it.  I searched and searched to find Pamela part II (yes, Richardson actually did write a sequel).  So far it promises to be just as frustrating as part I!
How Not To Write a Romance. This book should be an inspiration for romance writers, indeed writers of any genre, because after reading it you are sure you can write a better story. Now getting that story published may be a tad more difficult because you aren't already a best selling writer, but hey we've all got to start somewhere.Jayne Ann Krentz isn't the only writer whose early works fall in the category of head scratchers as in, "Why in the world did anyone buy that manuscript?" Other best selling authors have had less than stellar beginnings and when a begining writer reads these works it gives her courage to keep trying to write and sell her own stories. If you don't fall in this category of reader then maybe you don't want to read this one
This is appalling. Teach your kid to use Weights and Measures and poison him/herself with sugar and empty calories at the same time!Perhaps Hershey's should also create a book on Dental Hygiene,weight control and the advantages of hyperactivity.I suppose this is approved by the Bush administration's Dept. of Education. Anything to keep corporate America happy! Pathetic
Boring. This story has been done time and time again.  Don't waste your money.  Humor was forced and trite, book was way too long
Disgust!. I would prefer to give this book no stars. It is an outdated, sexist look  at the generalizations of men that no longer apply in today's society. I am  amazed that this book is a 1998 publication. It would make better since if  it was published in 1950. I am 25 years old and wanted to find out why my  husband is so different from me in certain aspects. This book was useless,  all it did was offend me, disgust me and lead to arguments with my husband.  It made me feel that I made a bad decision in being heterosexual because I  liked nothing about men and their ways. My husband read through the book  and talked to me about the inaccuracies and made me feel good about men and  him again. I would not suggest this book to anyone under 50, especially if  they are desperately seeking to understand their husband and are dealing  with minor marital problems. This book will only make things worse. Among  the many irritating statements made, my favorite offensive/sexist statement  is: Men's arms are built to swing an ax, while women's are built to cradle  babies. Give me a break! Someone needs to write a book on this subject that  is relative to this day and age. Women and men do struggle with their  differences and it would be so helpful to have an accurate manual to go to  for suggestions. This is not such a manual
Thumbs Down for "Terri's Family". Anyone gushing over the "concerned and loving" parent's of Terri Shiavo really needs to read Michael Shiavo's book on the life and death of his wife. Unlike "Terri's Family," he uses real documents, court and hospital records to support his case. He also exposes the Shindler's (in particular, Bob), as being much less concerned with their their daughter's treatment and more more concerned with affording a bigger condo.Terri is finally resting in peace
Silly Premise. This is one of Kellerman's poorest books.  When you FINALLY get to what is going on, it is ridiculous.  Don't waste your time on this
Not Really A 'Little House' Book At All. The First Four years was released many years after These Happy Golden Years brought a sweet, tidy ending to the series. I did not like this book and it just does not feel like it belongs with the other books. It is about hardship and bitter times and disturbs the harmony of the other titles. I'd recommend serious thought be given before this book is begun
Outdated---Ancient History. Exiled Cubans in Miami up to 1987. This is real old stuff. I wonder why this book is still being published. Felt like a collection of shorter magazine--newspaper articles compiled to look like a real book. Many long, disjointed sentences. Could use an updating. There must be better books out there about this topic
Leaves me cold. This rates as one of the poorer mysteries I have read in years.  It was truly an ordeal to finish, and I am left wondering why I bothered.  It has a totally unbelievable plot and inconsistent characters, many of whom are  stereotypical creations of little or no interest.  I was particularly  amused when the detective was told to &quot;make a few inquiries at the  transsexual shoe shop, giving the size and style of the shoe from the  corpse&quot;.  In all of LA, I am sure there is just one known  &quot;transsexual shoe shop&quot;.  Please.  I suspect Ms. LaPlante has  better material, but this is a poor example better left unread.  I would  give it less than one star, but unfortunately that's not an option
Very little sailing...tons of social commentary. I admit I am a resident of the South - Alabama to be exact.  But when I purchased this book, I sincerely wanted to read a story about sailing for a year in the Bahamas.  Sadly, this book is more about a spoiled couple that spends about 25% of the time telling you how scared they are about every aspect of the trip and 50% of the time criticizing the social conditions of the "South" as they travel down the ICW on the East Coast.  The other 25% of the time is spent talking about random ideas with a few sentences of the sailing trip they are supposedly on.  By page 70 I was tired of their liberal slant on a part of the US they claim to be "from".  Message to the author, I live in Birmingham.  Rosa Parks made her heroic stand against racial injustice in Montgomery.  Simple facts like this seem to be trivial to the authors who are more concerned with expressing their overall disgust with a South that has seemingly not changed much since the days of slavery.  Well, I certainly wouldn't say everything is perfect here, but as the authors admit, nowhere is perfect.  The Southeast is one of the fastest growing regions for economical development and changes are taking place.  Birmingham does boast to be the birth place for Civil Rights and we have an excellent Civil Rights museum that I have taken the time to actually visit to learn of the past injustices with the hope that I will be part of a better place for all.  I resent being lectured to by the main author who evidently loves his teaching job.  And if he does want to lecture this Southerner, I would expect him to take time to at least learn some of the more major details of the Civil Rights movement.Very little sailing story.  Lots of liberal opinions spewed forth as though they were facts when even his facts are wrong.  If you want to read about a sailing story....buy Sailing the Dream.  I am going to return my copy of this book to the author.  I may even take a red pen and mark all of his errors.  I would give him a grade of "F" if I were his professor
Left Behind Series. The Left Behind series is the best reading I have ever read. I admit my reading is not all that much, but when I read the very first book I was hooked, I read all twelve books in about six weeks. They lead me to understand the Bible better. Thank you Tim and Jerry for such great books.Corrine Robinson
It All Depends. It all depends on who you are if you will like this book.  Republicans will like it but Democrats or people with brains won't.
a little bit dry. I read through this book and found it fairly hard to digest. It seems too "academic" for me. An amateur like me probably won't be able to get anything meaningful out of it
Based on Incorrect Facts. This is the first time I've given a book the minimum rating.I bought this book in the hope that it would help me consider whether the Purpose-Driven Life/Church is more 'secular philosophy influencing church beliefs' than 'the church bringing God's revelation to the world'.  However, it quickly became apparent that the basis of this book is fundamentally flawed, as the author gets many basic facts wrong.The problems can best be illustrated by looking at Appendix A, where the author contrasts 'Psychology' with the Bible.  I'll describe the errors as they apply to Jungian psychology, as this is one of the main targets for the author in the book and is something of which I have some knowledge.Example Errors--------------(1) Fear of the LordPoint 1 of the appendix says psychology "counsels no fear of the Lord at anytime.." with the Bible teaching that the fear of the Lord is the beginning of wisdom.  Yet Carl Jung wrote: "It is quite right, therefore, that the fear of God should be considered the beginning of all wisdom... Both are justified, the fear of God as well as the love of God" (Completed Works Volume 11, p419).(2) Jung and atheismPoint 2 of the appendix says "Most founding fathers were atheists or humanists... including.. Jung"  In fact, Carl Jung famously asserted his absolute knowledge of God's existence in a BBC documentary made shortly before he died.  The atheist Richard Dawkins described Jung as believing in a "100% probability of God" (The God Delusion, p50).(3) Body, Mind, Soul, Personality... and SpiritPoint 3 of the Appendix declares that psychology does not acknowledge the spirit in man.  Yet Carl Jung's writings are packed with discussion of the spirit.  Just in case you think that by 'spirit' he really meant 'mind', Jung wrote: "Spirit, like God... cannot be proved to exist in the external world and cannot be understood rationally" (CW 8, p 329).  This clearly distinguishes spirit from mind/body/personality, all of which can be studied scientifically/rationally.(4) Eternal HopePoint 4 of the appendix contrasts psychology, as offering no hope for eternity, with the Bible that teaches us about our eternal destiny.  But Jung's view was that "eternity..[is] the prerogative of the One God". (CW11, p493).(5) The Holy SpiritPoint 5 of the appendix declares "Psychology doesn't even believe in the Holy Spirit".  In contrast, Jung wrote: "the Paraclete [ie: Holy Spirit] is of the greatest significance" (CW11, p433), and "Since the Holy Ghost is the Third Person of the Trinity and God is present entire in each of the three Persons at any time, the indwelling of the Holy Ghost means nothing less than an approximation of the believer to the status of God's son." (CW11, p413).The author goes on to make 35 points of comparison between Psychology and Scripture, and in regards Jungian Psychology I take issue with most of them.  Please don't misunderstand me: I'm not saying that Jung's views should be taken uncritically by any means, he says many things that are highly controversial.  But this book is based on straw man arguments.The spirit in which it is written---------------------------------I felt very uncomfortable with the tone taken in the book towards Rick Warren.  His name is used several times on most pages, when making points of criticism, giving it the feel of a sustained, personal attack.  He is often placed in double-binds (eg: he is criticised for saying that Willow Creek back his programmes, because it is not the Lord's backing!).Rick Warren is also labelled early on in the book as a 'heretic', which is a very serious charge.  But he is then criticised for statements such as "meditation is focused thinking" and  "your personal testimony is more effective than a sermon" and "faithfulness has always been a rare quality".Are these really matters of fundamental heresy to which 1 Timothy 4 might be relevant?  They seem to me to be merely disputable matters that fall into the province of Romans 14.Conclusion----------The Purpose-Driven approach has pervaded the church so much that I think there is a need for a book like this to question and challenge what is happening.  Unfortunately, whilst this book may contain fine-sounding argument, it does not contain sound argument, because of the many elementary factual mistakes.
Communist Fish. Rainbow fish has colorful shiny scales.  He is shamed into giving them to everyone.  Sounds like a communist primer
One of the most deceptive books ever written. There is no measure how harmful and disastrous this "sermon" has been to all who have read or heard it.  The teaching of hell or everlasting damnation (eternal torment) is a pagan teaching that has been graphed into the teachings of Christianity over 1800 years ago.  The first century church never believed in a "hell".  The theory of hell was brought in by converts to Christianity from  pagan religions of the world.  "Hell" was embraced by the political/religious leaders of the church because they saw the controlling and "converting" effect of the pagan doctrine and thus it was adopted as "orthodox" centuries after the resurrection of Christ.  Our English translations have all been used to continue this pagan teaching as fact, when it is actually fiction.  Mostly all English versions except the Concordant Literal New Testament and Young's Literal propagate this fallacy.Do your homework.  Go to www dot what-the-hell-is-hell dot com and www dot bible-truths dot com and read up.  If you scoff then here is your challenge.  Do the research from a non-traditional, non-pagan perspective and you might find incredible things to praise God about.Other HIGHLY recommended books are "The Inescapable Love of God" by Thomas Talbott (ISBN: 1581128312, not on Amazon, you must google it), "The Origin and History of the Doctrine of Endless Punishment" by Thomas Thayer, "The Bible Hell" by Dr. John Wesley Hanson.  Go to the sites given above and finally get a better view of what "hell" is and where it came from.  You will find answers to the many questions that arise from searching this out.All those who scoff and stop up your ears and move on, to you I say that the real hell is the one that your doctrine creates in the minds and hearts of all who have been indoctrinated by it and your view of God that it creates.  THAT is hell indeed, and THAT is the ONLY hell that exists
Forgettable Italo chiller. International noir hits rock-bottom with one of the latest outing of this midlist Italian author. A wannabe psychothriller, Almost Blue could only satisfy the staunchest defenders of old whodunits, what with its trite plot and its absolute contempt for logic. And, the less said about the writing style, the better. Is this all Italy got to offer? We shudder at the mere thought..
Man, what tough going !. What a slog it is trying to get through this book. I'm nearly there (I've read 3 or 4 other books since starting this)... the reason for my stubbornness in finishing it is that it came so highly recommended by friends, and the mostly rave reviews it's got here. Ignatius Reilly, the main character is interesting enough (that's why I gave it 2 instead of 1 star) but that has a lot to do with the fact that the rest of the cast and plot is so boring, I find myself flicking on the pages to see how far I have to go before the story gets back to Ignatius again. I keep thinking "OK, the side splitting stuff must be coming up soon"...there are humourous passages here and there but nothing to merit the accolades it has received here nor winning the Pulitzer Prize. I'm at a loss to explain its popularity
Counting the trees and missing the forest. I had been looking forward to reading this book because of research I'm doing on a related topic.  I'm not a Catholic and certainly not a nun but I am definitely a Christian and interested in how the Good News intertwines with American history.I was so disappointed in Ms. Carey's approach that I felt downright cheated as a reader. As another reviewer notes, Ms. Carey looses her journalist perspective in this book...if there ever was any, I would add. Certainly by page 15, last sentence of the second paragraph, it is gone entirely.  Too bad, because she has done respectable research.  I wondered who was paying for the book since the slantedness is so pronounced. The tragedy for the reader is that the more complete, compelling and difficult truths are washed out in easy-to-swallow platitudes.The section on the Sister Survey has tremendous 'meat' in it, and Carey should be commended for bringing data forward.  She fails, however, to put a context on the data beyond "he said/she said" and leaves the reader to pick up on all the well-placed inferences from previous chapters. In short, there is no in-depth thinking and, as another reviewer points out, she reveals clear personal contempt for the 'change-sisters' as a basis for those conclusions she does draw.For me, the most significant shortcoming of the work is the lack of adequate consideration to what was happening TO the sisters, to the church as a whole in the U.S. (its overall relationship to European mothershouses and even to Rome) and to the communities that the sisters had been serving. Significant poltical, economic and social upheavals in the post WWII America cannot simply be wisked away as 'new age' stuff.  It is inconceivable that these upheavals failed to act upon the individual and the community characteristics of religious women any less than they left their mark on Americans as a whole...where/how we lived, our values, our music, our hopes or lack thereof.  The notion that the decline of religious sisters' groups is due to internal struggles between persuasive 'change sisters' and apparently passive 'traditional sisters', albeit sparked by Vatican II, is so naive as to be stunning. Yet, that is the message that Ms. Carey brings home more than once.Even viewed with the narrow inward-looking perspective that dominates the book, no serious consideration was given to the problem of how women religious communities were faring economically, what had caused their economic crises and the impact that community economics had on the outlook of the sisters. Blaming the dilemmas on changing from traditional habit to secular clothes is not a sufficiently comprehensive answer for me.One psychologist (not a reveiwer) has suggested that one of the possible reasons why social justice was of such interest to many of the 'new' sisters is because their own situation was so unjust.  Delve into the on/again-off/again -- mostly WAY off -- support provided to women religious vs priests in some diocesan areas and one wonders how justice was served at all. Clearly that's a whole book unto itself.Finally, Ms. Carey's work seems to belie a preference for Euro-dominated orders as the ideal - although never stated like that. If that is correct, then it helps make some sense of why 'change sisters' are so abhorent in her view. Sort of like some British still preferring to think of us as 'the colonies.'Not coming from that tradition, I'd have to say that I don't share her notion. I feel that Ms. Carey put together a goodly amount of data and then proceded to count the trees instead of seeing the forest or well beyond.
The blind will lead the blind and both will fall into the ditch. He bowed at a shinto shrine.He attends the Pagan rite at Bohemian Grove for the Cremation of Care.He belongs to the Order of Death also known as Skull and Bones.His wife says he milks male horses and that she enjoys male dancers.Only the blind could think this is a description of a Bible believer
Christian Marxist. I was excited to read this book as it is on the reading list for a theology course at Wheaton College.  It didn't take me long to figure out Walsh and Keesmaat are theologians who like to write from a "new perspective" that is really the same old political liberalism of the left. They just don't get it.  After reading their views on 9/11, the US Military, their praise of food coops, and their negative comments about coroporate America I am surprised they do not teach at Berkeley on the left coast.  The Gospel really is simple; they make it synonymous with the liberal agenda
This book is pure baloney and propaganda. Global warming is not controversial among scientists.  For many years, there has been almost universal agreement among climate scientists that global warming is happening, and that human pollution is largely responsible.So why is this still controversial?  Largely because a handful of skeptics, like Michaels, have thrown up a dust cloud of confusion around the issue through popular books, newspaper opinion pieces, television and radio appearances, and other tactics.  They have skillfully exploited the media's desire for "balance" in their reporting, when in fact, they are in an extreme, scientifically isolated minority.  Many politicians have been swept up in their deceptions.Michaels gets huge amounts of money from the coal and oil industries, which stand to lose if we start getting serious about addressing climate change.  Doesn't that say it all about this man's credibility
actors not authors. I usually am entertained by the aforementioned actors, but authors, they are not.  I had less of a problem with Garofalo's banter, but Stiller, made no mistake about mentioning over and over that he was writing the book for the advance and the revenue that it would supply.  Stiller's voice can virtually be heard through his writing which was just innane banter thrown down on a page and attached to his name with the hope that it would draw readers.  This book is not worth the time or the money that in essence is exactly what the authors were after.  Their apparent motives are insulting to their fans and readers
same old same old. This book has the same old information you have already heard.  I really did not like this book.  It had several items that are false in it, like gorillas eat meat, which they do not.  It has lots of negative information on various foods but offers no suggestions on where to buy an alternative product.  I just do not see the point of adding this book to your library or collection.  No new information whatsoever
Sappho Would've Leapt After Reading This. That's what this book should have been titled. Erica Jong is, indeed, an incredible writer, but not here. Not even close. Her willingness to have two female characters candidly discuss the merits of dildos does not automatically qualify her as a feminist writer. I seriously doubt that Sappho, wherever she may now be, finds it entertaining or edifying to know that Erica Jong thought so little of her as to portray her as a dildo fan. If "Sex and the City" were still spewing out new episodes, perhaps Ms. Jong would have eventually suggested an episode featuring Sappho as a dildo salesperson and Carrie Bradshaw as her devoted dildo-loving customer.Feminism is not about having to use "scary" words like dildo and (...)to prove how much of a woman you are. It's about knowing that you are enough of a woman to not have to prove your feminism to anyone...ever
mostly sloppy and uniformed with a few good bits. Ambrose writes in a mostly accessible style which is not a bad thing, but this book is a mish mash of different magazine pieces that have virtually nothing in common and are quite uneven in quality.  Further, some of his work is just pure opinion based on almost no real scholarship, (his arguments about the bombing of japan or the cold war come to mind).  For armchair historians who think they "know" alot about history, Ambrose is the man, unfortunately his unfaultering US boosterism which results in obvious, moth-worn and erroneous conclusions will not really appeal to anyone else
Why Do Cultural Ctitics Have To Write Like This?. OK--I know that Nina Auerbach is a famous, groundbreaking feminist literary critic.  I don't disagree with many of her points in this book. (Though I'm innately suspicious of any system that fits as perfectly as hers does.  She never seems to find an example that doesn't fit her thesis--rather like an undergraduate writing a paper and discarding any evidence that doesn't fit.)  And I am interested in cultual criticism--particularly the idea that horror fiction reflects the fears, desires, and fixations of particular time periods.  This said, I found Auerbach's book tough slogging.  Why do cultural critics seem to feel that the "lower" the text they're criticizing, the more jargon-filled, pedantic, and convulted their prose style must become?  The endlessly long sentences with their multpile references and their twisting, parenthetical asides made my eyes glaze over.  Certainly Auerbach is not the worst prose stylist of any academic I've read, but this fact, itself, is an indictment of the kind of writing that gets university professors published these days.So, yes, there are insights and arguments in this book that make it worth reading.  But I found the experience of reading the book a rather depressing enterprise, and it made me long for clearer, livlier, and more accessible writing from theorists and literary critics.  I can't say that I'm optimistic on this count
nothin much here. This is like the other cambridge companions: it is not a reference work, is not thorough, is not authoritative nor objective. This is a collection of essays tending toward the highly speculative, each around 50 pages in length. They range from the silly to the ok, and none are very impressive. The cambridge companion series is misleadingly titled. They cater to narrow interests, not to the general public. Students who need a basic understanding of Nietzsche before they start delving into special topics will find almost no assistance here. Most of the material is of the professorial, specialized, not-generally-interesting variety
Everyone Loves Una; Or, The Navel-Gazer: A Mary Sue. I truly wanted to like this book.  After years of avoidance I had just finished Moby Dick and found it not only more readable than I'd feared but downright enjoyable.  In addition I'd heard nothing but good things about this novel whose premise certainly intrigued me, and like its predecessor it has one of the truly great opening lines in literature:  "Captain Ahab was neither my first husband nor my last."  Alas, it was all down hill from there; overall this is one of the worst books I've ever forced myself to finish.This came as quite a surprise because the author is no untalented hack.  Author of two other published novels and a short story collection, director of a university level creative writing program, long-term teacher of writing, and holder of a Ph.D. in same, all to considerable critical acclaim, she should be correcting and grading (failing) garbage like this not producing it.  So what went wrong?  How did this novel end up so awful?  The answer is brick by brick and piece by piece.  There is no one great thing wrong with it but rather a lot of little things.LENGTH: If "brevity is the soul of wit", this novel's witlessness is easily explained.  At 666 pages (interesting number that) this novel is about three times as long as it should have been.  It would seem that, to some extent like Melville before her, Naslund confused Length with Importance, but Melville was a lot more skilled at padding than she is.  IMHO this desire to fill too many pages made many of the other problems worse by allowing Naslund both to go into unnecessary detail about things no one else cares about and to repeat herself to the point of self-parody.  Somewhere under the barnacle encrustations may be the finely lined hull of a short novel, but this was a manuscript desperately in need of editing... with a meat axe or a chainsaw.THE NAME DROPPING: One of the pleasures of any historical novel is the encounters between fictional characters and historical figures, but if badly handled these encounters can un-suspend disbelief and downright offend.  They are badly handled here.  An almost uneducated hick from the backwoods of Kentucky encounters by chance a significant number of the thoughtful elites of mid-nineteenth century New England and those she doesn't utterly charm with her brilliance and erudition she gets the better of as in her unintentionally hilarious encounter with Naslund's peculiar imagining of Nathaniel Hawthorne.  One or two of these, developed at greater length could have added to the verisimilitude.  As it is, it is a Zelig or a Forrest Gump without the humor (or the self-awareness).THE POLITICS: Even the most conservative readers would probably find the popular views of a majority of mid-nineteenth century New Englanders a bit disconcerting if espoused straight in a modern novel, so a certain amount of modernizing would be appropriate just to reduce the cringing.  However, Naslund takes this to the opposite extreme by having Una espouse the Politically Correct view on every single controversy of the day (and some that only exist in our significantly sillier day) from slavery to whaling, from feminism to free love, from homosexuality to sensitivity towards the differently abled, all without consequence or even criticism.  This latter is the most offputting because to have actually championed such views back then would have taken considerable courage whatever one thinks of the ideas themselves.  Una espouses them with all the negative consequences that Naslund receives for espousing them today, which is to say: none.THE ANTI-CHRISTIAN BIGOTRY: There is nothing so very wrong with characters in a mid-nineteenth century novel exhibiting agnosticism or atheism as both views were gaining more and more credence at the time, but it is downright silly to suggest that such views would have been widely accepted.  It is even sillier to portray Christianity as something confined exclusively to the foolish, the bigoted, the future apostate, or the mentally ill.  It tells us more about the author than anything else that Una is openminded towards every religious and quasi-religious idea of the time EXCEPT Christianity.THE FARFETCHED SCENARIOS: I sensed the novel was in trouble during the opening scene in which Una loses both her mother and her baby but manages to withstand this blow by making friends with a runaway slave with whom she has a quasi-lesbian encounter....  After this the novel goes into flashback and becomes unrealistic.  After her crazy Christian father threatens to kill her (a sentiment the reader will come to know and understand), Una is raised in a lighthouse by her ludicrously liberal-minded aunt and uncle, encounters two young men who both fall in love with her, disguises herself as a cabin boy and sails on the same whaler with them, successfully avoids detection, is sunk by a whale, survives by committing cannibalism, marries the surviving young man after he goes insane, and is abandoned by him after he goes to live with the Indians, leaving her free to "marry" Captain Ahab (Una never really "marries" anybody but of course nobody ever criticizes).  Things don't get more realistic in the second half, which includes Una's clever and successful investment in the crazy newfangled idea of obtaining oil from the ground instead of from a whale.  Riiiight.THE MARY SUE: However, the absolute worst thing about this novel is the fact that it is a "Mary Sue" that peculiarity of fan fiction in which a laughably idealized and practically perfect in every way alter ego of the author fulfills some basic psychological need while inducing a combination of anger and nausea in the reader.  A more realistic main character might have saved it.  Una never learns anything from her life's too-many-to-be-believed experiences because she already knows everything.  She doesn't change because she is already perfect.  She doesn't have to deal with the criticism of others because she doesn't receive any, and she doesn't have to beg the forgiveness of those she has wronged because they forgive her so easily and besides, Una had her reasons (and they were very good ones you can be sure).The only thing I can figure is that her publisher approved this book on concept alone WITHOUT anyone ever reading it.  I feel like I've just waded through the inept scribbling of a delusional teenage girl who insists on rereading Moby Dick in her bedroom... with the door locked.
Wasted Space. I was very disappointed with the content and layout of this book.  The amount of wasted pages for 'workspace' is excessive, but considering the lack of true content, I assume they needed to fill pages with something.
Weak, Lacking Depth and Dated material. I've read many books in this segment and I would strongly recommend reading Hot Text: Web Writing that Works or Networds. Robert Bly is a &quot;print guy&quot; that thought it would be interesting to write a book on electronic copy.  I would say that the first half of the book is written by supposed experts in on-line marketing.  The book is crowded with all sorts of references to other people's work. This leads to a very choppy style of reading in my opinion.  The author uses case studies from work that he has already completed but rarely does the content match the electronic world.  For a book that is written in 2003, the data is incredibly dated. The author is comfortable with using data from 1996 in a book that talks about the ever changing environment of On-Line marketing.  Most of the data regarding internet statistics was incredibly dated. The author talks  about the principals of good copy writing but rarely goes into any depth with regards to examples of the principals.  I found the writing to be lazy to say the least.  Clearly this author is capitalizing on the interest of electronic copy.  Take out the experts that know about on-line marketing, you're left with an incredibly weak book.  Although there are is a lot of expert reference, rarely do the experts go into any depth with regards to their arguments or points.  If  this book is the only book that you are exposed to within this segment; you might be left thinking that you read an average book. When you compare the book to other books in the same segment, it simply doesn't compare.  Not a good book
Another unfortunate representation. As much as America needs a real understanding of the Indochina conflict, this work falls drastically short.  The sources sighted are the typical biased rationalizations void of depth and understanding.  Anyone with an elementary wish to finding truth in mid to late twentieth century Indochina has merely to check whether actual primary participants were used in the construction of this work.  Clearly, they were not.  As an examination of American political decision making it may have certain merit.  It is however impossible to gain a full understanding of the decisions without knowledge of the depth of the situations.  This book does not do that.  Clips taken out of context from the FRUS (Foreign Relations of the United States) compilations are not a substitute for scholarly research.  This work is long on pages, but short on understanding
Very pretty book, some ideas but not that good. &quot;The Home Organizing Workbook&quot; by Meryl Starr is the type of book that is design to catch the reader attention of the shelve. But, once the reader takes a close look at it. The reader begins to realize that while it has some useful information there are better organizing books on the market. If you are interesting reading it, just check it out, and save your money
Annoyed. I wanted to read this book because of the impact of 'Midnight Express&quot; and was curious as to why he then had such a sparse career. Now I know. His tragically short life is sad, as it is for anyone...but I  couldn't get past being annoyed by how careless he was with the people in  his life and careless about his career.  He was good, then he seemed to  blow it with bad behavior. I know there are reasons for it, but I could  only feel sorry to a point. A lot of my annoyance was the &quot;name  dropping&quot;..Susan's reference to would-be stars &quot;then&quot; and  informing us as to who they have become... as if we the public would not  know.  I have the feeling she wanted some vindication for what she went  through, some acknowledgement for her perseverence...and some legacy of  value for her husband. Who can blame her. So many people have died of AIDS,  so many horrific stories of ordinary people who never had a voice. I guess  I get annoyed that people look to Hollywood for their heroes
wrong item sent. I received a book that I didn't even order.  The one I ordered is yellow and white ( 3th edition).  THis isn't the one I ordered; therefore, I need a refund.I sent the book back and I know the seller received it on 8/19
Everything Is A Conspiracy These Days. I bristle at the suggestion that perhaps Roosevelt knew of the attack but did nothing to stop it, as if a repulsed sneak attack would not have convinced America to go to war.  The conspiracy theory holds that Roosevelt had the carriers shipped out of Pearl, leaving the obsolete battleships to be destroyed in the attack.  The one glaring problem with this theory (actually there are several problems, but I consider this the most compelling) can be summarized in a single word: oil.  A HUGE amount of oil was stored at Pearl, such a huge amount in fact that the carriers and subs would have been out of action probably for an entire year, if the oil had been destroyed.  The value of that oil was tremendous, and Roosevelt would have been absolutely demented to risk it.  It was pure luck that the Japanese did not target it (they actually planned to hit it on the aborted third run).  Additionally, Roosevelt was a former Navy Secretary who referred to the Army as &quot;them&quot; and the Navy as &quot;us&quot;.  It is way beyond belief that he would have sacrificed the battleships and their crews, much less the oil.  It's always sooooo simple to monday morning quarterback, a lesson to keep in mind today regarding Iraqi WMD
Utopic.  Islamic Insurrection is not imploding. The author develops an original argument that the Islamic insurrection is imploding on its own.  In other words,  Osama bin Laden's Jihad is viewed as intolerable terror against innocent civilians by a majority of Muslims.  Over time, the Muslim peace lovers will progressively dwarf the ranks of the Jihadists.In the author's mind, this is especially true if the U.S. gets out of the way and stop waging an ill fated War on Terror that keeps throwing oil on the fire of the Jihad movement.  He makes a case that the U.S. ongoing backing of Israel and its invasion of Iraq have strongly boosted Al Qaeda's ranks.The author belongs to the camp that believe that the Islamic insurrection is almost solely a counter reaction to U.S. foreign policy.  It certainly is a factor, but how can it be the main driver?  9/11 was totally unsolicited.  Also, prior act of terrorism were more often than not caused by the U.S. government becoming friendlier towards various Middle Eastern ones rather than the opposite.  Thus, whether the U.S. supports or attacks a Middle Eastern state, it appears as justification for act of Islamic terrorism.  What kind of rational is that.The Pew Global Attitudes surveys and current events don't support any of the author's original arguments.  Osama bin Laden's aura is ever increasing.  Islam is becoming increasingly fundamentalist and violent throughout the Middle East and Africa.  Wherever it overlaps with Christian population bloodshed results more often than not executed by the Muslims and suffered by the Christians such as in Somalia, Rwanda, and Sudan.So, the main thesis of letting Islam extremism implode on its own just does not hold well to any reality check.  Right now it is picking up steam big time.Instead, I recommend a far more prescient book on the subject: Samuel Huntington's "The Clash of Civilizations."  He has a far better understanding of Islam's extremism from a geopolitical and demographic standpoints.
Pretentious text, weird typography. If you want to read a "presuppositionalist" defense of militantly unregenerate Calvinism, I'd suggest EVERY THOUGHT CAPTIVE by Richard Pratt instead. It's much clearer, it's written in far better English, it's unpretentious, and it will take up a lot less of your time.The text of this book looks as though it was photographed from a cut-and-paste of miscellaneous typescripts of different text sizes. The typographical variations appear to have no function. Just another irritation in a pretentious and windy book
Disappointing...very. I have loved this series from the beginning - great characters, fun stories, thrills and romance.  Very light, quick reads that are great entertainment.  This story was awful.  There were two mysteries.  One was wrapped up so quickly it was very unrewarding, and the other was so convoluted I didn't even get it.A comment was made that one person, when convicted, wouldn't be around to hurt anyone any more. But this person wasn't even the perp for the big mystery.  And the epilogue? WHO was that person?  And how did they figure it out?  Too many holes for an otherwise easy read.Finally, the characterization was off.  The normal comraderie between the girls was missing.  I felt no love from the original three for Yuki, in spite of her storyline.  If there's a sixth story, I hope it brings back some of the magic from the earlier books.  I'm giving this book two stars only because these characters are like old friends.  If I had just picked up the series with this book, it would be a one.  Sorry James
Just Not Up To Ms. Hooper's Normal Standards!!!. I've been like many reviewers a long time fan of this author and have found this latest "Evil" novel to be less then inspiring, or fun to read.It does read like a textbook as far as the topic of psychic issues.  Our teaching was couched in conversation normally between Rafe and Isabel. We would hit these class lectures normally right in the middle of the murder/mystery portion of the book, and I would just be getting into the meat of the story, and then I would be derailed by "too much information."  This is not to say that I don't care for instuction and added background.  I do, but there is a time when it is just too much.  We unfortunatly hit this wall of information throughout the story.This was just an okay read.  There was plenty of suspense (who was doing all of the killing and why) but I just felt that the fleshing out of the storyline, as well as character development was not truly priorty while writing the novel.  The relationship between Rafe and Isabel was rather confusing.  She spent most of her time lecturing him on paranormal issues, and less time letting her hair down and being relaxed while she was with him socially.To be honest I did skim a few pages, but still, I was okay as far as not missing anything important.  This was not her strongest effort and if you are picking Ms. Hooper up for the first time I highly recommend her other earlier reads or even the other two "Evil" reads.  An author can't be on "top" all of the time and we should just remember that she is capable of doing so much better.  I'm really looking forward to her latest series she has started that will still feature Bishop and his team, and hope that she is back on track as the author we love.Official reviewer www.romancedesigns.co
Mark of the Beast is MONEY. "No one buys or sells without the MONEY of the beast on/in mind or hand" -- Apocalypse. The correct, in context translation of the classical Greek word mistranslated as "mark" is karagma, which means MONEY.You won't discover the truth about this in Strong's concordance because Strong's Greek-English Lexicon is an abridged version of Liddel-Scott's Greek-English Lexicon.Same with the word Mammon, which also means money in the Aramaic language, which Jesus spoke. They did not even bother to translate the word because the Pharisees love money. See the whole context of: "You can't serve God & MONEY, you'll either love the one and hate the other . . . but the Pharisees, who loved money heard all this and scoffed.The so-called christians today do not follow the Logos-Logic of God (John 1:1) but the trite, anti-Christ/anti-Logos-Logic of "Saint" Paul, who was BLINDED by the light.Confessing with your mouth that Jesus rose from the dead will NOT save you. Only logos-logic will.The Truth will rise again. Nearly every great philosopher, leader, or revolutionary has realized that the mark of the beast is MONEY, i.e., that MONEY is an unnecessary-evil stumblingblock for the blind.For more information see www.666isMONEY.co
revenge of the whale not a good book you better not read it. i read this book the reveng of the whale.it is about a huge sperm whale that attacks a ship that is trying to capturen it.they are trying to kill it beacuse of the sperm oil it has.they bring it back to land and sell it.i didnt like the book becase it didnt really have a main charecter.all it talked about is what the ship did and how they capiutur the whales.i also didnt like it because i thought it was going to have more action in it.most of the time ther just sailing and not really doing anything really exiting.it also dont really have a story line all it talkes about is what the ship is doing.it has no charecter conflicts.i was expecting more fights seenes with the whale and i would have hopped the would have discribed the whale better and how it attacked the ship more.some of the things i did like about it was it had one vwery god part in it.when the capterd one of the whales.it told how the got it and what they had to do to get it.i also like the pictures in the book it showed what the whales looked like and all the tools they had.i really didnt like this book but if you read it mabey you will u might be suprised
Funny, but under this guise should provide actual guidance. A good helping of humor is good for potential grooms, but most of us need more substantial info along with it.  This book does provide a few good laughs (like the description of a diamond as an &quot;overdigested lump of  coal -- the kidney stone of earth's urinary tract),&quot;  but if you are  looking for actual guidance - which you most likely will need - look  elsewhere in the handful of books for grooms
written on childish intellectual level, yet not even good as that. I read about half the book before calling it quits for good.  I love the real Issaac Asimov stories, but this is not even a respectable imitator (if there are any at all).First, we are expected to buy the idea of time travel into the past--a logical impossibility that has occasionally been gotten away with when there was great action or character development to compensate.  Halfway through, I realized that this book would have neither of these.  Instead, two of the main characters, an outdoorsman and paleantologist inexplicably bicker with each other about nothing at all, from the moment they meet.Wu's hidden agenda seems to be to advocate environmentalism, a religion the daily tabloids and ivory tower politician/pseudo-scientists are doing enough to disseminate on their own.This is not even good for children, as it is poorly written, is philosophically flawed, and is uselessly descriptive (e.g., the main female character is described as 'pretty'...so what?).Fortunately, I've yet to read over half of the REAL Asimov stories, so I have something to look forward to.
Simplistic advice. The advice given in this book is really so banal that I suppose anyone could have written the book. I really don't understand why there has been so much attention given to the concept of emotional intelligence.  Seems to me that normal folks are, according to the description of the authors, emotionally intelligent.  No need to write books about something that's so  obvious. Is it maybe written for those you lack the real intelligence
Not impressed. The authors seemed to spend more time asking you if you really, really, really want to get a poodle, considering all the work and money they take, than on giving valuable information.  Not very helpful to those of us who already have a poodle and want to learn more about our dog/puppy, and caring for them.  It does have chapters on care and grooming, etc, but for the first several chapters it seemed to be cautioning people away from getting a poodle, at least that was the impression I had
Really bad ending. I liked this book up until the ending.  I expected the judges to be released and taken care of one by one which would have been predictable (it's what I thought was going to happen), but at least satisfying and believable considering the power Grisham gave the CIA throughout this entire book.  Instead, the ending was quite disappointing and pretty much ruined the book for me
Not for neophytes. Beware, if you are not familiar with the tools and commands of this program, this book is not for you. The author, particularly in the early portions of the book, skips steps and gives incorrect information.For example, in the directions for creating a "honeycomb graphic," the author says to create a "five-sided polygon" (p. 32). Without seeing that Figure 2.21 shows a six-sided polygon, a new person will create this polygon according to directions and be totally frustrated with the fact that the sides are slanted and in no way will create the object needed for this exercise. After creating the correct polygon, the author says to connect the 26 corner points. However, without being able to see the majority of these corner points due to lack of directions (a person familiar with the program would probably know the right steps to take here), there is no way to complete this exercise.This is just one example; there are many such problems in this book. Not only are there missing steps in exercises, there are missing words in sentences which makes it hard to follow.I would not recommend this book for someone just starting out in Flash MX 2004. On the other hand, if you are familiar with the program or a mind reader, you can overlook some of these problems. The whining about what was wrong with the program didn't help either
I just don't understand. Why are there so many insanely positive reviews for this book?  Honestly, what has this author contributed to the world with this book?  Was it the characters?  No, they've all been used and reused and used some more in practically every other work of fiction in the last fifty years (i.e. cocky and handsome FBI agent, beautiful but dangerous killer with a past, take-no-sh#t FBI boss, etc.).  Was it the deep insight into the characters themselves?  A laugh out loud, "No!".  There was nothing coming close to character development.  Was there some new and clever writing style?  Unless you count having two page chapters revolutionary (I call it a way to have a two hundred page novella turned into a four hundred page novel).  How about the plot?  Was that something worth my time?  Not unless you haven't ever watched suspence movie in your life.So honestly, what the hell makes this book worth anyone's time?  All I can find in this book are two dimensional characters, needless sub-plots, ludicris dialogue, and empty promises (we're lied to about the main character's fate in the beginning and we're lied to about this being a thriller in the vein of Hitchcock).As a person who has turned to the world of novels to escape Hollywood's onslaught of needless, pointless, and time wasting strategy of churning out movie after movie of pure garbage I can trully say that this is the type of book that will doom us all into a market of hurried and horribly bad novels to take our hard earned money.This man does not deserve our money and certainly does not deserve to write anything other than an apology letter to the world for dumbing us down into thinking that this type of writing is anything other than trash
Would not recommend this book to anyone. I was really surprised at how bad this book was.  It was terribly written and cheesy.  Both of the main characters are completely unbelievable - the author describes Joshua Seigl as though he were an 80 year old man - he is supposed to be in his late 30's.  He wears tweed caps, and calls people "darling"??  Even for a "literary" type, completely off the mark.  His whole persona was like something out of the depression.  As for the Tattooed Girl, this character was also annoyingly unbelievable.  No one under the age of 70 uses the word "Jewess" - EVER.  This book reminded me of a book that an adult wrote for children, completely failing to grasp a certain time and place.CHEESY and overwritten.  But, naturally, I had to finish it, and I was glad when I did.
dont buy it. there is no information giving. it took me 2 hours to finish whole book, which is less than 50 pgs.dont buy it
Series hits a brick wall. This is the third installment in the Mitch Rapp series and the author's fourth book overall. (I'd suggest reading the previous books both for chronology reasons and that they're better reads.) Mitch is America's #1 "go to" guy when it comes to fighting terrorism. In "Separation of Power" he is faced with cleaning up some open issues from his last mission (someone tried to kill him), the political "in-fighting" surrounding the naming of a new CIA chief, rogue Mossad agents, Iraq gaining nuclear weapons and falling in love. One could be forgiven in thinking this last issue would make for a pleasant diversion while our hero prevents WW III. Not so. Mitch's romance takes a front and center position and in a word is well ... comedic. The "action" threads of the plot - which this author has worked so well in his previous books - is hinted at in the first 100 pages, doesn't really begin until after 200 pages - and then proceeds in fits and starts. There is an inordinate amount of "character development" - self-serving, amoral, scheming politicans & our world weary, battle scarred reluctant hero Mitch, who must once again pick up the sword to do what no other man can do - which like the "romance" impedes the plot. The book hastily concludes, (20+ pages), in an unsatisfying and simplistic finale. Hopefully this book is an anomaly in the series because the author's previous books were great roller coaster rides and provided entertaining reading at the beach and in airports. Unfortunately the much rushed conclusion and Mitch's "new" situation doesn't guarantee that.
Am I the only one...?. I read this book many years ago, and thought it was terrible.  Looking through the reviews just now, I couldn't believe how overwhelmingly positive they were, and just had to put in a word for those of us (and I assume/hope there are others) who didn't like the book.The book is ludicrously long, and meanders through way too many red herrings, dead ends, and nonsequitirs.  There are any number of sub-plots that appear out of nowhwere, go nowhere, never pay off, and leave you wondering why you had to take the time to read through them at all.The sub-plots, though, are nothing like as much of a problem as the main plot itself.  It's a very uninspiring story about a business deal.  Will person A get the contract, or will person B?  A business deal?  Who cares?SPOILER ALERT:And then, after sitting through thousands of pages boringly building up to the big deal, at the end one of the characters randomly dies, and the whole thing just peters out.  No climax, no drama, nothing.I also respectfully disagree with the reviewers who praised the characters.  I found that Clavell has a bad habit of making his characters too perfect, carried out too far in this book.  All of the major characters are the greatest golfer and an olympic diver and the greatest gourmet and a brilliant business person and so on and so on.  These are not real people, they're supermen who I couldn't relate to at all.It's boring, it's long, it's badly written.  I was particularly disappointed because I loved Shogun and liked Tai-pan and King Rat.  But after this one, I've never read another Clavell book, and I don't think I will
Interesting subject - poorly written. Although it was a chore to overlook the poor writing - the stories were interesting.  However, because the writing was so poor, especially from someone so well educated, I can't help but doubt the author's credibility
Rubbish. A conservative, but well-meaning friend of mine lent me this book. Upon first read I was astounded continuously by the utter tripe that dribbles from one page to the next in a viscous stream of fetid crap.This is taken from the website dedicated to this book, "Greatness.com".I have believed, and taught, that only two nations ever were ordained of God for Greatness! Israel and America! This is a must read for everyone, but especially for clergy and others in key leadership. We must be moved to action and the saving of the freedoms of our great Nation.The road to saving freedoms lies in cutting taxes for the rich?The road to saving personal freedom lies in developer more and more sophisticated nukes?How about the Russia and China "Military build up" chapters?Does this mental midget not understand the utter incapacity of either of those nations to even pose a threat to us? ( thanks to the gillions we invest in defense )This is just utter and complete crap. This entire book from front to back is an affront to Christianity, the supposed centerpiece of its ideology. I'm not surprised America elected George Bush with Budwesier-swigging armchair generals like this man actually receiving acolades for such trash
American Mania: When less would have been better. Peter Whybrow's finest moments are to be found at the beginning and at the end of this book, in which he provides an eloquent, impassioned and highly quotable critique of contemporary American society.  Ideally, these two sections should be treated as independent essays, because they really don't deserve to go down with the rest of the ship - which, in this case, is a very long exposition of an error-ridden, poorly (though lengthily)defended, and, well, just plain wrong, hypothesis. The short version of Whybrow's thesis is that Americans are "manic" because America was populated by migrants who were curiousity-driven risk-takers, and that, somehow, this resulted in changes in neurobiology which in turn perpetuate (and perhaps create - this was vague) the inability to be satified with "enough."  One might expect this kind of individualistic theory from a psychiatrist, which is a profession that frequently misses the larger picture.  What one doesn't expect is the degree to which Whybrow explores the migrant "mind-set" without offering a shred of evidence for its existence.  (No "evidence" can be offered.  Most of these early migrants are quite thoroughly dead.) Notwithstanding the fact that a significant proportion of migrants came to America against their will (Africans, Chinese, and most women to name a few) there simply is no means to evaluate whether any migrant group anywhere experiences a shift in the activity of neurochemicals.  To claim otherwise is sheer nonsense.Whybrow makes a fine attempt at appearing to offer support for his claims by quoting from venerable old dinosaurs. Although Whybrow quotes at considerable length from Adam Smith, giving the reader the false impression that Whybrow understands economics, he does not analyze America's manic spending with depth. Instead, he offers a series of broad, well-known statistics about wealth distribution, economic trends, etc, which tell us very little about the actual psychology involved in our supposed spending frenzy.All this could be forgiven had there been an adequate amount of thought put into the central tenets which form the bulk the book.  But here again, Whybrow falls short.  He tends to rely on popular prejudices more than actual research.  His blythe claim that the fall of Soviet Russia signaled the triumph of laissez faire capitalism over communism stands as one of the more ridiculous statements in the book.  (Not withstanding the very obvious communist elephant in the room - China - no reputable economist on the past 200 years actually treats laissez faire capitalism as anything more than a quaint myth.) His assumption that obesity is somehow related to unbridled greed is equally absurd.  When was the last time you saw an obese CEO? A simple comparative field trip to a McDonald's, and let's say, a high-end French restaurant on the upper east side would have added a vital piece of factual information so deplorably missing from Whybrow's analysis.  For, unlike the exec-moms and financial wiz-kids who Whybrow seems to think are representative samples of "America" your average wage-earner does not suffer from "over-scheduled" children, jet-lagged interpersonal relations, and turbo-charged consumption.If you want to read a well-written exposition of some of the unfounded myths "explaining" contemporary America, then this book is for you.  If not, then read Jared Diamond, Kevin Phillips, or Chalmers Johnson.
Self-focused marketing in action. Even though Don Peppers and Martha Rodgers have seized and even created opportunities to promote CRM and 1 to 1 marketing, this book provides no true thought leadership.  The only redeemable aspect of the writing are  some real world high level examples of proactive customer relationship  building.  Not anything extraordinary, but enough from some large company  top execs. to get an understanding that a customer-focused business can  only be successful if the culture is nutured from the top down.  The book  does one thing very well; it promotes future Peppers and Rodgers writings  that hopefully have more pratical application.  The fact that the authors  ask the readers to send their thoughts and ideas on specific topics to  unique addresses, of the 1to1 Peppers and Rodgers web site, definitely  follows the CRM philosophy.  Not to mention, gives them a bank of  real-world experience to draw from for their next project. I recommend  looking elsewhere for any &quot;real meat&quot; relevant to CRM strategy  lessons
Christian slop for the dumbed-down. I see some have given reviews that Marrs researched his subject area well. What he's done is give some conspiratorial reason for life as we know it. He connects unrelated dots and makes so many egregious errors its not even worth mentioning.Because some guy makes some "connections" and offers cockamamie theories disguised as "insight' and "knowledge" doesn't make them true, people. I used to be a Fundie Christian, but I could never quite understand how some supposed intelligent people could believe such utter toxic waste and even more so when less and less evidence produced. The structure of a cult has it that you recruit the brainier types. For some reason they are easier to bamboozle. Intellectual morons are what they're called in some circles. I'm not saying Christians are intelligent (from my experience, quite the opposite, but the leaders are), but those who are "intelligent" are blind, arrogant (usually), make massive conclusions based upon virtually nothing and fit the same pattern as the Christians who destroyed ancient Rome and brought on the Dark Ages. What was rumor and innuendo (usually stemming from paranoia and slop originating from the authors of books like the subject of this review) ends up being cirulated and recirculated to the point that within these circles it becomes some NWO and Luciferian reality. Scary ain't it? Then, they cause wars to take place in far-flung places like Iraq so to bring about the death and chaos and so the Messiah can ride down and impose his version of a dictatorship and meanwhile our "good" Christians get to rule with a iron rod. Sounds like fantasy, right? Not to these psychos. Because they are psychotic in their actions and the delivery system is Christ-insanity. Allow this mental toxic waste to propagate then you got another Dark Ages with added life destroying methods like bio warfare, nuclear weapons and environmental degradation. All for the arrival of the Messiah!Anyway, people, this guy, Mr. Marrs, repesents the same forces that destroyed European culture and achievement (thus relagating her to backwater status) for over 1,000 years, commencing with the Dark Ages where all knowledge and old ways were considered evil and heretical. Of the DEVIL! Lucifer, Baal, Satan, Molech, you get the drift.I believe some "belief-systems" are toxic waste waiting to destroy in the name of love and grace. Christ-insanity is one such cult gone wild. If it blossoms again be prepared for incessant wars to bring about the Messiah and a earth destroyed for their paranoid and evil delusions. THEY are the EVIL ones folks! The greatest country as yet (eventhough its tarnished now) is probably the USA due to a farreaching and foresight oriented document called "The Constitution". The men that brought it about were mostly Freemasons and Deists. They didn't want the same petty religious squabbles that were happening in Britian between various psychopathic Christian factions to inundate the new America. The Puritans, for example, were persecuted by rival Christian factions and when they obtained power became the persecutors. I've researched how the Christians really acted in ancient Rome. They targetted higher ups (rich, wealthy, senators) to convert and then plotted and succeeded in controlling the Roman state, i.e. Constantine. They used basically the same tactics as early to modern communists. Scheming and doing everything possible to destroy the Roman state so through a chaos scenario they can usurp it. They did more than that. Then they destroyed all the vestiges of the old relgions, banned all freedom of thought, annihilated science, philosophy and other disciplines. Europe didn't slink out of this until the Renaissance. Meanwhile, guys like Marrs would say how the Pope or some other religious leader was evil and of "the Devil" and the cycle would endlessly repeat over and over and over.....until the madness abates with reason and open inquiry without the fear of being put in the Iron Maiden for heretical thoughts. For example, Germany, in the 30 Years War in the early 1600s was turned into a wasteland (1/2 of the population destroyed) due to Marrsesque madness.Folks, there is a conspiracy, mostly of very wealthy, high level, types who want to hold onto their shekels to the detriment of all. Basic human pettiness and greed is the most part. They use Democrazy and conflicting factions (religious and ethnic - divide and conquer) to hold basic control and offer the illusion of *voting*. Bearing in mind the sleazebag politicians will do whatever gives them a new car or vacation and knowing *selling out* has become a virtue. They, these guys and politicians, are criminals for the most part destroying the planet, our health, our very existence. However, because of their utter and complete corruption they will go down and no amount of BS democrazy is going to save their sorry asses when all their ill-gotten wealth and property (maybe even *more*) is confiscated. It is another cycle and it will happen sooner than you think. So forget about numbnuts Marrs and his drivel for the slow witted. These a**holes that I described will crash & burn soon enough. This is due to organic historical cycles and a shifting of wealth and power. I can only hope a strong man comes about that makes them pay dearly for their arrogance and greed. Ruthless action is what will come my friends and when it does they won't have any place to hide.
Over Rated. I heard all of these great things about this book etc...... So I got a copy and let me tell you it was a huge let down. I can honestly say it had loads of disgusting passages that I did not find at all entertaining. The "bowel movement" chapter was totally repulsive. I found it self indulgent, he had a crappy upbringing, that does not make for a good book
poorly organized. The problem that I have with this book is that often the words that it defines tells me to go look up another fine.  That would be fine, except that I go to the word it said to look up and discover that I either have to look up another word.  This book is not helpful in that respect, and given that a lot of PCs run Windows, it doesn't really make sense to release a hypertext version for the Mac but not one for Windows.  So the Windows users are stuck with a book that really isn't that good
A Painful and Slow Read. This book reads like a graduate thesis. It manages to bury interesting ideas with overly drawn out explanations and arguments. Each chapter should be pared down to a third of its length, but I recommend not finding out for yourself; spend your money elsewhere
'94 Blackstone Audio is AWFUL. The 1994 Blackstone Audio Book version of "Turn of the Screw" is read by Pat Bottino.  Mr. Bottino's uninspired presentation destroyed the story.Perhaps Mr. Bottino got better in later ventures, I don't know, but he mangled "Turn".Avoid this version at all costs
One percent of 9 trillion is????. Page 328:"... For example, out of a worldwide total of $9 trillion in international bank loans and deposits in 2001, only about $700 billion went to poor countries-less than one percent. Out of $12 trillion in international investment securities, only about $600 billion went to poor countries, an even smaller fraction of one percent. ..."I really enjoyed this book until I read this passage, now I'm doubting everything I've ever learned about math
Ordinary does not have to be ugly. This book depressed me. I don't understand what other people see in it. I was thrilled when I finished it. I don't think Anne Tyler is my taste.
Something like an enema. I'm going to wait until it gets cold enough to burn this guy's book. "Oblivion," couldn't be a better title, while reading these stories--I couldn't actually bear to finish even one of them-- you feel as if you have entered some circle of Hell, and your punishment is to have to read all this crap. This guy makes me mad, his prose actually bores into your skull, it feels like torture to read and you want to say enough, yes, I will tell you anything you want to hear, but please just shut the blank up
Dragging out the same joke for far too long. Swartzwelder is the best writer on the Simpsons staff, bar none. But his prose style leaves so much to be desired. What works within the context of a voiced animated show falls flat on its face in print.Swartzwelder revisits the character of Frank Burly, P.I., last seen in "The Time Machine Did It". That earlier novel worked, even though the joke got a litle long-in-the-tooth at the end. Here, the attempt to once again meld film-noirish black-and-white movie cliches with 50s-ish science fiction, this time an alien invasion that only Burly is too stupid to realize is happening, cannot even elicit a guffaw.Some may feel Burly is simply Homer recast as Phillip Marlowe. But even Homer would remember to be, you know...funny. In this case, the formula very quickly becomes. Burly almost discovers invasion, incident causes Burly great pain, Burly forgets there is an invasion. It just does not hold up.Maybe those who read this book without reading its predeccesor will enjoy it more as they will be unfamiliar with the formula. For those who are attracted purely by the "writer of the Simpsons" blurb, you're better off buying any of the DVDs and passing on this.
Disappointing. I had very high hopes for this book due to its title and was looking for how to more cohesively merge Buddhism with management in modern corporate America. My experience is that this book neither explained Buddhism correctly nor did it give good management principles. It was just some light reading and common sense. The meditation exercises at the end of the book were strange discussing different colors of light and using the four elements in meditation all that is needed is to focus on the breathe and observe thoughts without losing yourself in them, that is true meditation, simply sit. This book also focused to much time and effort on the self,which is the very thing we should be overcoming. This is a poor book on Buddhism and management.Keep Looking.
Old concepts repackaged and regurgitated. All Covey is saying in his longwinded book, basically, is this: Listen to the people you love. Put the family first in all your decisions. Blah blah blah and something about synergy.The writing is horrible, and the metaphors are overused. I also dislike Covey's plagiarizing material from the Bible and not acknowledging where he gets his "inspiration".  In one passage he equates the Bible and other books of scripture with "Chicken Soup For the Soul" as "wisdom literature".  Despite being a supposed devout Mormon himself, obviously he's afraid to mention the Book of Mormon in that passage. Perhaps he's afraid of scaring away potential pigeons--I mean, readers.This was a book my book club decided to read; otherwise I'd have never even tried to get past the first few pages. I wonder how a man who is on the road more often than not can really interact with his own family and give "us", the poor ignorant masses, advice on our own families. In one passage he even says that other people's advice may not apply to our own situations. Then how can he expect us to take his advice?Don't waste your money. If you absolutely must read it, get it from the library. Covey doesn't need your money, he has a huge house with a basketball court and indoor pool. He's doing fine.
Historically inaccurate garbage. This book gets one star because you can't give zero. I have a B.A. in European History and I am utterly horrified by the historical inaccuracies in this series. As examples taken at random (there are lots, lots more of them): in Book One, Bauer describes Alcibiades as betraying Athens and leading an army into the city. Utterly incorrect. She admits she moved Boudicca's revolt until a later date in order to show that the Roman Empire was breaking down. Hello, you can't move historic dates in order to "prove" a hypothesis. In book Two, in her description of Justinian's rise to Emperor she basically says that he left the farm, studied hard and was chosen emperor. In point of fact, his uncle was emperor. Her historical errors go on and on. The author evidently didn't even bother to check her "facts" against something as simple as wikipedia. Bauer, according to her cover blurb, is a novelist and journalist with no apparent academic training in history, and, boy, does that lack of academic training show. She writes appealing journalistic hyperbole but doesn't bother to back her breezy simplifications with historical facts. Bauer also has a strong religous agenda. I'm a Christian myself but find the presentation of bible stories as historical events offensive. Anyone using this book to teach history to their child is doing their child a vast disservice.
This is only a VERY SHORT EXCERPT!!!!. This is misleading...not even 5% of the Ruskin masterwork is printed in this book.
Illegal surgery and the medical community. The daughter of a prominent Boston doctor is dead, apparently from a botched abortion (which was illegal in the late 60's).  Dr. John Berry's friend, Art Lee, is in jail for the crime, which he says he didn't commit.  So, Dr. Berry sets out to prove his friend's innocence, and runs into cover-ups and lots of secrets.  But there are many doubts, such as was the girl really pregnant, and did Dr. Lee actually perform the surgery, and why is Dr. Berry so interested in finding the culprit?For Michael Crichton's first novel, it's not bad, but nowhere near as good as some later ones.  The plot is marginally interesting, but it was hard to keep characters straight and the dialog didn't sound very natural.  Dr. Berry (who just takes the whole work week off to investigate) talks more like a cheesy "private eye" than a doctor.  Also annoying was the use of footnotes and endnotes to explain various medical terms and concepts - nice to know but annoying to look up
Matthew you could have done your research even under marilyn monroe biographies. why do you and others continue to perpetuate the movie magazine stories and call them non fiction even da vinci code is fictionplease guys do your research and find the marilyn monroe foundation and her daughter nancy miracle who wrote a great play which tells the heretofore untold real story ofthe person behind the image      it's about time   not the same old story not again please it's 200
This book is trash. If you want a book about jarring, hideous color combinations and no useful information whatsoever, get this one. There are so many bad art instruction books, and this one is one of the worst & most useless. The cover of the book gives you an example of the horrible color schemes the author uses. Do you really want to make paintings like that? Also, the color theory in this book is WRONG. Quiller is one of those who still believes that the primary colors are red, blue, and yellow, when they are actually cyan, magenta, and yellow. I bought another book, "Color Theory Made Easy," which is much better. It teaches correct color theory and useful information. I don't know what other good color theory books there are, but I do know you shouldn't buy this useless piece of junk by Quiller. I am really tired of bad art instruction books getting rave reviews on Amazon.com and buying them because I was gullible enough to believe all these reviews
NOT for beginners or the mildly apathetic. This book is very comprehensive, which is either a blessing or curse depending on your background. As someone who knew nothing about Islam prior to reading this book, I was frequently overwhelmed by the mass of information that Lapidus has arranged. As you may notice by the sheer volume of this 970 page book, it is VERY wordy. Like most history texts, it is also very dry and devoid of emotion. The author does, however, provide a complex view of Islam that is fair and accurate
I was "Bored of the Silent". I feel I must protect other unwitting prospective readers from this directionless, suspenseless, bore.  Being a fan of all things Egypt and an Agatha Christie fan as well I thought this book would be sure to please---not so!  Short of Grisham I've never read about heroic characters so impossibly beautiful, charming, intelligent, desirable, and perfect in any way and SO boring.  Was this a mystery?  I don't remember much of a plot at all.  Just characters going from one place to another and getting engaged in conflictless conflicts.  Finally, why set it in Egypt if you intend to use next to nothing of the country, its people (other than a few trite stereotypes), and its antiquities?Reading it on a long plane flight, I actually pondered whether finishing the book or crashing would be preferable.  For my guilty pleasure I'll go back to Stephen King---Tolstoy by comparison
Too Blue. I'm embarassed that I read this all the way through. The language/expletives passing for literature and dialogue were an early turnoff. I don't live with people who talk like that, and I don't understand the purpose: "sophistication"? To my mind, the characters were not enhanced nor the plot forwarded by the way the book was loaded with @%#&*s.
Go to 'baye.com', and scroll to the training article on Power Factor Training. Yes, you can use more weight in positions of leverage advantage, not because you're working 'more muscle', but because of your limbs' positioning relative to gravity. When you finish a set of full-range  leg presses,(for example), you almost surely have strength left to do much more work in your somewhat straight-legged position. Does this mean that you should not work the weaker,  bend-legged position at all, as this book claims?  ////NO//// First of all, working the'weak range' to exhaustion is as effective as working the 'strong range',(it's how hard you work that matters in either case). Second, with the huge majority of people , the range you work is the only range that shows improvement, (I know, the author disagrees; he lies). Third, this almost-isometric style effects the central nervous system more than tissue.  If you only need strength in this one range, and don't want to change your appearance much, fine. But there's a problem even with that: Strength built without building tissue needs more maintenance than strength built along with  muscle, and is -so- specific to the mode of development as to be virtually useless in any other activity except the exercise that developed it! If you want to make proper use of this principle, try this: First work full-range reps until failure.Then, and only then, have the bar or machine arm assisted into 'strong range', and do a second set. This method requires much recuperation , and should only be done with one exercise in a session,(actually it's rarely needed at all, but certainly more valid than Power Factor.  The funny thing about Power Factor claims is that , if they want to mislead people with exercise principles, they haven't even chosen the most severe principle: You can -lower- more weight than you can -hold-. The best single way to develop strength is to have  a weight,(so heavy that you can't even hold it up!), assisted into the 'finished' position, and attempt to slow it's 'fall' as much as possible. Sure, it's crazy, dangerous, and unnecessary, but it works, (and it's full-range!)
Please find another Calculus book!. Let me put it bluntly: my instructor uses this book as little as possible due to the incredibly overdone style in which the text and problems are written. Calculus is difficult enough as it is, but this book makes it virtually impossible to comprehend. User un-friendly. Petition your math department to choose another text.
It is so bad. The absolute worst book eve
incredible fabrications of history. Does she know anything about Japan's wartime history? Just google "Unit 731," the place where her own daddy probably worked at. Is it a pure coincidence that her daddy lived in the area where these despicable, inhuman experiments took place
Worst Humorous book.. This is a worst book I ever read. Also it is not written by Jerry Seinfeld but forwarded by him. And I picked it up because of Seinfelds name. This book lacks humor. Its no way at the level of Larry Davids or Costanzas character. The chapters are just repetetive. Crappy letters and stories can be very humorous, but that humour is completely lacking in this book. I am giving it a 1 star because that is the lowest I can go. Avoid this. It is a waste of time. Broth must try a bit hard for his next publication. Seinfeld shows that he can be a loyal friend by giving a forward to this book, I guess, without reading it
The writing never really comes together... This is a collection of short stories revolving around the new founder of her own detective agency.  The book spends a fair amount of time on local color.  The mysteries, if you can call them that, are light weight.  There's nothing wrong with any of that, often I want a light read, but there were two big factors that I could not get around that make me give a one star rating.First, the people in Botswana are presented very negatively, and the men are even worse than the women.  Maybe most Botswanans truly are self-centered bastards, but I found that too hard to believe.  (Even so, I could accept that depiction in a hard-boiled detective book, but this is more of a sunny-side-up book.)Second, the author keeps presenting contradictory pictures of the characters, particularly the main character.  In one story she is shown as exceptionally honest, while most other stories show her freely lying.  In one story she says she would never commit a crime, and in another story she steals a car.  In one story she is attracted to a man who beats and rapes her, in some stories she has no interest in any man, and in one story she is attracted to an apparently nice man.  I kept asking myself if the author was trying to make some point by these contradictions, but I couldn't discern any theme and came to believe it was simply poor writing
Lackluster. This book was very easy to read and moved along quickly but it was by no means &quot;good.&quot;  The plot was sometimes boring and sometimes just silly and the writing was banal.  Although it was a fast read, there are  hundreds of other books out there that are a fast read and capitivating.   Reading this book was a waste of my time
TOO DARK FOR ME. I read this book once. It was allright but too dark and racy for me. I like reading about vampires but this one was hard to follow in some parts and some parts I liked some but I liked Merrick better. BOOK WAS OKA
Poor. The storyline is way over-the-top, the plot is very poor, the red-neck-America-knows-best attitude of the writer is funny and sometimes annoying. Still, I've red worse books. But not many.
Not-so-Perfect Life is far from perfect book. I laughed out loud when I read Annie Lamont's "Operating Instructions", but I understood the source when I read it.  I am very disappointed in Fox's book because she passes herself off as a "suburban educated mom" who is struggling with role definition.  The book is whiney to a fault, and Fox is not the typical educated professional with whom I can relate. In the first 50 pages I had difficulty getting past her foray into witchcraft and active participation in the pro-abortion movement.  At least one of these, if not both, are huge mis-connects for the "average" person, much less, the market for which the book was supposedly written.  Skip this and read Lamont.
Islam in America. Read The Holy Quran before reading any propaganda books like this. Any book on Islam not written by a Islamic Scholar will be biased and racist. The wisdom of the Islamic Faith can only be understood by understanding the life of the Prophet Mohammed (PBUH). The Hadith will guide you in understanding the true path for all mankind. Please do not buy propaganda books. Go to the sourse of all Islamic thought. Read the Koran and the Hadith and understand the truth without lies from American Press
Boring. I know it's difficult to discuss and review all of Europe in one book, but this book was boring. It was easy to read, but not very fun or interesting. It did hit the highlights of the major sights, but it acts more like a reference than an exciting guide
Didn't work for me... This book is a quick read, though obviously there is more there. How much, exactly, remains in question. Apparently, others have seen more there than I did, but I think this is one of those books that reflects back at you what you are looking for in it. If one wants to find deep meaning or spirituality, one will find it -- extracting meaning from each picture, each word, each pause. But, I don't know. I found 'The Alchemist' to be much more successful in doing a similar thing. I would recommend that one instead..
if you have any sort of hard science knowledge, don't bother. this book is obviously written by someone who is scientifically-challenged.  basic astronomy, math, ecology, etc., do not add up.    ----------------------------   this is especially unfortunate, since the characters were created so well.  they were people who were real - complex mixtures of strengths, weaknesses, inconsistancies, virtues, stupidites, etc.  in fact, the characters and basic story were so well done, that i pushed on in the book much further than i should have, hoping that bad science would go away and i could enjoy the interaction of the people, but alas, after a hundred or so pages, i could take it no longer
BoRiNg!. Bought because it's purportedly a 'MUST READ' of recommended English 19th century literature and I'm trying to read every good book I can before I die (hopefully at 90). Unfortunately,  this book is a waste of time as it's BoRiNg (even w/ the footnotes that I so dearly love).
Trotsky: Mass Murderer and Liar. You know, I hate to burst the bubble of devoted Trotskyites across the globe, but Trotsky was just as responsible for Stalin's rule as anyone. For Leon to blame Stalin is the height of hypocrisy. Without Lenin's apparatus of social repression and Trotsky's apparatus of military dictatorship, Stalin would never have been.The Russian Revolution was never a win for workers. It destroyed them, some 4 million at Lenin's hands, 30 million by Stalin, and 65 million by Mao Tse-tung.No policy or ideology that denies the soul can ever succeed. And communism does just that. By denying that which makes humans humans, it can bring only suffering
Disappointing. McLaren's critique of the church in the modern age paints a scathing picture, but doesn't refer to any leaders by name. His perspective seems distorted to me, but I cannot tell who he has in mind, because he doesn't cite any particular modern church writings.Of most concern to me is that McLaren's strategies seem to lack biblical support.  Culture seems to be the guiding force behind his strategies, but he is working from his own projection of the direction of western culture in the future.  If McLaren's projection is off, then his strategies will be irrelevant at best.
Potentially Very Dangerous. This is the story of a very arrogant doctor who quits his medical practice because of what his &quot;Inner Teacher&quot; told him. This could be a sign of psychosis. Nowhere in the books is the distinction between psychosis and psychic ever made. Perhaps Joy does not want his readers and potential students to know the difference
Alien Abductions and hypnotic induced memories.. This book is a text book case of hypnotically induced memories for the sake of UFO disinformation, I will give three star in other subject :MIND CONTROL.The only "aliens" who really want to  take samples of your tissue have your same DNA and wear camuflage uniforms...don't waste your money with this one
Nice But I expected More. This is a nice book but not a good buy at about $50! Nice pictures that you might look at again sometime in the future but not much info if you want a reference for Yoga.What is needed in the Yoga community is a book like "Strength Training Anatomy"  By Frederic Delavier.( at about $15 this is THE BOOK to have in your collection!!) Detailing Yoga asanas that work the various muscle groups.
not so hot. The cover is by far the best art in this book...  There are some other good ones inside, but most are incredibly poorly drawn and not very erotic at all; why they bothered putting a hard cover on such an amateurish effort is beyond me.  Even the ones that are well drawn mostly just look like normal women with wings added as an afterthought.  Bottom line, I'll snip out a few pictures to keep as art reference and throw away the rest.
Blank Pages and Redundant Material. I received this book as a gift, and I am so glad I did not buy it.  It is a 137 page book, of which over 50 pages (FIFTY PAGES) are blank, or have bad line-art of a siamese cat.  The remaining pages are large type, double spaced, half of which are just rehashes of previous books.  I figure there are probably 30 pages of original material.  It's obvious that Ms. Braun (or the publishers using a ghostwriter) are just trying to milk the fan base for more money.  Avoid this book, even if you are a Cat Who completist
Uninformed.  A book of generalizations for his cult. I've been confused by Michael Medved's position on film ever sinse he posed a question in the wall Street Journal asking "What happened to the missing moviegoers?".  He was speaking about the end of the Production Code (censorship) in Hollywood, and how that coincided with a drop off in movie attendance.Yes--movies seriously changed in the late 60s, as filmmakers were allowed to depict subject matter previously forbidden.  I'm not sure what he is trying to prove here.  Everyone stopped going to the movies because of this?  So, it had nothing to do with attendance dropping since the mid-50s, with Vietnam, with the death of urban movie palaces and the total change of the movie going experience, the public's boredom with overblown "roadshow attractions" , with television?No, actually, because in Mr. Medved's world you can trace anything and everything to a lack of morals.He points out that the "Sound of Music" won best Picture in 1965, and then "Midnight Cowboy" (about a male hustler) won Best picture in 1969, thereby proving the decline and fall of western civilization.So, I guess nevermind how many "family" movies of this time period ("Hello Dolly," "Doctor Dolittle", "Chitty Chitty Bang Bang," "Greatest Story Ever Told") were total and complete bombs at the box office.He states that removal of the production code (remember, the decline and fall of western civilization) "hurt the bottom line." And apparently movies have just been utter "filth" ever since?So, Christians would be hypocritical to own DVDs of the films that came out just after the removal of the Code, that could not have been made before it: "The Wild Bunch," "The Grauduate," "Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf," "The Producers," "Rosemary's Baby," "Midnight Cowboy," "Bonnie and Clyde."All of those movies did great at the box office, by the way.So I'm lost as to how the removal of the Production Code wrecked "the bottom line" in Hollywood.Oh yes, one other thing:  Michael Medved did the glowing introduction to DeMille's "The Ten Commandments" at the Conservative Film Festival (or whatever its called) in 2004.DeMille's 1932 film "The Sign of The Cross," jam-packed with violence, sexual perversion, [...]), helped contribute to the Catholic revolt against films, and the enforcement of the Code itself.Some "scholar" you guys got here.
No solos. If you are trying to learn the solos of the first four Iron Maiden albums (S/T, Killers, Number of the Beast, and Piece of Mind), this is not the book for you. This book only has the rhythm guitar.
lots of drawings, but little info. This booklet has a lot of Warner Brothers drawings, but it doesn't delve into the specifics of creating animation very well.  I'd recommend getting The Animator's Survival Kit instead as it has tons of good and well explained info on the art of creating your own animation
disappointed. The original works of James Strong are excellent, however in the case of some of these newer books where Dr. Strong's work has been "corrected" are not so good. Corrected means shot full of errors. For example, I understand that many believe in the rapture, however the word rapture does not exist in the Bible, it is a work of man. I was so disappointed to see references to rapture in a bible dictionary because belief in the rapture alters the entire understanding of the New Testament. If I were given the option I would have given it a 0
Misses the Point. After using Dr.Dyer's aaah meditation CD for a month, I decided that I wanted to learn more this meditation. Therefore, I bought the book Manifest Your Destiny.  The book reads like a personal journal about nine insights he has gained from his own search for spiritualism.  There are many things that disturb me about this book.Dr. Dyer cites quotes from the bible to substantiate some of his points without citing the book, chapter, or verse.  One of the bible quotes he uses is "Is it not written in your law `I have said, You are gods?'" (John 10:34)  This is the passage to which Jesus referred when He said this to the Pharisees who were attempting to charge Him with blasphemy: " God standeth in the congregation of God; He judgeth among the gods. How long will ye judge unjustly, And respect the persons of the wicked? ... I said, Ye are gods, And all of you sons of the Most High."  (Psalms 82:1,2,6). The unjust judges of Israel (i.e., the Pharisees) were the subject of these verses.  They were civil magistrates because of their authority and power; and, they represented divine majesty in the government of the twelve tribes of Israel.  Dr. Dyer uses this verse completely out of context.   Scripture cannot be broken.Jesus believed in the bible because it is infallible and immutable as are God's other laws.  A true seeker of spiritualism cannot reconfigure God's Word for his own purpose.  Neither can the true spiritual seeker be ignorant about God's Word and actually expect to know God's and come into a relationship with Him.  Dr. Dyer takes a little bit of truth and expands upon it in a somewhat convincing way to fit our desire for an easy road to spiritualism. The fact of the matter is that according to Jesus the door to God's kingdom is narrow (Luke 13:24).   There are no shortcuts.Lastly, a true spiritual seeker does not strive to become spiritual with the intention of manifesting worldly possessions.  This appears to be a main theme of Dr. Dyer's book.  Those who seek God first gain all they need to be happy in this world as a "gift" from Him.  We do not need to grasp at anything as long as we trust God and put Him first in our lives.  Dr. Dyer seems to miss the point.
No dept. I expected something of a mystery with plot development. Wow, the plot never got higher than 6&quot;s off the ground. The story was weak without any mystery and it had no development of charaters. The dialogue seemed to be at a 6th grade level because the story's character seemed to behave as 6th graders. If you read, Ludlum, Clancy, DeMille, Follet don't spend time opening this book. For those reviewers who thought this book had great insights into behind the scenes work of the government, you need to expand your reading list. The idea of the purple dots could have been a great story, but it never got off the launch pad. Most people have more excitement driving to work than what this story provided
Please Do Not Be Mislead By The Title!. If you're interested primarily in Near-Death Experiences, then do not go with this one.  Mrs. Whitfield describes her two NDE's here, but this is for the most part a New Age compendium on how to increase your spirituality through the balancing of your chakras, handling psychic and kundalini  energies, etc.  There's nothing wrong with that except for perhaps  misleading the public with the title such as it is.  Mrs. Whitfield is an  accomplished therapist and extemely well-studied in her work, but there are  too many publications available like this one.  For those wanting powerful  testimonials from those who have had near-death experiences, you will NOT  find it here. There are so many more books available from Amazon that carry  NDE accounts that will change your life
Why continue to be deceived... Tim LaHaye, Jerry Jenkins, and others in the Pre-Trib circle, such as Ed Hindson, Tommy Ice, Chuck Missler, etc., continue to put forth the same deceptions that Hal Lindsey popularized decades ago.  The notion of a pre-tribulation rapture is foreign to scripture, it is foreign to the teachings of the early Church, and it is grooming the Church for destruction through ignorance and lack of preparation for what is really coming.  These men are novices and not prophecy "experts" or "scholars" by any stretch of the imagination; they are those who tickle the ears of gullible Christians.  Why continue to be deceived?  Tim Cohen, in his excellent book, "The AntiChrist and a Cup of Tea," provides biblically sound and testable evidence to show that the coming AntiChrist is known NOW.  Not only that, the same author (Tim Cohen) has now put out the strongest presentation on the whole issue of the rapture EVER offered to the saints of God in Christ: "The REAL Rapture".  If you really want to know the truth about the timing of the coming rapture, then you need to hear Tim Cohen's "The REAL Rapture" (based on a volume in his forthcoming "Messiah, History, and the Tribulation Period" series (see Prophecy House's web site, prophecyhouse dot com, for details on these items)
The Pursuit of Arrogance. Simply put, this book is the drivel of a man who thinks very highly of himself. It's like being forced to have dinner with your egotistical, drunken uncle. "Blah blah blah... And then  I saved the world and looked good doing it.... Blah blah blah... AREN'T I GREAT?!?!
Ramblings of a dirty old man. Heinlein is a great author.  When he sits back and tells a story, he's one of the best.  Glory Road and Citizen of the Galaxy are wonderful, and The Moon Is a Harsh Mistress should be on the shelf of any science fiction fan.This, however, is an awful book.  It's not merely one of Heinlein's worst.  It's one of the worst books I've ever had the misfortune to read.The problem isn't that there's no action, although there isn't.  The problem is that there isn't anything of substance to replace it.  There's lots of sex, but not in enough detail to be titilating.  There isn't a love story either; you can't have romance or sexual tension when your characters will sleep with anyone and everyone for any reason.  The book just rambles aimlessly until it ends.Maybe Heinlein was trying for an examination of gender roles and sexual identity, but if so he failed miserably.  The characters in this book aren't just from a different culture; they aren't people at all.  They're too flat.  If you want to think about such things, ponder them on your own or read a different book.  I suggest Left Hand Of Darkness by Ursula Le Guin.I Will Fear No Evil reads like an old man's rambling personal fantasies.  Someone must like it, but I can't recommend it even to the most devoted Heinlein fans.  If you're tempted, do yourself a favor and re-read Stranger In A Strange Land instead
A mediocre look at French Style. I bought this book expecting it to be as wonderful as French Chic by fashion writer Suzanne Somer (unfortunately out of print) or A Year of Style by Frederic Fekkai.  Unfortunately, this book is filled with dated clothing and very little substance to explain the French fashion mystique.  However, there are two other great books that are keepers.  The first is Frederic Fekkai: A Year of Style.  The famous French stylist does an excellent job of showing you how to be beautiful with easy and simple ideas to use throughout the year. The second book is A Guide to Elegance: For Every Woman Who Wants to Be Well and Properly Dressed on All Occasions by Geneviere Antonine Dariaux.  Madame Genevieve Antoine Dariaux, former directrice for Nina Ricci shares her extensive expertise on creating the classic French look
Promise lost. The title is misleading. It should indicate that a great deal of other information is brought into play, such as history, politics, and propoganda. Many will, no doubt, make the case for how these add information to the main story line. I don't see how a flawed and simplistic history of early research in radiation helps tell the story of how a boy becomes interested in building a reactor. If you want to read a better and more correct history of the discovery and early work in radiation, even an encyclopedia does a better job. And the author's drive to paint nuclear energy as black as possible leads him to huge errors in his facts. What Wernher von Braun has to do with radiation, I can't begin to guess, but he was never a major in the SS. He was never an officer in any Nazi organization. Some reviewers dispute the author's aim to attack nuclear energy. It's very telling that one of his oft quoted sources, "Nukespeak" was published by the Sierra Club and written by a trio who have made it public that their aim is to be sure this country turns permanently away from this energy source. The author's significant mistakes are enough to discredit this book on their own merit, or lack of.I feel a need to also address his characterization of David and other geeks. Especially in lack of a mentor or proper guidance with potentially lethal equipment, an enthusiastic student shouldn't be run down by adults. That, as much as any other event in David's life, helped push him further into the hole he was digging, withdrawing from possible assistance, and causing David to adopt a suspicious and sarcastic attitude toward adults. That's a certain recipe for the disaster that nearly was in David's life. I do know of that which I speak. My own experiments when I was younger nearly disposed of me, and the abuse I took from peers and adults only made me more determined to show them I knew what I was doing. I secreted all I did, as David began to do. We dorks may be dorks, but alienating eccentrics doesn't help them or those affected by them.A disappointing book, one that could have risen to great heights. The bigger shame is that there is no other book on the subject that I can recommend
Don't Quit Your Dayjob!. Maybe the worst "thriller" I've read in years. The dialogue, characters and plot are at best soap opera material and that's giving it a positive spin. I hope Mr. Hosp is a good lawyer....and we all know what Wm. Shakespeare said about that profession
More money?. Talk to the Polish and South Koreans, and ask them why they do more with less.
A Little Voice Says "Don't Waste Your Money". The main thing I learnt from this book is that it is definitely better sometimes to look through a book before buying it. I thought this was a very juvenile book, in terms of the level of smearing and name calling I thought there was, e.g. the False Memory Syndrome Foundation is described as "the CIA's answer to the flat earth society"and Col John Alexander is given the epithet "Doctor of Death". Some child abuse cases are recounted with an unnecessary level of graphic detail, and the author includes a partially obscured picture of a scene of child pornography. I wondered if this was really needed, but then I remembered that the publisher is Feral House, which also publishes books by Satanist Anton LaVey and the Apocalypse Culture books, which also feature child porn. Instead of blaming the CIA for everything, Mr Constantine could also have pointed the finger at his publisher for potentially encouraging Satanism and child abuse.I don't really want to spend more time saying what I didn't like about this book, but I didn't like the way the author seemed to be so sure of himself. Some examples: all UFOs are manmade, all "alien" abductions are CIA abductions, remote viewing is the CIA beaming images into people's heads.
Houston...we have a problem. I gave this book two stars because I admire anyone who can summon the sheer willpower needed to complete a novel of nonsense--particularly one with as much deadwood between the covers as this one. One must also admire the salemanship that must have been displayed when FW was presented to a publisher. If not for these factors it would have gotten one star. Please don't be sucked into the crowd that thinks a book is really good if they can't understand it. Instead, rate highly the book whos author presented you with a clear story, made you want to read the next page, and perhaps, in the end, changed your view of the world
Sisler: One of the two most overrated players ever. I hope Huhn did not spend much time on this project.George Sisler had a .340 career batting average, and that sounds impressive to the few baseball fans who still think batting average is a major statistic.  But for the rest of us, Sisler is either--as the preeminent living baseball historian, Bill James, calls him--the most overrated player in baseball history, or, as I call him, the second most overrated player in baseball history, behind Roberto Clemente.The two men had the same problem.  They racked up very high batting averages for their eras, and thus superficially appeared to be great hitters, but they almost never walked.  Thus, their career ON-BASE PERCENTAGES, of which "batting average" is but a portion, were mediocre.  And neither one of them hit home runs, though Sisler was especially egregious in this respect.He played in one of baseball's greatest launching pads ever,  Sportsman's Park, where it was: 310 down the right field line, 322 to straightaway right, and 351 to deepest right center.  And he played there with the super-live ball of the 1920's, before they put the screen up in that part of the park.  He also got to play as a visitor in Cleveland's League Park and NY's Yankee Stadium, when they were generous to left-handed hitters, as well as nearly three full seasons as a visitor in the outrageous Baker Bowl in Philly, the century's greatest launching pad.Do you know how many HR's the guy hit in his career?  Try 102.So this guy is not "baseball's forgotten great."  This guy is deservedly forgotten, because sophisticated baseball fans have come to realize he wasn't great.  All those years in Sportsman's Park, and he never once hit 20 HR's.  All those gaudy batting averages, and his career on-base percentage was lower than those of Fred McGriff, Alvin Davis, Gene Tenace, Elmer Valo, Jack Clark and many scores of other guys who hit nowhere near .300, let alone .340.Finally, I'm aware of Sisler's mid-career injury, and the huge decline in his stats which flowed from it.  He was a vastly better player before that than afterward, and without it, he may have been truly great.  But so what?  Anyone remember Don Mattingly?  I remember thinking he was going to replace Lou Gehrig as the greatest 1B of all time.  And I wasn't alone.  His back injury ruined him, and if he still makes the Hall, it will be only because he was a Yankee.  These things happen, and they don't make Sisler something he was not.  (And Sisler was just as terrible about taking walks before the injury as after.)Next time, Mr. Huhn, write about a "forgotten great" who truly was great.  This book was a waste of your time, and is a waste of any reader's time.Jim F
YOU'VE GOT TO BE KIDDING. Obviously, creationists confuse the question "Has evolution occurred?" with the question "What is the cause of evolution?" The scientific answer to the first question is, of course, "yes," and the answer to the second question (at least in part) is "natural selection." What logic and evidence leads scientists to these answers?The Logic Of EvolutionThe conclusion that evolution has occurred is drawn from two simple observations:Observation 1: Living things come only from living things. Spontaneous generation is not possible when living things are already in existence.Observation 2: Fossil remains show that living things in the remote past were very different from living things today.THEREFORE:Conclusion: Life has changed through time (evolved).A dramatic proof of the thesis that life has changed through time is seen in the fossil record of the vertebrates, animals having a segmented backbone. At the beginning of the Cambrian Period (570-500 million years ago), there were no vertebrates at all. Later in the Cambrian, problematic forms appeared which seem to have been related to the vertebrates, but showed distant affinities with the echinoderms as well. (Echinoderms today are represented by starfish, sea lilies, sea cucumbers, etc.; embryologically they appear to compose the phylum most closely related to the Chordata, the phylum to which vertebrates belong.) Toward the end of the Cambrian Period, the first vertebrates appeared: the ostracoderms, jawless fishes possessed of a bony armor plate and having flattened bodies apparently adapted to a bottom-feeding way of life.According to the fossil record, vertebrates went without jaws for many millions of years. Finally, at the beginning of the Devonian Period (395-345 million years ago), the first fish with jaws entered their remains into the record in the rocks. At the very end of the Devonian or the beginning of the Carboniferous Period (345-280 million years ago), the first primitive amphibians arose. These fish-like animals differed from their air-breathing fish ancestors mostly in their elaboration of the bony structure of the paired appendages - converting fins into hands and feet - and in reinforcement of the structures attaching the paired appendages to the spinal column. The first reptiles did not appear until the last half of the Carboniferous Period.To give the lie to creationist claims that there are no connecting-link fossils to join the vertebrate classes, the Permian Period (280-225 million years ago) saw the appearance of an entire order of animals, the mammal-like reptiles (Therapsida), which can be seen to change with time from typical, primitive reptiles, into primitive mammals. It was not until late in the Triassic Period (225-190 million years ago) that the therapsid-mammal transmutation was complete. Contrary to the first chapter of Genesis, which claims that the first mammals appeared on the earth a mere twenty-four hours after the first fish, the first mammals did not appear on earth until more than 300 million years of fish evolution had transpired!Birds, which, according to both creation myths in Genesis, were created on the same day as fish, do not enter the fossil record until the Jurassic Period (190-136 million years ago). Representing an ultimate variation on the dinosaur theme, birds trace their descent from reptiles quite different from those ancestral to the mammals. Contrary to the claims of some creationists, evolutionists do not claim that reptiles evolved into birds, and birds evolved into mammals!Even though the first mammals appeared in the Triassic Period, forms for which the English language has names would not appear until the late Cretaceous (136-65 million years ago), when opossum-like forms appeared, the Eocene Epoch (60-40 million years ago), when primitive whales originated, and the Oligocene Epoch (40-25 million years ago), when apes, monkeys, and primitive grazing mammals appeared.The record in the rocks, thus, is evidence either for fishes evolving into birds and mammals, or it is evidence of thousands of successive "special creations" - magical replacements of successive faunas by slightly different ones. Curiously, the latter interpretation is as unbiblical as it is unscientific.If either of the biblical myths were true, all types of vertebrates - living types of mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, and fishes - would be found along with bacteria and trilobites at the very beginning of the fossil record and would be extractable from all rock layers of later ages. But of course, nothing could be farther from reality. The infamous "gaps in the fossil record," adduced by creationists as evidence against evolution, are actually a devastating refutation of the idea that all forms of life were miraculously zapped onto the earth at the same time!The Logic Of Natural SelectionSince creationists in their attacks of evolution in general, and of natural selection in particular, usually obfuscate the scientific principles involved and generally substitute a straw man which is easier to ridicule, it is important that we state clearly just what it is that science has to say on the topic of how new species come to be. The modern ("synthetic") theory of natural selection consists of a tightly interwoven fabric of observations and logical conclusions drawn from them. In a nutshell, the structure of the theory is the following:Observation 1: All living things tend to reproduce in geometric progression, so that if all offspring survived, the entire earth would be overrun by them.Observation 2: In fact, however, the earth is NOT so overrun. The populations of various species remain approximately constant in size from century to century, due to the finite resources of the environment.THEREFORE:Conclusion A: There must be a competition for the available resources of the environment, a "struggle for existence."Observation 3: Heritable variations (mutations) are observed to occur spontaneously, from time to time, in populations of all species.Observation 4: In a given environment, some of these variations are helpful in the struggle for existence, and others are harmful or neutral.THEREFORE:Conclusion B: A natural selection of individuals will result. Those with helpful mutations will survive and expand in numbers, and those with harmful mutations will tend to perish and be reduced in numbers.Observation 5: The source of inheritable changes is either (1) change in the sequence of chemical "bases" in the DNA molecules making up an organism's genes, (2) rearrangement of genes on chromosomes, or (3) multiplication or deletion of genes or chromosomes.Observation 6: Physically and chemically speaking, there is no limit to the amount of base changing possible in DNA or the amount of gene rearrangement which can take place.THEREFORE:Conclusion C: There will be no limit to the amount of variation possible in any given species. Given enough time, and changing environmental conditions, mutation will add to mutation, and any species will gradually change into one or more new species. As mutations cause greater and greater cumulative change, and as sexual recombination assembles novel hereditary ensembles, species will turn into new genera, genera into new families, etc.With the exception of the observations concerning changes in DNA and chromosomes as the source of evolutionary variation, the theory above was discovered by Charles Darwin in the middle of the last century. Darwin came to his theory grudgingly - he had originally been a creationist himself. But the facts of nature which he uncovered in his trip around the world on H.M.S. Beagle forced him to give up the Genesis mythology in favor of evolutionary science, and made him formulate the theory of natural selection.It is not often remembered that Darwin was not the only person to discover the principle of natural selection. At the same time that Darwin was formulating his theory, Alfred Russell Wallace - completely independent of Darwin, and half a world away - was forced by his study of the plants and animals of the Malay Archipelago to conclude that evolution had occurred, and that natural selection was the motive force!The lesson to be learned from this is that the facts of nature compel unbiased minds to conclude that evolution has occurred, and that natural selection is at least a part of the cause of evolutionary change. (Population size and genetic isolation of populations are also important factors affecting the degree to which evolutionary change will occur.)As we examine the bizarre details of the Genesis creation myth, however, we must ask: Is it conceivable that any person not already aware of the first Genesis myth could go out into the world of nature and conclude that green plants came into existence before the sun? That birds existed before reptiles? Without knowledge of the second Genesis myth, who would come up with the idea that man is older than both plants and animals, but that woman did not come into existence until the last animal species had appeared? Without being brainwashed by the Noah's Ark tale, what geologist would conclude that the whole planet was covered by a shell of water 4,334 years ago? What independent observer would conclude that the kiwi, which can neither swim nor fly, came to New Zealand from Mt. Ararat in Turkey, but couldn't make it to Greece or Australia? Could anyone conclude that there was once a "firmament" in the sky -- with windows in it, and water above it?Of course not. But we can be quite sure that even if the creationist legions of darkness should succeed in eradicating all knowledge of Darwin's theory, honest men and women of the future studying the facts of nature would discover it anew. This is because evolutionary science is science, and is true in the sense that it is testable and accords with the facts of nature. The creationist dogmas, however, are not science and - to the extent that they are testable - are contradicted by the testimony of nature.
Dont waste your time or money. Terrible and pretentious writing. I tried to read this book without much luck. If you have trouble sleeping, this is the perfect sleeping pill.
My Baby is a PERSON, Not a Thing. While this book does contain good information, it's presented in a way I couldn't get past. In an attempt to read like the owner's manual for a machine, like a car or a stereo system, the book consistently refers to the baby as "the model". It was obviously meant to be cute but in my opinion it fails in that respect. I'm very much turned off by referring to babies in the same way you would refer to your washing machine. My baby is a PERSON, not a THING. To its credit, the book does explain how each baby is unique, but it does so by pointing out that "some models do this" and "some models do that." Again, I'm turned off by referring to the baby as a "model"
How Sad............ I think I've read most of Mr. Woods' Stone Barrington novels, enjoying them thoroughly - BUT this is a sad addition to the collection. He just called this one in - unrealistic plot, unresolved plotlines, bad dialogue.......I think he's unfortunately succumbed to the 'publisher's lament': "You just HAVE to release another Stone novel this year!" There's no pride of authorship in this book - it's strictly a throwaway....and the circular bin is where it's ended up......
Left me wanting more... The characters are uninteresting and 2-dimensional, the dialog hackneyed. I have no idea why it's on the New York Times Bestseller list. It was more of an obligation for me to finish this book than anything else. Don't waste your money
Wasted My Money. The title was the best part of this book.  Not worth purchasing - if you MUST read it check it out from the library or borrow it. Don't ask me for it - mine is headed for Goodwill because I can not stand to burn or trash a book. It was awful and vulgar.  Very disappointed. I hope someone else writes the book to fit the title.  Unfortunately I bought two books by the author and was disappointed with BOTH
I put on weight. Everyone's body is different...my weakness was always bread therefore it's been over 12 months I've cut down on bread. Therefore when I had gone on this diet I actually put on some weight and realized that I don't miss the getting tired eating so much bread.I'm sure it'll work for some but wasn't right for me
Tedious. Reminded me of a UT student on the 7 year plan. A great 200 page story that is told in 380 pages. Hope the next is better
Ok but not very detailed. This book is a more a of brief review of table saw technique and jigs. The chapters are not very detailed and don't actually contain any directions for doing most of cuts or processes. The most frustrating thing is where he will say "just use this very handy jig" and then gives a very crude drawing of the jig with no explanation of how to build it or even a basic layout. A MUCH better book is Kelly Mehler's The Table Saw Book
Terrible Book. Oh my, all the terrible reviews for this book are true!!  Ms. Steel is excessively repetitive....I mean EXCESSIVE.  Ms. Steel goes into too much background on the characters way too early in the book...and she continues to repeat this information over and over and over and over...you get the picture.  I too found myself saying, "Okay, we get it already..."  I also agree with one of the reviewers who mentioned the bonding experience the men had.  I don't know the men Ms. Steel knows and hangs out with, but she had these me talking about their feelings with each other, as well as how their dysfunctional pasts had affected them.  Oh please, no man on earth talks that way.  Especially to other men.  This book is completely aweful.  The plot is so slow and does not grab the readers attention.  I have read many of Ms. Steel's books and I believe this one is her worst.  I have now started reading Sandra Brown and she is sooo much better.  I recommend "The Alibi."  So far that has been my favorite by her.  She has mystery, suspense, romance...  Her words are so much more descriptive and interesting than Ms. Steels.  To sum it up, I was completely disappointed with the book "Toxic Bachelors."  I highly recommend Sandra Brown, she is a much better author
Econometrics Analysis by William H. Greene. I used the first edition of this book as a graduate student in my econometrics class. The book is very confusing and hard to understand. It's still of no help to me now that I am a professor and writing research paper. Whenever I need a review in econometrics I use Judge et all; &quot;The Theory and practice of econometrics.&quot; It is a better book, well written, and easy to follow. Unfortunately it is off print. We need a better book than the one by Greene. If it was for me, this book should be put where it belongs, in the garbage
Shallow content, Overpriced book. This book has a very shallow content, and is only a glorified feature listing of web analytics product features with no in-depth details at all. What makes it worse is it is highly overpriced for what shallow content it offers. This information can be obtained from the vendors website datasheets also. Avoid this book
aes sedai are sooo boring. the first chapter was awesome... lan gearing up for a battle, there's suspense, there's a promise of action, i was excited to read more.  i'm halfway through the book now and it's been nothing since but morraine and siuan chapters... what is robert jordan's problem?  why spoil a great fantasy series with chapter after chapter of catty females, i don't understand why i still read this author
For tru-fans only. The novel was a badly-researched and badly-written third-rate airport thriller.  This illustrated edition is an expensive and attractive badly-researched and badly-written third-rate airport thriller.For tru-fans only
how bad can you get with good ideas?. Of the first three Anita Blake's novels this is surely the worst.This hit me as totally unexpected and I am very disappointed.The problem lies in the plot, misconstructed, discontinuous, a heap of unrelated events thrown together with little sense, not to mention a mass of inconsistencies spread throughout the pages. Inconsistencies in characters descriptions and details are to be found in all the first four books but here we have mistakes such as Anita driving her car which was wrecked the night before and is again the day after. Hard to swallow.In such a context that some ideas are really good and some characters very interesting matters very little
The Essence Of Awful. Thomas Frank has been endowed with a talent for writing tortured prose which is uniquely inelegant, the Washington Post should really recruit him, he could be much more effective at crippling the language there. Instead he makes do with whatever scraps of intellect he possess to write articles in  obscure magazines one stumbles over occasionally in second hand bookstores,  and this wretchedness.  Thomas Frank is no more equipped to comment on the  Sixties then Michael Crichton would be on Bertrand Russel
Boots. The original. He was kind of cool, but now he ain't; people using his backwardness against us. Forget this dude, or perish. 1896 speech was a total sell out to da man.Drop ya boots, dawg!!!I
The really own words of the master are excellent. One at the front: The really own words of the master are excellent. One must make sure that only 43 sides of the only 7 x 5 inch small book are interviews with Bruce Lee. The rest consists of interviews with the former  interviewers. However, as a paperback this book costs not really a fortune.  But the words of the master are absolutely worth-while, as already  mentioned at the beginning
An attempted read. Perhaps I expected more from this book than was present, but I could hardly get through the first few chapters and I am an avid historic biography reader. I found her methods tiresome and boring, having the preference to recite found facts rather than compile and share, she reads like a card catalog. I now know exactly what to read if I do wish to learn something of these women she eludes to, but after having put this book down, I feel I am less wise to the subjects then when I started. I need a chronological telling of a person and their movement, not a forty-three page explanation of exactly who has written such things in the past. Perhaps, I stopped reading three or four chapters before it got good, but I doubt it. I was very disappointed
belief vs. belief; not science vs. religion. This book is written relatively well.  But, as other reviewers points out, if you really want to understand the arguments, then you had better realize Eugenie Scott is a staunch defender evolution and always has been.  In other words, there is no way she could have, and did not, write a balanced treatment of the debate at all.  It's balanced for evolutionists, to be sure, not for anyone else and obviously not for me.  I am still waiting for anyone, anyone at all, to go into enough detail about the fossil record (there are a number of possibilities here) to actually prove that there are enough fossils, that the dating of them was accurate, there was no 'fudging', and many more details about the fossils themselves and the techniques used to analyze them - to show that evolution is a fact.  If, for example, we somehow fossilized 100 different birds that are alive today, some related and some not, I have a feeling that evolution would still be prescribed as the cause for the different species, that different dates would be assigned for each species based on what type of rock it was found (even though it has nothing to do with anything in this case), etc.  The negative reviews of those who critize this book are based purely on emotion.  None of them involve science, which is supposedly what evolution is based on.  If anyone can tell me how specific traits of evolution are testable, such as the 'fact' that life began from inanimate matter, or that species evolved into separate species, I would love to hear it.  Please be specific and let me know how you know based on your five senses, and not that there's a magical theory that explains it, because just as creationism explains everything - so does evolution.  Both are not true.  I am truly amazed that Amazon.com doesn't delete most of the 'reviews' because they are nothing but a bunch of cheap shots at the other side
Not one to start with. Aaron Sisson works in the English mining industry, and is also a talented flortist. Disenchanted with his life, he leaves his wife and children and finds work with an orchestra in London. There, and in Italy, he tries to come to terms with his life and emotions whilst finding new acquaintances in London society and then with Britons in Italy.The novel centres on Aaron's alienation, his retreat from and aversion to responsibility for others: it is right to stay in a relationship when you are feeling untrue to yourself by doing so? Just what are individuals' responsibilities to each other?These are familiar Lawrence themes and will come as no surprise to those who have read his other works. It's also very much a novel of its time: pseudo-fascist ideas are in the air - social Darwinism and Nietzschean thought permeate the attitudes of the main characters, especially Lilly.That being said, this is somewhat second-rate Lawrence. It's a very bitty novel: it was written in haste, sections completed then left for a considerable amount of time. And it reads like that. Few of the characters are convincingly drawn, others appear then disappear without reason and without contributing to the novel in any meaningful way. The strength of the prose is variable, with large sections of the novel stagnating as a result.One for those interested in reading Lawrence's lesser-known works, but I should imagine a turn-off for those trying him out for the first time.G Rodger
Woeful. I have been reading Cornwell for about a decade now and in the 1990's I thought of her as one of the very best of the best writers out there. Her first 5 or 6 novels were tremendous but since then she has slowly tapered off into mediocrity and this book - Trace - represents an all-time low.The thing that got me was the level of the writing, it just seemed so flat and lifeless. I found it repetitive in the first chapter when Scarpetta is saying to herself that "she should have been told....". It just seemed so ordinary, almost as if someone else was writing this book and not a talented novelist like Cornwell.
Disappointing. I was really curious about Angela Davis,but I found this book really boring. It seemed really clinical and dry. I've read alot of autobiographies,and this one was really disappointing. She never really opened up
Hiro's Worst Book. I have read Dilip Hiro's other books, which I am a big fan of, and this one is terrible. It is totally biased against America. It seems that Hiro is questioning Bin Laden's and Al Qaeda's involvement in the 9/11 events. He also seems to have a soft spot in his heart for the Taleban regime, and defends them for not turning over Bin Laden to the US.The historical background he gives on the different nations and religion of the region is excellent and well written. When the book gets into the time of the 20th century and later, it seems that Hiro sides with the radicals, or makes excuses for their actions.America and the West are not perfect, and are part of the cycle of violence in the middle east, but to totally dicredit all of our policies and actions is rediculous. I do not recommend this book, unless you like Al Qaeda and the Taleban
A Conflicted Review. My review of this book is somewhat conflicted.  While I would state it would make a good book if you did not know anything about Windows 2000 Security, I find that it fails as a preparation for the 70-214 exam.I read some of the paragraph length sentences to others at work, and they too got a chuckle out of it.  The simplest of items are presented in a wordiness that would make reading Our Mutual Friend or even War and Peace akin to glancing through the Sunday comics.  At the same time, many items that should be the meat of the book are glossed over in an almost trivial manner.If this were simply a training manual, it would have received 3 or even 4 stars.  While Windows NT 4.0 Server can be considered archaic, not even a full page in this text is given to security concerns during the upgrade procedure from NT 4.0 to 2000.I would heartily suggest brushing up on upgrade issues for the exam if this book is to be your sole study guide.  With only 50 questions on the exam, it would not take many NT 4.0 questions to blow your chance at passing the 70-214 exam
Boring. I could not get into this book.  The storyline was dull and so were the characters.  Not recommended
A broad book, but lacking in details. The book covers a broad range of problems in machine design but lacks clear explanations and citations.  Often times in sample problems the author's solution skips crucial steps or fails to cite information.  The section on fasteners is lacking as well.  It neglects to mention counterfeit fasteners and their implications in recent years.  It also does not mention AN or NAS fasteners.  Too many coeficients are taken blindy from charts which are not cited.  This makes the problems in the book little more than blind "plug & chug" type problems.  One might expect this from a first or second edition high school book, but not a fourth edition college text
Beware:  Difficult Read. Perhaps this book explains Schopenhauer with amazing clarity and detail, but I couldn't make it past the first 50 pages.  It's just one multi-page paragraph after another.  The author needs to learn the concept of whitespace.The introduction to "Essays and Aphorisms" provides a concise look at Schopenhauer for the casual reader
get your nose out of your navel and see the world around you. This man is another example of our over-affluent society's attempt to distract itself from existential angst via the myth that we should all be happy and feel good. Deepak Chopra has grown very rich catering to the alienation of misguided Marin County yuppies. Sleep is important, as is taking care of our bodies and minds, but do we need a smarmy swami to tell us this? Basic common sense (drink a lot of water...) is sugar-coated in pseudo-spiritual jargon, insulting the intelligence of anyone other than self-help-junkies and cult-bait. Can't sleep? Use the 17 bucks to buy a real book, and read it in bed. Or buy a vibrator
That's It. Ms.Steel is truly the Queen of repition. She needs to get some new editors and listen to them or unplug her word processeor. I see that is the ongoing critism of her books. I swore I was never going to read another of her soaps(I can't stand those either) but this given to me by friends that said it was sooo good.  I'll stick with the authours I know I like from now on. And I hope she finds some new descriptions to use besides impeccably and exquisite/exquisitely, she has worn these out. BUT she's laughing all the way to her banks and investment brokers
Oreilly losing quality. This book as has been said "is a completely different book and not worthy of being called the second edition of such a good book". Oreilly has dissapointed me for the first time, since most oreilly perl books are excellent value and of a high quality. Instead as in the first edition that covers a good range of advanced topics this book chooses some rare and obscure ones. This book is of little use to the programmer whom has ever picked up the cook book or perl programming by same publisher. Unfortunely for me I did not have the chance to see the book in person, or a truthful review.
Not at all colorful or fun to read for parents or students. We have this book - in fact, we have had it for six years and have never used it.  I have tried, but it is too boring to use.  Poetry should be colorful and beautiful.  Not page after page of poetic text to read.  I suggest getting some classic poetry books - full of color and pictures - and reading the beautiful words to your children.  This book is one to skip
You do plan to have Chain Masters on your Chain Master Tour?. You gotta love a book called "Master of Chains" which deprives you of anything even remotely resembling a Master of Chains until the last 50 pages of text. Oh wait... no you don't. Lebow destroys the nice tapestries he managed to weave with decent dramatic prose by tripping through the worst action writing I've ever seen.As with most of the D&D novels: the editor assigned to this book is completely incompetent and has no business working in professional publishing.
The CD doesn't run on a Mac. I wish I could review the book but I can't. I have a Mac and can't run the CD. I have totally wasted my money.Almost every nursing book I've bought in the last two years has had a CD and every one of them has worked. I just went back through the description on Amazon and can't find a reference to the fact that you have to be running windows. So if you have a Mac stay away from this book
Fabrications. Helllo!  I am Mambo Racine Sans Bout, the same Mambo Racine about whom Ross Heaven has so many nice things to say in his book, "Vodou Shaman".  It is with some regret that I must warn the prospective reader that most of what is in this book never actually happened - Ross is willing to say anything for a buck, apparently.  He never let me see what he was writing until the book was published, and I never imagined he would make up so many stories!  Now that I have refused to support his activities he is very angry with me, but the fact remains that this book is 99% BUNK.  [...
I would never recommend. his biggest advice - a rooming house.  For one good luck finding a house that has proper zoning for this.  Politicians and neighborhoods hate these things.  Not to mention the nightmare of the transient types you will attract.  Also it's pretty dated as it still recommends buying RTC properties.  The RTC died out years ago after the aftermath of the 80's real estate and S&amp;L crash
Don't buy this book. I really hate to pan a book because I have a lot of respect for the effort that goes into writing one but do yourself a favor and skip this one.I purchased it based on the rave reviews below and then when I recieved it I knew immediatly that I had to return it. Illustrator Gone Wild is a sophmoric effort. At best it's worth flipping through while in the book store but it's not worth taking home. If you've bothered to learn Illustrator from a class or a good book, such as Adobe's Classroom in a book series, then you all ready have the skills and knowledge to do everything in the book such as the chapter on making Kiss type. (Which I doubt you'll ever be called upon to do) But if you want to learn something about the details of making clean professional or even attractive art then you'll find this book lacking, as I did.The key thing that interested me in the book was the promised chapter on photo-realism and the review that said this book was like the WoW series only more project oriented. The details on photo-realism were so scant that one could pick up all this book had to say in 30 minutes of trying to trace and color a shiny metal object. This book's similarity to the WoW series ends at being a book with chapters, words and pictures. While it does offer more detail in steps to create art than WoW the projects it offers are the kind of thing you'd do on a Sunday afternoon for fun or for a friend's band who can't afford to pay you but not the kind of thing you'd show at work, in a portfolio or try to sell freelance
Miller's Motive For Bad Reporting. This book came out at the same time that Judith Miller was doing the incredibly bad reporting for the NYTimes that lead the US into the Iraq War. Much of her reporting on WMD spurred interest in her book and increased its sales. I wonder how much her incredibly bad reporting that the Times has now repudiated as false and misleading can be credited to unconscious credulousness centered on the knowledge that more WMD fear would increase her book sales
Long-winded for such a thin volume... I would've loved to have this information more succinct & to the point, it would have made a good article...unfortunately the author obviously attempted to stretch it out & pad it, which, in my opinion makes for a frustrating read.I give it 2 stars because it does contain some useful information, if you can tolerate & get past the author's overstated & condescending writing style
Don't waste your money. The paintings in this book were of very poor quality.  Some were even smeared.  Couldn't wait to send this back
A rather boring translation of the great Dreigroschenoper. One has to know and understand the original German text of the Dreigroschenoper to be really able to judge the quality of the English translations. This one, used among others by Helen Schneider on her album  with Weill songs, has nothing of the sarcasms of the German lyrics. Better  read the 1954 translation of Marc Blitzstein or the translation made by  Frank McGuinness in the early 1990s
Poor evidence of sources. Maguelonne Toussaint-Samat provides a rather feeble excuse for her limited bibliography and fails to provide adequate citations for many of her assertions. There is an obvious French slant on history throughout the book. And in some cases there appear to be insertions of &quot;local legends&quot; or Francophile dreams for which there is no other evidence than Toussaint-Samat's statement (i.e., fabricated quotations attributed to Charlemagne's biographer in the cheese story on pages 116-117 - look it up!). In a generalized, broad-spectrum work such as this it would be all but impossible to check every fact. But, that being said, the book contains hundreds if not thousands statements of fact and her uncritical (at best!) inclusion of information for which there is no evidence in the source cited brings the whole book, as an authoritative source, into question
What they didn't teach the writer about writing. While the "facts" in this book are interesting, it is such a difficult read.  How any editor let this book by is beyond me.  You can find out more about our society and the events of this period by visiting a retirement home as compared to reading this book.Paraphrasing that switches from first to third person and overall rambling makes this a terrible read.  This book reads like a high-school project
Superficial advice, save your money. This book was a big waste of money.  The information is so basic only a real novice would learn anything.  And don't believe the positive reviews  you read for Kelly's books.  It's obvious he wrote them himself, since no  one with a brain would praise the kind of junk he puts out
Ruination. Dear God in Heaven . What a dreary little effort this is and what a disappointment after A Simple Plan . GReat idea for a very short story. Bad idea for a novel . In the end  ( if you can finish the tome ) you'll be rooting for the plant to do its darnest and quickly
Making Meaning:  How Successful Business Deliver Meaningful Customer Experiences. I skimmed through the book and found it to be of little meaning.  There did not appear to be any substance to it.  I sent it back for refund.  I have never returned a book before this one.  I am not sure why this book was published.  Try again.
NASTY  SPRING. A friend of mine gave me this book to read, and I was shocked by the poems.  The words that can best describe them are DISTURBING AND PORNOGRAPHIC.  I was embarrassed to read them, and, believe me, I don't embarrass easily.  The poem "The First" is so sexually graphic that it belongs in an adult only book store, and should be so labeled.I like poetry that is uplifting, about traditional themes such as love (not just sex), the beauty of the natural world, etc.I gave this book back to my friend, and I cannot recommend it to anyone.Sincerely,Alex Charles
In the tradition of Kenneth Anger... Probably no biography is without some value, but this is one of the two worst Chaplin books published.  The comedian was hardly a perfect man, and there are things about him even a long-time fan might find bothersome, but much of this biography is trashy and filled with unsubstantiated ugly rumors.  David Robinson's CHAPLIN:  HIS LIFE AND ART, published twenty years ago, remains the best way to learn about Mr. Chaplin's complex life and work, while Glenn Mitchell's CHAPLIN ENCYCLOPEDIA I have found very helpful.  This book is best ignored and forgotten
Who's looking out for the sexually harrassed?. Glad I was able to borrow this rather than buy.  It his his show in a book.  By the way I have never seen such consistantly low ratings.  Could it be that the majority of his fans can't read?  I have to believe this guy makes a few bucks between his show, radio and books.  Why does he have to fall to the level of hawking factor crap on his show.  Even Hannity is above that.  I gave him 1 star above the default minimum for spelling and grammer. 0 for useful content
fairytaleaficcionado. interesting, well documented, with marvelous illustrations.Definitely a good buy for adults who still dream  of fairy tales characters. It is a pity that the collection does not include stories from "One thousand and one nights". Otherwise it will be perfect and complete.
Pretty worthless. I'm afraid this book is pretty useless as far as factual information goes. Few texts are properly cited and  John Paul I is quoted as saying all sorts of things--ie condemning Moses--which it's pretty hard to credit. Many of his public speeches are available and they don't support the contentions made. Both David Yallop's and John Cornwell's books cover the same material and are vastly better; though they write from very different perspectives
I need another book just to understand how to use this book!. I am currently entering my 3rd year of nursing, and of course, the school that i attend also requires the use of this hateful book.  I found it very difficult to use.  The only recommendation I have is, contact your instructors early enough and hope they help you to understand this demon
Avoid the book and movie. No thrills and a pointless plot marr what could have been a pretty decent story.The whole thing is based on who wants to kill Darby and why. And that is where it falls apart. The FBI or CIA could have easily investigated faster and easier then she could, and what is the point of trying to kill her?To bury what is already out in the open? The FBI, CIA and White House all had a copy. What are they trying to silence? Nothing at all. Perhaps if it were just for revenge the plot might not have collapsed on itself
this is ridiculous. I don't like fat people whether they are men or women.  Americans each too many calories and do not get enough exercise.  there is no Adonis complex.  i can't believe a guy actually spent his time looking through playgirl centerfolds to write a book.  buy a book on cycling or other exercise book... it'll be money, time and health better spent.  get outside and do something.
not so great if you're looking for accuracy. As a person who spent over 2 years in Ghana and became pretty familiar with Adinkra symbols...I was disappointed with this stamp kit.  I was excited when I saw this kit online but should have read the reviews before ordering as I see several other people felt let down too.  I can hardly believe that the author left out the most well loved Adinkra symbol of all, "Gye Nyame", a symbol about the power of God.  I really wish the author had put more effort into her research and included the names and accurate meanings of the symbols in the Twi language.  Bummer
Declining Significance of Race?. The book has a compelling argument, because many of us would like to think that racism is a thing of the past.  It takes away the responsibility from people to end racial inequality, because racism is no longer the cause.  I agree with Wilson that class inequality is bad and that it does impact African Americans.  However, there is a store of research showing that racial discrimination still plays a real, solid role in the continued marginalization of Blacks. You would be hard pressed to find an African American who has not experienced racism.  While, the book is not devoid of scholarship, it needs to be approached with caution.  Be critical of what you would like to be the case and seek out what is trully the case.
If you must read it, borrow it from the library. I just had a hard time reading/understanding/finishing this book. I did finally finish it because I wanted to know the mystery behind the author's father, but in the end the whole book was disappointing. I guess it's a matter of the book's structure. The author jumps from one time setting to another so often, it gets totally confusing! Also she intertwines different stories of different family members and other people in her life, that it's easy to confuse the characters. Some of the language sounds awkward, the curse words seem...forced. Also after a while, the author's unceasing bitterness towards life tended to grate on my nerves
Horrible Book. This is the worst finance book I have ever seen. For a book used for a MBA finance course it is not very helpful at all. If you are not a finance genius this book is definetly a no no. The examples leave you clueless and the theory is very general. Dare to try and solve the unrealistic sample problems at the end of the chapters, and a lot of the solutions in the solutions manual are WRONG! The professor who taught the Finance class, who has been in the field all his life and has a doctorate degree in finance admits this book is garbage and not appropriate for the MBA; beacuse of this we did not even use the book for his course. This is a very expensive and huge book and so not worth the price. I learned nothing
Abridged. While it doesn't indicate it, this is a heavily abridged version of the story, and pretty much just deals with the elements contained in the 2002 film.  It's still a good story, but gets 2 stars for not indicating that it's abridged, and because even at 1400 pages, the full unedited story by Dumas is MUCH richer and makes for a much more satisfying story.  Do not cheat yourself of that satisfaction by settling for 1/3 of the story
Too narrow minded. The author spoke only from her point of view, which was Midwestern and Christian.  She devoted a huge section to church weddings, and a tiny section for any other kind, which did not help me at all.  Also, she kept talking about NOT having a wedding outdoors, which doesn't make any nature-loving bride happy, nor does it give a California bride tips on planning her outdoor wedding.  Thirdly, this book doesn't include many ethnic or cultural tips and traditions (except for the tiny part on the Jewish wedding).  Try the Unoffical Guide to planning your Wedding or the Dummies book instead
Just dreadful!. As much fun as sitting in your accountant's office with your lap full of tax receipts. Of course, there are worse things in life, but please, remind me of what they are. Better yet, don't remind me!
Feeble Heart Rate Training. This book tries to do too much: it wants to be a heart rate training book AND a book about training for sporting events.  The book is only 200 pages...get the picture?   The book provides cursory information on training for various sports: walking, running, cycling, in-line skating, and  triathlon.  Obviously, if you really wanted to learn how to train  competitively for these sports, this ISN'T the book for you.  If you're  looking for a book that tells you how to create a workout you can do at a  health club on a stair-climbing machine or elliptical trainer, etc....this is  NOT the book for you.  Sure, there's a chapter on "group" exercise (i.e.  aerobic class), but it FAR from practical.  The introductory chapters  merely delineate the heart zones rather than offering suggestions for  combining them meaningfully or providing progressive programs.  The book  simply tries to cover too much in order to increase its market
Title should be Ross Jackson Rambles. I was so disappointed in this book that I put it aside for several years. Finally, this weekend, I picked it back up and read it cover to cover, just out of curiousity. It's kind of interesting, but it's not what it proclaims itself to be.I originally found it by doing a search for "co-housing" and/or "ecovillages". Seeing the title, "And We ARE Doing It! Building an Ecovillage Future", and seeing that it even had a hammer and nails on the cover, I wrongly assumed that it would be about the actual building of an ecovillage. I was curious to see another insight into structures chosen and rejected, and what form of internal governance they chose and why. Well, this book has almost none of that.Rather, this slim booklet is JT Ross Jackson's rambling musings about how Gaiacorp and Gaia Trust came to be. Just as he gets to the topic of co-housing, he makes a radical departure and devotes all of chapter 4 to his mystical and paranormal experiences with a spiritual awakening during a brief trip to India. At that point, I really felt like he'd lost a lot of credility to a wider audience. He goes on to do a good job detailing some of the problems he and his wife encountered setting up some "Green" financial institutions. And he does a good job describing some of the problems with the WTO and MAI and out of control Trans-National Corporations. He paints a picture of a world about to crash ecconomically, socially, and environmentally through greed. It's a good message, but the folks that need to hear it aren't going to wade through the rest of the book to get to that part. Then, he ends the booklet with a few pages of badly written sci-fi. While I happen to like futuristic sci-fi, I found it sad that the only part of the book that touched on a vision of an ecovillage and the inherent internal policy issues, had to be one set in 2064 with some very unlikely touches.I really can't recommend this book. If you already tend towards "Green" and you want a fun read, this might be worth checking out. But, if you want info on actually establishing an ecovillage this book is going to disappoint you.
Really stretching the truth; is wastepaper really our most significant export?. This issue with Dorgan's use of statistics was highlighted in a major newspaper this week and I feel compelled to share it with those who may not question the information the author uses to reach his conclusions.The book's author, in complaining about America's export situation, complains "That's right. America's largest export (by volume) is now "wastepaper" mostly headed for China."The hopefully obvious problem with this statement is that quantifying exports by volume is absurd in a day when economies rely far more significantly on the production of services and high-value products such as computer chips.  A cubic yard of Dell laptops clearly has far more value than a cubic yard of wastepaper.  The newspaper author went on to cite US trade statistics showing that, on a dollar basis, wastepaper is a comparatively insignificant (though undeniably bulky) export.Relying on information as flimsy as this, one would be forced to conclude that the author is really stretching to find statistics to support his protectionist agenda.  Overall the book needs to be read with a very critical eye, and perhaps added to the next ship carrying the US's largest (by volume) export to China
Just not my cup of tea. I believe this book is strictly for scholars and Hindus. It is somewhat dry and unless you have an overwhelming interest in the subject can become quite dull. It does have excellent detail and structure for those interested in the subject but alas I have discovered I am not
